As these factors are strengthened through the continued practice of jhāna, they make possible a clearer awareness of sensory processes as they occur.
The factors of rapture, serenity, & equanimity, existing independently of the input of the five senses, make the mind less involved in sensory pleasures, less inclined to search for emotional satisfaction from them; the factors of mindfulness, investigation of phenomena, persistence, & concentration enable clear insight into the events that make up sensory perception.
To see events in the body & mind simply as that — events, conditioned, arising & passing away — creates a further sense of distance, disenchantment, & de-identification.
'Knowing & seeing the eye as it has come to be, knowing & seeing forms… eye-consciousness… eye-contact as they have come to be, knowing & seeing whatever arises conditioned by eye-contact — experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain — as it has come to be, one is uninfatuated with the eye… forms… eye-consciousness… eye-contact… whatever arises conditioned by eye-contact and is experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain…
'Knowing & seeing the ear… Knowing & seeing the nose… Knowing & seeing the tongue… Knowing & seeing the body…
'Knowing & seeing the intellect as it has come to be, knowing & seeing ideas… intellect-consciousness… intellect-contact as they have come to be, knowing & seeing whatever arises conditioned by mental contact — experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain — as it has come to be, one is uninfatuated with the intellect… ideas… intellect-consciousness… intellect-contact… whatever arises conditioned by intellect-contact and is experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain.
'For him — remaining uninfatuated, unconjoined, unconfused — the five aggregates for sustenance head toward future diminution.
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now this & now that — is abandoned by him.
His bodily disturbances & mental disturbances are abandoned.
His bodily torments & mental torments are abandoned.
His bodily distresses & mental distresses are abandoned.
He is sensitive both to ease of body & ease of awareness.
'Any view belonging to one who has come to be like this is his right view.
Any resolve, his right resolve.
Any effort, his right effort.
Any mindfulness, his right mindfulness.
Any concentration, his right concentration: just as earlier his actions, speech, & livelihood were already well-purified.
Thus for him the noble eightfold path goes to the culmination of its development… the four establishings of mindfulness go to the culmination of their development… the seven factors for Awakening go to the culmination of their development.
for him these two qualities occur in tandem: tranquility & insight.'
With the union of tranquility & insight at the culmination of the path, Awakening occurs.
The Canon records many instances where Awakening is sudden & total, and many where it occurs in stages: The reason for the difference isn't stated, but perhaps in sudden Awakening the mind goes through the various stages in quick succession.
At any rate, a brief look at the stages will give something of an idea of the dynamics of the mind's Unbinding.
The standard list of the stages gives four, and describes them in terms of how many of the ten Fetters the mind sheds: identity-views, uncertainty, grasping at habits & practices, sensual passion, irritation, passion for form, passion for formlessness, conceit, restlessness, & ignorance.
'There are in this community of monks, monks who, with the total ending of three Fetters, are Stream-winners, steadfast, never again destined for states of woe, headed for self-awakening…
'There are… monks who, with the total ending of three fetters and the waning of passion, aversion, & delusion, are Once-returners.
After returning only once to this world they will put an end to stress…
'There are… monks who, with the total ending of the first five Fetters, are due to be reborn, there to be totally unbound, never again to return from that world…
'There are… monks who are Arahants, whose effluents are ended, who have reached fulfillment, done the task, laid down the burden, attained the true goal, totally destroyed the fetter of becoming, and who are released through right gnosis.'
An alternative way of classifying the stages lists three:
'There is the case of the monk who has attained full accomplishment with regard to virtue, a modicum of accomplishment with regard to concentration, and a modicum with regard to discernment…
'There is the case of the monk who has attained full accomplishment with regard to virtue, full accomplishment with regard to concentration, and a modicum of accomplishment with regard to discernment…
'There is the case of the monk who has attained full accomplishment with regard to virtue, full accomplishment with regard to concentration, and full accomplishment with regard to discernment.
With the ending of the effluents, he remains in the effluentless release of awareness & release of discernment, having known and made them manifest for himself right in the present.'
As the text makes clear, Stream-winners and Once-returners are those who have fully developed virtue, Non-returners are those who have fully developed virtue & concentration, and Arahants are those who have fully developed all three parts of the path: virtue, concentration, & discernment.
This is not to say, however, that Stream-winners have not developed discernment to a fairly high degree.
In fact, the unvarying definition of Stream-winners is that they have 'seen with discernment,' and their level of Awakening is called the arising of the Dhamma eye.
What they see with this Dhamma eye is always expressed in the same terms:
Then Ven.
Assaji gave this exposition of Dhamma to Sāriputta the Wanderer:
Then to Sāriputta the wanderer, as he heard this exposition of Dhamma, there arose the dustless, stainless Dhamma eye: Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.
For this realization to occur, it must follow on a glimpse of what stands in opposition to 'all that is subject to origination,' i.e., a glimpse of the Unconditioned — deathlessness.
Sāriputta the wanderer went to Moggallāna the wanderer.
Moggallāna the wanderer saw him coming from afar and, on seeing him.
said, 'Bright are your faculties, my friend; pure your complexion, & clear.
Could it be that you have attained the Deathless?'
'Yes, my friend, I have…'
Although their Awakening is not yet complete, Stream-winners see enough of the Deathless to remove all uncertainty about the Buddha's teachings.
To Upāli the householder, as he was sitting right there, there arose the dustless, stainless Dhamma eye: Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.
Then — having seen the Dhamma, having reached the Dhamma, known the Dhamma, gained a footing in the Dhamma, having crossed over & beyond uncertainty, having had no more questioning — Upāli the householder gained fearlessness and became independent of others with regard to the Teacher's message.
Their glimpse of deathlessness is also enough to convince Stream-winners of the worthlessness of identity views that center on the five aggregates of sustenance, all of which come under the category of 'all that is subject to origination.'
'Māgandiya, it is just as if there were a blind man who couldn't see black objects… white… blue… yellow… red… the sun or the moon.
Now suppose that a certain man were to take a grimy, oil-stained rag and fool him, saying, “Here, my good man, is a white cloth — beautiful, spotless, & clean.” The blind man would take it and wear it.
'Then suppose his friends, companions, & relatives took him to a doctor, and the doctor treated him with medicine: purges from above & purges from below, ointments & counter-ointments, and treatments through the nose.
And thanks to the medicine his eyesight would appear & grow clear.
Then together with the arising of his eyesight, he would abandon whatever passion & delight he felt for that grimy, oil-stained rag.
And he would regard that man as an enemy & no friend at all, and think that he deserved to be killed.
“My gosh, how long have I been fooled, cheated, & deceived by that man & his grimy, oil-stained rag!
— 'Here, my good man, is a white cloth — beautiful, spotless, & clean.' 'In the same way, Māgandiya, if I were to teach you the Dhamma — this freedom from Disease, this Unbinding — and you on your part were to understand that freedom from Disease and see that Unbinding, then together with the arising of your eyesight, you would abandon whatever passion & delight you felt with regard for the five aggregates for sustenance.
And it would occur to you, “My gosh, how long have I been fooled, cheated, & deceived by this mind!
For in clinging, it was just form that I was clinging to… it was just feeling… just perception… just fabrications… just consciousness that I was clinging to.
With my clinging as condition, there is becoming… birth… aging & death… sorrow, lamentation, pains, distresses, & despairs all come into play.
And thus is the origination of this entire mass of stress.”'
Because they realize that their glimpse of the goal came through an act of discernment, Stream-winners no longer grasp at habits & practices.
What this means is that they no longer view mere adherence to habits & practices as a sufficient means to the goal in & of itself, although they continue to abide by the habits of right speech, action, & livelihood and by the practice of jhāna that fostered their discernment to begin with.
Having seen the efficacy of their own actions, they will never intentionally do evil again.
This is what perfects their virtue.
Still, they have yet to fully comprehend the practice of jhāna, and so their minds remain attached to the phenomena — with & without form — on which that practice is based.
As the texts say, they are bound by their incomplete mastery of concentration & discernment, and by seven remaining Fetters to the cycle of birth & death.
As for Non-returners, they have mastered jhāna to the extent that they can use it as a vantage point for watching the arising & passing away that occurs in reference to the five senses, while the pleasure, rapture, & equanimity it offers serve them as a fulcrum point for uprooting any desire for the pleasures of those five senses, together with all feelings of irritation that come when such desires are not met.
They, too, have seen the Deathless, but as with Stream-winners, their discernment is not yet fully comprehensive: They have yet to turn it on the act of seeing: the tools — tranquility & insight — that lead to that discernment, and the subtle levels of passion & delight that accompany it.
The texts express this point in a variety of ways.
Some passages simply list the Fetters that Non-returners have yet to abandon: passion for form, passion for formlessness, conceit, restlessness, & ignorance.
Others give more experiential accounts of what is happening in a Non-returner's mind.
From reading these latter accounts it is possible to see how the five Fetters in the list are interconnected: Although Non-returners shed attachment to identity views back when they attained Stream entry, they still have a lingering sense of the conceit 'I am', associated with the five aggregates for sustenance — possessing form & formless — as they function subtly in the arising of tranquility & insight as a process of becoming.
And while they have gained enough insight into the five senses to let go of any attachment to them, they still suffer from a certain amount of ignorance concerning the subtler level of becoming inherent in that conceit.
This leads to refined forms of passion & delight that keep them restless & bound to the sixth sense: the mind.
'There is the case, Ānanda, where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He regards whatever phenomena there that are connected with form, feeling, perceptions, fabrications, & consciousness as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a dissolution, empty, not self.
'He turns his mind away from those phenomena, and having done so, inclines his mind to the phenomenon of deathlessness: “This is peace, this is exquisite — the resolution of all fabrications; the relinquishing of all acquisitions; the ending of craving; dispassion; stopping; Unbinding.” Staying right there, he reaches the ending of the effluents.
Or, if not, then — through this very Dhamma-passion, this very Dhamma-delight, and from the total ending of the first five Fetters — he is due to be reborn, there to be totally unbound, never again to return from that world.
'
Several strands of our discussion converge at this passage.
To begin with, the act of discernment described here — inclining the mind to the Deathless — is identical with the object of concentration described by the Buddha at AN..
This would thus be an instance of tranquility occurring in concert with insight.
Secondly, as the passage points out, the crucial difference between Arahants and Non-returners is whether or not the mind feels passion & delight for this act of discernment.
Here the distinctions concerning sustenance & clinging raised at the beginning of Chapter III come subtly into play.
Any act of discernment, even on this level, comes under the five aggregates for sustenance, as composed of perception, fabrications, & consciousness.
If not fully seen for what it is, it can thus act as a phenomenon offering sustenance.
Any passion & delight for it — and these themselves are perceptions & fabrications — function as refined sustenance/clinging in the modes of views, mental absorption, & a sense of 'I am' involved in the act of discerning.
Thus the mind still contains the conditions for becoming on a refined level, and this stands in the way of its total freedom.
Ven.
Khemaka, a Non-returner, speaks shortly before he attains Arahantship: 'Just like the scent of a blue, red, or white lotus: If someone were to call it the scent of a petal or the scent of the color or the scent of a filament, would he be speaking correctly?'
'No, friend.'
'Then how would he describe it if he were describing it correctly?'
'…As the scent of the flower.'
'In the same way, friends, I don't say that this “I am” is form, nor that this “I am” is other than form.
I don't say that this “I am” is feeling… perception… fabrications… I don't say that this “I am” is consciousness, nor that this “I am” is other than consciousness.
It's just that for me the “I am” with regard to the five aggregates for sustenance has not been removed, although I don't regard them as “This is me.
'…Just like a cloth, spotted & stained, whose owners give it over to a washerman: The washerman scrubs it with salt earth or lye or cow dung and then rinses it in clear water.
Now even though the cloth is clean and spotless, it still has a slight, lingering residual scent of salt earth or lye or cow dung.
The washerman gives it to the owners, the owners put it away in a wicker box filled with incense, and its slight, lingering residual scent of salt earth, lye, or cow dung disappears.
'In the same way, even though a noble disciple has abandoned the five lower Fetters, he still has with regard to the five aggregates for sustenance a slight, lingering residual “I am” conceit, an “I am” desire, an “I am” obsession.
But at a later time he keeps focusing on the phenomena of arising & passing away with regard to the five aggregates of sustenance: “Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.” As he keeps focusing on the arising & passing away of these five aggregates for sustenance, the slight, lingering residual “I am” conceit, “I am” desire, “I am” obsession he had with regard to them disappears.'
Only when discernment is so fully developed & totally comprehensive that it has no lingering conceits, desires, or obsessions for anything — not even for the fabrications of passion & delight that condition subtle levels of becoming around the experience of the deathless — can it complete its emancipation from the six spheres of sensory contact that make up the All.
Moggallāna: 'Briefly, lord, to what extent is a monk — released through the ending of craving — utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, a follower of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate: foremost among human & heavenly beings?'
The Buddha: 'There is the case, Moggallāna, of the monk who has heard, “All things are unworthy of attachment.” Having heard that all things are unworthy of attachment, he fully knows every thing.
Fully knowing every thing, he fully comprehends every thing.
Fully comprehending every thing, then whatever feeling he experiences — pleasure, pain, neither pleasure nor pain — he keeps focusing on inconstancy with regard to it, keeps focusing on dispassion, focusing on stopping, focusing on relinquishing.
As he keeps focusing on inconstancy… dispassion… stopping… relinquishing with regard to that feeling, he is unsustained by anything in the world.
Unsustained, he is not agitated.
Unagitated, he is unbound right within.
He discerns: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.
'It's to this extent, Moggallāna, that a monk, in brief, is released through the ending of craving, utterly complete, utterly free from bonds, a follower of the utterly holy life, utterly consummate: foremost among human & heavenly beings.'
'Now when a monk discerns — as they actually are — the origin & passing away of the six spheres of contact, their allure, their drawbacks, & the emancipation from them, then he discerns what is superior to all these things.'
'With ignorance as condition, there occur fabrications; with fabrications as condition, consciousness; with consciousness as condition, name & form; with name & form as condition, the six sense spheres…
'But with the remainderless fading & stopping of ignorance, fabrications stop.
With the stopping of fabrications, consciousness stops.
With the stopping of consciousness, name & form… the six sense spheres… contact… feeling… craving… clinging… becoming… birth stops.
With the stopping of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, & distress all stop.
Thus is the stopping of this entire mass of stress.'
'That which arises in dependence on the eye as pleasure or joy, that is the allure of the eye.
Whatever of the eye are inconstant, stressful, & subject to change, that is the drawback of the eye.
Whatever is the subduing of passion & desire, the abandoning of passion & desire for the eye, that is the emancipation from the eye.
'
'This, the unsurpassed, foremost state of peace, has been realized by the Tathāgata: liberation, through lack of clinging/sustenance, having known, as they actually are, the origin, the passing away, the allure, the drawbacks of — and the emancipation from — the six spheres of contact.'
This unsurpassed, foremost state of peace that comes as the mind realizes emancipation from the All, is totally Unconditioned.
'There is, monks, an unborn — unbecome — unmade — uncompounded.
If there were not that unborn — unbecome — unmade — uncompounded, there would not be the case that emancipation from the born — become — made — compounded would be discerned.
But precisely because there is an unborn — unbecome — unmade — uncompounded, emancipation from the born — become — made — compounded is thus discerned.'
Having fully realized the Unconditioned, the mind no longer falls under the sway of stress & inconstancy.
No longer engrossed, it finds that its sense of participation & engagement in all the processes of experience disbands once & for all.
Nandaka: 'Sisters, it is just as if an adept butcher or butcher's apprentice, having killed a cow, were to carve it up with a sharp carving knife so that — without damaging the substance of the inner flesh, without damaging the substance of the outer hide — he would cut, sever, & detach only the skin muscles, connective tissues, & attachments in between; and having cut, severed, & detached the outer skin, and then covering the cow again with that very skin, he were to say that the cow was actually joined to the skin: Would he be speaking rightly?'
'No, sir.
Why is that?… because no matter how much he might say that the cow was actually joined to the skin, the cow would still be disjoined from the skin.'
'This simile, sisters, I have given to convey a message.
The message is this: The substance of the inner flesh stands for the six inner sense spheres; the substance of the outer hide stands for the six outer sense spheres.
The skin muscles, connective tissues, & attachments in between stand for passion & delight.
And the sharp knife stands for noble discernment, which cuts, severs, & detaches the defilements, fetters, & attachments in between.'
Although the senses & their objects are there just as before, the fundamental affective link that ties the mind to sensations has been cut.
And its cutting means unconditional freedom for the mind.
MahāKaccāyana: 'Concerning the brief statement the Blessed One made, after which he entered his dwelling without expounding the detailed meaning — i.e., “A monk should investigate in such a way that, his consciousness neither externally scattered & diffused, nor internally fixated, he would from lack of clinging/sustenance be unagitated.
When… from lack of clinging/sustenance he would be unagitated, there is no seed for the conditions of future birth, aging, death, or stress” — I understand the detailed meaning of this statement to be this:
'How is consciousness said to be scattered & diffused?
There is the case where a form is seen with the eye, and consciousness follows the drift of the image of the form, is tied to the attraction of the image of the form, is chained to the attraction of the image of the form, is fettered & joined to the attraction of the image of the form: Consciousness is said to be externally scattered & diffused.

'And how is consciousness said not to be externally scattered & diffused?
There is the case where a form is seen with the eye, and consciousness does not follow the drift of the image of the form, is not tied to… chained to… fettered, or joined to the attraction of the image of the form: Consciousness is said not to be externally scattered & diffused.

'And how is the mind said to be internally fixated?
There is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhāna.
His consciousness follows the drift of the rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, is tied to… chained… fettered, & joined to the attraction of the rapture & pleasure born of seclusion.
Or further… he enters & remains in the second jhāna.
His consciousness follows the drift of the rapture & pleasure born of concentration, is tied to… chained… fettered, & joined to the attraction of the rapture & pleasure born of concentration.
Or further… he enters & remains in the third jhāna… His consciousness follows the drift of the equanimity & pleasure… Or further… he enters & remains in the fourth jhāna.
His consciousness follows the drift of the neither pleasure nor pain, is tied to… chained to… fettered, & joined to the attraction of the neither pleasure nor pain: The mind is said to be internally fixated.
'And how is the mind said not to be internally fixated?
There is the case where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhāna.
His consciousness does not follow the drift of the rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, is not tied to… chained to… fettered, or joined to the rapture & pleasure born of seclusion.

'And how is agitation caused by clinging/sustenance?
There is the case of an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person… who assumes form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
His form changes & is unstable.
Because of the change & instability of his form, consciousness alters in accordance with the change in the form.
With the concomitant arising of agitation born from this alteration, the mind stays consumed.
And because of the consumption of awareness, he feels fearful, threatened, & solicitous.
It is thus, friends, that agitation is caused by clinging/sustenance.

'And how is non-agitation caused by lack of clinging/ sustenance?
There is the case of an instructed noble disciple… who does not assume form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
His form changes & is unstable, but consciousness does not for that reason alter in accordance with the change in form.
His mind is not consumed with any concomitant agitation born from such a change.
Because his awareness is not consumed, he does not feel fearful, threatened, or solicitous.
It is thus, friends, that non-agitation is caused by lack of clinging/sustenance.
'
'One who is dependent has wavering.
One who is independent has no wavering.
There being no wavering, there is calm.
There being calm, there is no desire.
There being no desire, there is no coming or going.
There being no coming or going, there is no passing away or arising.
There being no passing away or arising, there is neither a here nor a there nor a between-the-two.
This, just this, is the end of stress.'
'Sensing a feeling of pleasure, he discerns that it is fleeting, not grasped at, not relished.
Sensing a feeling of pain… Sensing a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, he discerns that it is fleeting, not grasped at, not relished.
Sensing a feeling of pleasure, he senses it disjoined from it.
Sensing a feeling of pain… Sensing a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, he senses it disjoined from it.
When sensing a feeling limited to the body, he discerns that “I am sensing a feeling limited to the body.” When sensing a feeling limited to life, he discerns that “I am sensing a feeling limited to life.” He discerns that “With the break-up of the body, after the termination of life, all that is experienced, not being relished, will grow cold right here.
'Just as an oil lamp burns in dependence on oil & wick; and from the termination of the oil & wick — and from not being provided any other sustenance — it goes out unnourished; even so, when sensing a feeling limited to the body, he discerns that “I am sensing a feeling limited to the body.” When sensing a feeling limited to life, he discerns that “I am sensing a feeling limited to life.” He discerns that “With the break-up of the body, after the termination of life, all that is sensed, not being relished, will grow cold right here.
'Thus a monk so endowed is endowed with the highest resolve for discernment, for this — the knowledge of the ending of all stress — is the highest noble discernment.
'His release, being founded on truth, does not fluctuate, for whatever is deceptive is false; Unbinding — the undeceptive — is true.
Thus a monk so endowed is endowed with the highest resolve for truth, for this — Unbinding, the undeceptive — is the highest noble truth.
'Whereas formerly he foolishly had taken on & brought to completion acquisitions, he has now abandoned them, their root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Thus a monk so endowed is endowed with the highest resolve for relinquishing, for this — the renunciation of all acquisitions — is the highest noble relinquishing.
'Whereas formerly he foolishly had greed — as well as desire & infatuation — he has now abandoned them, their root destroyed… not destined for future arising.
Whereas formerly he foolishly had malice — as well as ill-will & hatred — he has now abandoned them… Whereas formerly he foolishly had ignorance — as well as delusion & confusion — he has now abandoned them, their root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Thus a monk so endowed is endowed with the highest resolve for calm, for this — the calming of passions, aversions, & delusions — is the highest noble calm.
“One should not be negligent of discernment, should guard the truth, be devoted to relinquishing, and train only for calm.” Thus it was said, and in reference to this was it said.
' “He has been stilled where the currents of construing do not flow.
And when the currents of construing do not flow, he is said to be a sage at peace”: Thus it has been said.
With reference to what was it said?
“I am” is a construing.
“I am this” is a construing.
“I will be” is a construing.
“I will not be”… “I will be possessed of form”… “I will not be possessed of form”… “I will be percipient”… “I will not be percipient”… “I will be neither percipient nor non-percipient” is a construing.
Construing is a disease, construing is a cancer, construing is an arrow.
By going beyond all construing, he is called a sage at peace.
'Furthermore, a sage at peace isn't born, doesn't age, doesn't die, is unagitated and free from longing.
He doesn't have anything whereby he would be born.
Not being born, will he age?
Not aging, will he die?
Not dying, will he be agitated?
Not being agitated, for what will he long?
It was in reference to this that it was said, “He has been stilled where the currents of construing do not flow.
And when the currents of construing do not flow, he is said to be a sage at peace.”'
Sāriputta: 'And how, my friend, is a monk's mind well-composed by means of awareness?
“My mind is without passion” — his mind is well-composed by means of awareness.
“My mind is without aversion”… “My mind is without delusion”… “My mind is not subject to passion”… “to aversion”… “to delusion” — his mind is well-composed by means of awareness.
“My mind is destined not to return to states of sensuality”… “to states of form”… “to formless states” — his mind is well-composed by means of awareness.
'Even if powerful forms cognizable by the eye come into the visual range of a monk whose mind is thus rightly released, his mind is neither overpowered nor even engaged.
Being still, having reached imperturbability, he focuses on their passing away.
And even if powerful sounds… aromas… flavors… tactile sensations… Even if powerful ideas cognizable by the intellect come into the mental range of a monk whose mind is thus rightly released, his mind is neither overpowered nor even engaged.
Being still, having reached imperturbability, he focuses on their passing away.
'Just as if there were a stone column, sixteen spans tall, of which eight spans were rooted below ground, and then from the east there were to come a powerful wind storm: The column would not shiver nor quiver nor quake.
And then from the west… the north… the south there were to some a powerful wind storm: The column would not shiver nor quiver nor quake.
Why?
Because of the depth of the root and the well-buriedness of the stone column.
In the same way, my friend, even if powerful forms cognizable by the eye come into the visual range of a monk whose mind is thus rightly released… etc… his mind is neither overpowered nor even engaged.'
This radical freedom — unattached to sensation, untouched by the power of passion, aversion, & delusion — is the Unbinding experienced in the present life.
At one time the Buddha was living in Magadha, just below the hills, near a brahman village called Ekanala.
At that time the brahman Kasibharadvaja had yoked together a number of plows, for it was planting time.
The Buddha arose in the morning, and having dressed and taken up his bowl he went up to where the brahman Kasibharadvaja was working.
At that time the farmer was feeding his workers.
So the Buddha went up to where that feeding was taking place and stood to one side.
Seeing the Buddha standing for alms, the brahman Kasibharadvaja said this to him: “I, recluse, plow and sow; and only after having plowed and sown do I eat.
You too should plow and sow; and only after having plowed and sown should you eat.
“I do indeed plow and sow, brahman.” replied the Buddha, “And only after having plowed and sown do I eat.
“But, Gotama, we do not see your yoke and plow, nor your plowshare, oxen or goad.
And yet you say you plow and sow, and eat only after having plowed and sown!
And then the brahman Kasibharadvaja addressed the Buddha with this verse:
Then the brahman Kasibharadvaja filled a large bronze bowl with food and offered it to the Buddha: “Please eat, Gotama sir, this food!
You are indeed a farmer!
Surely you plow the plowing that yields the crop of deathlessness!
…
Although the compilers of the Pali Canon were not concerned with teaching the physical sciences, there are frequent passages where they cite the behavior of the physical universe, in similes or examples, to illustrate points of doctrine.
A number of these passages discuss questions of heat, motion, meteorology, the etiology of diseases, and so forth, in enough detail to show that a common theory underlies their explanation.
That theory centers on the concept of 'dhātu,' property or potential.
The physical properties presented in this theory are four: those of earth, liquid, heat, & wind.
Three of them — liquid, heat, & wind — are potentially active.
When they are aggravated, agitated or provoked — the Pali term here, 'pakuppati', is used also on the psychological level, where it means angered or upset — they act as the underlying cause for activity in nature.
Fire, for example, is said to occur when the heat property is provoked.
'There comes a time when the external heat property is provoked and consumes village, town & city, countryside & rural area; and then, coming to the edge of a green district, the edge of a road, the edge of a rocky district, to the water's edge, or to a lush, well-watered area, goes out from lack of sustenance.'
Once a fire has been provoked, it needs 'upādāna' — commonly translated as fuel — to continue burning.
Upādāna has other meanings besides fuel, though — one is the nourishment that sustains the life & growth of a tree — and as we will see below, wind can also function as a fire's upādāna.
Thus, 'sustenance' would seem to be a more precise translation for the term.
'How do you construe this, young man: Which fire would be more brilliant, luminous, & dazzling — that which burned in dependence on a sustenance of grass & timber, or that which burned in dependence on having relinquished a sustenance of grass & timber?'
'If it were possible, Gotama, for a fire to burn in dependence on having relinquished a sustenance of grass & timber, that fire would be the more brilliant, luminous, & dazzling.'
'It's impossible, young man, there is no way that a fire could burn in dependence on having relinquished a sustenance of grass & timber, aside from a feat of psychic power…'
'Just as a fire, Vaccha, burns with sustenance, and not without sustenance, even so I declare the rebirth of one who has sustenance, and not of one without sustenance.'
'But, Venerable Gotama, at the moment a flame is being swept on by the wind and goes a far distance, what do you say is its sustenance then?'
'Vaccha, when a flame is being swept on by the wind and goes a far distance, I say that it is wind-sustained.
The wind, Vaccha, is its sustenance at that time.'
'And at the moment when a being sets this body aside and has not yet attained another body, what do you say is its sustenance then?'
'Actually, Vaccha, when a being sets this body aside and has not yet attained another body, I say that it is craving-sustained.
Craving, Vaccha, is its sustenance at that time.'
Another meaning for upādāna is clinging, which suggests that, just as a tree clings to the soil that provides its sustenance, fire clings to its fuel.
Thus the above passage could also read, 'fire burns with clinging and not without clinging' — a characteristic of fire that was observed in other ancient Asian traditions, such as the Chinese I Ching, as well.
The clinging nature of fire is reflected in a number of other idioms used by the Pali Canon to describe its workings.
For one, an object that catches fire is said to get 'stuck' or to 'stick': Adherence is a two-way process.
'Just as a wing bone or tendon parings, monks, thrown into a fire don't catch fire, keep apart, turn aside, and are not drawn in; even so the heart of a monk who spends time often with a mind accustomed to focusing on the repulsive, doesn't stick to the engaging in the sexual act, keeps apart, turns aside, and is not drawn in, and remains either indifferent or repelled.'
The second side of the attachment — that fire, in sticking to something, gets stuck — is reflected in yet another idiom in the Pali Canon: When it leaves a piece of fuel it has been clinging to, it is said to be released.
'Just as fire… after being released from a house of reeds or a house of grass, burns even gabled houses, plastered, latched, shut against the wind; even so, all dangers that arise, arise from fools, and not from wise people; all disasters… all troubles that arise, arise from fools and not from wise people.'
This sense of fire's being entrapped as it burns echoes the stanza from the Ŝvetāśvatara Upaniṣad, quoted above, that refers to fire as being 'seized' when ignited by the friction of fire sticks.
Apparently the Buddhists were not alone in their time in seeing attachment & entrapment as they watched a fire burn.
And this would account for the way early Buddhist poetry tends to couple the image of an extinguished fire with the notion of freedom:
So, to summarize: The image of an extinguished fire carried no connotations of annihilation for the early Buddhists.
Rather, the aspects of fire that to them had significance for the mind-fire analogy are these: Fire, when burning, is in a state of agitation, dependence, attachment, & entrapment — both clinging & being stuck to its sustenance.
Extinguished, it becomes calm, independent, indeterminate, & unattached: It lets go of its sustenance and is released.
This same nexus of events, applied to the workings of the mind, occurs repeatedly in Canonical passages describing the attainment of the goal:
'One attached is unreleased; one unattached is released.
Should consciousness, when standing, stand attached to form, supported by form, established on form, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
Should consciousness, when standing, stand attached to feeling… to perception… to fabrications… it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
Were someone to say, “I will describe a coming, a going, a passing away, an arising, a growth, an increase, or a proliferation of consciousness apart from form, from feeling, from perception, from fabrications,” that would be impossible.
'If a monk abandons passion for the property of form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, then owing to the abandoning of passion, the support is cut off, and there is no base for consciousness.
Consciousness, thus unestablished, not proliferating, not performing any function, is released.
Owing to its release, it stands still.
Owing to its stillness, it is contented.
Owing to its contentment, it is not agitated.
Not agitated, he is totally “nibbāna-ed” right within.
He discerns that “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.”'
This being the set of events — stillness, independence, unattachment — associated with the extinguishing of a fire and the attainment of the goal, it would appear that of all the etymologies offered to explain the word 'nibbāna,' the one closest to its original connotations is that quoted by Buddhaghosa in The Path of Purification.
There he derives the word from the negative prefix 'nir,' plus 'vāna,' or binding*: 'Unbinding'.
Modern scholars have tended to scorn this derivation as fanciful, and they favor such hypotheses as 'blowing out,' 'not blowing' or 'covering.' But although these hypotheses may make sense in terms of modern Western ideas about fire, they are hardly relevant to the way nibbāna is used in the Canon.
Freedom, on the other hand, is more than relevant.
It is central, both in the context of ancient Indian theories of fire and in the psychological context of attaining the goal: 'Not agitated, he is totally unbound right within.'
So 'Unbinding' would seem to be the best equivalent for nibbāna we have in English.
What kind of unbinding?
We have already gained some idea — liberation from dependency & limitations, from agitation & death — but it turns out that nibbāna is not the only term the Buddha borrowed from the workings of fire to describe the workings of the mind.
Upādāna is another, and a survey of how he applied it to the mind will help to show what is loosed in the mind's unbinding and how.
This remarkable and powerful poem, found buried amid the rather dry linguistic commentary of the Niddesa, speaks to the dual themes of impermanence and selflessness.
In the later systematic psychology called Abhidhamma, these themes are developed into the doctrine of momentariness and the thorough enumeration of impersonal phenomena.
All human experience is ever-changing, but is known in fleeting moments of perceptive and affected consciousness.
Close awareness of these moments, using heightened attention which can be developed through concentration and insight meditation, reveal a plethora of non-personal mental factors arising and passing away in innumerable unique combinations.
The poem captures something of this dance of dharmas, yet steers us away from identifying it as “ours.” The elements out of which the mind so quickly constructs these glimpses of experience are universal — pleasure and pain, for example, are felt equally by all.
Every mental state is certainly unique, partly because each moment's sense data changes and partly because the causal matrix from which they arise, the personality, is so different for each person.
But the characteristics of the basic aggregates that comprise all human experience — materiality, feeling, perception, formations and consciousness — have remained similar from time immemorial.
Our subjective world is created by these states emerging in a moment of mind's awareness, and when no longer aware — in deep sleep or death, for example — our world dies with us..
The image of a tiny seed balancing on the point of a needle is striking — it so poignantly describes the exquisite precision of the human condition.
With the past long gone and the future unmanifest, all we have access to is the present moment, and this is only as accessible as we are attentive to it.
How much of our legacy we neglect when we fail to attend!
Meditation can train the mind to be as sharp as a needle point, to notice phenomena as fleeting as a flash of lightning.
So whether we live, years or only a few dozen, each life can be as infinitely deep as our mindfulness can penetrate.
The discourses of the Pali Canon make a frequent analogy between the workings of fire and those of the mind: The mind unawakened to the supreme goal is like a burning fire; the awakened mind, like a fire gone out.
The analogy is made both indirectly & directly: indirectly in the use of terminology borrowed from the physics of fire to describe mental events; directly in any number of metaphors:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One — while staying at Uruvelā on the bank of the Nerañjarā River in the shade of the Bodhi tree, newly awakened — was sitting in the shade of the Bodhi tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
After the passing of those seven days, on emerging from that concentration, he surveyed the world with the eye of an Awakened One.
As he did so, he saw living beings burning with the many fevers and aflame with the many fires born of passion, aversion, & delusion.
The All is aflame.
Which All is aflame?
The eye is aflame.
Forms are aflame.
Eye-consciousness is aflame.
Eye-contact is aflame.
And whatever there is that arises in dependence on eye-contact, experienced as pleasure, pain, or neither pleasure nor pain, that too is aflame.
Aflame with what?
Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion.
Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging, & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
The ear is aflame.
Sounds are aflame…
The nose is aflame.
Aromas are aflame…
The tongue is aflame.
Flavors are aflame…
The body is aflame.
Tactile sensations are aflame…
The intellect is aflame.
Ideas are aflame.
Intellect-consciousness is aflame.
Intellect-contact is aflame.
And whatever there is that arises in dependence on intellect-contact, experienced as pleasure, pain or neither pleasure nor pain, that too is aflame.
Aflame with what?
Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion.
Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging, & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
Not only is the extinguishing of passion, aversion, & delusion compared to the extinguishing of a fire, but so is the passing away of a person in whom they are extinguished.
When the Blessed One was totally gone out — simultaneously with the total going out — Ven.
Anuruddha uttered these stanzas:
The aim of this essay is to explore the implications of this imagery — to give a sense of what it was & was not intended to convey — by first making reference to the views concerning the physics of fire current in the Buddha's time.
This, short of an actual experience of Awakening — something no book can provide — seems the most natural approach for drawing the proper inferences from this imagery.
Otherwise, we are bound to interpret it in terms of our own views of how fire works, a mistake as misleading & anachronistic as that of painting a picture of the Buddha dressed as Albert Einstein or Isaac Newton.
The presentation here is more like a photo-mosaic than an exposition.
Quotations have been aligned & overlapped so as to reflect & expand on one another.
Comments have intentionally been kept to a bare minimum, so as to allow the quotations to speak for themselves.
The weakness of this approach is that it covers several fronts at once and can make its points only incrementally.
Its strength lies in its cumulative effect: revealing — beneath apparently disparate teachings — unifying patterns that might go unnoticed in a more linear narrative, much as satellite pictures can reveal buried archeological remains that would go unnoticed by a person standing on the ground.
One of the noteworthy features of the Pali Canon is that common patterns of thought & imagery shape the extemporaneous words of a wide variety of people reported within it.
Here we will hear the voices not only of the Buddha — the speaker in all passages from the Canon where none is identified — but also of lay people such as Citta, monks such as Vens.
Ānanda & MahāKaccāyana, and nuns such as Sisters Nandā, Sumedhā, & Pāṭācārā.
Each has his or her own style of expression, both in poetry & in prose, but they all speak from a similarity of background & experience that makes it possible to view their message as a single whole, in structure as well as content.
The structure we are most concerned with here centers on the image of extinguished fire and its implications for the word 'nibbāna' & related concepts.
Used with reference to fire, nibbāna means 'being out' or 'going out.' Used with reference to the mind, it refers to the final goal and to the goal's attainment.
Our essay into the cluster of meanings surrounding this word is meant to read like a journey of exploration, but a brief preview will help us keep track both of where we are in relation to the map provided by the Abstract, and of where we are going.
The first chapter surveys ancient Vedic ideas of fire as subsisting in a diffused state even when extinguished.
It then shows how the Buddha took an original approach to those ideas to illustrate the concept of nibbāna after death as referring not to eternal existence, but rather to absolute freedom from all constraints of time, space, & being.
The remaining three chapters deal with the concept of nibbāna in the present life.
Chapter II introduces a cluster of Buddhist ideas concerning the nature of burning fire — as agitated, clinging, bound, & dependent — and draws out the implications that these ideas have for what happens when a fire goes out and, in parallel fashion, when the mind attains nibbāna.
In particular, it concludes that of all the etymologies traditionally offered for nibbāna, Buddhaghosa's 'unbinding' is probably closest to the original connotations of the term.
Chapter III takes up the notion of clinging as it applies to the mind — as sensuality, views, habits & practices, and doctrines of the self — to show in detail what is loosened in the mind's unbinding, whereas Chapter IV shows how, by detailing the way in which the practice of virtue, concentration, & discernment frees the mind from its fetters.
This final chapter culminates in an array of passages from the texts that recapitulate the pattern of fire-&-freedom imagery covered in the preceding discussion.
If read reflectively, they also serve as reminders that their perspectives on the concept of nibbāna can best be connected only in light of that pattern.
We should note at the outset, though, that nibbāna is only one of the Buddhist goal's many names.
One section of the Canon lists, and the composite impression they convey is worth bearing in mind:
According to the Pali Canon — the earliest extant record of the Buddha's teachings — the fabrications of language cannot properly be used to describe anything outside of the realm of fabrication.
In one mode of analysis, this realm is divided into the six senses & their objects; in another mode, into the five aggregates of form, feeling, perception, fabrications, & consciousness.
However, passages in the Canon point to another realm — where the six senses & their objects cease — which can be experienced although not otherwise described, even in terms of existing, not existing, both, or neither.
The goal of Buddhist practice belongs to this second realm, and this of course raised problems for the Buddha in how to teach & describe that goal.
He solved the problem by illustrating the goal with similes & metaphors.
The best-known metaphor for the goal is the name nibbāna, which means the extinguishing of a fire.
Attempts to work out the implications of this metaphor have all too often taken it out of context.
Some writers, drawing on modern, everyday notions of fire, come to the conclusion that nibbāna implies extinction, as we feel that a fire goes out of existence when extinguished.
Others, however, note that the Vedas — ancient Indian religious texts that predate Buddhism by many thousands of years — describe fire as immortal: Even when extinguished it simply goes into hiding, in a latent, diffused state, only to be reborn when a new fire is lit.
These writers then assume that the Buddha accepted the Vedic theory in its entirety, and so maintain that nibbāna implies eternal existence.
The weakness of both these interpretations is that they do not take into account the way the Pali Canon describes the workings of fire, the limits beyond which no phenomenon may be described, and the precise implications that the Buddha himself drew from his metaphor in light of &.
The purpose of this essay is to place this metaphor in its original context to show what it was and was not meant to imply.
Any discussion of the way the Buddha used the term nibbāna must begin with the distinction that there are two levels of nibbāna.
The first is the nibbāna experienced by a person who has attained the goal and is still alive.
This is described metaphorically as the extinguishing of passion, aversion, & delusion.
The second is the nibbāna after death.
The simile for these two states is the distinction between a fire that has gone out but whose embers are still warm, and one so totally out that its embers are cold.
The Buddha used the views of fire current in his day in somewhat different ways when discussing these two levels of nibbāna, and so we must consider them separately.
To understand the implications of nibbāna in the present life, it is necessary to know something of the way in which fire is described in the Pali Canon.
There, fire is said to be caused by the excitation or agitation of the heat property.
To continue burning, it must have sustenance.
Its relationship to its sustenance is one of clinging, dependence, & entrapment.
When it goes out, the heat property is no longer agitated, and the fire is said to be freed.
Thus the metaphor of nibbāna in this case would have implications of calming together with release from dependencies, attachments, & bondage.
This in turn suggests that of all the attempts to describe the etymology of the word nibbāna, the closest is the one Buddhaghosa proposed in The Path of Purification: Un- + binding: Unbinding.
To understand further what is meant by the unbinding of the mind, it is also important to know that the word upādāna — the sustenance for the fire — also means clinging, and that according to the Buddha the mind has four forms of clinging that keep it in bondage: clinging to sensuality, to views, to precepts & practices, and to doctrines of the self.
In each case, the clinging is the passion & desire the mind feels for these things.
To overcome this clinging, then, the mind must see not only the drawbacks of these four objects of clinging, but, more importantly, the drawbacks of the act of passion & desire itself.
The mind does this by following a threefold training: virtue, concentration, & discernment.
Virtue provides the joy & freedom from remorse that are essential for concentration.
Concentration provides an internal basis of pleasure, rapture, equanimity, & singleness of mind that are not dependent on sensual objects, so that discernment can have the strength & stability it needs to cut through the mind's clingings.
Discernment functions by viewing these clingings as part of a causal chain: seeing their origin, their passing away, their allure, the drawbacks of their results, &, finally, emancipation from them.
Although the Canon reports cases where individuals cut through all four forms of clinging at the same time, the more common pattern is for discernment first to cut through sensual clinging by focusing on the inconstancy & stressfulness of all sensory objects and on the worthlessness of any passion or desire directed to them.
Thus freed, the mind can turn its discernment inward in a similar way to cut through its clinging to the practice of concentration itself, as well as to views in general and notions of 'self' in particular.
Once it no longer views experience in terms of self, the entire self/not-self dichotomy collapses.
The mind at this point attains Deathlessness, although there is no sense of 'I' in the attainment.
There is simply the realization, 'There is this.' From this point onward the mind experiences mental & physical phenomena with a sense of being dissociated from them.
One simile for this state is that of a hide removed from the carcass of a cow: Even if the hide is then placed back on the cow, one cannot say that it is attached as before, because the connective tissues that once held the hide to the carcass — in other words, passion & desire — have all been cut.
The person who has attained the goal — called a Tathāgata in some contexts, an arahant in others — thus lives out the remainder of his/her life in the world, but independent of it.
Death as experienced by a Tathāgata is described simply as, 'All this, no longer being relished, grows cold right here.' All attempts to describe the experience of nibbāna or the state of the Tathāgata after death — as existing, not existing, both, or neither — are refuted by the Buddha.
To explain his point, he again makes use of the metaphor of the extinguished fire, although here he draws on the Vedic view of latent fire as modified by Buddhist notions of what does and does not lie within the realm of valid description.
To describe the state of the Tathāgata's mind, there has to be a way of knowing what his/her consciousness is dependent on.
Here we must remember that, according to the texts, a meditator may develop intuitive powers through the practice of concentration enabling him/her to know the state of another person's mind, or the destination of that person after death.
To do so, though, that person's consciousness must be dwelling on a particular object, for it is only through knowledge of the object that the state of the mind can be known.
With ordinary people this is no problem, for ordinary consciousness is always dependent on one object or another, but with Tathāgatas this is impossible, for their consciousness is totally independent.
Because terms such as existing, not existing, both, or neither, apply only to what may be measured against a criterion of knowing, they cannot apply to the Tathāgata.
The Buddha borrows two points from the Vedic notion of fire to illustrate this point.
Even if one wants to assume that fire still exists after being extinguished, it is so subtle that it cannot be perceived, and so diffuse that it cannot be said to go to any one place or in any particular direction.
Just as notions of going east, west, north, or south do not apply to an extinguished fire, notions of existing and so forth do not apply to the Tathāgata after death.
As for the question of how nibbāna is experienced after death, the Buddha says that there is no limit in that experience by which it could be described.
The word 'limit' here is the important one.
In one of the ancient Vedic myths of creation, the universe starts when a limit appears that separates male from female, sky from earth.
Thus the implication of the Buddha's statement is that the experience of nibbāna is so free from even the most basic notions making up the universe that it lies beyond description.
This implication is borne out by other passages stating that there is nothing in that experience of the known universe — earth, water, wind, fire, sun, moon, darkness, coming, going, or stasis — at all.
Thus, when viewed in light of the way the Pali Canon describes the workings of fire and uses fire imagery to describe the workings of the mind, it is clear that the word nibbāna is primarily meant to convey notions of freedom: freedom in the present life from agitation, dependency, & clinging; and freedom after death from even the most basic concepts or limitations — such as existence, non-existence, both, or neither — that make up the describable universe.
Freed, disjoined, & released from ten things, the Tathāgata dwells with unrestricted awareness, Vāhuna.
Which ten?
Freed, disjoined, & released from form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness… birth… aging… death… stress*… defilement, he dwells with unrestricted awareness.
Just as a red, blue, or white lotus born in the water and growing in the water, rises up above the water and stands with no water adhering to it, in the same way the Tathāgata — freed, disjoined, & released from these ten things — dwells with unrestricted awareness.
Just as the great ocean has but one taste, the taste of salt, even so does this doctrine & discipline have but one taste: the taste of release.
These two verses point to the healing symbolism of the Buddha's teaching.
He is often pictured as the great physician who, seeing the suffering of all beings in the world, applies the medical formula of the four noble truths to ) describe the symptoms of suffering; ) investigate its specific causes; ) using this information, reverse the causes to conceive a cure; and finally ) lay out a flexible program of treatment that will lead a person out of affliction to lasting health of body and mind.
Notice that the medicine will only work if it is drunk.
The heart of the Buddhist message is not so much the theoretical analysis of the human condition, subtle and compelling as it is, but rather the practical effect of actually taking the cure.
The physician can do no more than offer us the medicine — it is up to each of us to drink of it ourselves.
This is where the practice of meditation and the moment-to-moment cultivation of wholesome mind states is so important.
Since all of our afflictions ultimately grow from our attachments, and from the clinging constructions we forge, the path to freedom or health will unfold as we learn to abandon these constructions and as they begin to wane.
The mechanism for this cure is wisdom, which emerges as we begin to meditate and hence see more clearly the nature of our constructed experience.
Being cured does not mean that the process of aging and dying simply stops.
But we can, through wisdom, be “untouched” by aging and death.
Health consists of a sufficiently deep understanding of the nature of things that we do not cling to anything in the world.
Non-attachment is itself the cure.
The venerable Ananda arose early one morning, and taking up his robe and bowl approached a certain settlement of nuns, where he sat down on a seat that had been prepared.
A number of nuns approached the venerable Ananda, and after greeting him, sat down to one side.
So seated, these nuns said this to the venerable Ananda: “There are here, Ananda sir, a number of nuns who abide with minds well established in the four foundations of mindfulness.
Their understanding is becoming ever greater and more excellent.
“So it is, Sisters, so it is!” replied Ananda.
“Indeed for anybody, Sisters, whether monk or nun, who abides with a mind well established in the four foundations of mindfulness — it is to be expected that their understanding becomes ever greater and more excellent.
Here, Ananda, a monk abides contemplating body as body — ardent, fully aware, mindful — leading away the unhappiness that comes from wanting the things of the world.
And for one who is abiding contemplating body as body, a bodily object arises, or bodily distress, or mental sluggishness, that scatters his mind outward.
Then the monk should direct his mind to some satisfactory image.
When the mind is directed to some satisfactory image, happiness is born.
From this happiness, joy is then born.
With a joyful mind, the body relaxes.
A relaxed body feels content, and the mind of one content becomes concentrated.
He then reflects: “The purpose for which I directed my my mind has been accomplished.
So now I shall withdraw.” He withdraws, and no longer thinks upon or thinks about.
He understands: “I am not thinking upon or thinking about.
Inwardly mindful, I am content.” This is directed meditation.
And what is undirected meditation?
Not directing his mind outward, a monk understands: “My mind is not directed outward.” He understands: “Not focused on before or after; free; undirected.” And he understands: “I abide observing body as body — ardent, fully aware, mindful — I am content.” This is undirected meditation.
And so, Ananda, I have taught directed meditation; and I have taught undirected meditation.
Whatever is to be done by a teacher with compassion for the welfare of students, that has been done by me out of compassion for you.
Here are the roots of trees.
Here are empty places.
Get down and meditate.
Don't be lazy.
Don't become one who is later remorseful.
This is my instruction to you.
This text is interesting for a number of reasons, though it seems not to be particularly well known or often referred to.
The framing story shows clearly that women were diligent and successful practitioners of insight meditation in the Buddha's time, and that they were well-supported in this pursuit.
Ananda, the Buddha's cousin and life-long assistant, was a great champion of the nuns' cause and would often visit communities of nuns to encourage their dhamma practice.
The Buddha seems to take the opportunity of Ananda's report to expound on some of the details of mindfulness technique.
What he says here about directed and undirected meditation is particularly interesting in light of the modern integration of metta practice with vipassana practice.
The Buddha seems to acknowledge that mindful awareness is sometimes difficult to come by, and that there are times when one's “mind becomes scattered” by the arising of challenging mind states.
His response here is not the warrior's tone sometimes found elsewhere in the texts, whereby the practitioner should just overcome the unwholesome thoughts and rouse up sufficient heroic energy to re-establish mindfulness.
Nor is it the gentler response we often hear in the dhamma hall, to just be aware of what is arising, without judgment of any kind, gently returning our attention to the breath or other primary object of meditation.
Rather the Buddha's suggestion is a deliberate re-direction of our attention to a “satisfactory image.
The pali words here are pasadaniya nimitta.
A nimitta is an image or manifestation that appears in the mind — something akin to a sign, a vision or an appearance of an object in the “mind's eye.” It is the term used in visualization meditations, and even has a slight connotation of “conjuring up” something in the mind.
The adjective pasadaniya is translated by Woodward in the PTS edition as “pleasurable,” but this sort of term is too easily misconstrued in Buddhist contexts.
I don't think the Buddha is suggesting here that we seek something pleasant in order to avoid the arising discomfort, but is rather suggesting a short term strategy for the practical disarming of the mind's defense mechanisms.
The commentator Buddhaghosa suggest that the image of the Buddha might be an example of a satisfactory image, but probably anything wholesome and not productive of strong craving will do.
The idea is just to re-direct the mind to flow around the obstacle that has appeared, but not to use something that will itself become another obstacle.
The practical effect of this re-direction of attention is the natural calming of the mind and relaxation of the body.
Only from tranquillity can true alertness arise — otherwise the mind's attentiveness is just busy or restless.
But as the ensuing passage confirms, this excursion into the deliberate cultivation of a specific image can be abandoned as soon as its mission has been fulfilled.
Insight meditation has never been about cultivating blissful states of mind or body for their own sake.
But as a skillful means for helping our understanding “become ever greater and more excellent,” it seems to be a useful technique.
I think we need to rely upon the guidance of experienced meditation teachers, however, to help us discern when it is appropriate to apply this strategy.
The mind is so capricious: it may turn to a more pleasurable object of awareness just to escape the growing pains of evolving insight; or it may mislead itself into thinking it is practicing undirected meditation when it is actually just “spacing out.
One important thing to notice about this passage is that the undirected meditation is occurring squarely in the context of the foundations of mindfulness.
This is not “object-less awareness”, or the “awareness of awareness itself” that is mentioned in some traditions.
The meditator understands his awareness to be free and undirected, while contemplating body as body, feeling as feeling, mind as mind and mental states as mental states.
What distinguishes undirected meditation from directed meditation is simply the role of intention in the process.
Alas, this cautionary tale does not have the happy ending we would like of such fables.
In fact, as a childhood fan of Curious George and with a certain affection for this foolish monkey, I could not bring myself to translate what the hunter does to him upon his arrival.
The Buddha was not one to pull any punches, especially when an important point of training for the monks was at stake.
The story is taken from the Satipatthana Samyuttam, a collection of discourses which discuss the Foundations of Mindfulness, root teachings of the vipassana meditation tradition.
The message is one that has much to do with the application of “wise attention”, and involves changing one's frame of reference through which sense experience is received and processed.
If we give our attention to the appeal or the pleasurableness that accompanies sensory experience, then we are necessarily caught by the perceptual object.
There can be no freedom of mind, because we are subtly yearning for more gratification than the transient object is capable of delivering.
Instead of satisfying our desires, such experience merely stirs up more desire.
This is the situation most of us take as normal — we seek satisfaction of desire through the pursuit of pleasure in the realms of the senses.
The monastic ideal that so thoroughly shaped the flavor of early Buddhism involves a wholly different way of relating to experience.
The idea is not that monks are to avoid or ignore the data that comes in through the five sense doors — indeed this is hardly possible, since all of our sensory experience must pass through these gateways.
Rather the instruction is about not getting attached to sense pleasures, as the poor monkey gets stuck to the monkey trap.
Sense data itself is not harmful, but the sweetness of pleasure in which each sense input is wrapped is the factor that gets us caught, due to our “foolish and greedy nature.
The difference in strategy, where a monk is “wandering in the pastures” of the four foundations of mindfulness, is the presence of equanimity.
Vipassana meditation trains us to attend more dispassionately to the nuances of experience.
When we simply observe, “mindful and fully aware,” then we begin to undermine the mechanisms by which the mind gets stuck to the objects of our experience.
Upādāna carries both of its meanings — clinging & sustenance — when applied to the mind.
It refers on the one hand both to mental clinging & to the object clung to, and on the other to both the act of taking mental sustenance & the sustenance itself.
This, of course, raises the question, 'Sustenance for what?' In the description of dependent co-arising, upādāna forms the condition for becoming and, through becoming, for birth, aging, death, and the entire mass of suffering & stress.
Thus the answer: 'Sustenance for becoming' & its attendant ills.
'Just as if a great mass of fire, of ten… twenty… thirty or forty cartloads of timber were burning, and into it a man would periodically throw dried grass, dried cow dung, & dried timber, so that the great mass of fire — thus nourished, thus sustained — would burn for a long, long time; even so, monks, in one who keeps focusing on the allure of those phenomena that offer sustenance, craving develops; with craving as condition, sustenance; with sustenance as condition, becoming; with becoming as condition, birth; with birth as condition, aging, illness & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all come into play.
Thus is the origin of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
'Just as if a great mass of fire… were burning, into which a man simply would not periodically throw dried grass, dried cow dung, or dried timber, so that the great mass of fire — its original sustenance being consumed, and no other being offered — would, without nourishment, go out; even so, monks, in one who keeps focusing on the drawbacks of those phenomena that offer sustenance, craving stops.
From the stopping of craving, sustenance stops.
From the stopping of sustenance, becoming… birth… aging, illness & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all stop.
Thus is the stopping of this entire mass of suffering & stress.'
The Buddha made a distinction between phenomena that offer sustenance & the sustenance itself.

'And what, monks, are phenomena that offer sustenance?
What is sustenance?
Form, monks, is a phenomenon offering sustenance.
Any desire or passion related to it, is sustenance related to it.
Feeling… Perception… Fabrications… Consciousness is a phenomenon offering sustenance.
Any desire or passion related to it, is sustenance related to it.'
Thus passion & desire are both the act of taking sustenance and the sustenance itself, while form, feeling, perception, fabrications, & consciousness simply offer the opportunity for them to occur.
Alternatively, we can translate the distinction as one between clingable phenomena & the clinging itself.
'And what, monks, are clingable phenomena?
What is clinging?
Form, monks, is a clingable phenomenon.
Any desire or passion related to it, is clinging related to it.
Feeling… Perception… Fabrications… Consciousness is a clingable phenomenon.
Any desire or passion related to it, is clinging related to it.'
In this case, passion & desire are the act of clinging and the object clung to, while form, feeling, & the rest simply offer the opportunity for them to occur.
Still, the two sides of this distinction are so closely interrelated that they are hardly distinct at all.
Visākha: 'Is it the case that clinging/sustenance is the same thing as the five aggregates for clinging/sustenance, or is it something separate?'
Sister Dhammadinnā: 'Neither is clinging/sustenance the same thing as the five aggregates for clinging/ sustenance, my friend, nor is it something separate.
Whatever desire & passion there is with regard to the five aggregates for clinging/sustenance, that is the clinging/sustenance there.'
here may relate to the fire image, as khandha can also mean the trunk of a tree.)
The desire & passion for these five aggregates can take any of four forms.

'Monks, there are four sustenance for becoming.
Which four?
Sensuality as a form of sustenance, views as a form of sustenance, habits & practices as a form of sustenance, doctrines of the self as a form of sustenance.'
These four modes of sustenance act as the focus for many of the passages in the Canon describing the attainment of the goal.
Because they are so closely related to the notion of nibbāna — they are the binding loosened in the unbinding of the mind — each of them deserves to be considered in detail.
First, sensuality.
The Buddha recommended relinquishing attachment to sensuality, not because sensual pleasures are in any way evil, but because the attachment itself is dangerous: both in terms of the pain experienced when a relished pleasure inevitably ends, and in terms of the detrimental influence such attachment can have on a person's actions — and thus on his or her future condition.
'It's with a cause, monks, that sensual thinking occurs, and not without a cause… And how is it, monks, that sensual thinking occurs with a cause and not without a cause?
In dependence on the property of sensuality there occurs the perception of sensuality.
In dependence on the perception of sensuality there occurs the resolve for sensuality… the desire for sensuality… the fever for sensuality… the quest for sensuality.
Questing for sensuality, monks, an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person conducts himself wrongly through three means: through body, through speech, & through mind…
'Just as if a man were to throw a burning firebrand into a dry, grassy wilderness and not quickly stamp it out with his hands & feet, and thus whatever animals inhabiting the grass & timber would come to ruin & loss; even so, monks, any contemplative or brāhman who does not quickly abandon, dispel, demolish, & wipe out of existence an out-of-tune, unskillful perception once it has arisen, will dwell in stress in the present life — threatened, despairing, & feverish — and on the break-up of the body, after death, can expect a bad destination.'
This is not to deny that sensual pleasures provide a certain form of happiness, but this happiness must be weighed against the greater pains & disappointments sensuality can bring.
'Now what is the allure of sensuality?
There are, monks, these five strings of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
Sounds cognizable via the ear… Aromas cognizable via the nose… Flavors cognizable via the tongue… Tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
Now whatever pleasure or joy arises in dependence on these five strings of sensuality, that is the allure of sensuality.
'And what is the drawback of sensuality?
There is the case where, on account of the occupation by which a clansman makes a living — whether checking or accounting or calculating or plowing or trading or cattle tending or archery or as a king's man, or whatever the occupation may be — he faces cold, he faces heat, being harassed by mosquitoes & flies, wind & sun & creeping things, dying from hunger & thirst.
'Now this drawback in the case of sensuality, this mass of stress visible here & now, has sensuality for its reason, sensuality for its source, sensuality for its cause, the reason being simply sensuality.
'If the clansman gains no wealth while thus working & striving & making effort, he sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats his breast, becomes distraught: “My work is in vain, my efforts are fruitless!” Now this drawback too in the case of sensuality, this mass of stress visible here & now, has sensuality for its reason…
'If the clansman gains wealth while thus working & striving & making effort, he experiences pain & distress in protecting it: “How will neither kings nor thieves make off with my property, nor fire burn it, nor water sweep it away, nor hateful heirs make off with it?” And as he thus guards and watches over his property, kings or thieves make off with it, or fire burns it, or water sweeps it away, or hateful heirs make off with it.
And he sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats his breast, becomes distraught: “What was mine is no more!” Now this drawback too in the case of sensuality, this mass of stress visible here & now, has sensuality for its reason…
'Furthermore, it is with sensuality for the reason, sensuality for the source, sensuality for the cause, the reason being simply sensuality, that kings quarrel with kings, nobles with nobles, brāhmans with brāhmans, householders with householders, mother with child, child with mother, father with child, child with father, brother with brother, sister with sister, brother with sister, sister with brother, friend with friend.
And then in their quarrels, brawls, & disputes, they attack one another with fists or with clods or with sticks or with knives, so that they incur death or deadly pain.
Now this drawback too in the case of sensuality, this mass of stress visible here & now, has sensuality for its reason…
'Furthermore, it is with sensuality for the reason, sensuality for the source… that, taking swords & shields and buckling on bows & quivers, charge into battle massed in double array while arrows & spears are flying and swords are flashing; and there they are wounded by arrows & spears, and their heads are cut off by swords, so that they incur death or deadly pain.
Now this drawback too in the case of sensuality, this mass of stress visible here & now, has sensuality for its reason…
'Furthermore, it is with sensuality for the reason, sensuality for the source… that, taking swords & shields and buckling on bows & quivers, charge slippery bastions while arrows & spears are flying and swords are flashing; and there they are splashed with boiling cow dung and crushed under heavy weights, and their heads are cut off by swords, so that they incur death or deadly pain.
Now this drawback too in the case of sensuality, this mass of stress visible here & now, has sensuality for its reason, sensuality for its source, sensuality for its cause, the reason being simply sensuality.'
Even the more honorable emotions that can develop from sensual attraction — such as love & personal devotion — ultimately lead to suffering & stress when one is inevitably parted from the person one loves.
'Once in this same Sāvatthi there was a certain man whose wife died.
Owing to her death he went mad, out of his mind and — wandering from street to street, crossroads to crossroads — would say, “Have you seen my wife?
Have you seen my wife?” From this it may be realized how from a dear one, owing to a dear one, comes sorrow & lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
'Once in this same Sāvatthi there was a wife who went to her relatives' home.
Her relatives, having separated her from her husband, wanted to give her to another against her will.
So she said to her husband, “These relatives of mine, having separated us, want to give me to another against my will,” whereupon he cut her in two and slashed himself open, thinking, “Dead we will be together.” And from this it may be realized how from a dear one, owing to a dear one, comes sorrow & lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.'
'How do you construe this, monks: Which is greater, the tears you have shed while transmigrating & wandering this long time — crying & weeping from being joined with what is displeasing, from being separated from what is pleasing — or the water in the four great oceans?'… 'This is the greater: The tears you have shed… Why is that?
From an inconstruable beginning, monks, comes transmigration.
A beginning point is not evident, though beings hindered by ignorance and fettered by craving are transmigrating & wandering on.
Long have you thus experienced stress, experienced pain, experienced loss, swelling the cemeteries — long enough to become disenchanted with all conditioned things, enough to become dispassionate, enough to be released.'
A theme recurrent throughout the Canon is that complete knowledge of any object does not end with an understanding of its allure & drawbacks, but goes on to comprehend what brings emancipation from the mental fetters based on both.
'And what is the emancipation from sensuality?
Whatever is the subduing of passion & desire, the abandoning of passion & desire for sensuality, that is the emancipation from sensuality.'

'There are forms, monks, cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
If a monk relishes them, welcomes them, & remains fastened to them, he is said to be a monk fettered by forms cognizable by the eye.
He has gone over to Māra's camp; he has come under Māra's power.
The Evil One can do with him as he will.'
'There are forms cognizable by the eye — agreeable… enticing.
If a monk relishes them, welcomes them, & remains fastened to them, then… his consciousness is dependent on them, is sustained by them.
With sustenance/clinging, the monk is not totally unbound…
'If he does not relish them, welcome them, or remain fastened to them, then… his consciousness is not dependent on them, is not sustained by them.
Without sustenance/clinging, the monk is totally unbound.'
Here again, we see the reciprocal nature of attachment: One is bound by what one relishes & latches onto — or rather, by the act of relishing & latching on, in and of itself.
Citta: 'Venerable sirs, it is just as if a black ox & a white ox were joined with a single collar or yoke.
If someone were to say, “The black ox is the fetter of the white ox, the white ox is the fetter of the black” — speaking this way, would he be speaking rightly?'
Some elder monks: 'No, householder.
The black ox is not the fetter of the white ox, nor is the white ox the fetter of the black.
The single collar or yoke by which they are joined: That is the fetter there.'
Citta: 'In the same way, the eye is not the fetter of forms, nor are forms the fetter of the eye.
Whatever desire & passion arises in dependence on the two of them: That is the fetter there.
The ear is not the fetter of sounds… The nose is not the fetter of aromas… The tongue is not the fetter of flavors… The body is not the fetter of tactile sensations… The intellect is not the fetter of ideas, nor are ideas the fetter of the intellect.
Whatever desire & passion arises in dependence on the two of them: That is the fetter there.'
In other words, neither the senses nor their objects are fetters for the mind.
Beautiful sights, sounds, & so forth, do not entrap it, nor do the senses themselves.
Instead, it is trapped by the act of desire & passion based on such things.
'Monks, there are these five strings of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable… enticing; sounds… aromas… flavors… tactile sensations cognizable via the body — agreeable… enticing.
But these are not sensuality.
They are called stings of sensuality in the discipline of the Noble Ones.
Thus sensual pleasures, which belong to the realm of form, are the 'clingable phenomena' that offer sustenance for the bond of desire & passion.
Or, to borrow an image from Ven.
Rāhula, they are the bait — as long as one is blind to their true nature — for falling into the trap of one's own craving & heedlessness.
For this reason, freedom from sensuality as a clinging/sustenance requires a two-pronged approach: to realize the true nature of the bait and to extricate oneself from the trap.
The first step involves examining the unattractive side of the human body, for as the Buddha says,
'Monks, I don't know of even one other form that stays in a man's mind and consumes it like the form of a woman… one other sound… smell… taste… touch that stays in a man's mind and consumes it like the touch of a woman.
The touch of a woman stays in a man's mind and consumes it.
'I don't know of even one other form that stays in a woman's mind and consumes it like the form of a man… one other sound… smell… taste… touch that stays in a woman's mind and consumes it like the touch of a man.
The touch of a man stays in a woman's mind and consumes it.'
'Just as if a sack with openings at both ends were full of various kinds of grain — wheat, rice, mung beans, kidney beans, sesame seeds, husked rice — and a man with good eyesight, pouring it out, were to reflect, “This is wheat.
This is rice.
These are mung beans.
These are kidney beans.
These are sesame seeds.
This is husked rice,” in the same way, monks, a monk reflects on this very body from the soles of the feet on up, from the crown of the head on down, surrounded by skin and full of various kinds of unclean things: “In this body there are head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, tendons, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, membranes, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, gorge, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, oil, saliva, mucus, fluid in the joints, urine”…
'Or again, as if he were to see a corpse cast away in a charnel ground — one day, two days, three days dead — bloated, livid & festering, he applies it to this very body, “This body, too: Such is its nature, such is its future, such its unavoidable fate”…
'Or again, as if he were to see a corpse cast away in a charnel ground, picked at by crows, vultures, & hawks; by dogs, hyenas, & various other creatures… a skeleton smeared with flesh & blood, connected with tendons… a fleshless skeleton smeared with blood, connected with tendons… a skeleton without flesh or blood, connected with tendons… bones detached from their tendons, scattered in all directions — here a hand bone, there a foot bone, here a shin bone, there a thigh bone, here a hip bone, there a back bone, here a rib, there a chest bone, here a shoulder bone, there a neck bone, here a jaw bone, there a tooth, here a skull… the bones whitened, somewhat like the color of shells… piled up, more than a year old… decomposed into a powder, he applies it to this very body, “This body, too: Such is its nature, such is its future, such its unavoidable fate.” So he abides contemplating the body in & of itself, internally, externally or both internally & externally.'
The purpose of this contemplation is not to develop a morbid fascination with the grotesque, but simply to correct the distortion of perception that tries to deny the unattractive aspects of the body and to admit only 'the sign of the beautiful' — its attractive side.
Now of course this contemplation has its dangers, for it can go overboard into states of aversion & depression, but these are not incurable.
At several points in the Canon, where the Buddha sees that monks have let the contemplation of foulness adversely affect their minds, he recommends that they calm their aversion by focusing on the in & out breath as a companion meditation.
Ultimately, as a more balanced perception of the body develops, one may make use of the second prong of the approach: turning one's attention from the object of the lust to the act of lust itself, seeing it as an act of mental fabrication — foolish, inconstant, & stressful — and so removing any sense of identification with it.
This, in turn, can calm the mind to an even deeper level and lead on to its Unbinding.
'For one who keeps focusing on the foulness, any obsession with passion for the property of beauty is abandoned.
For one who has mindfulness of breathing well-established to the fore within oneself, annoying external thoughts & inclinations don't exist.
For one who keeps focusing on the inconstancy of all fabrications, ignorance is abandoned, clear knowing arises.
Views are the second mode of clinging/sustenance.
And, as with the abandoning of attachment to sensuality, the abandoning of attachment to views can lead to an experience of Unbinding.
Attachment to views can block an experience of Unbinding in any of three major ways.
First, the content of the view itself may not be conducive to the arising of discernment and may even have a pernicious moral effect on one's actions, leading to an unfavorable rebirth.
I have heard that once the Blessed One was dwelling among the Koliyans… Then Puṇṇa the Koliyan, a bovine, and Seniya, a canine naked ascetic, approached the Blessed One.
On arrival, Puṇṇa the Koliyan bovine, bowing down to the Blessed One, sat to one side, while Seniya, the canine naked ascetic, exchanged courteous greetings with the Blessed One, and after an exchange of friendly greetings and courtesies, sat to one side, curling up like a dog.
While he was sitting there, Puṇṇa the Koliyan bovine said to the Blessed One, 'Sir, Seniya, this naked ascetic, is a canine, a doer-of-hard-tasks.
He eats food that is thrown on the ground.
He has long undertaken & conformed to that dog-practice.
What is his future destination, what is his future course?'
'There is the case where a person develops the dog-practice fully & perfectly… Having developed the dog-practice fully & perfectly, having developed a dog's virtue fully & perfectly, having developed a dog's mind fully & perfectly, having developed a dog's demeanor fully & perfectly, then on the break-up of the body, after death, he reappears in the company of dogs.
But if he is of such a view as, “By this virtue or practice or asceticism or holy life I will become a greater or lesser god,” that is his wrong view.
Now, Puṇṇa, there are two destinations for one with wrong view, I say: hell or the animal womb.
So the dog-practice, if perfected, leads him to the company of dogs; if defective, to hell.'
'Just as if in the last month of the hot season a māluva creeper pod were to burst open, and a māluva creeper seed were to fall at the foot of a sāla tree.
The deity living in the tree would become frightened, apprehensive, & anxious.
Her friends & companions, relatives & kin — garden deities, forest deities, tree deities, deities living in herbs, grass, & forest monarchs — would gather together to console her: “Have no fear, have no fear.
In all likelihood a peacock is sure to swallow this māluva creeper seed, or a deer will eat it, or a brush fire will burn it up, or woodsmen will pick it up, or termites will carry it off, and anyway it probably isn't really a seed.
'And then no peacock swallowed it, no deer ate it, no brush fire burned it up, no woodsmen picked it up, no termites carried it off, and it really was a seed.
Watered by a rain-laden cloud, it sprouted in due course and curled its soft, tender, downy tendril around the sāla tree.
'The thought occurred to the deity living in the sāla tree: “Now what future danger did my friends… foresee, that they gathered together to console me?… It's pleasant, the touch of this māluva creeper's soft, tender, downy tendril.
'Then the creeper, having enwrapped the sāla tree, having made a canopy over it, & cascading down around it, caused the massive limbs of the sāla tree to come crashing down.
The thought occurred to the deity living in the tree: “This was the future danger my friends… foresaw, that they gathered together to console me… It's because of that māluva creeper seed that I'm now experiencing sharp, burning pains.
'In the same way, monks, there are some contemplatives & brāhmans who hold to a doctrine, a view like this: “There is no harm in sensuality.” Thus they meet with their downfall through sensuality.
They consort with women wanderers who wear their hair coiled and long.
'The thought occurs to them: “Now what future danger do those contemplatives & brāhmans foresee that they teach the relinquishing & analysis of sensuality?
It's pleasant, the touch of this woman wanderer's soft, tender, downy arm.
'Thus they meet with their downfall through sensuality.
With the break-up of the body, after death, they will go to a bad bourn, destitution, the realm of the hungry shades, hell.
There they will experience sharp, burning pains.
The thought will occur to them: “This was the future danger those contemplatives & brāhmans foresaw that they taught the relinquishing & analysis of sensuality.
It's because of sensuality, as a result of sensuality, that we are now experiencing these sharp, burning pains.”'
Secondly, apart from the actual content of the views, a person attached to views is bound to get into disputes with those who hold opposing views, resulting in unwholesome mental states for the winners as well as the losers.
Thirdly, and more profoundly, attachment to views implicitly involves attachment to a sense of 'superior' & 'inferior,' and to the criteria used in measuring and making such evaluations.
As we saw in Chapter I, any measure or criterion acts as a limitation or bond on the mind.
An important point to notice is that attachment to views must be abandoned through knowledge, and not through skepticism, agnosticism, ignorance, or a mindless openness to all views.
This point is made clear in the Discourse of the Supreme Net.
There the Buddha gives a list of philosophical positions concerning the nature of the self, the cosmos, & the state of ultimate freedom in the immediate present.
The list is intended to be exhaustive — the 'net' in the title of the discourse — covering all possible views & positions on these subjects divided into ten categories, one of the categories — equivocation — including cases of agnosticism.
'There are, monks, some contemplatives & brāhmans who, being asked questions regarding this or that, resort to verbal contortions, to eel-like wriggling, on four grounds… There is the case of a certain contemplative or brāhman who does not discern as it actually is that “This is skillful,” or that “This is unskillful.” The thought occurs to him: “I don't discern as it actually is that 'This is skillful,' or that 'This is unskillful.' If I… were to declare that 'This is skillful,' or that 'This is unskillful,' desire, passion, aversion, or irritation would occur to me; that would be a falsehood for me.
Whatever would be a falsehood for me would be a distress for me.
Whatever would be a distress for me would be an obstacle for me.” So, out of fear of falsehood, a loathing for falsehood, he does not declare that “This is skillful,” or that “This is unskillful.” Being asked questions regarding this or that, he resorts to verbal contortions, to eel-like wriggling: “I don't think so.
I don't think in that way.
I don't think otherwise.
I don't think not.
I don't think not not.
' There is the case of a certain contemplative or brāhman who does not discern as it actually is that “This is skillful,” or that “This is unskillful”… “If I, not discerning as it actually is that 'This is skillful,' or that 'This is unskillful,' were to declare that 'This is skillful,' or that 'This is unskillful' — There are contemplatives & brāhmans who are pundits, subtle, skilled in debate, who prowl about like hair-splitting marksmen, as it were, shooting positions to pieces with their dialectic.
They might cross-question me, press me for reasons, rebuke me.
I might not be able to stand my ground, that would be a distress for me… an obstacle for me.” So, out of a fear for questioning, a loathing for questioning… he resorts to verbal contortions, to eel-like wriggling…
' There is the case of a certain contemplative or brāhman who is dull & exceedingly stupid.
Out of dullness & exceeding stupidity, he — being asked questions regarding this or that — resorts to verbal contortions, to eel-like wriggling: “If you ask me if there exists another world, if I thought that there exists another world, would I declare that to you?
I don't think so.
I don't think in that way.
I don't think otherwise.
I don't think not.
I don't think not not.
If you asked me if there isn't another world… both is & isn't… neither is nor isn't… if there are beings who transmigrate… if there aren't… both are & aren't… neither are nor aren't… if the Tathāgata exists after death… doesn't… both… neither… I don't think so.
I don't think in that way.
I don't think otherwise.
I don't think not.
I don't think not not.”'
Agnosticism, then, is not a way of abandoning standpoints but is simply another standpoint: Like all standpoints, it must be abandoned through knowledge.
The type of knowledge called for — in which standpoints are regarded, not in terms of their content, but as events in a causal chain — is indicated by the refrain that follows each of the ten categories of the Supreme Net.
'This, monks, the Tathāgata discerns.
And he discerns that these standpoints, thus seized, thus grasped at, lead to such & such a destination, to such & such a state in the world beyond.
And he discerns what is higher than this.
And yet discerning that, he does not grasp at that act of discerning.
And as he is not grasping at it, unbinding is experienced right within.
Knowing, as they have come to be, the origin, ending, allure, & drawbacks of feelings, along with the emancipation from feelings, the Tathāgata, monks — through lack of sustenance/ clinging — is released.'
Another list of speculative views — a set of ten positions summarizing the standard topics debated by the various schools of contemplatives in the Buddha's time — recurs frequently in the Canon.
Non-Buddhist debaters used it as a ready-made checklist for gauging an individual's positions on the controversial issues of the day and they often put it to the Buddha.
Invariably, he would reply that he did not hold to any of the ten positions.
'Seeing what drawback, then, is Master Gotama thus entirely dissociated from each of these ten positions?'
'Vaccha, the position that “the world is eternal” is a thicket of views, a wilderness of views, a contortion of views, a writhing of views, a fetter of views.
It is accompanied by suffering, distress, despair, & fever, and it does not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, stopping; to calm, direct knowledge, self-awakening, Unbinding.
'The position that “the world is not eternal”… “the world is finite”… “the world is infinite”… “the soul is the same thing as the body”… “the soul is one thing and the body another”… “after death a Tathāgata exists”… “after death a Tathāgata does not exist”… “after death a Tathāgata both exists & does not exist”… “after death a Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist”… does not lead to disenchantment, dispassion, stopping; to calm, direct knowledge, self-awakening, Unbinding.'
'Does Master Gotama have any position at all?'
'A “position,” Vaccha, is something that a Tathāgata has done away with.
What a Tathāgata sees is this: “Such is form, such its origin, such its disappearance; such is feeling, such its origin, such its disappearance; such is perception… such are fabrications… such is consciousness, such its origin, such its disappearance.” Because of this, I say, a Tathāgata — with the ending, fading out, stopping, renunciation & relinquishing of all construings, all excogitations, all I-making & my-making & obsessions with conceit — is, through lack of sustenance/clinging, released.'
The construings the Buddha relinquished include views not only in their full-blown form as specific positions, but also in their rudimentary form as the categories & relationships that the mind reads into experience.
This is a point he makes in his instructions to Bāhiya, which led immediately to the latter's attaining the goal.
When the mind imposes interpretations on its experience, it is engaging implicitly in system-building and all the limitations of location & relationship that system-building involves.
Only when it can free itself of those interpretations and the fetters they place on it, can it gain true freedom.
'Therefore, Bāhiya, you should train yourself thus: In reference to the seen, there will be only the seen.
In reference to the heard, only the heard.
In reference to the sensed, only the sensed.
In reference to the cognized, only the cognized.
That is how you should train yourself.
When for you there will be only the seen in reference to the seen… only the heard… only the sensed… only the cognized in reference to the cognized, then, Bāhiya, there is no you in connection with that.
When there is no you in connection with that, there is no you there.
When there is no you there, you are neither here nor yonder nor between the two.
This, just this, is the end of stress.'
Habits & practices.
The Canon mentions a variety of habits & practices — the third mode of clinging/sustenance.
Prominent among them are Brāhmanical rituals & Jain practices of self-torture, and according to the Commentary these are the habits & practices referred to in this context.
Yet although the goal will always remain out of reach as long as one remains attached to such practices, the abandonment of this attachment is never in & of itself sufficient for attaining the goal.
But there is another practice which, though a necessary part of the Buddhist path, can nevertheless offer sustenance for becoming; and which — as the object of attachment to be transcended — figures prominently in descriptions of the goal's attainment.
That practice is jhāna, or meditative absorption.
It might be argued that this is stretching the term, 'practice', a little far, but jhāna does not fall under any of the other three sustenances for becoming at all, and yet it definitely does function as such a sustenance, so there seems to be little choice but to place it here.
Different passages in the Canon number the levels of jhāna in different ways.
The standard description gives four, although the pure mindfulness & equanimity attained on the fourth level may further be applied to four progressively more & more refined formless sensations — termed the 'peaceful emancipations, formlessness beyond forms' — that altogether give eight levels, often referred to as the eight attainments.
A number of objects can serve as the basis for jhāna.
The breath is one, and an analysis of the Canon's description of the first stages of breath meditation will give an idea of what jhāna involves.
The first step is simply being mindful of the breath in the present:
'There is the case of a monk who, having gone to a forest, to the shade of a tree or to an empty building, sits down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect, & keeping mindfulness to the fore.
Always mindful, he breathes in; mindful he breathes out.
Then comes evaluation: He begins to discern variations in the breath: 
“Breathing in long, he discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long.' Or breathing in short, he discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, he discerns, 'I am breathing out short.' The remaining steps are willed, or determined: He 'trains himself,' first by manipulating his sense of conscious awareness, making it sensitive to the body as a whole.

'He trains himself, “I will breathe in sensitive to the entire body”… “I will breathe out sensitive to the entire body.
Now that he is aware of the body as a whole, he can begin to manipulate the physical sensations of which he is aware, calming them — i.e., calming the breath — so as to create a sense of rapture & ease.
'He trains himself, “I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication”… “I will breathe out calming bodily fabrication.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in sensitive to rapture”… “I, will breathe out sensitive to rapture.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in sensitive to pleasure”… “I will breathe out sensitive to pleasure.
Now that bodily processes are stilled, mental processes become apparent as they occur.
These too are calmed, leaving — as we will see below — a radiant awareness of the mind itself.
'He trains himself, “I will breathe in sensitive to mental fabrication”… “I will breathe out sensitive to mental fabrication.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in calming mental fabrication”… “I will to breathe out calming mental fabrication.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in sensitive to the mind”… “I will to breathe out sensitive to the mind”'…
The standard description of jhāna, however, does not refer to any particular object as its basis, but simply divides it into four levels determined by the way the mind relates to the object as it becomes more & more absorbed in it.
'Furthermore, monks, the monk — quite secluded from sensuality, secluded from unskillful qualities — enters and remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, so that nothing of his entire body is unpervaded by rapture & pleasure born from seclusion.
'Just as an adept bathman or bathman's apprentice would pour bath powder into a brass basin and knead it together, sprinkling it again & again with water, so that his ball of bath powder — saturated, moisture-laden, permeated within & without — would nevertheless not drip; even so, monks, the monk permeates… this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of seclusion.
And as he remains thus earnest, ardent, & intent, any longings related to the household life are abandoned, and with their abandoning his mind gathers & settles inwardly, unified & composed.
That is how a monk develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
'And furthermore, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, he enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of concentration, so that nothing of his entire body is unpervaded by rapture & pleasure born of concentration.
'Just like a lake with spring-water welling up from within, having no inflow from east, west, north, or south, and with the skies periodically supplying abundant showers, so that the cool fount of water welling up from within the lake would permeate & pervade, suffuse & fill it with cool waters, there being no part of the lake unpervaded by the cool waters; even so monks, the monk permeates… this very body with the rapture & pleasure born of concentration.
And as he remains thus earnest, ardent & intent… he develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
'And furthermore, with the fading of rapture, he remains equanimous, mindful, & alert, and senses pleasure with the body.
He enters & remains in the third jhāna, of which the Noble Ones declare, “Equanimous & mindful, he has a pleasant abiding.” He permeates & pervades, suffuses & fills this very body with the pleasure divested of rapture, so that nothing of his entire body is unpervaded by pleasure divested of rapture.
'Just as in a blue-, white-, or red-lotus pond, there may be some of the blue, white, or red lotuses that, born & growing in the water, stay immersed in the water and flourish without standing up out of the water, so that they are permeated & pervaded, suffused & filled with cool water from their roots to their tips, there being nothing of those blue, white, or red lotuses unpervaded by cool water; even so, monks, the monk permeates… this very body with the pleasure divested of rapture.
And as he remains thus earnest, ardent & intent… he develops mindfulness immersed in the body.
'And furthermore, with the abandoning of pleasure & stress — as with the earlier disappearance of joys & distress — he enters & remains in the fourth jhāna: purity of equanimity & mindfulness, neither pleasure nor stress.
He sits, permeating the body with a pure, bright awareness, so that nothing of his entire body is unpervaded by pure, bright awareness.
'Just as if a man were sitting covered from head to foot with a white cloth so that there would be no part of his body to which the white cloth did not extend; even so, monks, the monk sits, permeating the body with a pure, bright awareness.
And as he remains thus earnest, ardent, & intent… he develops mindfulness immersed in the body.'
'Directed thought' mentioned in the reference to the first level of jhāna corresponds, in the description of breath meditation, to the mindfulness directed to the breath in the present.
'Evaluation' corresponds to the discernment of variations in the breath, and to the manipulation of awareness & the breath so as to create a sense of rapture & pleasure throughout the body.
The still waters in the simile for the third level of jhāna, as opposed to the spring waters welling up in the second level, correspond to the stilling of mental fabrications.
And the pure, bright awareness in the fourth level corresponds to the stage of breath meditation where the meditator is sensitive to the mind.
Thus as the mind progresses through the first four levels of jhāna, it sheds the various mental activities surrounding its one object: Directed thought & evaluation are stilled, rapture fades, and pleasure is abandoned.
After reaching a state of pure, bright, mindful, equanimous awareness in the fourth level of jhāna, the mind can start shedding its perception of the form of its object, the space around its object, itself, & the lack of activity within itself.
This process takes four steps — the four formlessnesses beyond form — culminating in a state where perception is so refined that it can hardly be called perception at all.
'With the complete transcending of perceptions of form,
and the passing away of perceptions of resistance, and not attending to perceptions of diversity, “Infinite space,” one enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of space…
'With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of space, “Infinite consciousness,” one enters & remains in the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness…
'With the complete transcending of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, “There is nothing,” one enters & remains in the dimension of nothingness…
'With the complete transcending of the dimension of nothingness, one enters & remains in the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
To abandon attachment to jhāna as a sustenance for becoming means, not to stop practicing it, but rather to practice it without becoming engrossed in the sense of pleasure or equanimity it affords, so that one can discern its true nature for what it is.
When this had been said, Venerable Ānanda asked the Blessed One: 'In the case, lord, where a monk has reached the point that — “It should not be, it should not occur to me; it will not be, it will not occur to me.
What is, what has come to be, that I abandon” — he obtains equanimity.
Would this monk be totally unbound, or not?'
'A certain such monk might, Ānanda, and another might not.'
'What is the cause, what is the reason, whereby one might and another might not?'
'There is the case, Ānanda, where a monk has reached the point that — “It should not be, it should not occur to me; it will not be, it will not occur to me.
What is, what has come to be, that I abandon” — he obtains equanimity.
He relishes that equanimity, welcomes it, remains fastened to it.
As he does so, his consciousness is dependent on it, sustained by it.
With sustenance, Ānanda, a monk is not totally unbound.'
'Being sustained, where is that monk sustained?'
'The dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.'
'Then, indeed, being sustained, he is sustained by the supreme sustenance.'
'Being sustained, Ānanda, he is sustained by the supreme sustenance; for this — the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception — is the supreme sustenance.
There is the case where a monk… reaches equanimity.
He does not relish that equanimity, does not welcome it, does not remain fastened to it.
Such being the case, his consciousness is not dependent on it, is not sustained by it.
Without sustenance, Ānanda, a monk is totally unbound.'
Once the mind can detach itself from the pleasure & equanimity offered by jhāna, it can be inclined toward that which transcends jhāna — the unconditioned quality of deathlessness.
'There is the case, Ānanda, where a monk… enters & remains in the first jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of seclusion, accompanied by directed thought & evaluation.
He regards whatever phenomena there that are connected with form, feeling, perception, fabrications, & consciousness as inconstant, stressful, a disease, a cancer, an arrow, painful, an affliction, alien, a dissolution, empty, not-self.
He turns his mind away from those phenomena and, having done so, inclines it to the phenomenon of deathlessness: “This is peace, this is exquisite — the resolution of all fabrications; the relinquishing of all acquisitions; the ending of craving; dispassion; stopping; Unbinding.
'Staying right there, he reaches the ending of effluents.
Or, if not, then — through this very Dhamma-passion, this very Dhamma-delight, and from the total wasting away of the first five Fetters* — he is due to be reborn, there to be totally unbound, never again to return from that world.
'
The fact that the various levels of jhāna are nurtured & willed, and thus dependent on conditions, is important: A realization of exactly how they are nurtured — a realization acquired only through practical experience with them — can give insight into the conditioned nature of all mental events and is one of the ways in which the attachment to jhāna, as sustenance for becoming, can be abandoned.
An indication of how this happens is given in outline form in the Discourse on Mindfulness of In & Out Breathing.
To take up the description of breath meditation where we left off: Once there is direct awareness of the mind itself, the various levels of jhāna are reviewed.
Now, however, primary attention is focused, not on the object, but on the mind as it relates to the object — the different ways in which it can be satisfied & steadied, and the different factors from which it can be released by taking it through the different levels.
'He trains himself, “I will breathe in…& out gladdening the mind.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in…& out steadying the mind.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in…& out releasing the mind.
The states of gladdening, steadiness, & release experienced on these levels, though, are willed and therefore conditioned.
The next step is to focus on the fact that these qualities, being conditioned, are inconstant.
Once the mind sees directly that inconstancy is inherent both in the pleasure offered by jhāna and in the act of will that brings it about, one becomes dispassionate toward it, stops craving it, and can relinquish any & all attachment to it.
'He trains himself, “I will breathe in…& out focusing on inconstancy.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in…& out focusing on dispassion.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in…& out focusing on stopping.” He trains himself, “I will breathe in…& out focusing on relinquishing.”'
At the conclusion to the discourse, the Buddha states that breath meditation, when practiced often & repeatedly in this way, results in the maturation of clear knowledge & release.
A more vivid description of how mastery of jhāna can lead to the insight that transcends it, is given in the Discourse on the Analysis of the Properties:
' there remains only equanimity: pure & bright, pliant, malleable & luminous.
Just as if a skilled goldsmith or goldsmith's apprentice were to prepare a furnace, heat up a crucible, and, taking gold with a pair of tongs, place it in the crucible.
He would blow on it time & again, sprinkle water on it time & again, examine it time & again, so that the gold would become refined, well-refined, thoroughly refined, flawless, free from dross, pliant, malleable & luminous.
Then whatever sort of ornament he had in mind — whether a belt, an earring, a necklace, or a gold chain — it would serve his purpose.
In the same way, there remains only equanimity: pure & bright, pliant, malleable & luminous.
He discerns that “If I were to direct equanimity as pure & bright as this toward the dimension of the infinitude of space, I would develop the mind along those lines, and thus this equanimity of mine — thus supported, thus sustained — would last for a long time.
“
'He discerns that “If I were to direct equanimity as pure & bright as this toward the dimension of the infinitude of space and to develop the mind along those lines, that would be fabricated.
“ He neither fabricates nor mentally fashions for the sake of becoming or un-becoming.
This being the case, he is not sustained by anything in the world.
Unsustained, he is not agitated.
Unagitated, he is totally unbound right within.
He discerns that “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.”'
Doctrines of the self form the fourth mode of clinging/ sustenance.
The Canon reports a wide variety of such doctrines current in the Buddha's time, only to reject them out-of-hand for two major reasons.
The first is that even the least articulated sense of self or self-identification inevitably leads to stress & suffering.
'Monks, do you see any clinging/sustenance in the form of a doctrine of self which, in clinging to, there would not arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair?'
'No, lord.'
'…Neither do I… How do you construe this, monks: If a person were to gather or burn or do as he likes with the grass, twigs, branches, & leaves here in Jeta's Grove, would the thought occur to you, “It's us that this person is gathering, burning, or doing with as he likes”?'
'No, lord.
Why is that?
Because those things are not our self and do not pertain to our self.'
'Even so, monks, whatever is not yours: Let go of it.
Your letting go of it will be for your long-term happiness & benefit.
And what is not yours?
Form is not yours… Feeling is not yours… Perception… Fabrications… Consciousness is not yours.
Let go of it.
Your letting go of it will be for your long-term happiness & benefit.'
The second reason for rejecting doctrines of the self is that, whatever form they take, they all contain inherent inconsistencies.
The Buddha's most systematic treatment of this point is in the Great Discourse on Causation, where he classifies all theories of the self into four major categories: those describing a self possessed of form & finite; possessed of form & infinite; formless & finite; and formless & infinite.
The text gives no examples for the categories, but we might cite the following as illustrations: theories that deny the existence of a soul, and identify the self with the body; theories that identify the self with all being or with the universe; theories of discrete souls in individual beings; theories of a unitary soul or identity immanent in all things.
Discussing these various categories, the Buddha states that people who adhere to any of them will state that the self already is of such a nature, that it is destined to acquire such a nature after death, or that it can be made into such a nature by various practices.
He then goes on to discuss the various ways people assume a self as defined in relation to feeling.
'In what respect, Ānanda, does one assume when assuming a self?
Assuming feeling to be the self, one assumes that “Feeling is my self” “Feeling is not my self: My self is oblivious “ “Neither is feeling my self, nor is my self oblivious to feeling, but rather my self feels, in that my self is subject to feeling.
'Now, one who says, “Feeling is my self,” should be addressed as follows: “There are these three feelings, my friend — feelings of pleasure, feelings of pain, & feelings of neither pleasure nor pain.
Which of these three feelings do you assume to be the self?
At a moment when a feeling of pleasure is sensed, no feeling of pain or of neither pleasure nor pain is sensed.
Only a feeling of pleasure is sensed at that moment.
At a moment when a feeling of pain is sensed, no feeling of pleasure or of neither pleasure nor pain is sensed.
Only a feeling of pain is sensed at that moment.
At a moment when a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain is sensed, no feeling of pleasure or of pain is sensed.
Only a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain is sensed at that moment.
' “Now, a feeling of pleasure is inconstant, compounded, dependent on conditions, subject to passing away, dissolution, fading, & stopping.
A feeling of pain… A feeling of neither pleasure nor pain is inconstant… subject to stopping.
Having sensed a feeling of pleasure as 'my self,' then with the stopping of one's very own feeling of pleasure, 'my self' has perished.
Having sensed a feeling of pain as 'my self'… Having sensed a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain as 'my self,' then with the stopping of one's very own feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, 'my self' has perished.
'Thus he assumes, assuming in the immediate present a self inconstant, entangled in pleasure & pain, subject to arising & passing away, he who says, “Feeling is my self.” Thus in this manner, Ānanda, one does not see fit to assume feeling to be the self.
'As for the person who says, “Feeling is not the self: My self is oblivious,” he should be addressed as follows: “My friend, where nothing whatsoever is sensed at all, would there be the thought, 'I am'?”'
'No, lord.'
'Thus in this manner, Ānanda, one does not see fit to assume that “Feeling is not my self: My self is oblivious.
'As for the person who says, “Neither is feeling my self, nor is my self oblivious to feeling, but rather my self feels, in that my self is subject to feeling,” he should be addressed as follows: “My friend, should feelings altogether and every way stop without remainder, then with feeling completely not existing, owing to the stopping of feeling, would there be the thought, 'I am'?”'
'No, lord.'
'Thus in this manner, Ānanda, one does not see fit to assume that “Neither is feeling my self, nor is my self oblivious to feeling, but rather my self feels, in that my self is subject to feeling.
'Now, Ānanda, in as far as a monk does not assume feeling to be the self, nor the self as oblivious, nor that “My self feels, in that my self is subject to feeling,” then, not assuming in this way, he is not sustained by anything in the world.
Unsustained, he is not agitated.
Unagitated, he is totally unbound right within.
He discerns that “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.
'If anyone were to say with regard to a monk whose mind is thus released that “The Tathāgata exists after death,” is his view, that would be mistaken; that “The Tathāgata does not exist after death”… that “The Tathāgata both exists & does not exist after death”… that “The Tathāgata neither exists nor does not exist after death” is his view, that would be mistaken.
Why?
Having directly known the extent of designation and the extent of the objects of designation, the extent of expression and the extent of the objects of expression, the extent of description and the extent of the objects of description, the extent of discernment and the extent of the objects of discernment, the extent to which the cycle revolves: Having directly known that, the monk is released.
“The monk released, having directly known that, does not see, does not know is his opinion,” that would be mistaken.' 
Views of the self can center around not only feeling, but also physical form, perception, fabrications, & consciousness — the five aggregates for sustenance — which, according to another passage in the above discourse, cover the extent of what can be designated, expressed, & described, but none of which, on investigation, can rightfully be designated as self.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Vārāṇasi, in the Game Refuge at Isipatana.
There he addressed the group of five monks:
'Form, monks, is not-self.
If form were the self, this form would not lend itself to dis-ease.
One could get form to be like this and not be like that.
But precisely because form is not-self, it lends itself to dis-ease.
And one cannot get form to be like this and not be like that.
'Feeling is not-self… Perception is not-self… Fabrications are not-self…
'Consciousness is not-self.
If consciousness were the self, this consciousness would not lend itself to dis-ease.
One could get consciousness to be like this and not be like that.
But precisely because consciousness is not-self, it lends itself to dis-ease.
And one cannot get consciousness to be like this and not be like that.
'How do you construe thus, monks — Is form constant or inconstant?' — 'Inconstant, lord.' — 'And whatever is inconstant: Is it easeful or stressful?' — 'Stressful, lord.' — 'And is it right to assume with regard to whatever is inconstant, stressful, subject to change, that “This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am”?' — 'No, lord.'
'…Is feeling constant or inconstant?… Is perception constant or inconstant?… Are fabrications constant or inconstant?…
'Is consciousness constant or inconstant?' — 'Inconstant, lord.' — 'And whatever is inconstant: Is it easeful or stressful?' — 'Stressful, lord.' — 'And is it right to assume with regard to whatever is inconstant, stressful, subject to change, that “This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am”?' — 'No, lord.'
'Thus, monks, any form whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: every form is to be seen as it actually is with right discernment as: “This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.
'Any feeling whatsoever… Any perception whatsoever… Any fabrications whatsoever…
'Any consciousness whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: every consciousness is to be seen as it actually is with right discernment as: “This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.
'Seeing thus, the instructed noble disciple grows disenchanted with form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with fabrications, disenchanted with consciousness.
Disenchanted, he grows dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he is released.
With release, there is the knowledge, “Released.” He discerns that “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.”'
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the group of five monks delighted at his words.
And while this explanation was being given, the hearts of the group of five monks, through not clinging, were released from effluents.
On the surface, doctrines about the self would appear simply to be another variety of speculative view.
They deserve separate treatment, though, because they all come down to a deeply rooted sense of 'I am' — a conceit coloring all perception at the most fundamental level.
'Monks, any contemplatives or brāhmans who assume in various ways when assuming a self, all assume the five aggregates for sustenance or a certain one of them.
Which five?
There is the case where an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person… assumes form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, form as in the self, or the self as in form.
He assumes feeling to be the self… perception to be the self… fabrications to be the self… He assumes consciousness to be the self, or the self as possessing consciousness, consciousness as in the self, or the self as in consciousness.
'Thus, both this assumption & the understanding, “I am,” occur to him.
And so it is with reference to the understanding “I am” that there is the appearance of the five faculties — eye, ear, nose, tongue, & body.
'Now, there is the intellect, there are ideas, there is the property of ignorance.
To an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person, touched by experience born of the contact of ignorance, there occur: “I am,” “I am thus,” “I will be,” “I will not be,” “I will be possessed of form,” “I will be formless,” “I will be percipient,” “I will be non-percipient,” or “I will be neither percipient nor non-percipient.
'The five faculties, monks, continue as they were.
And with regard to them the instructed noble disciple abandons ignorance and gives rise to clear knowing.
Owing to the fading of ignorance and the arising of clear knowing, — “I am,” “I am this,”… “I will be neither percipient nor non-percipient” — do not occur to him.'
The sense of 'I am' can prevent a person from reaching the goal, even when he feels that he has abandoned attachment to sensuality, speculative views, & the experience of jhāna.
'There is the case, monks, where a certain contemplative or brāhman, with the relinquishing of speculations about the past and the relinquishing of speculations about the future, from being totally not determined on the fetters of sensuality, and from the surmounting of the rapture of seclusion, of pleasure not-of-the-flesh, & of the feeling of neither pleasure nor pain, thinks, “I am at peace, I am unbound, I am without clinging/sustenance!
'With regard to this, the Tathāgata discerns: “This venerable contemplative or brāhman, with the relinquishing of speculations about the past… thinks, 'I am at peace, I am unbound, I am without clinging/sustenance!” Yes, he affirms a practice conducive to Unbinding.
But still he clings, clinging to a speculation about the past or… a speculation about the future… or a fetter of sensuality… or the rapture of seclusion… or pleasure not-of-the-flesh… or a feeling of neither pleasure nor pain.
And the fact that he thinks, 'I am at peace, I am unbound, I am without clinging/sustenance!' — that in itself points to his clinging.
'With regard to this — fabricated, gross — there is still the cessation of fabrications.
Knowing, “There is that,” seeing the escape from it, the Tathāgata has gone beyond it.'
Whereas the contemplative or brāhman under discussion in this passage reads an 'I' into what he is experiencing, the Buddha simply observes that 'There is this…' This unadorned observation — which simply sees what is present in an experience as present, and what is absent as absent — is treated in detail in the Lesser Discourse on Emptiness.
There the Buddha describes how to develop it methodically, in ascending stages passing through the levels of jhāna — in this case based on the object 'earth', or solidity — and leading ultimately to Awakening.
'Ānanda, just as this palace of Migāra's mother is empty of elephants, cattle, & mares, empty of gold & silver, empty of assemblies of women & men, and there is only this non-emptiness — the singleness based on the community of monks; even so, Ānanda, a monk — not attending to the perception of village, not attending to the perception of human being — attends to the singleness based on the perception of wilderness.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its perception of wilderness.
'He discerns that “Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of village… that would exist based on the perception of human being, are not present.
There is only this modicum of disturbance: the singleness based on the perception of wilderness.” He discerns that “This mode of perception is empty of the perception of village.
This mode of perception is empty of the perception of human being.
There is only this non-emptiness: the singleness based on the perception of wilderness.” Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: “There is this.” And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
'Further, Ānanda, the monk — not attending to the perception of human being, not attending to the perception of wilderness — attends to the singleness based on the perception of earth.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its perception of earth.
Just as a bull's hide is stretched free from wrinkles with a hundred stakes, even so — without attending to all the ridges & hollows, the river ravines, the tracts of stumps & thorns, the craggy irregularities of this earth — he attends to the singleness based on the perception of earth.
His mind… settles & indulges in its perception of earth.
'He discerns that “Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of human being… that would exist based on the perception of wilderness, are not present.
There is only this modicum of disturbance: the singleness based on the perception of earth.” He discerns that “This mode of perception is empty of the perception of human being… empty of the perception of wilderness.
There is only this non-emptiness: the singleness based on the perception of earth.” Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: “There is this.” And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, & pure.
'Further, Ānanda, the monk — not attending to the perception of wilderness, not attending to the perception of earth — attends to the singleness based on the perception of the dimension of the infinitude of space… 
'Further, Ānanda, the monk — not attending to the perception of the dimension of nothingness, not attending to the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception — attends to the singleness based on the signless concentration of awareness.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its signless concentration of awareness.
'He discerns that “Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of nothingness… that would exist based on the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, are not present.
And there is only this modicum of disturbance: that connected with the six sensory spheres, dependent on this very body with life as its condition.” He discerns that “This mode of perception is empty… 'Further, Ānanda, the monk — not attending to the perception of the dimension of nothingness, not attending to the perception of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception — attends to the singleness based on the signless concentration of awareness.
His mind takes pleasure, finds satisfaction, settles, & indulges in its signless concentration of awareness.
'He discerns that “This signless concentration of awareness is fabricated & mentally fashioned.” And he discerns that “Whatever is fabricated & mentally fashioned is inconstant & subject to stopping.” For him — thus knowing, thus seeing — the mind is released from the effluent of sensuality, the effluent of becoming, the effluent of ignorance.
With release, there is the knowledge, “Released.” He discerns that “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.
'He discerns that “Whatever disturbances that would exist based on the effluent of sensuality… the effluent of becoming… the effluent of ignorance, are not present.
And there is only this modicum of disturbance: that connected with the six sensory spheres, dependent on this very body with life as its condition.” He discerns that “This mode of perception is empty of the effluent of sensuality… the effluent of becoming… the effluent of ignorance.
And there is just this non-emptiness: that connected with the six sensory spheres, dependent on this very body with life as its condition.” Thus he regards it as empty of whatever is not there.
Whatever remains, he discerns as present: “There is this.” And so this, his entry into emptiness, accords with actuality, is undistorted in meaning, pure — superior & unsurpassed.'
Ānanda: 'It is said that the world is empty, the world is empty, lord.
To what extent is it said that the world is empty?'
The Buddha: 'Insofar as it is empty of self or of anything pertaining to self: Thus it is said that the world is empty.
And what is empty of self or of anything pertaining to self?
The eye is empty of self or of anything pertaining to self.
Forms… Eye-consciousness… Eye-contact is empty of self or of anything pertaining to self.
'The ear… The nose… The tongue… The body…
'The intellect is empty of self or of anything pertaining to self.
Ideas… Intellect-consciousness… Intellect-contact is empty of self or of anything pertaining to self.
Thus it is said that the world is empty.'
In abandoning the notion of self with regard to the world — here defined in the same terms as the 'All' — the Buddha did not, however, hold to a theory that there is no self.
Having sat to one side, Vacchagotta the wanderer said to the Blessed One, 'Now then, Venerable Gotama, is there a self?' When this was said, the Blessed One was silent.
'Then is there no self?' Again, the Blessed One was silent.
Then Vacchagotta the wanderer got up from his seat and left.
Then, not long after Vacchagotta the wanderer had left, Venerable Ānanda said to the Blessed One, 'Why, lord, did the Blessed One not answer when asked a question by Vacchagotta the wanderer?'
'Ānanda, if I, being asked by Vacchagotta the wanderer if there is a self, were to answer that there is a self, that would be conforming with those contemplatives & brāhmans who are exponents of eternalism.
And if I… were to answer that there is no self, that would be conforming with those contemplatives & brāhmans who are exponents of annihilationism.
If I… were to answer that there is a self, would that be in keeping with the arising of knowledge that all phenomena are not-self?
'No, lord.'
'And if I… were to answer that there is no self, the bewildered Vacchagotta would become even more bewildered: “Does the self that I used to have, now not exist?”'
This dialogue is one of the most controversial in the Canon.
Those who hold that the Buddha took a position one way or the other on the question of whether or not there is a self have to explain away the Buddha's silence, and usually do so by focusing on his final statement to Ānanda.
If someone else more spiritually mature than Vacchagotta had asked the question, they say, the Buddha would have revealed his true position.
This interpretation, though, ignores the fact that of the Buddha's four express reasons for not answering the question, only the last is specific to Vacchagotta.
The first two hold true no matter who is asking the question: To say that there is or is not a self would be to fall into one of two philosophical positions that the Buddha frequently attacked as incompatible with his teaching.
As for his third reason, the Buddha wanted to be consistent with 'the arising of knowledge that all phenomena are not-self,' not because he felt that this knowledge was worth holding onto in & of itself, but because he saw that the arising of such knowledge could, through causing the mind to let go of all forms of clinging/sustenance, lead to liberation.
This point becomes clear when we compare the exchange with Vacchagotta, given above, to this one with Mogharāja:
The fundamental difference between this dialogue & the preceding one lies in the questions asked: In the first, Vacchagotta asks the Buddha to take a position on the metaphysical question of whether or not there is a self, and the Buddha remains silent.
In the second, Mogharāja asks for a way to view the world so that one can go beyond death, and the Buddha speaks, teaching him to view the world without reference to the notion of self.
This suggests that, instead of being a metaphysical assertion that there is no self, the teaching on not-self is more a strategy, a technique of perception aimed at leading beyond death to Unbinding — a way of perceiving things that involves no self-identification, no sense that 'I am', no attachment to 'I' or 'mine.' And this would be in keeping with the discernment the Buddha recommends in the Discourse on the Supreme Net: one that judges views not in terms of their content, but in terms of where they come from and where they lead.
If a person aiming at Unbinding is not to view the world in terms of self, then in what terms should he or she view it?
The Buddha's comment to Anurādha — 'It is only stress that I describe, and the stopping of stress' — suggests an answer, and this answer is borne out by a series of other passages in the Canon.
'Lord, “Right view, right view,” it is said.
To what extent is there right view?'
'By & large, Kaccāyana, this world is supported by a polarity, that of existence & non-existence.
But when one sees the origination of the world as it has come to be with right discernment, “non-existence” with reference to the world doesn't occur to one.
When one sees the stopping of the world as it has come to be with right discernment, “existence” with reference to the world doesn't occur to one.
'By & large, Kaccāyana, this world is in bondage to attachments, clingings, & biases.
But one such as this doesn't get involved with or cling to these attachments, clingings, fixations of awareness, biases, or obsessions; nor is he resolved on “my self.” He has no uncertainty or doubt that mere stress, when arising, is arising; stress, when passing away, is passing away.
In this, his knowledge is independent of others.
It's to this extent, Kaccāyana, that there is right view.'
'There is the case where an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person… does not discern what ideas are fit for attention, or what ideas are unfit for attention.
This being so, he doesn't attend to ideas fit for attention, and attends to ideas unfit for attention… This is how he attends inappropriately: “Was I in the past?
Was I not in the past?
What was I in the past?
How was I in the past?
Having been what, what was I in the past?
Will I be in the future?
Will I not be in the future?
What will I be in the future?
How will I be in the future?
Having been what, what will I be in the future?” Or else he is inwardly perplexed about the immediate present: “Am I?
Am I not?
What am I?
How am I?
Where has this being come from?
Where is it bound?
'As this person attends inappropriately in this way, one of six kinds of view arises in him: The view I have a self arises in him as true & established, or the view I have no self… or the view It is precisely because of self that I perceive self… or the view It is precisely because of self that I perceive not-self… or the view It is precisely because of not-self that I perceive self arises in him as true & established, or else he has a view like this: This very self of mine — the knower that is sensitive here & there to the ripening of good & bad actions — is the self of mine that is constant, everlasting, eternal, not subject to change, and will endure as long as eternity.
This is called a thicket of views, a wilderness of views, a contortion of views, a writhing of views, a fetter of views.
Bound by a fetter of views, the uninstructed run-of-the-mill person is not freed from birth, aging, & death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
He is not freed from stress, I say.
'The well-taught noble disciple… discerns what ideas are fit for attention, and what ideas are unfit for attention.
This being so, he doesn't attend to ideas unfit for attention, and attends to ideas fit for attention… He attends appropriately, This is stress… This is the origin of stress… This is the stopping of stress… This is the way leading to the stopping of stress.
As he attends appropriately in this way, three fetters are abandoned in him: identity-view, uncertainty, & grasping at habits & practices.'
'Now this, monks, is the noble truth of stress: Birth is stress, aging is stress, death is stress; sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair are stress; association with the unbeloved is stress, separation from the loved is stress, not getting what is wanted is stress.
In short, the five aggregates for sustenance are stress.
'And this, monks, is the noble truth of the origination of stress: the craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now here & now there — i.e., craving for sensual pleasure, craving for becoming, craving for non-becoming.
'And this, monks, is the noble truth of the stopping of stress: the remainderless fading & stopping, renunciation, relinquishment, release, & letting go of that very craving.
'And this, monks, is the noble truth of the way leading to the stopping of stress: precisely this noble eightfold path — right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
'Vision arose, insight arose, discernment arose, knowledge arose, illumination arose within me with regard to things never heard before: “This is the noble truth of stress”… “This noble truth of stress is to be comprehended”… “This noble truth of stress has been comprehended”… “This is the noble truth of the origination of stress”… “This noble truth of the origination of stress is to be abandoned”… “This noble truth of the origination of stress has been abandoned”… “This is the noble truth of the stopping of stress”… “This noble truth of the stopping of stress is to be realized”… “This noble truth of the stopping of stress has been realized”… “This is the noble truth of the way leading to the stopping of stress”… “This noble truth of the way leading to the stopping of stress is to be developed”… “This noble truth of the way leading to the stopping of stress has been developed.
'And, monks, as long as this three-round, twelve-permutation knowledge & vision of mine concerning these four noble truths as they have come to be was not pure, I did not claim to have directly awakened to the unexcelled right self-awakening… But as soon as this three-round, twelve-permutation knowledge & vision of mine concerning these four noble truths as they have come to be was truly pure, then did I claim to have directly awakened to the unexcelled right self-awakening… Knowledge & vision arose in me: “Unprovoked is my release.
This is the last birth.
There is now no further becoming.”'
'Just as if there were a pool of water in a mountain glen — clear, limpid, & unsullied — where a man with good eyes standing on the bank could see shells, gravel, & pebbles, and also shoals of fish swimming about & resting, and it would occur to him, “This pool of water is clear, limpid & unsullied.
Here are these shells, gravel & pebbles, and also these shoals of fish swimming about & resting.” So too, the monk discerns as it actually is, that “This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the stopping of stress… This is the way leading to the stopping of stress… These are effluents… This is the origination of effluents… This is the stopping of effluents… This is the way leading to the stopping of effluents.” His heart, thus knowing, thus seeing, is released from the effluent of sensuality, released from the effluent of becoming, released from the effluent of ignorance.
With release, there is the knowledge, “Released.” He discerns that “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.
'This, great king, is a fruit of the contemplative life, visible here & now, more excellent than the previous ones and more sublime.
And as for another visible fruit of the contemplative life, higher & more sublime than this, there is none.'
Thus for the person who aims at Unbinding, the Buddha recommends a technique of perception that regards things simply in terms of the four truths concerning stress, with no self-identification, no sense that 'I am', no attachment to 'I' or 'mine' involved.
Although, as the following passage states, there may be a temporary, functional identity to one's range of perception, this 'identity' goes no further than that.
One recognizes it for what it is: inconstant & conditioned, and thus not worthy of being taken as a self — for in transcending attachment to it, there is the realization of deathlessness.
Ānanda: 'It's wonderful, lord; it's marvelous.
For truly, the Blessed One has pointed out the way to cross over the flood by going from one support to the next.
But what then, lord, is the noble liberation?'
The Buddha: 'There is the case, Ānanda, where a noble disciple considers that “Sensual pleasure here & now and in lives to come; form here & now and in lives to come; perceptions of form here & now and in lives to come; perceptions of imperturbability, perceptions of the dimension of nothingness, perceptions of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception: that is an identity, to the extent that there is identity.
this is deathless: the liberation of the mind through lack of clinging/sustenance.”'
Once the sense of self is transcended, its polar opposite — the sense of something standing in contradistinction to a self — is transcended as well.
In the Discourse at Kālaka's Park, the Buddha expresses this lack of a self/non-self polarity directly in terms of sensory experience.
For a person who has attained the goal, experience occurs with no 'subject' or 'object' superimposed on it, no construing of experience or thing experienced.
There is simply the experience in & of itself.
'Monks, whatever in this world — with its gods, Māras & Brahmās, its generations complete with contemplatives & brāhmans, princes & men — is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, pondered by the intellect: That do I know.
Whatever in this world… is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, pondered by the intellect: That I directly know.
That is known by the Tathāgata, but in the Tathāgata it has not been established…
'Thus, monks, the Tathāgata, when seeing what is to be seen, doesn't construe seen, doesn't construe an unseen, doesn't construe to-be-seen, doesn't construe a seer.
'When hearing… When sensing…
'When cognizing what is to be cognized, he doesn't construe cognized, doesn't construe an uncognized, doesn't construe to-be-cognized, doesn't construe a cognizer.
'Thus, monks, the Tathāgata — being such-like with regard to all phenomena that can be seen, heard, sensed, & cognized — is “Such.” And I tell you: There is no other “Such” higher or more sublime.
A view is true or false only when one is judging how accurately it refers to something else.
If one is regarding it simply as an event in & of itself, true & false no longer apply.
Thus for the Tathāgata — who no longer needs to impose notions of subject or object on experience, and can regard sights, sounds, feelings, & thoughts purely in & of themselves — views are not necessarily true or false, but can simply serve as phenomena to be experienced.
With no notion of subject, there is no grounds for 'I know, I see;' with no notion of object, no grounds for 'That's just how it is.' So — although a Tathāgata may continue using 'true' & 'false' in the course of teaching others, and may continue reflecting on right view as a means of abiding mindfully & comfortably in the present — notions of true, false, self, & not self have lost all their holding power over the mind.
As a result, the mind can see conditioned events in their suchness — 'such are the aggregates, such their origin, such their disappearance' — and is left free to its own Suchness: unrestrained, uninfluenced by anything of any sort.
This concludes our survey of the four modes of clinging/ sustenance — passion & delight for sensuality, for views, for habits & practices, and for doctrines of the self — and should be enough to give a sense of what is loosed in the Unbinding of the mind.
All that remains now is the question of how.
Many of the passages we have considered seem to suggest that total Unbinding may be realized by letting go of any one of these four modes of sustenance.
What most likely happens in such cases, though, is that the abandoning of one mode immediately triggers an abandoning of the remaining three, for there are other cases reported in the Canon where the experience of Unbinding comes in stages spread over time: the arising of the eye of Dhamma, which frees one from passion & delight for identity views, uncertainty, and grasping at habits & practices; the attainment of Non-returning, which frees one from passion & delight for sensuality; and the attainment of Arahantship, which frees one from passion & delight for all views, the practice of jhāna, & the conceit 'I am.' Why these stages happen in this order, and how they relate to the practices meant to induce them, is what we will take up next.
Once the Blessed One was dwelling in the Vajji country, at Ukkacela on the bank of the river Ganges, not long after Sariputta and Maha Moggallana had passed away.
And at that time the Blessed One was seated in the open, surrounded by company of monks.
The Blessed One surveyed the silent gathering of monks, and then spoke to them, saying:
“This assembly, O bhikkhus, appears indeed empty to me, now that Sariputta and Maha Moggallana have passed away.
Not empty, for me, is an assembly, nor need I have concern for a place where Sariputta and Maha Moggallana dwell.
“Those who in the past have been Holy Ones.
Fully enlightened Ones, those Blessed Ones, too, had such excellent pairs of disciples as I had in Sariputta and Maha Moggallana.
Those who in the future will be Holy Ones, fully Enlightened Ones, those Blessed Ones too will have such excellent pairs of disciples as I had in Sariputta and Maha Moggallana.
“Marvelous it is, most wonderful it is, bhikkhus, concerning those disciples, that they will act in accordance with the Master's Dispensation, will act in according to his advice; that they will be dear to the four Assemblies, will be loved, respected and honored by them.
Marvelous it is, most wonderful it is, bhikkhus, concerning the Perfect Ones, that when such a pair of disciples has passed away there is no grief, no lamentation on the part of the Perfect One.
“For of that which is born, come to being, put together, and so is subject to dissolution, how should it be said that it should not depart?
That indeed, is not possible.
“Therefore, bhikkhus, be ye an island unto yourselves, a refuge unto yourselves, seeking no external refuge; with the Teaching as your island, the Teaching your refuge, seeking no other refuge.
See also: DN, SN.
Once the Blessed One was dwelling at Savatthi, in Anathapindika's park.
At that time the Venerable Sariputta was at Nalaka village in the Magadha country, and was sick, suffering, gravely ill.
The Novice Cunda was his attendant.
And the Venerable Sariputta passed away finally through that very illness.
Then the Novice Cunda took the almsbowl and robes of the Venerable Sariputta and went to Savatthi, to the Jeta Grove, Anathapindika's park.
There he betook himself to the Venerable Ananda and, having saluted him, seated himself at one side.
Thus seated, he spoke to the Venerable Ananda saying: “Venerable sir, the Venerable Sariputta has had his final passing away.
These are his bowl and robes.
“On this matter, Cunda, we ought to see the Blessed One.
Let us go, friend Cunda, and meet the Master.
Having met him, we shall acquaint the Blessed One with that fact.
“Yes, Venerable sir,” said the Novice Cunda.
They went to see the Blessed One, and having arrived there and saluted the Master, they seated themselves at one side.
Then the Venerable Ananda addressed the Blessed One:
“O Lord, the Novice Cunda has told me this: 'The Venerable Sariputta has had his final passing away.
These are his bowl and robes.' Then, O Lord, my own body became weak as a creeper; everything around became dim and things were no longer clear to me, when I heard about the final passing away of the Venerable Sariputta.
“How is this, Ananda?
When Sariputta had his final passing away, did he take from you your portion of virtue, or your portion of concentration, or your portion of the knowledge and vision of deliverance?
“Not so, Lord.
When the Venerable Sariputta had his final passing away he did not take my portion of virtue… concentration… wisdom… deliverance, or my portion of the knowledge and vision of deliverance.
But O Lord, the Venerable Sariputta has been to me a mentor, teacher, and instructor, one who rouses, inspires and gladdens, untiring in preaching Dhamma, a helper of his fellow monks.
And we remember how vitalizing, enjoyable and helpful his Dhamma instruction was.
“Have I not taught you aforetime, Ananda, that it is the nature of all things near and dear to us that we must suffer separation from them, and be severed from them?
Of that which is born, come to being, put together, and so is subject to dissolution, how should it be said that it should not depart?
That, indeed, is not possible.
It is, Ananda, as though from a mighty hardwood tree a large branch should break off, so has Sariputta now had his final passing away from this great and sound community of bhikkhus.
Indeed, Ananda, of that which is born, come to being, put together, and so is subject to dissolution, how should it be said that it should not depart?
This, indeed, is not possible.
“Therefore, Ananda, be ye an island unto yourself, a refuge unto yourself, seeking no external refuge; with the Teaching as your island, the Teaching your refuge, seeking no other refuge.
See also: DN, SN..
“There is, O monks, worldly joy, there is unworldly joy, and there is a still greater unworldly joy.
There is worldly happiness, there is unworldly happiness, and there is a still greater unworldly happiness.
There is worldly equanimity, there is unworldly equanimity, and there a still greater unworldly equanimity.
There is worldly freedom, there is unworldly freedom, and there is a still greater unworldly freedom.
“Now, O monks, what is worldly joy?
There are these five cords of sense desire: forms cognizable by the eye that are wished for and desired, agreeable and endearing, associated with sense-desire and tempting to lust.
Sounds cognizable by the ear… odors cognizable by the nose… flavors cognizable by the tongue… tangibles cognizable by the body, wished for and desired, agreeable and endearing, associated with sense-desire and tempting to lust.
It is the joy that arises dependent on these five cords of sense desire which is called 'worldly joy.'
“Now what is unworldly joy?
Quite secluded from sense desires, secluded from unwholesome states of mind, a monk enters upon and abides in the first meditative absorption, which is accompanied by thought-conception and discursive thinking, and has joy and happiness born of seclusion.
With the stilling of thought-conception and discursive thinking, he enters upon and abides in the second meditative absorption which has internal confidence and singleness of mind without thought conception and discursive thinking, and has joy and happiness born of concentration.
This is called 'unworldly joy.'
“And what is the still greater unworldly joy?
When a taint-free monk looks upon his mind that is freed of greed, freed of hatred, freed of delusion, then there arises joy.
This called a 'still greater unworldly joy.'
“Now, O monks, what is worldly happiness?
There are these five cords of sense desire: forms cognizable by the eye… sounds cognizable by the ear… odors cognizable by the nose… flavors cognizable by the tongue… tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for and desired, agreeable and endearing, associated with sense desire and alluring.
It is the happiness and gladness that arises dependent on these five cords of sense desire which are called 'worldly happiness.'
“Now what is unworldly happiness?
Quite secluded from sense desires, secluded from unwholesome states of mind, a monk enters upon and abides in the first meditative absorption… With the stilling of thought-conception and discursive thinking, he enters upon and abides in the second meditative absorption… With the fading away of joy as well, he dwells in equanimity, mindfully and fully aware he feels happiness within, and enters upon and abides in the third meditative absorption of which the Noble Ones announce: 'He dwells in happiness who has equanimity and is mindful.' This is called 'unworldly happiness.'
“And what is the still greater unworldly happiness?
When a taint-free monk looks upon his mind that is freed of greed, freed of hatred, freed of delusion, then there arises happiness.
This is called a 'still greater unworldly happiness.'
“Now, O monks, what is worldly equanimity?
There are these five cords of sensual desire: forms cognizable by the eye… tangibles cognizable by the body that are wished for and desired, agreeable and endearing, associated with sense desire and alluring.
It is the equanimity that arises with regard to these five cords of sense desire which is called 'worldly equanimity.'
“Now, what is unworldy equanimity?
With the abandoning of pleasure and pain, and with the previous disappearance of gladness and sadness, a monk enters upon and abides in the fourth meditative absorption, which has neither pain-nor-pleasure and has purity of mindfulness due to equanimity.
This is called 'unworldly equanimity.'
“And what is the still greater unworldly equanimity?
When a taint-free monk looks upon his mind that is freed of greed, freed of hatred and freed of delusion, then there arises equanimity.
This is called a 'still greater unworldly equanimity.'
“Now, O monks, what is worldly freedom?
The freedom connected with the material.
What is unworldly freedom?
The freedom connected with the immaterial.
And what is the still greater unworldly freedom?
When a taint-free monk looks upon his mind that is freed of greed, freed of hatred, and freed of delusion, then there arises freedom.
See also: SN..
“I shall show you, O monks, a way of Dhamma presentation by which there are one hundred and eight.
Hence listen to me.
“In one way, O monks, I have spoken of two kinds of feelings, and in other ways of three, five, six, eighteen, thirty six and one hundred and eight feelings.
“What are the two feelings?
Bodily and mental feelings.
“What are the three feelings?
Pleasant, painful and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feelings.
“What are the five feelings?
The faculties of pleasure, pain, gladness, sadness and equanimity.
“What are the six feelings?
The feelings born of sense-impression through eye, ear, nose, tongue, body and mind.
“What are the eighteen feelings?
There are the six feelings by which there is an approach in gladness; and there are six approaches in sadness and there are six approaches in equanimity.
“What are the thirty six feelings?
There are six feelings of gladness based on the household life and six based on renunciation; six feelings of sadness based on the household life and six based on renunciation; six feelings of equanimity based on the household life and six based on renunciation.
“What are the hundred and eight feelings?
There are the thirty six feelings of the past; there are thirty six of the future and there are thirty six of the present.
“These, O monks, are called the hundred and eight feelings; and this is the way of the Dhamma presentation by which there are one hundred and eight feelings.”
Once the Blessed One dwelled at Rajagaha in the Bamboo-Grove Monastery, at the Squirrel's Feeding Place.
There a wandering ascetic, Moliya Sivaka by name, called on the Blessed One, and after an exchange of courteous and friendly words, sat down at one side.
Thus seated, he said:
“There are, revered Gotama, some ascetics and brahmans who have this doctrine and view: 'Whatever a person experiences, be it pleasure, pain or neither-pain-nor-pleasure, all that is caused by previous action.' Now, what does the revered Gotama say about this?
“Produced by bile, there arise, Sivaka, certain kinds of feelings.
That this happens, can be known by oneself; also in the world it is accepted as true.
Produced by phlegm… of wind… of combined… by change of climate… by adverse behavior… by injuries… by the results of Kamma —, Sivaka, there arise certain kinds of feelings.
That this happens can be known by oneself; also in the world it is accepted as true.
“Now when these ascetics and brahmans have such a doctrine and view that 'whatever a person experiences, be it pleasure, pain or neither-pain-nor-pleasure, all that is caused by previous action,' then they go beyond what they know by themselves and what is accepted as true by the world.
Therefore, I say that this is wrong on the part of these ascetics and brahmans.
When this was spoken, Moliya Sivaka, the wandering ascetic, said: “It is excellent, revered Gotama, it is excellent indeed!…May the revered Gotama regard me as a lay follower who, from today, has taken refuge in him as long as life lasts.”
Once the Venerable Ananda went to see the Blessed One.
Having saluted him respectfully, he sat down at one side.
Thus seated, he said:
“What are the feelings, O Lord?
What is the origin of feelings, what is their cessation and the way leading to their cessation?
What is the gratification in feelings?
What is the danger in feelings?
And what is the escape from them?
“There are, Ananda, three kinds of feelings: pleasant, painful and neutral.
Through the origin of sense-impression there is origin of feelings; through the cessation of sense-impression there is cessation of feelings.
It is the noble eightfold path that is the way leading to the cessation of feelings, namely: right understanding, right thought, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness and right concentration.
“It is the happiness and gladness arising dependent on feelings that is the gratification in feelings.
Feelings are impermanent, pain, and are subject to change; this is the danger in feelings.
The removal and the giving up of the desire and lust for feelings is the escape from feelings.
“I have further taught, Ananda, the gradual cessation of conditioned phenomena.
In him who has attained the first meditative absorption, speech has been stilled.
Having attained the second absorption, thought-conception and discursive thinking has ceased.
Having attained the third absorption, joy has ceased.
Having attained the fourth absorption, inhalation and exhalation have ceased.
Having attained the sphere of the infinity of space, perception of form has ceased.
Having attained the sphere of the infinity of consciousness, the perception of the sphere of the infinity of space has ceased.
Having attained the sphere of no-thingness, the perception of the sphere of infinity of consciousness has ceased.
Having attained the sphere of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, the perception of the sphere of no-thingness has ceased.
Having attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have ceased.
In a taint-free monk greed, hatred, and delusion are quietened.”
Once a certain monk came to see the Blessed One and, after saluting him respectfully, sat down at one side.
Seated thus, he spoke to the Blessed One as follows:
“When I went into seclusion, while I was in solitude, this thought occurred to me: 'Three feelings have been taught by the Blessed One: pleasant, painful and neutral feelings.
But the Blessed One has also said that whatever is felt is within suffering.' Now, with reference to what was it stated by the Blessed One that whatever is felt is within suffering?
“Well spoken, monk, well spoken!
While three feelings have been taught by me, the pleasant, the painful and the neutral, yet I have also said that whatever is felt is within suffering.
This, however, was stated by me with reference to the impermanence of conditioned phenomena.
I have said it because conditioned phenomena are liable to destruction, to evanescence, to fading away, to cessation and to change.
It is with reference to this that I have stated: 'Whatever is felt is within suffering.'
“I have further taught, monk, the gradual cessation of conditioned phenomena.
In him who has attained the first meditative absorption, speech has ceased.
Having attained the second absorption, thought-conception and discursive thinking has ceased.
Having attained the third absorption, joy has ceased.
Having attained the fourth absorption, inhalation and exhalation have ceased.
Having attained the sphere of the infinity of space, perception of form has ceased.
Having attained the sphere of the infinity of consciousness, the perception of the sphere of the infinity of space has ceased.
Having attained the sphere of no-thingness, the perception of the sphere of infinity of consciousness has ceased.
Having attained the sphere of neither-perception-nor-non-perception, the perception of the sphere of no-thingness has ceased.
Having attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have ceased.
In a taint-free monk greed has ceased, hatred has ceased, delusion has ceased.
“I have further taught, monk the gradual stilling of conditioned phenomena.
In him who has attained the first meditative absorption, speech has been stilled.
Having attained the second absorption, thought-conception and discursive thinking have been stilled… Having attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling have been stilled.
In a taint-free monk greed has been stilled, hatred has been stilled, delusion has been stilled.
“There are, monk, these six quietenings.
In him who has attained the first absorption, speech is quietened.
Having attained the second absorption, thought-conception and discursive thinking are quietened.
Having attained the third absorption, rapture is quietened.
Having attained the fourth absorption, inhalation and exhalation is quietened.
Having attained the cessation of perception and feeling, perception and feeling are quietened.
In a taint-free monk greed is quietened, hatred is quietened, delusion is quietened.”
“There are, O monks, these three feelings, rooted in sense-impression, caused by sense-impression, conditioned by sense-impression: pleasant, painful and neutral feelings.
“Dependent on a sense-impression that is liable to be felt as pleasurable, there arises a pleasant feeling.
When that very sense-impression liable to be felt as pleasurable has ceased, then the sensation born from it — namely the pleasant feeling that arose dependent on that sense-impression — also ceases and is stilled.
“Dependent on a sense-impression that is liable to be felt as painful, there arises a painful feeling.
When that very sense-impression liable to be felt as painful has ceased, then the sensation born from it — namely the painful feeling that arose dependent on that sense-impression — also ceases and is stilled.
“Dependent on a sense-impression that is liable to be felt as neutral, there arises a neutral feeling.
When that very sense-impression liable to be felt as neutral has ceased, then the sensation born from it — namely the neutral feeling that arose dependent on that sense-impression — also ceases and is stilled.
“Just as from the coming together and rubbing of two sticks of wood heat results and fire is produced, and by the separation and disconnection of the sticks, the heat produced by them ceases and disappears, so it is also with these three feelings which are born of sense-impression, rooted in sense-impression, caused by sense-impression, dependent on sense-impression: dependent on a sense-impression of a certain kind there arises a corresponding feeling; by the cessation of that sense-impression the corresponding feeling ceases.”
“The three kinds of feelings, O monks, are impermanent, compounded, dependently arisen, liable to destruction, to evanescence, to fading away, to cessation — namely, pleasant feeling, painful feeling, and neutral feeling.”
Once the Blessed One dwelt at Vesali, in the Great Forest, at the Gabled House.
In the evening, after had arisen from his seclusion, he went to the sick room and sat down on a prepared seat.
Being seated, he addressed the monks as follows:
“O monks, mindfully and clearly comprehending should a monk spend his time!
This is my injunction to you!
“And how, O monks, is a monk mindful?
He dwells practicing body-contemplation on the body, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
He dwells practicing feeling-contemplation on feelings, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
He dwells practicing mind-contemplation on the mind, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
He dwells practicing mind-object-contemplation on mind-objects, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
So, monks, is a monk mindful.
“And how, O monks, is a monk clearly comprehending?
He applies clear comprehension in going forward and going back; in looking straight on and in looking elsewhere; in bending and in stretching; in wearing the robes and carrying the alms bowl; in eating, drinking, chewing and savoring; in obeying the calls of nature; in walking, standing sitting, falling asleep waking, speaking and being silent — in all that he applies clear comprehension.
So, monks, is a monk clearly comprehending.
“If a monk is thus mindful and clearly comprehending, ardent, earnest and resolute, and a pleasant feeling arises in him, he knows: 'Now a pleasant feeling has arisen in me.
It is conditioned, not unconditioned.
Conditioned by what?
Even by this sense-impression it is conditioned.
And this sense-impression, indeed, is impermanent, compounded, dependently arisen.
But if this pleasant feeling that has arisen is conditioned by a sense-impression which is impermanent, compounded, and dependently arisen, how could such a pleasant feeling be permanent?'
“In regard to both sense-impression and the pleasant feeling, he dwells contemplating impermanence, dwells contemplating evanescence, dwells contemplating detachment, dwells contemplating cessation, dwells contemplating relinquishment.
And in him who thus dwells, the underlying tendency to lust in regard to sense-impressions and pleasant feeling vanishes.
“If a painful feeling arises in him, he knows: 'Now a painful feeling has arisen in me.
It is conditioned, not unconditioned.
Conditioned by what?
Even by this sense-impression it is conditioned.
And this sense-impression, indeed, is impermanent, compounded, dependently arisen.
But if this painful feeling that has arisen is conditioned by a sense-impression which is impermanent, compounded and dependently arisen, how could such a painful feeling be permanent?'
“In regard to both sense-impression and painful feeling, he dwells contemplating impermanence, dwells contemplating evanescence, dwells contemplating detachment, dwells contemplating cessation, dwells contemplating relinquishment.
And in him who thus dwells, the underlying tendency to resistance in regard to sense-impression and painful feeling vanishes.
“If a neutral feeling arises in him, he knows: 'Now a neutral feeling has arisen in me.
It is conditioned, not unconditioned.
Conditioned by what?
Even by this sense-impression it is conditioned.
And this sense-impression, indeed, is impermanent, compounded, dependently arisen.
But if this neutral feeling that has arisen is conditioned by a sense-impression, which is impermanent, compounded and dependently arisen, how could such a neutral feeling be permanent?'
“In regard to both sense-impression and neutral feeling, he dwells contemplating impermanence, dwells contemplating evanescence, dwells contemplating detachment, dwells contemplating cessation, dwells contemplating relinquishment.
And in him who thus dwells, the underlying tendency to ignorance in regard to sense-impression and neutral feeling vanishes.
Once the Blessed One dwelt at Vesali, in the Great Forest, at the Gabled House.
In the evening, after the Blessed One had risen from his seclusion, he went to the sick room and sat down on a prepared seat.
Being seated he addressed the monks as follows:
“O monks, mindfully and clearly comprehending should a monk spend his time!
This is my injunction to you!
“And how, O monks, is a monk mindful?
He dwells practicing body-contemplation on the body, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
He dwells practicing feeling-contemplation on feelings, ardent, clearly comprehending and mindful, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
He dwells practicing mind-contemplation on the mind, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
He dwells practicing mind-object-contemplation on mind-objects, having overcome covetousness and grief concerning the world.
So, monks, is a monk mindful.
“And how, O monks, is a monk clearly comprehending?
He applies clear comprehension in going forward and going back; in looking straight on and in looking elsewhere; in bending and in stretching; in wearing the robes and carrying the alms bowl; in eating, drinking, chewing and savoring; in obeying the calls of nature; in walking, standing sitting, falling asleep, waking, speaking and being silent — in all that he applies clear comprehension.
So, monks, is a monk clearly comprehending.
“If a monk is thus mindful and clearly comprehending, ardent, earnest and resolute, and a pleasant feeling arises in him, he knows: 'Now a pleasant feeling has arisen in me.
It is conditioned, not unconditioned.
Conditioned by what?
Even by this body it is conditioned.
And this body, indeed, is impermanent, compounded, dependently arisen.
But if this pleasant feeling that has arisen, is conditioned by the body which is impermanent, compounded and dependently arisen; how could such a pleasant feeling be permanent?'
“In regard to both body and the pleasant feeling he dwells contemplating impermanence, dwells contemplating evanescence, dwells contemplating detachment, dwells contemplating cessation, dwells contemplating relinquishment.
And in him who thus dwells, the underlying tendency to lust in regard to body and pleasant feeling vanishes.
“If a painful feeling arises in him, he knows: 'Now a painful feeling has arisen in me.
It is conditioned, not unconditioned.
Conditioned by what?
Even by this body it is conditioned.
And this body, indeed, is impermanent, compounded, dependently arisen.
But if this painful feeling that has arisen is conditioned by the body which is impermanent, compounded and dependently arisen, how could such a painful feeling be permanent?'
“In regard to both the body and the painful feeling he dwells contemplating impermanence, dwells contemplating evanescence, dwells contemplating detachment, dwells contemplating cessation, dwells contemplating relinquishment.
And in him who thus dwells, the underlying tendency to resistance in regard to the body and painful feeling vanishes.
“If a neutral feeling arises in him, he knows: 'Now a neutral feeling has arisen in me.
It is conditioned, not unconditioned.
Conditioned by what?
Even by this body it is conditioned.
And this body, indeed, is impermanent, compounded, dependently arisen.
But if this neutral feeling that has arisen is conditioned by the body which is impermanent, compounded and dependently arisen, how could such a neutral feeling be permanent?'
“In regard to both the body and the neutral feeling he dwells contemplating impermanence, dwells contemplating evanescence, dwells contemplating detachment, dwells contemplating cessation, dwells contemplating relinquishment.
And in him who thus dwells, the underlying tendency to ignorance in regard to body and neutral feeling vanishes.
“If he experiences a pleasant feeling, he knows it as impermanent; he knows, it is not clung to; he knows, it is not relished.
If he experiences a painful feeling… a neutral feeling, he knows it as impermanent; he knows, it is not clung to; he knows, it is not relished.
“If he experiences a pleasant feeling, he feels it as one unfettered by it.
If he experiences a painful feeling, he feels it as one unfettered by it.
If he experiences a neutral feeling, he feels it as one unfettered by it.
“When having painful feelings endangering the body, he knows: 'I have a painful feeling endangering the body.' When having painful feelings endangering life he knows: 'I have a painful feeling endangering life.' And he knows: 'After the dissolution of the body, when life ends, all these feelings which are unrelished, will come to final rest, even here.'
“It is like a lamp that burns by strength of oil and wick, and if oil and wick come to an end, the flame is extinguished through lack of nourishment.
Similarly this monk knows: 'After the dissolution of the body, when life ends, all these feelings which are unrelished will come to rest, even here.'”
“An untaught worldling, O monks, experiences pleasant feelings, he experiences painful feelings and he experiences neutral feelings.
A well-taught noble disciple likewise experiences pleasant, painful and neutral feelings.
Now what is the distinction, the diversity, the difference that exists herein between a well-taught noble disciple and an untaught worldling?
“When an untaught worldling is touched by a painful feeling, he worries and grieves, he laments, beats his breast, weeps and is distraught.
He thus experiences two kinds of feelings, a bodily and a mental feeling.
It is as if a man were pierced by a dart and, following the first piercing, he is hit by a second dart.
So that person will experience feelings caused by two darts.
It is similar with an untaught worldling: when touched by a painful feeling, he worries and grieves, he laments, beats his breast, weeps and is distraught.
So he experiences two kinds of feeling: a bodily and a mental feeling.
“Having been touched by that painful feeling, he resists it.
Then in him who so resists that painful feeling, an underlying tendency of resistance against that painful feeling comes to underlie.
Under the impact of that painful feeling he then proceeds to enjoy sensual happiness.
And why does he do so?
An untaught worldling, O monks, does not know of any other escape from painful feelings except the enjoyment of sensual happiness.
Then in him who enjoys sensual happiness, an underlying tendency to lust for pleasant feelings comes to underlie.
He does not know, according to facts, the arising and ending of these feelings, nor the gratification, the danger and the escape, connected with these feelings.
In him who lacks that knowledge, an underlying tendency to ignorance as to neutral feelings comes to underlie.
When he experiences a pleasant feeling, a painful feeling or a neutral feeling, he feels it as one fettered by it.
Such a one, O monks, is called an untaught worldling who is fettered by birth, by old age, by death, by sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
He is fettered by suffering, this I declare.
“But in the case of a well-taught noble disciple, O monks, when he is touched by a painful feeling, he will not worry nor grieve and lament, he will not beat his breast and weep, nor will he be distraught.
It is one kind of feeling he experiences, a bodily one, but not a mental feeling.
It is as if a man were pierced by a dart, but was not hit by a second dart following the first one.
So this person experiences feelings caused by a single dart only.
It is similar with a well-taught noble disciple: when touched by a painful feeling, he will no worry nor grieve and lament, he will not beat his breast and weep, nor will he be distraught.
He experiences one single feeling, a bodily one.
“Having been touched by that painful feeling, he does not resist it.
Hence, in him no underlying tendency of resistance against that painful feeling comes to underlie.
Under the impact of that painful feeling he does not proceed to enjoy sensual happiness.
And why not?
As a well-taught noble disciple he knows of an escape from painful feelings other than by enjoying sensual happiness.
Then in him who does not proceed to enjoy sensual happiness, no underlying tendency to lust for pleasant feelings comes to underlie.
He knows, according to facts, the arising and ending of those feelings, and the gratification, the danger and the escape connected with these feelings.
In him who knows thus, no underlying tendency to ignorance as to neutral feelings comes to underlie.
When he experiences a pleasant feeling, a painful feeling or a neutral feeling, he feels it as one who is not fettered by it.
Such a one, O monks, is called a well-taught noble disciple who is not fettered by birth, by old age, by death, by sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
He is not fettered to suffering, this I declare.
“This, O monks, is the distinction, the diversity, the difference that exists between a well-taught noble disciple and an untaught worldling.”
“There are, O monks, these three feelings: pleasant, painful and neither-painful-nor-pleasant.
Pleasant feelings should be known as painful, painful feelings should be known as a thorn, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feelings should be known as impermanent.
If a monk has known the feelings in such a way, it is said of him that he has the right outlook.
He has cut off craving, severed the fetters and, through the full penetration of conceit, he has made an end of suffering.”
“When, O monks, an untaught worldling says that in the great ocean there is a pit, he speaks about something unreal and not factual.
'The pit,' O monks, is rather a name for painful bodily feelings.
When an untaught worldling is afflicted by painful bodily feelings, he worries and grieves, he laments, beats his breast, weeps and is distraught.
He is then said to be an untaught worldling who cannot withstand the bottomless pit and cannot gain a foothold in it.
But when a well-taught noble disciple is afflicted by painful bodily feelings, he will not worry nor grieve and lament, he will not beat his breast and weep, nor will he be distraught.
He is then said to be a noble disciple who can withstand the bottomless pit and has gained a foothold in it.”
“In the case of pleasant feelings, O monks, the underlying tendency to lust should be given up; in the case of painful feelings, the underlying tendency to resistance should be given up; in the case of neither-painful-nor-pleasant feelings, the underlying tendency to ignorance should be given up.
“If a monk has given up the tendency to lust in regard to pleasant feeling, the tendency to resistance in regard to painful feelings, and the tendency to ignorance in regard to neither-painful-nor-pleasant feelings, then he is called one who is free of tendencies, one who has the right outlook.
He has cut off craving, severed the fetters, and through the full penetration of conceit, he has made an end of suffering.”
“There are, O monks, these three feelings: pleasant feelings, painful feelings, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feelings.”
“There are, O monks, these three feelings: pleasant feelings, painful feelings, and neither-painful-nor-pleasant feelings.”
At Savatthi.
“There are, O monks, four nutriments for the sustenance of beings born, and for the support of beings seeking birth.
What are the four?
“Edible food, coarse and fine; sense-impression is the second; volitional thought, the third; and consciousness, the fourth.
“If, O monks, there is lust for the nutriment edible food, if there is pleasure in it and craving for it, then consciousness takes a hold therein and grows.
Where consciousness takes a hold and grows, there will be occurrence of mind-and-body.
Where there is occurrence of mind-and-body, there is growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is growth of kamma-formations, there is a future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is a future arising of renewed existence, there is future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is laden with sorrow, burdened with anguish and despair.
“If, O monks, there is lust for the nutriment sense-impression… volitional thought… consciousness, if there is pleasure in it and craving for it, then consciousness takes a hold therein and grows.
Where consciousness takes a hold and grows, there will be occurrence of mind-and-body.
Where there is occurrence of mind-and-body, there is growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is growth of kamma-formations, there is a future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is a future arising of renewed existence, there is future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is laden with sorrow, burdened with anguish and despair.
“Suppose there is a dyer or a painter.
Having some dye or lac, turmeric, indigo or crimson, he would depict, on a well-smoothed wooden tablet, on a wall or a piece of cloth, the figure of a woman or a man, with all the major and minor features.
Similarly, O monks, if there is lust for the nutriments edible food, sense-impression, volitional thought and consciousness… then consciousness takes a hold therein and grows.
Where consciousness takes a hold and grows, there is occurrence of mind-and-body.
Where there is occurrence of mind-and-body, there is growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is growth of kamma-formations, there is a future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is a future arising of renewed existence, there is future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is laden with sorrow, burdened with anguish and despair.
“But if, O monks, there is no lust for the nutriments edible food, sense-impression, volitional thought and consciousness, if there is no pleasure in them and no craving for them, then consciousness does not take a hold therein and does not grow.
Where consciousness does not take a hold nor grow, there will be no occurrence of mind-and-body.
Where there is no occurrence of mind-and-body, there is no growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is no growth of kamma-formations, there is no future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is no future arising of renewed existence, there is no future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is free of sorrow, of anguish and despair.
“Suppose, O monks, there is a gabled house or a gabled hall, with windows at the northern, southern, and eastern sides.
Now, when at sunrise, a ray of the sun enters through a window, where would it find hold?” — “On the western wall, O Lord.” — “But if there were no western wall, O monks, where would it find a hold?” — “On the earth, O Lord.” — “And if there were no earth, where would it find a hold?” — “On the water, O Lord.” — “And if there were no water, where would it find a hold?” — “It would not find any hold whatsoever, O Lord.
“Similarly, O monks, if there is no lust for the nutriments edible food, sense-impression, volitional thought and consciousness, if there is no pleasure in them and no craving for them, then consciousness does not take hold therein and does not grow.
Where consciousness does not take a hold nor grow, there will be no occurrence of mind-and-body, there is no growth of kamma-formations.
Where there is no growth of kamma-formations there is no future arising of renewed existence.
Where there is no future arising of renewed existence, there is no future birth, decay and death.
This, I say, O monks, is free of sorrow of anguish and despair.
Comy: “This is the application of the simile: the dyer or painter is the kamma with its adjuncts.
The wooden tablets, the wall or the piece of cloth, correspond to the three planes of existence in the cycle of rebirths.
As the painter produces a figure on a clean surface, so kamma with its adjuncts produces forms in various existences.
If the painter is unskilled, the figures he paints will be ugly, misshapen and not pleasing; similarly, if a person performs a kamma with mind devoid of knowledge, then that kamma will produce a form that does not lend beauty to the eye, etc., but will be ugly, misshapen and not pleasing even to father and mother.
But if the painter is skillful, the figures he produces will be beautiful, of attractive shape and pleasing; similarly if a person performs kamma in a state of mind imbued with knowledge, then the bodily form produced by that kamma, will give beauty to the eye, etc., will be attractive and well-shapen, like a finished work of art.
“Here, taking nutriment together with consciousness, there is one link between nutriment and mind-and-body.
Including mind-and-body in the section of the resultants there is one link between mind-and-body and kamma-formations.
Finally, there is one link between kamma-formations and the future existence.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN.; AN.; The Four Nutriments of Life by Nyanaponika Thera.
At Savatthi.
“Monks, remain with your minds well-established in the four establishings of mindfulness.
Don't let the deathless be lost to you.
“In which four?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
“Monks, remain with your minds well-established in these four establishings of mindfulness.
Don't let the deathless be lost to you.”
At Savatthi.
“Monks, there are these four establishings of mindfulness.
Which four?
“There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
For him, remaining focused on the body in and of itself, any desire for the body is abandoned.
From the abandoning of desire, the deathless is realized.
“He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
For him, remaining focused on feelings in & of themselves, any desire for feelings is abandoned.
From the abandoning of desire, the deathless is realized.
“He remains focused on the mind in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
For him, remaining focused on the mind in and of itself, any desire for the mind is abandoned.
From the abandoning of desire, the deathless is realized.
“He remains focused on mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
For him, remaining focused on mental qualities in & of themselves, any desire for mental qualities is abandoned.
From the abandoning of desire, the deathless is realized.”
At Savatthi.
“Stay mindful, monks, and alert.
This is our instruction to you all.
“And how is a monk mindful?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings… mind… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — subduing greed & distress with reference to the world.
This is how a monk is mindful.
“And how is a monk alert?
There is the case where feelings are known to the monk as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
Thoughts are known to him as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
Perceptions are known to him as they arise, known as they persist, known as they subside.
This is how a monk is alert.
“So stay mindful, monks, and alert.
This is our instruction to you all.”
At Savatthi.
On that occasion Ven.
Tissa, the Blessed One's paternal cousin, told a large number of monks, “Friends, it's as if my body is drugged.
I've lost my bearings.
Things aren't clear to me.
My mind keeps being overwhelmed with sloth & torpor.
I lead the holy life dissatisfied.
I have uncertainty about the teachings.
Then a large number of monks went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they told him: “Lord, Ven.
Tissa, the Blessed One's paternal cousin, has told a large number of monks, 'Friends, it's as if my body is drugged.
I've lost my bearings.
Things aren't clear to me.
My mind keeps being overwhelmed with sloth & torpor.
I lead the holy life dissatisfied.
I have uncertainty about the teachings.' Then the Blessed One told a certain monk, “Come, monk.
In my name, call Tissa, saying, 'The Teacher calls you, my friend.' “As you say, lord,” the monk answered and, having gone to Ven.
Tissa, on arrival he said, “The Teacher calls you, my friend.
“As you say, my friend,” Ven.
Tissa replied.
Then he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Is it true, Tissa, that you have told a large number of monks, 'Friends, it's as if my body is drugged.
I've lost my bearings.
Things aren't clear to me.
My mind keeps being overwhelmed with sloth & torpor.
I lead the holy life dissatisfied.
I have uncertainty about the teachings'?
“Yes, lord.
“What do you think, Tissa: In one who is not without passion, desire, love, thirst, fever, & craving for form, does there arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair from change & alteration in his form?
“Yes, lord.
“Good, Tissa, good.
That's how it is for one who is not without passion for form.
“What do you think, Tissa: In one who is not without passion, desire, love, thirst, fever, & craving for feeling… perception… fabrications, does there arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair from change & alteration in his fabrications?
“Yes, lord.
“Good, Tissa, good.
That's how it is for one who is not without passion for fabrications.
“What do you think, Tissa: In one who is not without passion, desire, love, thirst, fever, & craving for consciousness, does there arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair from change & alteration in his consciousness?
“Yes, lord.
“Good, Tissa, good.
That's how it is for one who is not without passion for consciousness.
“Now what do you think, Tissa: In one who is without passion, desire, love, thirst, fever, & craving for form, does there arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair from change & alteration in his form?
“No, lord.
“Good, Tissa, good.
That's how it is for one who is without passion for form.
“What do you think, Tissa: In one who is without passion, desire, love, thirst, fever, & craving for feeling… perception… fabrications, does there arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair from change & alteration in his fabrications?
“No, lord.
“Good, Tissa, good.
That's how it is for one who is without passion for fabrications.
“What do you think, Tissa: In one who is without passion, desire, love, thirst, fever, & craving for consciousness, does there arise sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair from change & alteration in his consciousness?
“No, lord.
“Good, Tissa, good.
That's how it is for one who is without passion for consciousness.
“What do you think, Tissa — Is form constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“… Is feeling constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, lord.”…
”… Is perception constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, lord.”…
”… Are fabrications constant or inconstant?” “Inconstant, lord.”…
“What do you think, Tissa — Is consciousness constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“Thus, Tissa, any form whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: every form is to be seen as it actually is with right discernment as: 'This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.'
“Any feeling whatsoever…
“Any perception whatsoever…
“Any fabrications whatsoever…
“Any consciousness whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: every consciousness is to be seen as it actually is with right discernment as: 'This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.'
“Seeing thus, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with fabrications, disenchanted with consciousness.
Through disenchantment, he becomes dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he is fully released.
With full release, there is the knowledge, 'Fully released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'
“Tissa, it's as if there were two men, one not skilled in the path, the other skilled in the path.
In that case the man not skilled in the path would ask the man skilled in the path about the path.
The second man would say, 'Come, my good man, this is the path.
Go along it a little further and you will see a fork in the road.
Avoiding the left fork, take the right.
Go along a little further and you will see an intense forest grove.
Go along a little further and you will see a large marshy swamp.
Go along a little further and you will see a deep drop-off.
Go along a little further and you will see a delightful stretch of level ground.
“I have made this comparison, Tissa, to convey a meaning.
The meaning is this: The man unskilled in the path stands for a run-of-the-mill person.
The man skilled in the path stands for the Tathagata, worthy & rightly self-awakened.
The fork in the road stands for uncertainty.
The left fork stands for the eightfold wrong path — i.e., wrong view, wrong resolve, wrong speech, wrong action, wrong livelihood, wrong effort, wrong mindfulness, wrong concentration.
The right fork stands for the noble eightfold path — i.e., right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
The intense forest grove stands for ignorance.
The large marshy swamp stands for sensual desires.
The deep drop-off stands for anger & despair.
The delightful stretch of level ground stands for Unbinding.
“Rejoice, Tissa!
Rejoice!
I am here to exhort you, I am here to aid you, I am here to instruct you!
That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, Ven.
Tissa delighted in the Blessed One's words.
At Savatthi.
“For a monk practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, what accords with the Dhamma is this: that he keep focused on stress with regard to form, that he keep focused on stress with regard to feeling, that he keep focused on stress with regard to perception, that he keep focused on stress with regard to fabrications, that he keep focused on stress with regard to consciousness.
As he keeps focusing on stress with regard to form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, he comprehends form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness.
As he comprehends form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, he is totally released from form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness.
He is totally released from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
He is totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN..
At Savatthi.
“For a monk practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, what accords with the Dhamma is this: that he keep focused on not-self with regard to form, that he keep focused on not-self with regard to feeling, that he keep focused on not-self with regard to perception, that he keep focused on not-self with regard to fabrications, that he keep focused on not-self with regard to consciousness.
As he keeps focusing on not-self with regard to form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, he comprehends form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness.
As he comprehends form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, he is totally released from form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness.
He is totally released from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
He is totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN..
At Savatthi.
“For a monk practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, what accords with the Dhamma is this: that he keep focused on inconstancy with regard to form, that he keep focused on inconstancy with regard to feeling, that he keep focused on inconstancy with regard to perception, that he keep focused on inconstancy with regard to fabrications, that he keep focused on inconstancy with regard to consciousness.
As he keeps focusing on inconstancy with regard to form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, he comprehends form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness.
As he comprehends form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, he is totally released from form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness.
He is totally released from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
He is totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN..
At Savatthi.
“For a monk practicing the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma, what accords with the Dhamma is this: that he keep cultivating disenchantment with regard to form, that he keep cultivating disenchantment with regard to feeling, that he keep cultivating disenchantment with regard to perception, that he keep cultivating disenchantment with regard to fabrications, that he keep cultivating disenchantment with regard to consciousness.
As he keeps cultivating disenchantment with regard to form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, he comprehends form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness.
As he comprehends form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness, he is totally released from form… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness.
He is totally released from sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
He is totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN..
At Savatthi.
“Monks, I will teach you the phenomena to be comprehended, as well as comprehension.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “And which are the phenomena to be comprehended?
Form is a phenomenon to be comprehended.
Feeling… Perception… Fabrications… Consciousness is a phenomenon to be comprehended.
These are called phenomena to be comprehended.
“And which is comprehension?
Any ending of passion, ending of aversion, ending of delusion.
This is called comprehension.
See also: SN..
At Savatthi.
“Monks, I will teach you the burden, the carrier of the burden, the taking up of the burden, and the casting off of the burden.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “And which is the burden?
'The five clinging-aggregates,' it should be said.
Which five?
Form as a clinging-aggregate, feeling as a clinging-aggregate, perception as a clinging-aggregate, fabrications as a clinging-aggregate, consciousness as a clinging-aggregate.
This, monks, is called the burden.
“And which is the carrier of the burden?
'The person,' it should be said.
This venerable one with such a name, such a clan-name.
This is called the carrier of the burden.
“And which is the taking up of the burden?
The craving that makes for further becoming — accompanied by passion & delight, relishing now here & now there — i.e., craving for sensual pleasure, craving for becoming, craving for non-becoming.
This is called the taking up of the burden.
“And which is the casting off of the burden?
The remainderless fading & cessation, renunciation, relinquishment, release, & letting go of that very craving.
This is called the casting off of the burden.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-gone, the Teacher, said further:
As might be imagined, the first group accused the second group of denying the concept of anatta, or not-self; whereas the second group accused the first of being unable to account for the truths that they said their concept of person explained.
Both groups, however, found that their positions entangled them in philosophical difficulties that have never been successfully resolved.
Perhaps the most useful lesson to draw from the history of this controversy is the one that accords with the Buddha's statements in MN, where he refuses to get involved in questions of whether a person has a live essence separate from or identical to his/her body, or of whether after death there is something of an arahant that exists or not.
In other words, the questions aren't worth asking.
Nothing is accomplished by assuming or denying an ultimate reality behind what we think of as a person.
Instead, the strategy of the practice is to comprehend the burden that we each are carrying and to throw it off.
As SN.
points out, when one stops trying to define oneself in any way, one is free from all limitations — and that settles all questions.
Dwelling at Savatthi.
There the Blessed One addressed the monks: “I will teach you the origination of the world & the ending of the world.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded to the Blessed One.
The Blessed One said: “And what is the origination of the world?
Dependent on the eye & forms there arises eye-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
This is the origination of the world.
“Dependent on the ear & sounds there arises ear-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact… Dependent on the nose & aromas there arises nose-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact… Dependent on the tongue & flavors there arises tongue-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact… Dependent on the body & tactile sensations there arises body-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact… Dependent on the intellect & mental qualities there arises intellect-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
This is the origination of the world.
“And what is the ending of the world?
Dependent on the eye & forms there arises eye-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
Now, from the remainderless cessation & fading away of that very craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
This is the ending of the world.
“Dependent on the ear & sounds there arises ear-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact… Dependent on the nose & aromas there arises nose-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact… Dependent on the tongue & flavors there arises tongue-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact… Dependent on the body & tactile sensations there arises body-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact… Dependent on the intellect & mental qualities there arises intellect-consciousness.
The meeting of the three is contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
Now, from the remainderless cessation & fading away of that very craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
This is the ending of the world.”
Dwelling at Savatthi… Then a certain brahman went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “What now, Master Gotama: Is the one who acts the same one who experiences?
“ 'The one who acts is the same one who experiences,' is one extreme.
“Then, Master Gotama, is the one who acts someone other than the one who experiences?
“ 'The one who acts is someone other than the one who experiences,' is the second extreme.
Avoiding both of these extremes, the Tathagata teaches the Dhamma by means of the middle: From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
When this was said, the brahman said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to point out the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the community of monks.
May Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge from this day forward, for life.”
“Even if a man does not will and plan, yet if he dwells on something this forms a basis for the continuation of consciousness:… rebirth… takes place…
“But if a man neither wills nor plans nor dwells on anything, no basis is formed for the continuation of consciousness.
This basis being absent, consciousness has no lodgment.
Consciousness not being lodged there and not growing, no rebirth of renewed existence takes place in the future, and so birth, decay-and-death, grief, lamentation, suffering, sorrow and despair are destroyed.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering.”
Staying at Savatthi… “What one intends, what one arranges, and what one obsesses about: This is a support for the stationing of consciousness.
There being a support, there is a landing of consciousness.
When that consciousness lands and grows, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
When there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
“If one doesn't intend and doesn't arrange, but one still obsesses, this is a support for the stationing of consciousness.
There being a support, there is a landing of consciousness.
When that consciousness lands and grows, there is the production of renewed becoming in the future.
When there is the production of renewed becoming in the future, there is future birth, aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
“But when one doesn't intend, arrange, or obsess, there is no support for the stationing of consciousness.
There being no support, there is no landing of consciousness.
When that consciousness doesn't land & grow, there is no production of renewed becoming in the future.
When there is no production of renewed becoming in the future, there is no future birth, aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.
Translator's note: In this discourse, the Buddha refuses to answer the question of whether there is anyone or anything lying behind the processes described in dependent origination.
When his interlocutor asks, for each factor in the causal process, “Which is the X, and whose is the X?” the Buddha equates this with the assumption that “X is one thing, and it is the X of someone/something else.” He then equates this with the proposition, which he has rejected many times elsewhere in the discourses, that the life-principle is one thing, and the body is something else, i.e., that there is something unseen lying behind the visible processes of life.
However, the Buddha has also rejected, in as many times, the proposition that the life-principle is the same as the body, i.e., that there is nothing unseen lying behind the visible processes of life.
Avoiding these two extremes, he simply drops the question and focuses attention on what is directly perceivable — the way one factor in dependent co-arising functions as a prerequisite for the next.
If one were to focus on what might or might not lie behind these factors, one would be tied up in speculations about what, by definition, can never be experienced.
But by focusing on the interplay of the factors that are directly perceivable, and — by so doing — developing dispassion for them, one can overcome the craving and ignorance that keep producing stress and suffering, and in that way gain release.
Staying at Savatthi… “From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications… From birth as a requisite condition, then aging-&-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
When this was said, a certain monk said to the Blessed One: “Which aging & death, lord?
And whose is this aging & death?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
If one were to ask, 'Which aging & death?
And whose is this aging & death?' and if one were to ask, 'Is aging & death one thing, and is this the aging & death of someone/something else?' both of them would have the same meaning, even though their words would differ.
When there is the view that the soul is the same as the body, there isn't the leading of the holy life.
And when there is the view that the soul is one thing and the body another, there isn't the leading of the holy life.
Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathagata points out the Dhamma in between: From birth as a requisite condition comes aging & death.
“Which birth, lord?
And whose is this birth?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
“Which becoming, lord?
And whose is this becoming?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From clinging as a requisite condition comes becoming.
“Which clinging, lord?
And whose is this clinging?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging.
“Which craving, lord?
And whose is this craving?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
“Which feeling, lord?
And whose is this feeling?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
“Which contact, lord?
And whose is this contact?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
“Which are the six sense media, lord, and whose are the six sense media?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
“Which name-&-form, lord?
And whose is this name-&-form?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
“Which consciousness, lord?
And whose is this consciousness?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said… “From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
“Which fabrications, lord?
And whose are the fabrications?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“If one were to ask, 'Which are the fabrications, and whose are the fabrications?' and if one were to say, 'Fabrications are one thing, and these fabrications are something/someone else's,' both of them would have the same meaning, even though their words would differ.
When there is the view that the life-principle is the same as the body, there is no leading the holy life.
And when there is the view that the life-principle is one thing and the body another, there is no leading the holy life.
Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathagata points out the Dhamma in between: From ignorance as requisite condition come fabrications.
Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance, every one of these writhings & wrigglings & wigglings — 'Which aging & death?
And whose is this aging & death?' or 'Is aging & death one thing, and is this the aging & death of someone/something else?' or 'The soul is the same as the body,' or 'The soul is one thing and the body another' — are abandoned, their root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
See also: SN.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed Ven.
Sariputta, “Sariputta, it is said in Ajita's Question in the Way to the Further Shore:
“How is the detailed meaning of this brief statement to be understood?
When this was said, Ven.
Sariputta remained silent.
A second time… A third time the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Sariputta, “Sariputta, it is said in Ajita's Question in the Way to the Further Shore:
“How is the detailed meaning of this brief statement to be understood?
A third time, Ven.
Sariputta remained silent.
“Do you see, Sariputta, that 'this has come into being'?
“One sees with right discernment, lord, that 'this has come into being.' Seeing with right discernment that 'this has come into being,' one practices for disenchantment with, for dispassion toward, for the cessation of what has come into being.
One sees with right discernment that 'it has come into being from this nutriment.' Seeing with right discernment that 'it has come into being from this nutriment,' one practices for disenchantment with, for dispassion toward, for the cessation of the nutriment by which it has come into being.
One sees with right discernment that 'from the cessation of this nutriment, what has come into being is subject to cessation.' Seeing with right discernment that 'from the cessation of this nutriment, what has come into being is subject to cessation,' one practices for disenchantment with, for dispassion toward, for the cessation of what is subject to cessation.
This is how one is a learner.
“And how, lord, is one a person who has fathomed the Dhamma?
“One sees with right discernment, lord, that 'this has come into being.' Seeing with right discernment that 'this has come into being,' one is — through disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, through lack of clinging/sustenance — released from what has come into being.
One sees with right discernment that 'it has come into being from this nutriment.' Seeing with right discernment that 'it has come into being from this nutriment,' one is — through disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, through lack of clinging/sustenance — released from the nutriment by which it has come into being.
One sees with right discernment that 'from the cessation of this nutriment, what has come into being is subject to cessation.' Seeing with right discernment that 'from the cessation of this nutriment, what has come into being is subject to cessation,' one is — through disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, through lack of clinging/sustenance — released from what is subject to cessation.
This is how one is a person who has fathomed the Dhamma.
“It is in this way, lord, that I understand the detailed meaning of the brief statement in Ajita's Question in the Way to the Further Shore:
“Excellent, Sariputta.
Excellent.
One sees with right discernment that 'this has come into being.' Seeing with right discernment that 'this has come into being,' one practices for disenchantment with, for dispassion toward, for the cessation of what has come into being.
One sees with right discernment that 'it has come into being from this nutriment.' Seeing with right discernment that 'it has come into being from this nutriment,' one practices for disenchantment with, for dispassion toward, for the cessation of the nutriment by which it has come into being.
One sees with right discernment that 'from the cessation of this nutriment, what has come into being is subject to cessation.' Seeing with right discernment that 'from the cessation of this nutriment, what has come into being is subject to cessation,' one practices for disenchantment with, for dispassion toward, for the cessation of what is subject to cessation.
This is how one is a learner.
“And how is one a person who has fathomed the Dhamma?
“One sees with right discernment that 'this has come into being.' Seeing with right discernment that 'this has come into being,' one is — through disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, through lack of clinging/sustenance — released from what has come into being.
One sees with right discernment that 'it has come into being from this nutriment.' Seeing with right discernment that 'it has come into being from this nutriment,' one is — through disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, through lack of clinging/sustenance — released from the nutriment by which it has come into being.
One sees with right discernment that 'from the cessation of this nutriment, what has come into being is subject to cessation.' Seeing with right discernment that 'from the cessation of this nutriment, what has come into being is subject to cessation,' one is — through disenchantment, dispassion, cessation, through lack of clinging/sustenance — released from what is subject to cessation.
This is how one is a person who has fathomed the Dhamma.
“It is in this way that the detailed meaning of the brief statement in Ajita's Question in the Way to the Further Shore is to be understood:

“Monks, I declare that the destruction of the cankers comes for him who knows and sees, and not for him who does not know and does not see.
By knowing what, by seeing what, does the destruction of the cankers come about?
'Such is material form, such is its arising, such is its passing away; such is feeling… such is perception… such are the mental formations… such is consciousness, such is its arising, such is its passing away': for him who knows this, for him who sees this, the destruction of the cankers comes about.
“Regarding this knowledge of destruction, I declare that there is a supporting condition without which it does not arise… What is this supporting condition?
Liberation… Liberation has a supporting condition…: Dispassion… Dispassion has a supporting condition…: Disenchantment… Disenchantment has a supporting condition…: Knowledge-and-vision-of-things-as-they-are… Knowledge-and-vision-of-things-as-they-are has a supporting condition…: Concentration… Concentration has a supporting condition…: Happiness… Happiness has a supporting condition…: Tranquillity… Tranquillity has a supporting condition…: Rapture… Rapture has a supporting condition…: Joy… Joy has a supporting condition…: Faith… Faith has a supporting condition…: Suffering… Suffering has a supporting condition…: Birth… Becoming… Grasping… Craving… Feeling… Contact… the Six Sense-Bases… Name-and-Form… Consciousness… the formations… Ignorance…
“Thus, monks, Ignorance is the supporting condition for the formations Birth.
Birth for Suffering, Suffering for Faith, Faith for Joy, Joy for Delight, Delight for Tranquillity, Tranquillity for Happiness, Happiness for Concentration, Concentration for Knowledge-and-vision-of-things-as-they-are, Knowledge-and-vision-of-things-as-they-are for Disenchantment, Disenchantment for Dispassion, Dispassion for Liberation, Liberation for Knowledge of the destruction of the cankers.”
Dwelling at Savatthi… “Monks, the ending of the effluents is for one who knows & sees, I tell you, not for one who does not know & does not see.
For one who knows what & sees what is there the ending of effluents?
'Such is form, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such is perception, such its origination, such its disappearance.
Such are fabrications, such their origination, such their disappearance.
Such is consciousness, such its origination, such its disappearance.' The ending of the effluents is for one who knows in this way & sees in this way.
“The knowledge of ending in the presence of ending has its prerequisite, I tell you.
It is not without a prerequisite.
And what is the prerequisite for the knowledge of ending?
Release, it should be said.
Release has its prerequisite, I tell you.
It is not without a prerequisite.
And what is its prerequisite?
Dispassion… Disenchantment… Knowledge & vision of things as they actually are present… Concentration… Pleasure… Serenity… Rapture… Joy… Conviction… Stress… Birth… Becoming… Clinging… Craving… Feeling… Contact… The six sense media… Name-&-form… Consciousness… Fabrications… Fabrications have their prerequisite, I tell you.
They are not without a prerequisite.
And what is their prerequisite?
Ignorance, it should be said.
“Thus fabrications have ignorance as their prerequisite, consciousness has fabrications as its prerequisite, name-&-form has consciousness as its prerequisite, the six sense media have name-&-form as their prerequisite, contact has the six sense media as its prerequisite, feeling has contact as its prerequisite, craving has feeling as its prerequisite, clinging has craving as its prerequisite, becoming has clinging as its prerequisite, birth has becoming as its prerequisite, stress & suffering have birth as their prerequisite, conviction has stress & suffering as its prerequisite, joy has conviction as its prerequisite, rapture has joy as its prerequisite, serenity has rapture as its prerequisite, pleasure has serenity as its prerequisite, concentration has pleasure as its prerequisite, knowledge & vision of things as they actually are present has concentration as its prerequisite, disenchantment has knowledge & vision of things as they actually are present as its prerequisite, dispassion has disenchantment as its prerequisite, release has dispassion as its prerequisite, knowledge of ending has release as its prerequisite.
“Just as when the gods pour rain in heavy drops & crash thunder on the upper mountains: The water, flowing down along the slopes, fills the mountain clefts & rifts & gullies.
When the mountain clefts & rifts & gullies are full, they fill the little ponds.
When the little ponds are full, they fill the big lakes.
When the big lakes are full, they fill the little rivers.
When the little rivers are full, they fill the big rivers.
When the big rivers are full, they fill the great ocean.
In the same way:
“Fabrications have ignorance as their prerequisite, consciousness has fabrications as its prerequisite, name-&-form has consciousness as their prerequisite, the six sense media have name-&-form as their prerequisite, contact has the six sense media as its prerequisite, feeling has contact as its prerequisite, craving has feeling as its prerequisite, clinging has craving as its prerequisite, becoming has clinging as its prerequisite, birth has becoming as its prerequisite, stress & suffering have birth as their prerequisite, conviction has stress & suffering as its prerequisite, joy has conviction as its prerequisite, rapture has joy as its prerequisite, serenity has rapture as its prerequisite, pleasure has serenity as its prerequisite, concentration has pleasure as its prerequisite, knowledge & vision of things as they actually are present has concentration as its prerequisite, disenchantment has knowledge & vision of things as they actually are present as its prerequisite, dispassion has disenchantment as its prerequisite, release has dispassion as its prerequisite, knowledge of ending has release as its prerequisite.”
“It is not by that which is low, monks, that the highest is attained; it is by the highest that the highest is attained.
Most excellent is the holy life.
The teacher has come to you face to face.
Therefore stir up energy, monks, to gain what has not been gained, to attain what has not been attained, to realize what has not been realized.
Then this our leaving the world will not prove a barren thing, but fruitful and productive of results.
So too the requisites we enjoy — robe, alms, lodging, medicine in sickness — trifling as they are, will be very fruitful for us, very profitable.
For thus, monks, you must train yourselves: perceiving his own benefit a man should exert himself tirelessly, perceiving the benefit to others, he should exert himself tirelessly, perceiving the benefit to both, he should exert himself tirelessly.”
Dwelling at Savatthi… “Monks, I will teach you dependent co-arising & dependently co-arisen phenomena.
Listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks replied.
The Blessed One said:
“Now what is dependent co-arising?
From birth as a requisite condition comes aging & death.
Whether or not there is the arising of Tathagatas, this property stands — this regularity of the Dhamma, this orderliness of the Dhamma, this this/that conditionality.
The Tathagata directly awakens to that, breaks through to that.
Directly awakening & breaking through to that, he declares it, teaches it, describes it, sets it forth.
He reveals it, explains it, makes it plain, & says, 'Look.' From birth as a requisite condition comes aging & death.
“From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth…
“From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming…
“From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance…
“From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving…
“From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling…
“From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact…
“From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media…
“From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form…
“From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness…
“From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
Whether or not there is the arising of Tathagatas, this property stands — this regularity of the Dhamma, this orderliness of the Dhamma, this this/that conditionality.
The Tathagata directly awakens to that, breaks through to that.
Directly awakening & breaking through to that, he declares it, teaches it, describes it, sets it forth.
He reveals it, explains it, makes it plain, & says, 'Look.' From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
What's there in this way is a reality, not an unreality, not other than what it seems, conditioned by this/that.
This is called dependent co-arising.
“And what are dependently co-arisen phenomena?
Aging & death are dependently co-arisen phenomena: inconstant, compounded, dependently co-arisen, subject to ending, subject to passing away, subject to fading, subject to cessation.
“Birth is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon…
“Becoming is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon…
“Clinging/sustenance is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon…
“Craving is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon…
“Feeling is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon…
“Contact is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon…
“The six sense media are dependently co-arisen phenomena…
“Name-&-form is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon…
“Consciousness is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon…
“Fabrications are dependently co-arisen phenomena…
“Ignorance is a dependently co-arisen phenomenon: inconstant, compounded, dependently co-arisen, subject to ending, subject to passing away, subject to fading, subject to cessation.
These are called dependently co-arisen phenomena.
“When a disciple of the noble ones has seen well with right discernment this dependent co-arising & these dependently co-arisen phenomena as they have come to be, it is not possible that he would run after the past, thinking, 'Was I in the past?
Was I not in the past?
What was I in the past?
How was I in the past?
Having been what, what was I in the past?' or that he would run after the future, thinking, 'Shall I be in the future?
Shall I not be in the future?
What shall I be in the future?
How shall I be in the future?
Having been what, what shall I be in the future?' or that he would be inwardly perplexed about the immediate present, thinking, 'Am I?
Am I not?
What am I?
How am I?
Where has this being come from?
Where is it bound?' Such a thing is not possible.
Why is that?
Because the disciple of the noble ones has seen well with right discernment this dependent co-arising & these dependently co-arisen phenomena as they have come to be.”
Dwelling at Savatthi.
“When a fool is obstructed by ignorance and conjoined with craving, this body thus results.
Now there is both this body and external name-&-form.
Here, in dependence on this duality, there is contact at the six senses.
Touched by these, or one or another of them, the fool is sensitive to pleasure & pain.
“When a wise person is obstructed by ignorance and conjoined with craving, this body thus results.
Now there is both this body and external name-&-form.
Here, in dependence on this duality, there is contact at the six senses.
Touched by these, or one or another of them, the wise person is sensitive to pleasure & pain.
“So what difference, what distinction, what distinguishing factor is there between the wise person & the fool?
“For us, lord, the teachings have the Blessed One as their root, their guide, & their arbitrator.
It would be good if the Blessed One himself would explicate the meaning of this statement.
Having heard it from the Blessed One, the monks will remember it.
“In that case, monks, listen & pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “The ignorance with which the fool is obstructed, the craving with which he is conjoined, through which this body results: that ignorance has not been abandoned by the fool; that craving has not been destroyed.
Why is that?
The fool has not practiced the holy life for the right ending of stress.
Therefore, at the break-up of the body, he is headed for a body.
Headed for a body, he is not entirely freed from birth, aging, death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
I tell you, he is not entirely freed from stress & suffering.
“The ignorance with which the wise person is obstructed, the craving with which he is conjoined, through which this body results: that ignorance has been abandoned by the wise person; that craving has been destroyed.
Why is that?
The wise person has practiced the holy life for the right ending of stress.
Therefore, at the break-up of the body, he is not headed for a body.
Not headed for a body, he is entirely freed from birth, aging, death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
He is, I tell you, entirely freed from stress & suffering.
See also: AN.
“Well now, good Gotama, is suffering caused by oneself?
“No indeed, Kassapa,” said the Blessed One.
“Well then, good Gotama, is one's suffering caused by another?
“No indeed, Kassapa.
“Well then, good Gotama, is suffering caused by both oneself and another?
“No indeed, Kassapa.
“Well then, good Gotama, this suffering which is caused neither by oneself nor by another, is it the result of chance?
“No indeed, Kassapa.
“Well then, good Gotama, is suffering non-existent?
“No Kassapa: suffering is not non-existent.
Suffering exists.
“Then the good Gotama neither knows nor sees suffering.
“No, Kassapa, it is not that I neither know nor see suffering: I know suffering, I see suffering.
“Well now, good Gotama, when I asked you, 'Is suffering caused by oneself?' you answered 'No indeed' Would the Lord, the Blessed One expound suffering to me!
Would the Lord, the Blessed One teach me about suffering!
“'He who performs the act also experiences ' — what you, Kassapa, first called 'suffering caused by oneself' — this amounts to the Eternalist theory.
'One person performs the act, another experiences,' — which to the person affected seems like “suffering caused by another” — this amounts to the Annihilationist theory.
Avoiding both extremes, Kassapa, the Tathaagata teaches a doctrine of the middle: Conditioned by ignorance are the formations…… so there comes about the cessation of this entire mass of suffering.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
Then early in the morning the Blessed One, having put on his robes and carrying his bowl and outer robe, went into Rajagaha for alms.
Kassapa-the-clothless ascetic saw him coming from afar.
On seeing him, he went to him and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he stood to one side.
As he was standing there, he said to the Blessed One, “We would like to question Master Gotama about a certain point, if he would take the time to answer our question.
“This is not the time for a question, Kassapa.
We have entered among houses.
A second time… A third time Kassapa the clothless ascetic said to him, “We would like to question Master Gotama about a certain point, if he would take the time to answer our question.
“This is not the time for a question, Kassapa.
We have entered among houses.
When this was said, Kassapa the clothless ascetic said, “What we want to ask isn't much.
“Then ask as you like.
“Master Gotama, is stress self-made?
“Don't say that, Kassapa.
“Then is it other-made?
“Don't say that, Kassapa.
“Then is it both self-made and other-made?
“Don't say that, Kassapa.
“Then is it the case that stress, being neither self-made nor other-made, arises spontaneously?
“Don't say that, Kassapa.
“Then does stress not exist?
“It's not the case, Kassapa, that stress does not exist.
Stress does exist.
“Well, in that case, does Master Gotama not know or see stress?
“Kassapa, it's not the case that I don't know or see stress.
I know stress.
I see stress.
“Now, when asked, 'Is stress self-made?' you say, 'Don't say that, Kassapa.' When asked, 'Then is it other-made?' you say, 'Don't say that, Kassapa.' When asked, 'Then is it both self-made and other-made?' you say, 'Don't say that, Kassapa.' When asked, 'Then is it the case that stress, being neither self-made nor other-made, arises spontaneously?' you say, 'Don't say that, Kassapa.' When asked, 'Then does stress not exist?' you say, 'It's not the case, Kassapa, that stress does not exist.
Stress does exist.' When asked, 'Well, in that case, does Master Gotama not know or see stress?' you say, 'Kassapa, it's not the case that I don't know or see stress.
I know stress.
I see stress.' Then explain stress to me, lord Blessed One.
Teach me about stress, lord Blessed One!
“'The one who acts is the one who experiences ' amounts to the eternalist statement, 'Existing from the very beginning, stress is self-made.' 'The one who acts is someone other than the one who experiences' amounts to the annihilationist statement, 'For one existing harassed by feeling, stress is other-made.' Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathagata teaches the Dhamma via the middle: 
“Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/ sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
When this was said, Kassapa the clothless ascetic said, “Magnificent, lord!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the community of monks.
Let me obtain the going forth in the Blessed One's presence, let me obtain admission.
“Anyone, Kassapa, who has previously belonged to another sect and who desires the going forth & admission in this doctrine & discipline, must first undergo probation for four months.
If, at the end of four months, the monks feel so moved, they give him the going forth & admit him to the monk's state.
But I know distinctions among individuals in this matter.
“Lord, if that is so, I am willing to undergo probation for four years.
If, at the end of four years, the monks feel so moved, let them give me the going forth & admit me to the monk's state.
Then Kassapa the clothless ascetic obtained the going forth in the Blessed One's presence, he obtained admission.
And not long after his admission — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus Ven.
Kassapa became another one of the arahants.”
“'Dhamma-teacher, Dhamma-teacher' they say, Lord.
“If, monk, anyone teaches a doctrine of disenchantment with decay-and-death, of dispassion its cessation, that suffices for him to be called a monk who teaches Dhamma.
“If anyone has trained himself in this disenchantment with decay-and-death, in dispassion its cessation, that suffices for him to be called a monk who is trained in what is in conformity with Dhamma.
“If anyone, through disenchantment with decay-and-death, through dispassion its cessation, is liberated from grasping, that suffices for him to be called one who has attained Nibbaana in this life.
Dwelling at Savatthi… Then Ven.
Kaccayana Gotta approached the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Lord, 'Right view, right view,' it is said.
To what extent is there right view?
“By & large, Kaccayana, this world is supported by a polarity, that of existence & non-existence.
But when one sees the origination of the world as it actually is with right discernment, 'non-existence' with reference to the world does not occur to one.
When one sees the cessation of the world as it actually is with right discernment, 'existence' with reference to the world does not occur to one.
“By & large, Kaccayana, this world is in bondage to attachments, clingings, & biases.
But one such as this does not get involved with or cling to these attachments, clingings, fixations of awareness, biases, or obsessions; nor is he resolved on 'my self.' He has no uncertainty or doubt that just stress, when arising, is arising; stress, when passing away, is passing away.
In this, his knowledge is independent of others.
It's to this extent, Kaccayana, that there is right view.
“'Everything exists': That is one extreme.
'Everything doesn't exist': That is a second extreme.
Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathagata teaches the Dhamma via the middle: From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.”
This discourse incorporates the teaching on the four nutriments into the pattern for dependent co-arising, placing them in the position usually occupied by clinging: after craving and before becoming.
Putting nutriment in this position highlights one of the connotations of the Pali word for clinging, upadana, which can also mean “sustenance.” It also highlights one of the connotations of the Pali word for craving, tanha, which can also mean “thirst.
The Commentary to this discourse tries to fit this teaching into the three-lifetime interpretation of dependent co-arising, emphasizing the role of the four nutriments in the mechanics of death and rebirth, but there is no need to limit the teaching to this interpretation.
The teachings both in this discourse and in the following one show the complex interactions and feedback loops among the different factors of dependent co-arising, both between lifetimes and within a single lifetime — even a single moment.
Craving is what takes material form, contact, intention, and consciousness — all of which precede it in the chain of dependent co-arising — and turns them into food for further becoming: continued becoming in this lifetime, and future becoming in the next.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks, there are these four nutriments for the maintenance of beings who have come into being or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
Which four?
Physical food, gross or refined; contact as the second; intellectual intention the third; and consciousness the fourth.
These are the four nutriments for the maintenance of beings who have come into being or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
“Now, these four nutriments have what as their cause, what as their origination, what as their source, what as that which brings them into play?
These four nutriments have craving as their cause, craving as their origination, craving as their source, craving as that which brings them into play.
“And this craving has what as its cause, what as its origination, what as its source, what as that which brings it into play?… Feeling…
“And this feeling has what as its cause…?…Contact…
“And this contact has what as its cause…?…The six sense media…
“And these six sense media have what as their cause…?…Name-&-form…
“And this name-&-form has what as its cause…?…Consciousness…
“And this consciousness has what as its cause…?…Fabrication…
“And this fabrication has what as its cause, what as its origination, what as its source, what as that which brings it into play?
Fabrication has ignorance as its cause, ignorance as its origination, ignorance as its source, ignorance as that which brings it into play.
“Thus, from ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
“From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
“From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
“From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
“From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
“From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
“From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
“From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
“From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
“From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
“From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/ sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN.; AN.; The Four Nutriments of Life by Nyanaponika Thera.
Dwelling at Savatthi.
“Monks, there are these four nutriments for the maintenance of beings who have come into being or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
Which four?
Physical food, gross or refined; contact as the second; intellectual intention the third; and consciousness the fourth.
These are the four nutriments for the maintenance of beings who have come into being or for the support of those in search of a place to be born.
When this was said, Ven.-Moliya-Phagguna said to the Blessed One, “Lord, who feeds on the consciousness-nutriment?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“I don't say 'feeds.' If I were to say 'feeds,' then 'Who feeds on the consciousness-nutriment?' would be a valid question.
But I don't say that.
When I don't say that, the valid question is 'Consciousness-nutriment for what?' And the valid answer is, 'Consciousness-nutriment for the production of future coming-into-being.
When that has come into being and exists, then the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.' “Lord, who makes contact?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“I don't say 'makes contact.' If I were to say 'makes contact,' then 'Who makes contact?' would be a valid question.
But I don't say that.
When I don't say that, the valid question is 'From what as a requisite condition comes contact?' And the valid answer is, 'From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.' “Lord, who feels?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“I don't say 'feels.' If I were to say 'feels,' then 'Who feels?' would be a valid question.
But I don't say that.
When I don't say that, the valid question is 'From what as a requisite condition comes feeling?' And the valid answer is, 'From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.' “Lord, who craves?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“I don't say 'craves.' If I were to say 'craves,' then 'Who craves?' would be a valid question.
But I don't say that.
When I don't say that, the valid question is 'From what as a requisite condition comes craving?' And the valid answer is, 'From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.' “Lord, who clings?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“I don't say 'clings.' If I were to say 'clings,' then 'Who clings?' would be a valid question.
But I don't say that.
When I don't say that, the valid question is 'From what as a requisite condition comes clinging?' And the valid answer is, 'From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging.
From clinging as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Lord, who takes sustenance?
“Not a valid question,” the Blessed One said.
“I don't say 'takes sustenance.' If I were to say 'takes sustenance,' then 'Who takes sustenance?' would be a valid question.
But I don't say that.
When I don't say that, the valid question is 'From what as a requisite condition comes sustenance?' And the valid answer is, 'From craving as a requisite condition comes sustenance.
From sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN.; SN.; SN.; AN.; The Four Nutriments of Life by Nyanaponika Thera.
Dwelling at Savatthi… “Monks, I will describe & analyze dependent co-arising for you.
“And what is dependent co-arising?
From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Now what is aging and death?
Whatever aging, decrepitude, brokenness, graying, wrinkling, decline of life-force, weakening of the faculties of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called aging.
Whatever deceasing, passing away, breaking up, disappearance, dying, death, completion of time, break up of the aggregates, casting off of the body, interruption in the life faculty of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called death.
“And what is birth?
Whatever birth, taking birth, descent, coming-to-be, coming-forth, appearance of aggregates, & acquisition of media of the various beings in this or that group of beings, that is called birth.
“And what is becoming?
These three are becomings: sensual becoming, form becoming, & formless becoming.
This is called becoming.
“And what is clinging/sustenance?
These four are clingings: sensuality clinging, view clinging, precept & practice clinging, and doctrine of self clinging.
This is called clinging.
“And what is craving?
These six are classes of craving: craving for forms, craving for sounds, craving for smells, craving for tastes, craving for tactile sensations, craving for ideas.
This is called craving.
“And what is feeling?
These six are classes of feeling: feeling born from eye-contact, feeling born from ear-contact, feeling born from nose-contact, feeling born from tongue-contact, feeling born from body-contact, feeling born from intellect-contact.
This is called feeling.
“And what is contact?
These six are classes of contact: eye-contact, ear-contact, nose-contact, tongue-contact, body-contact, intellect-contact.
This is called contact.
“And what are the six sense media?
These six are sense media: the eye-medium, the ear-medium, the nose-medium, the tongue-medium, the body-medium, the intellect-medium.
These are called the six sense media.
“And what is name-&-form?
Feeling, perception, intention, contact, & attention: This is called name.
The four great elements, and the form dependent on the four great elements: This is called form.
This name & this form are called name-&-form.
“And what is consciousness?
These six are classes of consciousness: eye-consciousness, ear-consciousness, nose-consciousness, tongue-consciousness, body-consciousness, intellect-consciousness.
This is called consciousness.
“And what are fabrications?
These three are fabrications: bodily fabrications, verbal fabrications, mental fabrications.
These are called fabrications.
“And what is ignorance?
Not knowing stress, not knowing the origination of stress, not knowing the cessation of stress, not knowing the way of practice leading to the cessation of stress: This is called ignorance.
“Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
See also: SN.; SN..
“Monks, ] before I attained supreme Enlightenment, while I was still a Bodhisatta, the thought occurred to me: 'This world, alas, has fallen into sore distress.
There is being born, growing old, dying, passing over and being reborn.
But from all this suffering, from decay and death, no way of release is apparent.
Surely there must be some way of release discoverable from this suffering, this decay-and-death.'
“Then, monks, this thought occurred to me 'What being present does decay-and-death come to be?
What conditions decay-and-death?' Then, monks, as I considered this thoroughly, the insight and comprehension dawned on me: 'Birth being present, death-and-decay comes to be; decay-and-death is conditioned by birth.' Then the thought occurred to me: 'What being present does birth come to be?
What conditions birth?… becoming… grasping… craving… feeling… contact… the six sense-bases… name-form… consciousness… formations?…' Then, as I considered this thoroughly, the insight and comprehension dawned on me: 'Ignorance being present the formations come to be; the formations are conditioned by ignorance.' And so we have it like this: 'Conditioned by ignorance are the formations, conditioned by the formations is consciousness… So there comes about the arising of this entire mass of suffering.'
“'Arising, arising!' — At this thought, monks, there arose in me, concerning things unheard of before, vision, knowledge, understanding, light.
“Then, monks, the thought occurred to me: 'By the absence of what does decay-and-death not come to be?' Then, monks, as I considered this thoroughly, the insight and comprehension dawned on me: 'In the absence of birth, decay-and-death does not come to be; from the ceasing of birth comes the ceasing of decay-and-death… becoming… grasping… craving… feeling… contact… the six sense-bases… name-form… consciousness… the formations… by the ceasing of ignorance comes the ceasing of the formations… So comes about the cessation of this entire mass of suffering.'
“'Cessation, cessation!' — At this thought, monks, there arose in me, concerning things unheard of before, vision, knowledge, understanding, light.”
“'Right view, right view,' it is said, Lord.
In what way, Lord, is there right view?'
“The world in general, Kaccaayana, inclines to two views, to existence or to non-existence.
But for him who, with the highest wisdom, sees the uprising of the world as it really is, 'non-existence of the world' does not apply, and for him who, with highest wisdom, sees the passing away of the world as it really is, 'existence of the world' does not apply.
“The world in general, Kaccaayana, grasps after systems and is imprisoned by dogmas.
But he does not go along with that system-grasping, that mental obstinacy and dogmatic bias, does not grasp at it, does not affirm: 'This is my self.' He knows without doubt or hesitation that whatever arises is merely dukkha that what passes away is merely dukkha and such knowledge is his own, not depending on anyone else.
This, Kaccaayana, is what constitutes right view.
“'Everything exists,' this is one extreme; 'nothing exists,' this is the other extreme.
Avoiding both extremes the Tathaagata teaches a doctrine of the middle: Conditioned by ignorance are the formations…… So there comes about the arising of this entire mass of suffering.
But from the complete fading away and cessation of ignorance there comes the cessation of the formations, from the cessation of the formations comes the cessation of consciousness… So there comes about the complete cessation of this entire mass of suffering.
Dukkha in Buddhist usage refers to the inherent unsatisfactoriness and general insecurity of all conditioned existence.
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Savatthi at Jetavana at the monastery of Anathapindika.
Then he addressed the monks saying, “O monks.” — “Venerable Sir,” said the monks by way of reply to the Blessed One.
Thereupon he spoke as follows:
“Monks, I shall relate a former incident.
There arose a battle between the Devas and Asuras.
Then Sakka, the Lord of the devas, addressed the devas of the Tavatimsa heaven thus:
“'Happy ones, if the devas who have gone to the battle should experience fear or terror or suffer from hair standing on end, let them behold the crest of my own banner.
If you do so, any fear, terror or hair standing on end arising in you will pass away.
“'If you fail to look up to the crest of my banner, look at the crest of the banner of Pajapati, King of gods.
If you do so, any fear, terror or hair standing on end arising in you will pass away.
“'If you fail to look up to the crest of Pajapati, King of the gods, look at the crest of the banner of Varuna, King of the gods.
If you do so, any fear, terror or hair standing on end arising in you will pass away.'
“Monks, any fear, terror or hair standing on end arising in them who look at the crest of the banner of Sakka… The Lord of the gods, of Pajapati… of Varuna… of Isana, the King of the gods, any fear terror or hair standing on end, may pass away, or may not pass away.
What is the reason for this?
“Sakka, the Lord of gods, O monks, is not free from lust, not free from hate, not free from delusion, and is therefore liable to fear, terror, fright, and flight.
I also say unto you O monks — if any fear, terror or hair standing on end should arise in you when you have gone to the forest or to the foot of a tree, or to an empty house, then think only of me thus:
“'Such Indeed is the Blessed One, arahant, supremely enlightened, endowed with knowledge and virtue, welcome being, knower of worlds, the peerless trainer of persons, teacher of gods and men, the Buddha, the Blessed One.' Monks, if you think of me, any fear, terror, or standing of hair on end, that may arise in you, will pass away.
“If you fail to think of me, then think of the Dhamma thus: 'Well expounded is the Dhamma by the Blessed One, a Dhamma to be realized by oneself and gives immediate results, a Dhamma which invites investigation and leads up to Nibbana, a Dhamma to be understood by the wise each for himself.' Monks, if you think of the Dhamma, any fear, terror or hair standing on end, that may arise in you, will pass away.
“If you fail to think of the Dhamma, then think of the Sangha thus: 'Of good conduct is the Order of Disciples of the Blessed One, of upright conduct is the Order of Disciples of the Blessed One, of wise conduct is the Order of Disciples of the Blessed One, of dutiful conduct is the Order of Disciples of the Blessed One.
This Order of Disciples of the Blessed One — namely those four pairs of persons, the eight kinds of individuals — is worthy of offerings, is worthy of hospitality, is worthy of gifts, is worthy of reverential salutations, is an incomparable field of merit for the world.' Monks, if you think of the Sangha, any fear, terror or hair standing on end, that may arise in you, will pass away.
What is the reason for this?
The Tathagata, O monks, who is arahant, supremely enlightened, is free from lust, free from hate, is free from delusion, and is not liable to fear, terror, fright or flight.
So said the Blessed One.
Having thus spoken, the teacher, the “Welcome Being”, further said:
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi at Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “Once in the past the devas & asuras were arrayed for battle.
Then Vepacitti the asura-king said to Sakka the deva-king: 'Let there be victory through what is well spoken.'
“'Yes, Vepacitti, let there be victory through what is well spoken.'
“So the devas & asuras appointed a panel of judges, 'These will decide for us what is well spoken & poorly spoken.'
“Then Vepacitti the asura-king said to Sakka the deva-king, 'Say a verse, deva-king!'
“When this was said, Sakka the deva-king said to Vepacitti the asura-king, 'But you are the senior deity here, Vepacitti.
You say a verse.'
“When this was said, Vepacitti recited this verse:
“When Vepacitti had said this verse, the asuras applauded but the devas were silent.
So Vepacitti said to Sakka, 'Say a verse, deva-king!'
“When this was said, Sakka recited this verse:
“When Sakka had said this verse, the devas applauded but the asuras were silent.
So Sakka said to Vepacitti, 'Say a verse, Vepacitti!'
“When this was said, Vepacitti recited this verse:
“When Vepacitti had said this verse, the asuras applauded but the devas were silent.
So Vepacitti said to Sakka, 'Say a verse, deva-king!'
“When this was said, Sakka recited this verse:
“When Sakka had said this verse, the devas applauded but the asuras were silent.
Then the deva & asura panel of judges said, 'The verses said by Vepacitti the asura-king lie in the sphere of swords & weapons — thence arguments, quarrels, & strife.
Whereas the verses said by Sakka the deva-king lies outside the sphere of swords & weapons — thence no arguments, no quarrels, no strife.
The victory through what is well spoken goes to Sakka the deva-king.'
“And that, monks, is how the victory through what was well spoken went to Sakka the deva-king.”
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living in the abode of Alavaka, the Yakkha, at Alavi.
Then Alavaka approached the Blessed One and said: “Get out, recluse.” — “Very well, friend,” so saying the Blessed One went out.
“Come in, recluse.” — “Very well, friend,” so saying the Blessed One entered.
“Get out, recluse,” said Alavaka to the Blessed One a second time.
— “Very well, friend,” so saying the Blessed One went out.
“Come in, recluse.” — “Very well, friend,” so saying the Blessed One entered.
“Get out, recluse,” said Alavaka to the Blessed One a third time.
— “Very well, friend,” so saying the Blessed One went out.
“Come in, recluse.” — “Very well, friend,” so saying the Blessed One entered.
“Get out recluse,” said Alavaka to the Blessed One a fourth time.
— “No, O friend, I will not get out.
Do what you will.
“I will ask you a question, recluse.
If you do not answer me, I will confound your mind, or cleave your heart, or take you by your feet and fling you over to the further shore of the ocean.
“Well, friend, I do not see anyone in the world of Devas, Maras, Brahmas, or among the generation of recluses, brahmanas, deities, and humans, who could either confound my mind or cleave my heart, or take me by the feet and fling me over to the further shore of the ocean; nevertheless, friend, ask what you will.
Then Alavaka addressed the Blessed One in verse:
Having thus spoken, Alavaka said to the Blessed One:
“Most excellent, O Gotama, is thy teaching, most excellent.
Just as a man would set upright what is overturned, reveal what is concealed, point out the way to one gone astray, bring an oil lamp into the darkness so that those with eyes could see objects; even so the Dhamma has been declared in many a manner by the Venerable Gotama.
I take refuge in the Venerable Gotama, in the Dhamma and in the Sangha.
May the Venerable Gotama accept me as a disciple who has taken refuge, from this day forth while life lasts.”
Translator's note: This lively exchange between a forest-dwelling monk and a benevolent deity is filled with poetic movement and gives us a glimpse of the care with which some people practiced in the time of the Buddha.
Since the working definition of stealing was “taking what has not been given,” the Devata is correct — in a very strict sense.
Notice that the monk at first reacts defensively, denying that he is doing anything wrong, and then tries to shift the blame to others who do even worse.
After recognizing a veiled compliment, he finally realizes that the Devata is trying to help him, at which point he encourages further help.
The Devata ends the exchange sharply, revealing an intriguing and capricious character who is willing to help, but only on his own terms.
This is a role often played by nature spirits and other minor deities in the Pali texts.
I have heard that on one occasion a certain monk was dwelling among the Kosalans in a forest thicket.
Now at that time, after his meal, returning from his almsround, he went down to a lotus pond and sniffed a red lotus.
Then the devata inhabiting the forest thicket, feeling sympathy for the monk, desiring his benefit, desiring to bring him to his senses, approached him and addressed him with this verse:
The monk, chastened by the devata, came to his senses.
I have heard that on one occasion a certain monk was dwelling among the Kosalans in a forest thicket.
Now at that time, he spent the day's abiding thinking evil, unskillful thoughts: i.e., thoughts of sensuality, thoughts of ill will, thoughts of doing harm.
Then the devata inhabiting the forest thicket, feeling sympathy for the monk, desiring his benefit, desiring to bring him to his senses, approached him and addressed him with this verse:
The monk, chastened by the devata, came to his senses.
On one occasion a certain monk, a Vajjian princeling, was dwelling near Vesali in a forest thicket.
And on that occasion an all-night festival was being held in Vesali.
The monk — lamenting as he heard the resounding din of wind music, string music, & gongs coming from Vesali, on that occasion recited this verse:
Then the devata inhabiting the forest thicket, feeling sympathy for the monk, desiring his benefit, desiring to bring him to his senses, approached him and addressed him with this verse:
The monk, chastened by the devata, came to his senses.
I have heard that on one occasion Ven.
Anuruddha was dwelling among the Kosalans in a forest thicket.
Now at that time, a devata from the retinue of the heaven of the Thirty-three named Jalini, one of Ven.
Anuruddha's former consorts, went to him and, on arrival, addressed him with this verse:
I have heard that on one occasion a certain monk was dwelling among the Kosalans in a forest thicket.
Now at that time, as he had gone to spend the day, he was thinking unskillful thoughts, connected with the household life.
Then the devata inhabiting the forest thicket, feeling sympathy for the monk, desiring his benefit, desiring to bring him to his senses, approached him and addressed him with this verse:
The monk, chastened by the devata, came to his senses.
On one occasion Ven.
Ananda was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then early in the morning he put on his robes and, carrying his bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms with Ven.
Vangisa as his attendant monk.
Now at that time dissatisfaction had arisen in Ven.
Vangisa.
Lust invaded his mind.
So he addressed Ven.
Ananda with this verse:
At that time the brahman Sangaarava was living there, a “purity-by-water” man who believed in purification by water: his practice was to go down into the water every evening and every morning.
Now the Venerable Aananda, rising early, took his robe and bowl and went into Saavatthii for alms.
“It would be well, Lord, if the Blessed One were to visit the dwelling of Sangaarava the Brahman, out of compassion for him.
The Blessed One silently consented.
“Is it true, brahman, that you are a 'purity-by-water' man… that you go down to the water every evening and morning?
“Yes, good Gotama.
“What benefit do you expect from?
“It is like this, good Gotama.
The evil deeds that I do in the day I cause to be borne away in the evening, and the evil deeds that I do in the night I cause to be borne away in the morning.
That is the benefit I expect from “
At these words the Brahman Sangaarava said to the Blessed One: “Excellent… I go to the Lord Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of monks.
May the Lord Gotama accept me as a lay-disciple who has taken refuge in him from this day forth as long as life shall last.”
“'This has come to be' — do you see that, Saariputta?
“'This has come to be' — that, O Lord, one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'this has come to be,' one is on the way towards revulsion from what has come to be, towards dispassion and cessation.
“'Produced by such nutriment' — that one sees, with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen, with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'this has been produced by such nutriment,' one is on the way towards revulsion from its production by nutriment, towards dispassion and cessation.
“'By the cessation of nutriment, that what has come to be is bound to cease' — that one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen, with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'By the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is bound to cease,' one is on the way towards revulsion from what is liable to cease, towards dispassion and cessation.
Thus, O Lord, is one in higher training.
“And how, O Lord, is one a comprehender of Dhamma?
'This has come to be' — that, O Lord, one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'this has come to be,' then, through revulsion from what has come to be, through dispassion and the cessation, one is liberated without any clinging.
“'Produced by such nutriment' — that one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'this has been produced by such nutriment,' then, through revulsion from its production by nutriment, through dispassion and the cessation, one is liberated without any clinging.
“'By the cessation of nutriment, that what has come to be is bound to cease' — that one sees with true wisdom, as it really is.
And having seen with true wisdom, as it really is, that 'by the cessation of that nutriment, what has come to be is bound to cease,' then, through revulsion from what is liable to cease, from dispassion and the cessation, one is liberated without any clinging.
Thus, O Lord, is one a comprehender of Dhamma… “Well spoken, Saariputta, well spoken,” said the Exalted One.
“There are, O monks, four nutriments for the sustenance of beings born, and for the support of beings seeking birth.
What are the four?
Edible food, coarse and fine; secondly, sense-impression; thirdly, volitional thought; fourthly, consciousness.
After these words, the venerable Moliya-Phagguna addressed the Exalted One as follows:
“Who, O Lord, consumes the nutriment consciousness?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One.
“I do not say that 'he consumes.' If I had said so, then the question 'Who consumes?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be: 'For what is the nutriment consciousness?' And to that the correct reply is: 'The nutriment consciousness is a condition for the future arising of a renewed existence; when that has come into being, there is the sixfold sense-base; and conditioned by the sixfold sense-base is sense-impression.' “Who, O Lord, has a sense-impression?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One.
“I do not say that 'he has a sense-impression.' Had I said so, then the question 'Who has a sense-impression?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be 'What is the condition of sense-impression?' And to that the correct reply is: 'The sixfold sense-base is a condition of sense-impression, and sense-impression is the condition of feeling.' “Who, O Lord, feels?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One.
“I do not say that 'he feels.' Had I said so, then the question 'Who feels?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be 'What is the condition of feeling?' And to that the correct reply is: 'sense-impression is the condition of feeling; and feeling is the condition of craving.' “Who, O Lord, craves?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One.
“I do not say that 'he craves.' Had I said so, then the question 'Who craves?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be 'What is the condition of craving?' And to that the correct reply is: 'Feeling is the condition of craving, and craving is the condition of clinging.' “Who, O Lord, clings?
“The question is not correct,” said the Exalted One, “I do not say that 'he clings.' Had I said so, then the question 'Who clings?' would be appropriate.
But since I did not speak thus, the correct way to ask the question will be 'What is the condition of clinging?' And to that the correct reply is: 'Craving is the condition of clinging; and clinging is the condition of the process of becoming.' Such is the origin of this entire mass of suffering.
“Through the complete fading away and cessation of even these six bases of sense-impression, sense-impression ceases; through the cessation of sense-impression, feeling ceases; through the cessation of feeling, craving ceases; through the cessation of craving, clinging ceases; through the cessation of clinging, the process of becoming ceases; through the cessation of the process of becoming, birth ceases; through the cessation of birth, old age, death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering.
“In this discourse, there is one link between consciousness and mind-and-body; one link between feeling and craving, and one link between the process of becoming and birth.
Sub-Comy: “Since, in the words of the discourse, 'The nutriment consciousness is a condition for the future arising of a renewed existence,' as being a condition in a former existence for a future existence, and as being a principal cause, therefore the Commentary says that 'there is a link between consciousness and mind-and-body.' Hence it should be understood that by the term consciousness, also the 'kamma-forming consciousness' is implied”.
At Savatthi.
“There are, O monks, four nutriments for the sustenance of beings born, and for the support of beings seeking birth.
What are the four?
“Edible food, coarse and fine; secondly, sense-impression; thirdly, volitional thought; fourthly, consciousness.
“Of these four nutriments, O monks, what is their source, what is their origin, from what are they born, what gives them existence?
“These four nutriments, O monks, have craving as their cause, have craving as their origin, are born of craving, and craving gives them existence.
“And this craving, O monks, what is its source, what its origin, from what is it born, what gives it existence?
Craving has feeling as its source and origin, it is born of feeling, and feeling gives existence to it.
“And this feeling, O monks, what is its source and origin, from what is it born and what gives existence to it?
Feeling has sense-impression as its source and origin…
“And this sense-impression, O monks, what is its source…?
sense-impression has the six sense-bases as its source and origin…
“And these six sense-bases, O monks, what is their source…?
The six sense-bases have mind-and-body as their source and origin…
“And this mind-and-body, O monks, what is its source…?
Mind-and-body has consciousness as its source and origin…
“And this consciousness, O monks, what is its source…?
Consciousness has kamma-formations as its source and origin…
“And these kamma-formations, O monks, what is their source and origin, from what are they born, what gives existence to them?
Kamma-formations have ignorance as their source and origin, they are born of ignorance and ignorance gives existence to them.
“Thus, O monks, through ignorance conditioned are kamma-formations; through the kamma-formations conditioned is consciousness; through consciousness conditioned is mind-and-body; through mind-and-body conditioned are the six sense-bases; through the six sense-bases conditioned is sense-impression; through sense-impression conditioned is feeling, through feeling conditioned is craving; through craving conditioned is clinging; through clinging conditioned is becoming; through becoming conditioned is birth; through birth conditioned are decay and death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
Thus arises this whole mass of suffering.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN.; AN.; The Four Nutriments of Life by Nyanaponika Thera.
Thus I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Benares in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
There he addressed the bhikkhus of the group of five.
“Bhikkhus, these two extremes ought not to be cultivated by one gone forth from the house-life.
What are the two?
There is devotion to indulgence of pleasure in the objects of sensual desire, which is inferior, low, vulgar, ignoble, and leads to no good; and there is devotion to self-torment, which is painful, ignoble and leads to no good.
“The middle way discovered by a Perfect One avoids both these extremes; it gives vision, it gives knowledge, and it leads to peace, to direct acquaintance, to discovery, to nibbana.
And what is that middle way?
It is simply the noble eightfold path, that is to say, right view, right intention; right speech, right action, right livelihood; right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
That is the middle way discovered by a Perfect One, which gives vision, which gives knowledge, and which leads to peace, to direct acquaintance, to discovery, to nibbana.
“Suffering, as a noble truth, is this: Birth is suffering, aging is suffering, sickness is suffering, death is suffering, sorrow and lamentation, pain, grief and despair are suffering; association with the loathed is suffering, dissociation from the loved is suffering, not to get what one wants is suffering — in short, suffering is the five categories of clinging objects.
“The origin of suffering, as a noble truth, is this: It is the craving that produces renewal of being accompanied by enjoyment and lust, and enjoying this and that; in other words, craving for sensual desires, craving for being, craving for non-being.
“Cessation of suffering, as a noble truth, is this: It is remainderless fading and ceasing, giving up, relinquishing, letting go and rejecting, of that same craving.
“The way leading to cessation of suffering, as a noble truth, is this: It is simply the noble eightfold path, that is to say, right view, right intention; right speech, right action, right livelihood; right effort, right mindfulness, right concentration.
“'Suffering, as a noble truth, is this.' Such was the vision, the knowledge, the understanding, the finding, the light, that arose in regard to ideas not heard by me before.
'This suffering, as a noble truth, can be diagnosed.' Such was the vision, the knowledge, the understanding, the finding, the light, that arose in regard to ideas not heard by me before.
'This suffering, as a noble truth, has been diagnosed.' Such was the vision, the knowledge, the understanding, the finding, the light, that arose in regard to ideas not heard by me before.
“'The origin of suffering, as a noble truth, is this.' Such was the vision… 'This origin of suffering, as a noble truth, can be abandoned.' Such was the vision… 'This origin of suffering, as a noble truth, has been abandoned.' Such was the vision… in regard to ideas not heard by me before.
“'Cessation of suffering, as a noble truth, is this.' Such was the vision… 'This cessation of suffering, as a noble truth, can be verified.' Such was the vision… 'This cessation of suffering, as a noble truth, has been verified.' Such was the vision… in regard to ideas not heard by me before.
“'The way leading to cessation of suffering, as a noble truth, is this.' Such was the vision… 'This way leading to cessation of suffering, as a noble truth, can be developed.' Such was the vision… 'This way leading to the cessation of suffering, as a noble truth, has been developed.' Such was the vision… in regard to ideas not heard by me before.
“As long as my knowing and seeing how things are, was not quite purified in these twelve aspects, in these three phases of each of the four noble truths, I did not claim in the world with its gods, its Maras and high divinities, in this generation with its monks and brahmans, with its princes and men to have discovered the full Awakening that is supreme.
But as soon as my knowing and seeing how things are, was quite purified in these twelve aspects, in these three phases of each of the four noble truths, then I claimed in the world with its gods, its Maras and high divinities, in this generation with its monks and brahmans, its princes and men to have discovered the full Awakening that is supreme.
Knowing and seeing arose in me thus: 'My heart's deliverance is unassailable.
This is the last birth.
Now there is no renewal of being.' That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus of the group of five were glad, and they approved his words.
Now during this utterance, there arose in the venerable Kondañña the spotless, immaculate vision of the True Idea: “Whatever is subject to arising is all subject to cessation.
When the Wheel of Truth had thus been set rolling by the Blessed One the earthgods raised the cry: “At Benares, in the Deer Park at Isipatana, the matchless Wheel of truth has been set rolling by the Blessed One, not to be stopped by monk or divine or god or death-angel or high divinity or anyone in the world.
On hearing the earth-gods' cry, all the gods in turn in the six paradises of the sensual sphere took up the cry till it reached beyond the Retinue of High Divinity in the sphere of pure form.
And so indeed in that hour, at that moment, the cry soared up to the World of High Divinity, and this ten-thousandfold world-element shook and rocked and quaked, and a great measureless radiance surpassing the very nature of the gods was displayed in the world.
Then the Blessed One uttered the exclamation: “Kondañña knows!
Kondañña knows!,” and that is how that venerable one acquired the name, Añña-Kondañña — Kondañña who knows.
At Savatthi.
“There are, O monks, four nutriments for the sustenance of beings born, and for the support of beings seeking birth.
What are the four?
“Edible food, coarse and fine; secondly, sense-impression; thirdly, volitional thought; fourthly, consciousness.
“How, O monks, should the nutriment edible food be considered?
Suppose a couple, husband and wife, have set out on a journey through the desert, carrying only limited provisions.
They have with them their only son, dearly beloved by them.
Now, while these two traveled through the desert, their limited stock of provisions ran out and came to an end, but there was still a stretch of desert not yet crossed.
Then the two thought: 'Our small stock of provisions has run out, it has come to an end; and there is still a stretch of desert that is not yet crossed.
Should we not kill our only son, so dearly beloved, prepare dried and roasted meat, and eating our son's flesh, we may cross in that way the remaining part of the desert, lest all three of us perish?'
“And these two, husband and wife, killed their only son, so dearly beloved by them, prepared dried and roasted meat, and, eating their son's flesh, crossed in that way the remaining part of the desert.
And while eating their son's flesh, they were beating their breast and crying: 'Where are you, our only and beloved son?
Where are you, our only and beloved son?'
“What do you think, O monks?
Will they eat the food for the pleasure of it, for enjoyment, for comeliness' sake, for embellishment?
“Certainly not, O Lord.
“Will they not rather eat the food merely for the sake of crossing the desert?
“So it is, O Lord.
“In the same manner, I say, O monks, should edible food be considered.
If, O monks, the nutriment edible food is comprehended, the lust for the five sense-objects is comprehended.
And if lust for the five sense-objects is comprehended, there is no fetter enchained by which a noble disciple might come to this world again.
“And how, O monks, should the nutriment sense-impression be considered?
Suppose, O monks, there is a skinned cow that stands close to a wall, then the creatures living in the wall will nibble at the cow; and if the skinned cow stands near a tree, then the creatures living in the tree will nibble at it; if it stands in the water, the creatures living in the water will nibble at it; if it stands in the open air, the creatures living in the air will nibble at it.
Wherever that skinned cow stands, the creatures living there will nibble at it.
“In that manner, I say, O monks, should the nutriment sense-impression be considered.
If the nutriment sense-impression is comprehended, the three kinds of feeling are thereby comprehended.
And if the three kinds of feeling are comprehended, there is, I say, no further work left to do for the noble disciple.
“And how, O monks, should the nutriment volitional thought be considered?
Suppose, O monks, there is a pit of glowing embers, filled to cover a man's height, with embers glowing without flames and smoke.
Now a man comes that way, who loves life and does not wish to die, who wishes for happiness and detests suffering.
Then two strong men would seize both his arms and drag him to the pit of glowing embers.
Then, O monks, far away from it would recoil that man's will, far away from it his longing, far away his inclination.
And why?
Because the man knows: 'If I fall into that pit of glowing embers, I shall meet death or deadly pain.'
“In that manner, I say, O monks, should the nutriment volitional thought be considered.
If the nutriment volitional thought is comprehended, the three kinds of craving are thereby comprehended.
And if the three kinds of craving are comprehended, there is, I say, no further work left to do for the noble disciple.
“And how, O monks, should the nutriment consciousness be considered?
Suppose, O monks, people have seized a criminal, a robber, and brought him before the king saying: 'This is a criminal, a robber, O Majesty!
Mete out to him the punishment you think fit!' Then the king would tell them: 'Go, and in the morning strike this man with a hundred spears!' And they strike him in the morning with a hundred spears.
At noon the king would ask his men: 'How is that man?' — 'He is still alive, Your Majesty.' — 'Then go and strike him again at noontime with a hundred spears!' So they did, and in the evening the king asks them again: 'How is that man?' — 'He is still alive.' — 'Then go and in the evening strike him again with a hundred spears!' And so they did.
“What do you think, O monks?
Will that man, struck with three hundred spears during a day, suffer pain and torment owing to that?
“Even if he were to be struck only by a single spear, he would suffer pain and torment owing to that.
How much more if he is being struck by three hundred spears!
“In that manner, I say, O monks, should the nutriment consciousness be considered.
If the nutriment consciousness is comprehended, mind-and-matter are thereby comprehended.
And if mind and body are comprehended, there is, I say, no further work left to do for the noble disciple.
See also: SN.; SN.; SN.; SN.; AN.; The Four Nutriments of Life by Nyanaponika Thera.
Thus I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Gaya, at Gayasisa, together with a thousand bhikkhus.
There he addressed the bhikkhus.
“Bhikkhus, all is burning.
And what is the all that is burning?
“The eye is burning, forms are burning, eye-consciousness is burning, eye-contact is burning, also whatever is felt as pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant that arises with eye-contact for its indispensable condition, that too is burning.
Burning with what?
Burning with the fire of lust, with the fire of hate, with the fire of delusion.
I say it is burning with birth, aging and death, with sorrows, with lamentations, with pains, with griefs, with despairs.
“The ear is burning, sounds are burning…
“The nose is burning, odors are burning…
“The tongue is burning, flavors are burning…
“The body is burning, tangibles are burning…
“The mind is burning, ideas are burning, mind-consciousness is burning, mind-contact is burning, also whatever is felt as pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant that arises with mind-contact for its indispensable condition, that too is burning.
Burning with what?
Burning with the fire of lust, with the fire of hate, with the fire of delusion.
I say it is burning with birth, aging and death, with sorrows, with lamentations, with pains, with griefs, with despairs.
“Bhikkhus, when a noble follower who has heard sees thus, he finds estrangement in the eye, finds estrangement in forms, finds estrangement in eye-consciousness, finds estrangement in eye-contact, and whatever is felt as pleasant or painful or neither-painful- nor-pleasant that arises with eye-contact for its indispensable condition, in that too he finds estrangement.
“He finds estrangement in the ear… in sounds…
“He finds estrangement in the nose… in odors…
“He finds estrangement in the tongue… in flavors…
“He finds estrangement in the body… in tangibles…
“He finds estrangement in the mind, finds estrangement in ideas, finds estrangement in mind-consciousness, finds estrangement in mind-contact, and whatever is felt as pleasant or painful or neither-painful-nor-pleasant that arises with mind-contact for its indispensable condition, in that too he finds estrangement.
“When he finds estrangement, passion fades out.
With the fading of passion, he is liberated.
When liberated, there is knowledge that he is liberated.
He understands: 'Birth is exhausted, the holy life has been lived out, what can be done is done, of this there is no more beyond.' That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were glad, and they approved his words.
Now during his utterance, the hearts of those thousand bhikkhus were liberated from taints through clinging no more.
Thus I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Benares, in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
There he addressed the bhikkhus of the group of five: “Bhikkhus.” — “Venerable sir,” they replied.
The Blessed One said this.
“Bhikkhus, form is not-self.
Were form self, then this form would not lead to affliction, and one could have it of form: 'Let my form be thus, let my form be not thus.' And since form is not-self, so it leads to affliction, and none can have it of form: 'Let my form be thus, let my form be not thus.'
“Bhikkhus, feeling is not-self…
“Bhikkhus, perception is not-self…
“Bhikkhus, determinations are not-self…
“Bhikkhus, consciousness is not self.
Were consciousness self, then this consciousness would not lead to affliction, and one could have it of consciousness: 'Let my consciousness be thus, let my consciousness be not thus.' And since consciousness is not-self, so it leads to affliction, and none can have it of consciousness: 'Let my consciousness be thus, let my consciousness be not thus.'
“Bhikkhus, how do you conceive it: is form permanent or impermanent?” — “Impermanent, venerable Sir.” — “Now is what is impermanent painful or pleasant?” — “Painful, venerable Sir.” — “Now is what is impermanent, what is painful since subject to change, fit to be regarded thus: 'This is mine, this is I, this is my self'”?
— “No, venerable sir.
“Is feeling permanent or impermanent?…
“Is perception permanent or impermanent?…
“Are determinations permanent or impermanent?…
“Is consciousness permanent or impermanent?” — “Impermanent, venerable sir.” — “Now is what is impermanent pleasant or painful?” — “Painful, venerable sir.” — “Now is what is impermanent, what is painful since subject to change, fit to be regarded thus: 'This is mine, this is I, this is my self'”?
— “No, venerable sir.
“So, bhikkhus any kind of form whatever, whether past, future or presently arisen, whether gross or subtle, whether in oneself or external, whether inferior or superior, whether far or near, must with right understanding how it is, be regarded thus: 'This is not mine, this is not I, this is not myself.'
“Any kind of feeling whatever…
“Any kind of perception whatever…
“Any kind of determination whatever…
“Any kind of consciousness whatever, whether past, future or presently arisen, whether gross or subtle, whether in oneself or external, whether inferior or superior, whether far or near must, with right understanding how it is, be regarded thus: 'This is not mine, this is not I, this is not my self.'
“Bhikkhus, when a noble follower who has heard sees thus, he finds estrangement in form, he finds estrangement in feeling, he finds estrangement in perception, he finds estrangement in determinations, he finds estrangement in consciousness.
“When he finds estrangement, passion fades out.
With the fading of passion, he is liberated.
When liberated, there is knowledge that he is liberated.
He understands: 'Birth is exhausted, the holy life has been lived out, what can be done is done, of this there is no more beyond.' That is what the Blessed One said.
The bhikkhus were glad, and they approved his words.
Now during this utterance, the hearts of the bhikkhus of the group of five were liberated from taints through clinging no more.
I shall fasten you, mind, like an elephant at a small gate.
I shall not incite you to evil, you net of sensual pleasure, body-born.

When fastened, you will not go, like an elephant not finding the gate open.
Witch-mind, you will not wander again, and again, using force, delighting in evil.

As the strong hook-holder makes an untamed elephant, newly taken, turn against its will, so shall I make you turn.

As the excellent charioteer, skilled in the taming of excellent horses, tames a thoroughbred, so shall I, standing firm in the five powers, tame you.

I shall bind you with mindfulness; with purified self shall cleanse.
Restrained by the yoke of energy you will not go far from here, mind.

Thus have I heard.
On one occasion the Exalted One was dwelling at Anathapindika's monastery, in Jeta's Grove, near Savatthi.
Now when the night was far spent, a certain deity whose surpassing splendor illuminated the entire Jeta Grove, came to the presence of the Exalted One and, drawing near, respectfully saluted him and stood at one side.
Standing thus, he addressed the Exalted One in verse:
“Not to associate with the foolish, but to associate with the wise; and to honor those who are worthy of honor — this is the greatest blessing.
To reside in a suitable locality, to have done meritorious actions in the past and to set oneself in the right course — this is the greatest blessing.
To have much learning, to be skillful in handicraft, well-trained in discipline, and to be of good speech — this is the greatest blessing.
To support mother and father, to cherish wife and children, and to be engaged in peaceful occupation — this is the greatest blessing.
To be generous in giving, to be righteous in conduct, to help one's relatives, and to be blameless in action — this is the greatest blessing.
To loathe more evil and abstain from it, to refrain from intoxicants, and to be steadfast in virtue — this is the greatest blessing.
To be respectful, humble, contented and grateful; and to listen to the Dhamma on due occasions — this is the greatest blessing.
To be patient and obedient, to associate with monks and to have religious discussions on due occasions — this is the greatest blessing.
Self-restraint, a holy and chaste life, the perception of the Noble Truths and the realisation of Nibbana — this is the greatest blessing.
A mind unruffled by the vagaries of fortune, from sorrow freed, from defilements cleansed, from fear liberated — this is the greatest blessing.
Those who thus abide, ever remain invincible, in happiness established.
These are the greatest blessings.
Translator's note: While the Mangala Sutta deals with the way of life conducive to progress and happiness, the Parabhava Sutta supplements it by pointing out the causes of downfall.
He who allows himself to become tarnished by these blemishes of conduct blocks his own road to worldly, moral and spiritual progress and lowers all that is truly noble and human in man.
But he who is heedful of these dangers keeps open the road to all those thirty-eight blessings of which human nature is capable.
Thus have I heard.
Once the Exalted One was dwelling at Anathapindika's monastery, in the Jeta Grove, near Savatthi.
Now when the night was far spent a certain deity whose surpassing splendor illuminated the entire Jeta Grove, came to the presence of the Exalted One and, drawing near, respectfully saluted Him and stood at one side.
Standing thus, he addressed the Exalted One in verse:
Having come here with our questions to the Exalted One, we ask thee, O Gotama, about man's decline.
Pray, tell us the cause of downfall!
The Buddha:
Easily known is the progressive one, easily known he who declines.
He who loves Dhamma progresses; he who is averse to it, declines.
Thus much do we see: this is the first cause of one's downfall.
Pray, tell us the second cause.
The Buddha:
The wicked are dear to him, with the virtuous he finds no delight, he prefers the creed of the wicked — this is a cause of one's downfall.
Being fond of sleep, fond of company, indolent, lazy and irritable — this is a cause of one's downfall.
Though being well-to-do, not to support father and mother who are old and past their youth — this is a cause of one's downfall.
To deceive by falsehood a brahman or ascetic or any other mendicant — this is a cause of one's downfall.
To have much wealth and ample gold and food, but to enjoy one's luxuries alone — this is a cause of one's downfall.
To be proud of birth, of wealth or clan, and to despise one's own kinsmen — this is a cause of one's downfall.
To be a rake, a drunkard, a gambler, and to squander all one earns — this is a cause of one's downfall.
Not to be contented with one's own wife, and to be seen with harlots and the wives of others — this is a cause of one's downfall.
Being past one's youth, to take a young wife and to be unable to sleep for jealousy of her — this is a cause of one's downfall.
To place in authority a woman given to drink and squandering, or a man of a like behavior — this is a cause of one's downfall.
To be of noble birth, with vast ambition and of slender means, and to crave for rulership — this is a cause of one's downfall.
Knowing well these causes of downfall in the world, the noble sage endowed with insight shares a happy realm.
At one time, the Venerable Kāmabhū was dwelling in Macchikāsanda, in Ambāṭakavana.
Then, there where the Venerable Kāmabhū was, there Citta, the householder, approached.
Having approached and having saluted the Venerable Kāmabhū, he sat to one side.
Having sat to one side, the Venerable Kāmabhū then said this to Citta, the householder:
“This was said, householder: 
“How, then, householder, should the detailed or expanded meaning of this condensed statement be seen?” 
“Was this, Venerable One, spoken by the Blessed One?
“Just so, householder.
“So then, Venerable One, please wait a moment while I look at its meaning.
And then, Citta the householder, having been silent for a moment, said this to the Venerable Kāmabhū:
“'Faultless part': now this, Venerable One, is a metaphorical expression for the virtues.
“'Adorned in white': this, Venerable One, is a metaphorical expression for liberation.
“'Going one way': this, Venerable One, is a metaphorical expression for mindfulness.
“'Rolls on': this, Venerable One, is a metaphorical expression for advancing and retreating.
“'Chariot': this, Venerable One, is a metaphorical expression for this body of four great elements, produced from mother and father, accumulated out of boiled rice and grain, subject to erosion, abrasion, dissolution and disintegration.
“Lust, indeed, Venerable One, is disturbance, hatred is disturbance, delusion is disturbance.
For a monk with poisonous mental influences destroyed, these are abandoned, broken at the root, like a palm made groundless, with sprouts annihilated, such that, thereafter, they have no arising.
Because of that, a monk with poisonous mental influences destroyed is called 'one who is undisturbed'.
“'The one who is coming': this, Venerable One, is a metaphorical expression for the arahant.
“'Flow': this, Venerable One, is a metaphorical expression for craving.
For a monk with poisonous mental influences destroyed, this is abandoned, broken at the root, like a palm made groundless, with sprouts annihilated, such that, thereafter, it has no arising.
Because of that, a monk with poisonous mental influences destroyed is called 'one with flow cut off'.
“Lust, indeed, Venerable One, is bondage, hatred is bondage, delusion is bondage.
For a monk with poisonous mental influences destroyed, these are abandoned, broken at the root, like a palm made groundless, with sprouts annihilated, such that, thereafter, they have no arising.
Because of that, a monk with poisonous mental influences destroyed is called 'one who is unbound'.
“Thus, indeed, Venerable One, is that which was said by the Blessed One:
“Of this condensed statement, Venerable One, spoken by the Blessed One, thus do I understand the detailed or expanded meaning.
“It is understood by you, householder, it is well-understood by you; for your wisdom-eye proceeds methodically through the profound word of the Buddha.
The above translation deliberately aims to adhere as closely as possible to the grammar and syntax of the Pāḷi text, while at the same time trying to present an easily readable English text.
In this way, the translation may be especially useful for students of Pāḷi who would like to follow the Pāḷi original in parallel to the English translation.
Consequently, I would like to suggest a different interpretation, here, of ara, derived from the same verbal root from which the noun ara, 'spoke', is derived, as is the adjective ara, 'swift, speedy': namely, √ṛ, 'to go, to move'.
Monier-Williams points out a usage of ara at the end of a compound, where it has the sense 'going', and cites the example of the word samara, which is analysed into sam + ara, 'coming together, meeting, confluence'; hence also 'hostile encounter, conflict, war' 'Zusammenlauf, Zusammenfluss'; 'feindlicher Zusammenstoss, Kampf').
Cone cites only muddha-ara as an example ara at the end of a compound; Rhys Davids and Stede define that term as 'head spoke'.
I propose to read ekāra as eka 'one, single, alone' + ara 'going', on the model of sam + ara.
The sense would then be either: that the 'chariot' goes always alone; or that the 'chariot' goes always in one direction; or that it travels always upon one path; or that it travels only in one way.
These various possible senses are not mutually exclusive, of course.
With respect to the first interpretation, ekāra as 'lone-going', which implies that the Arahant is completely unattached and lives in seclusion, we may consider that in Ud.
Bhaddiya is described, as seen from afar, following closely behind the mass of approaching monks ).
The Buddha then describes Bhaddiya as “usually, for the monks, of such an appearance as to be disregarded or despised” ).
Again, Malalasekera, Dictionary of Pāli Proper Names, s.v.
'Ambātakavana', informs us that the Elder Lakuṇṭaka Bhaddiya “lived there, in solitude, wrapt in meditation”, supporting this with a reference to Theragāthā.
).
On the theme of the 'oneness' or 'aloneness' of the Arahant, we might also cite the following stanza from Suttanipāta, §..)
The Cūḷaniddesa also provides a commentary to this same stanza, wherein, with reference to the word eko, 'one' or 'alone', in the phrase, “eko tamonudāsīno”, it says:
'One': the Blessed One, by being classified as one who has taken up the ascetic life, is one; by the meaning of being without companions, is one; by the meaning of having renounced craving, is one; absolutely free of passion, is one; absolutely free of ill will, is one; absolutely free of delusion, is one; absolutely without defilements, is one; having gone by the one-way path, is one; having fully and perfectly awakened in the one ultimate right and perfect awakening, is one.
Here, in this passage, we find an echo of both of the senses that I have proposed, hypothetically, for ekāra read as 'one-going': namely, both 'going alone' and 'going one way'.
Finally, we might consider also this passage from Dhammapada:
Even so, in this present context, I have ventured a slightly different reading.
Lābha means 'receiving, getting, acquisition, gain'.
Laddha is 'having obtained, taken, received', and thus suladdha is 'well-received, well-gained'.
If we took both occurrences of te as instrumental, 'by you', we might arrive at the alternative rendering that I have proposed.
More colloquially expressed, the sense would be: “You got it, householder, you got it well, householder!” This would provide a neat sense, given the context of the 'riddle' that Kāmabhū has posed, and Citta's fairly thorough solution of it.
Thus it was heard by me.
At one time the Blessed One was living in the deer park of Isipatana near Benares.
There, indeed, the Blessed One addressed the group of five monks.
“Form, O monks, is not-self; if form were self, then form would not lead to affliction and it should obtain regarding form: 'May my form be thus, may my form not be thus'; and indeed, O monks, since form is not-self, therefore form leads to affliction and it does not obtain regarding form: 'May my form be thus, may my form not be thus.'
“Feeling, O monks, is not-self; if feeling were self, then feeling would not lead to affliction and it should obtain regarding feeling: 'May my feeling be thus, may my feeling not be thus'; and indeed, O monks, since feeling is not-self, therefore feeling leads to affliction and it does not obtain regarding feeling: 'May my feeling be thus, may my feeling not be thus.'
“Perception, O monks, is not-self; if perception were self, then perception would not lead to affliction and it should obtain regarding perception: 'May my perception be thus, may my perception not be thus'; and indeed, O monks, since perception is not-self, therefore, perception leads to affliction and it does not obtain regarding perception: 'May my perception be thus, may my perception not be thus.'
“Mental formations, O monks, are not-self; if mental formations were self, then mental formations would not lead to affliction and it should obtain regarding mental formations: 'May my perception be thus, may my mental formations not be thus'; and indeed, O monks, since mental formations are not-self, therefore, mental formations lead to affliction and it does not obtain regarding mental formations: 'May my mental formations be thus, may my mental formations not be thus.'
“Consciousness, O monks, is not-self; if consciousness were self, then consciousness would not lead to affliction and it should obtain regarding consciousness: 'May my consciousness be thus, may my consciousness not be thus'; and indeed, O monks, since consciousness is not-self, therefore, consciousness leads to affliction and it does not obtain regarding consciousness: 'May my consciousness be thus, may my consciousness not be thus.'
“What do you think of this, O monks?
Is form permanent or impermanent?
“Impermanent, O Lord.
“Now, that which is impermanent, is it unsatisfactory or satisfactory?
“Unsatisfactory, O Lord.
“Now, that which is impermanent, unsatisfactory, subject to change, is it proper to regard that as: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'?
“Indeed, not that, O Lord.
“What do you think of this, O monks?
Is feeling permanent or impermanent?
“Impermanent, O Lord.
“Now, that which is impermanent, is it unsatisfactory or satisfactory?
“Unsatisfactory, O Lord.
“Now, that which is impermanent, unsatisfactory, subject to change, is it proper to regard that as: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'?
“Indeed, not that, O Lord.
“What do you think of this, O monks?
Is perception permanent or impermanent?
“Impermanent, O Lord.
“Now, what is impermanent, is it unsatisfactory or satisfactory?
“Unsatisfactory, O Lord.
“Now, that which is impermanent, unsatisfactory, subject to change, is it proper to regard that as: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'?
“Indeed, not that, O Lord.
“What do you think of this, O monks?
Are mental formations permanent or impermanent?
“Impermanent, O Lord.
“Now, those that are impermanent, are they unsatisfactory or satisfactory?
“Unsatisfactory, O Lord.
“Now, those that are impermanent, unsatisfactory, subject to change, is it proper to regard them as: 'They are mine, this I am, this is my self'?
“Indeed, not that, O Lord.
“Now what do you think of this, O monks?
Is consciousness permanent or impermanent?
“Impermanent, O Lord.
“Now, what is impermanent, is that unsatisfactory or satisfactory?
“Unsatisfactory, O Lord.
“Now, what is impermanent, unsatisfactory, subject to change, is it proper to regard it as: 'This is mine, this I am, this is my self'?
“Indeed, not that, O Lord.
“Therefore, surely, O monks, whatever form, past, future or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or lofty, far or near, all that form must be regarded with proper wisdom, according to reality, thus: 'This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.'
“Therefore, surely, O monks, whatever feeling, past, future or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or lofty, far or near, all that feeling must be regarded with proper wisdom, according to reality, thus: 'This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.'
“Therefore, surely, O monks, whatever perception, past, future or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or lofty, far or near, all that perception must be regarded with proper wisdom, according to reality, thus: 'This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.'
“Therefore, surely, O monks, whatever mental formations, past, future or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or lofty, far or near, all those mental formations must be regarded with proper wisdom, according to reality, thus: 'These are not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.'
“Therefore, surely, O monks, whatever consciousness, past, future or present, internal or external, coarse or fine, low or lofty, far or near, all that consciousness must be regarded with proper wisdom, according to reality, thus: 'This is not mine, this I am not, this is not my self.'
“O monks, the well-instructed noble disciple, seeing thus, gets wearied of form, gets wearied of feeling, gets wearied of perception, gets wearied of mental formations, gets wearied of consciousness.
Being wearied he becomes passion-free.
In his freedom from passion, he is emancipated.
Being emancipated, there is the knowledge that he is emancipated.
He knows: 'birth is exhausted, lived is the holy life, what had to be done is done, there is nothing more of this becoming.' This the Blessed One said.
Pleased, the group of five monks were delighted with the exposition of the Blessed One; moreover, as this exposition was being spoken, the minds of the group of five monks were freed of defilements, without attachment.
Indeed, at that time there were six arahants in the world.
At Sāvatthī… There the Blessed One said this: 
“And which, monks, is the taking up of the burden?
That which is this craving leading to rebirth, connected with delight and passion, finding delight here and there: namely, craving for sensual pleasure, craving for being, and craving for extinction.
This, monks, is called the taking up of the burden.

“And which, monks, is the putting down of the burden?
That which, of just this craving, is the cessation by means of the absence of desire without remainder: the abandoning, the forsaking, the freedom, the non-attachment.
This, monks, is called the putting down of the burden.”
This said the Blessed One.
Having said this, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, furthermore said this: 
Pañca-upādāna-khandhā: literally, “five clinging aggregates”; note that in this compound “clinging” is a noun, not an adjective.
In English, however, it may be mistakenly read as an adjective, which would imply that it is the aggregates themselves that are characterized as “clinging”.
Rather, the phrase ought to be read: “the five aggregates of clinging”, or “the five aggregates for clinging”; which is to say: the five aggregates that provide the basis for the act of clinging.
For this reason, I have translated the phrase as “the five clung-to aggregates”, to emphasise that the aggregates are, so to speak, the “objects”, or “objectivated phenomena”, of clinging, not the “subject” of clinging, as such.
The act of clinging is essentially an inflection of “mind” or “consciousness”: but here, “mind” or “consciousness” does not refer to, and cannot be reduced to and completely identified with, any or all of the mental factors and functions of the five aggregates.
Rather, it transcends them; and therefore, it is definitely not any “self”.
This sense of the transcendence of the true nature of “mind” is what provides the possibility and the meaning of Nibbāna; and thus also the possibility of the Buddhadhamma itself as a practical method for realizing Nibbāna.
“Mind” or “consciousness” clings to the aggregates and identifies “itself” with them.
By fully recognizing and realizing its innate “detachment” from the aggregates, it is ultimately “released”, and can finally attain the absolute “cessation” of its individuated “natural evolutionary” functions: hence, for example, the expression “mind-liberation”, which in the suttas is equivalent to attaining the condition of Nibbāna.
For an excellent perspective upon this theme, see Ven.
Thanissaro's various discussions of the expression viññāṇa anidassana, which occurs in DN and MN and refers to liberated consciousness that cannot in any way be “pointed out”; and of how this is closely related to the crucial idea, occurring frequently in the suttas, of appatiṭṭhita viññāṇa, consciousness that does not support itself on anything, is not established upon anything, because it does not cling to or identify with anything.
Puggala.
The primary sense of this very old word seems to have been “separate individual”, and it was used both of the “body” and of the “soul”.
It may well be related, in etymology and meaning, to the Vedic pṛthak, “separate, different”, and pṛthu, “spread out”, and would therefore be closely related to the term puthujjana.

For a significant account of the philosophical concept of the puggala in the Buddhadhamma, and the doctrinal and ideological struggles that have occurred around it, see Priestley, Pudgalavāda Buddhism: The Reality of the Indeterminate Self, University of Toronto, Canada,.
Although Priestley's account focuses especially on later non-Indian Buddhist sources, his survey of course includes the earlier Indian literature, and his perceptive philosophical conclusions are of deep value for anyone sensitive to and familiar with the earlier texts.
This does not mean that the puggala, as the “burden-bearer”, is a separate entity that takes hold of the “burden”.
Nor does it mean, as the post-Abhidhamma Theravāda commentary supposes, that the expression “bearer of the burden” is meant to show that “the “person” is admitted only as a mere convention”, which is the standard Theravāda Abhidhamma dogma on the matter.
The real point is that the “person” is neither separable from the five clung-to aggregates, nor is the “person” merely reducible to them.
The nature of the “person” thereby defies reductionism, while at the same time eschewing eternalism.
There is a very deep and important parallelism here between the concept of the “person” and Aristotle's concept of the psukhē, or individuated life principle, in de Anima.
Aristotle defined the concept of the psukhē in a radically new way within Greek philosophy: as the “form” of the living sentient being, which is neither reducible to the “material” upon which it depends, nor separable from that “material”.
Thus, he steered a middle way between the reductive materialism of the Atomists and the dualism of Plato.
His paradigm is “hylomorphic”, and I have argued elsewhere that it is profoundly relevant to and even helpful for a proper understanding of the teachings of the Suttanta Piṭaka, as the literature from which we may recover definite and coherent elements of the earliest extant Buddhadhamma.
Incidentally, the first chapter, “Puggalakathā”, “Debate about the Person”, of the fifth book of the Theravāda Abhidhamma Piṭaka, the Kathāvatthu or “Subjects of Debate”, purports to be an extensive refutation by a Theravādin of the alleged Puggalavāda “heresy”.
However, a careful analysis of these arguments reveals that the Theravādins either misunderstood or misrepresented what may well have been an actually “non-heretical” Puggalavāda interpretation of the earlier Buddhadhamma teachings.
On this view, the entire “Puggalakathā” section of the Kathāvatthu is based upon a fallacy, and “refutes” nothing more than a “straw man”.
Thus it has been heard by me.
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Sāvatthi in the Jeta Forest in the private park owned by Anāthapiṇḍika.
There the Blessed one addressed the monks thus: ‘Monks!’ Those monks responded thus: ‘Blessed One!’ The Blessed One said this:
“Monks, the ordinary person, unlearned in spiritual knowledge, might grow weary of, might become detached from, might become released from this physical body made up of the four great elements.
What is the reason for this?
Because, monks, apparent are the increase and the decrease, the taking up and the putting down, of this physical body made up of the four great elements.
For that reason, the ordinary person, in every way unlearned in spiritual knowledge, might grow weary, might become detached, might become released.
“But, indeed, that which, monks, is called ‘mind’, or ‘thought’, or ‘consciousness’, the ordinary person, in every way unlearned in spiritual knowledge, not enough to turn away, not enough to become detached, not enough to be released.
What is the reason for this?
Because for a long time, monks, that ‘mind’, or ‘thought’, or ‘consciousness’ of the ordinary person, in every way unlearned in spiritual knowledge, has been clung to, has been cherished, has been fondled: ‘This is mine, this I am, this is my self’.
Because of that, the ordinary person, in every way unlearned in spiritual knowledge, not enough to turn away, not enough to become detached, not enough to be released.
“Better, monks, to let the ordinary person, in all ways unlearned in spiritual knowledge, proceed from the assumption that the self is this physical body made up of the four great elements, rather than mind.
What is the reason for this?
This physical body, Monks, comprising the four great elements, is seen standing for one rainy season, standing for two rainy seasons,… for three… four… five… ten… twenty… thirty… forty… fifty… standing for a hundred or more rainy seasons.
“But, indeed, that which, monks, is called ‘mind’, or ‘thought’, or ‘consciousness’, that, by night and by day, as other, indeed, arises, as other ceases.
Just as, monks, a monkey in the mountain-side forests, moving itself, grasps a branch, then releasing that, grasps another, then releasing that, grasps another; even so, indeed, monks, that which is called ‘mind’, or ‘thought’, or ‘consciousness’: that, by night and by day, as other, indeed, arises, as other ceases.
“Therein, monks, the noble disciple, learned in spiritual knowledge, properly and legitimately cognizes just dependent co-arising, thus: ‘In the event of the being of this, there is this; from the arising of this, this arises.
In the event of the non-being of this, there is not this.
From the cessation of this, this ceases.’
“Which is this: ‘From ignorance as condition, the formative mental functions; from the formative mental functions as condition, sensory consciousness; from sensory consciousness as condition, name-and-form; from name-and-form as condition, the six sense bases; from the six sense bases as condition, contact; from contact as condition, sensation; from sensation as condition, craving; from craving as condition, clinging; from clinging as condition, being; from being as condition, birth; from birth as condition, old age and death, grief, lamentation, suffering, distress and tribulation all together come to be.
Thus there is the rise of this whole complex of suffering.
“‘But from the fading away and cessation, without any trace remaining, of ignorance, there is the cessation of the formative mental functions; from the cessation of the formative mental functions, the cessation of sensory consciousness; from the cessation of sensory consciousness, the cessation of name-and-form; from the cessation of name-and-form, the cessation of the six sense bases; from the cessation of the six sense bases, the cessation of contact; from the cessation of contact, the cessation of sensation; from the cessation of sensation, the cessation of craving; from the cessation of craving, the cessation of clinging; from the cessation of clinging, the cessation of being; from the cessation of being, the cessation of birth; from the cessation of birth, old age and death, grief, lamentation, suffering, distress and tribulation cease.
Thus there is the cessation of this whole complex of suffering.’
“Seeing thus, monks, a noble disciple, learned in spiritual knowledge, grows weary and turns away from material form; grows weary and turns away from feelings; grows weary and turns away from perceptions; grows weary and turns away from formative functions; grows weary and turns away from sensory consciousness.
Having grown weary and having turned away, he detaches; from detachment, he is released; from being released, there is the knowledge: ‘Released.’ He understands: ‘Destroyed is birth; the holy life has been fulfilled; what had to be done has been done; no coming back again to being-here’.”
“Yañca kho etaṃ, bhikkhave, vuccati cittaṃ itipi, mano itipi, viññāṇaṃ itipi…” The quotation marks placed around each term in the translation are justified by the fact that the Pali has “vuccati cittaṃ iti pi, mano iti pi, viññāṇaṃ iti pi”, “It is called “citta” or “mano” or “viññāṇa””: the particle iti after each term functions as a “quotation marker”, corresponding to the verb vuccati, “it is called…”.
These three terms demand a very detailed, comprehensive and lengthy analysis; which, of course, cannot possibly be provided in a footnote.
If this sutta were presenting a more detailed technical and theoretical discussion, such as we do indeed find in many other suttas, then it would be more appropriate to translate these terms more precisely: for example, citta as “subjective mind”, mano as “cognitive faculty”, and viññāṇa as “sensory consciousness”, although viññāṇa also has two further special technical senses and uses in the suttas).
But the present sutta is very clearly not intended to be technically and theoretically precise about this particular subject.
In fact, one of the points that the sutta seems to suggest is that for the ordinary, unlearned person these three terms are quite interchangeable: “six of one and half a dozen of the other”, as the English idiom goes.
For this reason, it is much more appropriate to translate these three terms more loosely and ambiguously; but this is somewhat difficult to do in English because, unlike Sanskrit and Pali, English does not have a very extensive vocabulary with which to indicate the subtleties of “consciousness” or “mind”.
We can see from the context in which these three terms are actually used in this sutta that what is in question here is the way in which the unlearned or uninformed person thinks of these terms: how he or she conflates them due to lack of analytical understanding, and how he or she relates to what he or she thinks of as his or her “own mind”: namely, identifying it and cherishing as the private, personal “self”.
This partial statement, “cittaṃ itipi, mano itipi, viññāṇaṃ itipi”, is very frequently quoted — in isolation, out of context — by proponents and commentators of the Abhidhamma and of Abhidhamma-influenced schools, in support of the stereotypical Abhidhamma view that the terms citta, mano, and viññāṇa are somehow “synonymous”.
Only one other similar passage can be found in the Suttanta Piṭaka, in DN, at DN i., but this passage is rarely cited, for an obvious reason: “Yaṃ ca kho idaṃ vuccati cittanti vā mano'ti vā viññāṇanti vā…” “That which is called ‘citta’ or ‘mano’ or ‘viññāṇa’…” There, in DN, it is put into the mouth of the kind of “reasoner” who wrongly argues that “mind” is a permanent, eternal, unchanging “self”.
It is therefore very interesting and very important to note that here, too, in SN., this same formula occurs in the context of a description of the way of thinking of the “tatrāssutavā puthujjano”, the “in every way spiritually-unlearned ordinary person”.
This crucial matter is too detailed and complex to discuss here in a brief footnote, but it can hopefully be addressed in detail and in depth on a different occasion.
Suffice it to say that I am not asserting that citta, mano, and viññāṇa are distinct and separate “things”, but that they refer to quite distinct and non-inter-reducible functions and properties of “mind” as such.
To claim that they are “mere synonyms” is, very crudely speaking, rather like claiming that the words “steam”, “liquid”, and “ice” are all “mere synonyms”.
To be sure, they may all refer to forms of “water”; but it would be plainly and simply wrong to claim that they are therefore merely “synonymous”.
The Milindapañha, the eighteenth book of the Khuddaka Nikaya, consists of parts as shown below.
The conclusion to the Milindapañha states that it contains questions, though in the editions available today only can be found.
Although not included as a canonical text in the traditions of all the Theravadin countries, this work is much revered throughout and is one of the most popular and authoritative works of Pali Buddhism.
Composed around the beginning of the Common Era, and of unknown authorship, the Milindapañha is set up as a compilation of questions posed by King Milinda to a revered senior monk named Nagasena.
This Milinda has been identified with considerable confidence by scholars as the Greek king Menander of Bactria, in the dominion founded by Alexander the Great, which corresponds with much of present day Afghanistan.
Menander's realm thus would have included Gandhara, where Buddhism was flourishing at that time.
What is most interesting about the Milindapañha is that it is the product of the encounter of two great civilizations — Hellenistic Greece and Buddhist India — and is thus of continuing relevance as the wisdom of the East meets the modern Western world.
King Milinda poses questions about dilemmas raised by Buddhist philosophy that we might ask today.
And Nagasena's responses are full of wisdom, wit, and helpful analogies.
I see this delightful and beautiful mansion, its surface of many a color, ablaze with crystal and roofed with silver and gold.
A well-proportioned palace, possessing gateways, and strewn with golden sand.
As the thousand-rayed sun in the autumn shines in the sky in the ten directions, dispelling the dark, so does this your mansion glow, like a blazing smoke-crested fire in the darkness of the night.
It dazzles the eye like lightning, beautiful, suspended in space.
Resounding with the music of lute, drum, and cymbals, this mansion of yours rivals Indra's city in glory.
White and red and blue lotuses, jasmine, and other flowers are there; blossoming sal trees and flowering asokas, and the air is filled with a variety of fragrances.
Sweet-scented trees, breadfruits, laden branches interlaced, with palm trees and hanging creepers in full bloom, glorious like jeweled nets; also a delightful lotus pool exists for you.
Whatever flowering plants there are that grow in water, and trees that are on land, those known in the human world and heavens, all exist in your abode.
Of what calming and self-restraint is this the result?
By the fruit of what deed have you arisen here?
How did this mansion come to be possessed by you?
Tell it in full, O lady with thick eyelashes.
How it come to be possessed by me, this mansion with its flocks of herons, peacocks, and partridges; and frequented by heavenly water-fowl and royal geese; resounding with the cries of birds, of ducks and cuckoos;
containing divers varieties of creepers, flowers and trees; with trumpet-flower, rose-apple, and asoka trees — now how this mansion came to be possessed by me, I will tell you.
Listen, venerable sir.
In the eastern region of the excellent country of Magadha there is a village called Nalaka, venerable sir.
There I lived formerly as a daughter-in-law and they knew me there as Sesavati.
Scattering flower-blossoms joyfully I honored him skilled in deeds and worshipped by gods and men, the great Upatissa who has attained the immeasurable quenching.
Having worshipped him gone to the ultimate bourn, the eminent seer bearing his last body, on leaving my human shape I came to the thirty and inhabit this place.
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, is it so that one does not transmigrate and one is reborn?
“Yes, your majesty, one does not transmigrate and one is reborn.
“How, venerable Nagasena, is it that one does not transmigrate and one is reborn?
Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, if someone kindled one lamp from another, is it indeed so, your majesty, that the lamp would transmigrate from the other lamp?
“Certainly not, venerable sir.
“Indeed just so, your majesty, one does not transmigrate and one is reborn.
“Give me another analogy.
“Do you remember, your majesty, when you were a boy learning some verse from a teacher?
“Yes, venerable sir.
“Your majesty, did this verse transmigrate from the teacher?
“Certainly not, venerable sir.
“Indeed just so, your majesty, one does not transmigrate and one is reborn.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, is a soul to be found?
The elder replied: “According to ultimate reality, your majesty, a soul is not to be found.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, is there any being which transmigrates from one body to another?
“Certainly not, your majesty.
“If, venerable Nagasena, there is no-one who transmigrates from one body to another, then would not one be released from evil deeds?
“Yes, your majesty.
If one is not reborn, then one would be released from evil deeds.
But indeed because one is reborn, your majesty, then one is not fully released from evil deeds.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, if some man were to steal the mangos of another, would this be an offense worthy of punishment?
“Yes, venerable sir, it would be an offense worthy of punishment.
“But, your majesty, since these mangos that he stole were not the same mangos that the other had planted, why would it be punishable?
“Venerable sir, they came into existence by means of those mangos that were planted, therefore it would be punishable.
“Indeed just so, your majesty, it is by the deeds that one does in this mind-and-body, lovely or unlovely, that one is reborn in another mind-and-body, therefore one would not be fully released from evil deeds.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, if someone passes away and is reborn in the Brahma world, and if another passes away and is reborn in Kashmir, which one takes the longer time, and which the shorter?
“They are the same, your majesty.
“Give me an analogy.
“Your majesty, where is your town of birth?
“There is a place called Kalasigama, there I was born.
“How far away, your majesty, is Kalasigama from here?
“About yojana, venerable sir.
“How far away, your majesty, is Kashmir from here?
“About yojana, venerable sir.
“Go on then, your majesty, think about Kalasigama.
“I have thought about it, venerable sir.
“Go on then, your majesty, think about Kashmir.
“I have thought about it, venerable sir.
“Which thinking took a long time, your majesty, and which a short time?
“They were the same, venerable sir.
“Just so, your majesty, if someone passes away and is reborn in the Brahma world, and if another passes away and is reborn in Kashmir, they happen in the same time.
“Give me another analogy.
“What do you think, your majesty, if two birds fly in the sky and one sits in a high tree, and the other in a low tree; if these happen at the same time, the shadow of which one would settle on the ground first, and which one later?
“They are the same, venerable sir.
“Just so, your majesty, if someone passes away and is reborn in the Brahma world, and if another passes away and is reborn in Kashmir, they happen in the same time.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, for whom is the greater demerit, one who knowingly does evil, or one who does evil unknowingly?
The elder replied: “Indeed, your majesty, for him who does evil not knowing is the greater demerit.
“In that case, venerable Nagasena, would we doubly punish one who is our prince or king's chief minister who not knowing does evil?
“What do you think, your majesty, who would get burned more, one who knowing picks up a hot iron ball, ablaze and glowing, or one who not knowing picks it up?
“Indeed, venerable sir, he who not knowing picks it up would get burned more.
“Indeed, your majesty, in the same way the greater demerit is for him who does evil not knowing.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.”
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of attention, and what is the distinguishing characteristic of wisdom?
“Examination is the distinguishing characteristic of attention, and severing is the distinguishing characteristic of wisdom.
“How is examination the distinguishing characteristic of attention; and how is severing the distinguishing characteristic of wisdom?
Give me an analogy.
“Do you know barley-reapers, your majesty?
“Yes, venerable sir, I know them.
“How, your majesty, do barley-reapers reap barley?
“Venerable sir, they take a sheaf of barley in the left hand, and take a sickle in the right hand, and they cut with the sickle.
“Just as, your majesty, a barley-reaper takes a sheaf of barley in the left hand, takes a sickle in the right hand, and cuts the barley, even so, your majesty, does the spiritual aspirant take hold of the mind with attention, and cut off the defilements with wisdom.
Indeed thus, your majesty, examination is the distinguishing characteristic of attention, and severing is the distinguishing characteristic of wisdom.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of wisdom?
“Previously, your majesty, I said 'severing is the distinguishing characteristic of wisdom,' and now furthermore illuminating is the distinguishing characteristic of wisdom.
“How, venerable sir, is illuminating the distinguishing characteristic of wisdom?
“Wisdom arising, your majesty, dispels the darkness of ignorance, produces the illumination of insight, brings forth the light of knowledge, and makes manifest the noble truths; and further, the spiritual practitioner sees with complete understanding impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and corelessness.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, a person might bring a lamp into a dark house, and with the lamp lit dispel the darkness, produce illumination, show the light, and make manifest forms, so too, your majesty, wisdom arising dispels the darkness of ignorance, produces the illumination of insight, brings forth the light of knowledge, and makes manifest the noble truths; and further, the spiritual practitioner sees with complete understanding impermanence, unsatisfactoriness, and corelessness.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, when mind consciousness arises, do contact and feeling also arise?
“Yes, your majesty, when mind consciousness arises, contact arises, feeling arises, perception arises, volition arises, applied thought arises, and sustained thought arises.
And all these mental states arise with contact in the lead.
“Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of contact?
“The distinguishing characteristic of contact, your majesty, is touching.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as if, your majesty, two rams are butting each other, one of these rams is to be understood as the eye, and the other as a visual object, and the coming together of the two of them is contact.
“Give me another analogy.
“Just as if, your majesty, two hands are clapping together, one of these hands is to be understood as the eye, and the other as a visual object, and the coming together of the two of them is contact.
“Give me another analogy.
“Just as if, your majesty, two cymbals are striking together, one of these cymbals is to be understood as the eye, and the other as a visual object, and the coming together of the two of them is contact.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
“Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of feeling?
“The distinguishing characteristic of feeling, your majesty, is sensing; experiencing is also a distinguishing characteristic.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, some man might render the king a service, and the king, being well pleased, might repay the service, such that the man on account of this service is provided and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure.
Then the man might think to himself: 'In the past I rendered a service to the king, and now he has repaid me, on account of which I am experiencing feelings of one kind and another.'
“Or just as, your majesty, some man having performed good actions, on the dissolution of the body, after death, would reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world, and there he would be provided and endowed with the five cords of sensual pleasure.
Then the man might think to himself: 'In the past I performed good actions, and now on account of this I am experiencing feelings of one kind and another.' So too, your majesty, the distinguishing characteristics of feeling are sensing and experiencing.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
“Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of perception?
“The distinguishing characteristic of perception, your majesty, is perceiving.
What does one perceive?
One perceives blue, yellow, red, white, and crimson.
Thus, your majesty, the distinguishing characteristic of perception is perceiving.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, the king's store-keeper, having entered the storehouse, might see the goods belonging to the king and would perceive blue, yellow, red, white and crimson.
So too, your majesty, the distinguishing characteristic of perception is perceiving.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
“Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of volition?
“The distinguishing characteristic of volition, your majesty, is intending; preparation is also a distinguishing characteristic.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, some man or other might prepare a poison and drink it himself, and make others drink it, then he and the others would become ill.
Even so, your majesty, if some man here through volition intended some unwholesome deed, then on the dissolution of the body, after death, he would reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
And those who follow his example would also on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a state of deprivation, in an unhappy destination, in perdition, in hell.
“Also just as, your majesty, some man or other might mix together ghee, fresh butter, oil, honey and sugar and drink it himself, and make others drink it, then he and the others would be happy.
Even so, your majesty, if some man here through volition intended some wholesome deed, then on the dissolution of the body, after death, he would reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
And those who followed his example would also on the dissolution of the body, after death, reappear in a happy destination, in the heavenly world.
So too, your majesty, the distinguishing characteristics of volition are intending and preparation.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
The king asked: “Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of consciousness?
“The distinguishing characteristic of consciousness, your majesty, is cognizing.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, a city-superintendent sitting at the crossroads in the middle of the city could see a person coming from the eastern direction, could see a person coming from the southern direction, could see a person coming from the western direction, and could see a person coming from the northern direction, then indeed, your majesty, does a person cognize with consciousness a form he sees with the eye, cognize with consciousness a sound he hears with the ear, cognize with consciousness a scent he smells with the nose, cognize with consciousness a taste he savors with the tongue, cognize with consciousness a touch he feels with the body, and cognize with consciousness a mental state he cognizes with the mind.
Indeed thus, your majesty, the distinguishing characteristic of consciousness is cognizing.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
“Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of applied thought?
“The distinguishing characteristic of applied thought, your majesty, is fixing one's mind on an object.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, a carpenter might fix a well-prepared piece of wood into a joint, so too, your majesty, the distinguishing characteristic of applied thought is fixing one's mind on an object.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.
“Venerable Nagasena, what is the distinguishing characteristic of sustained thought?
“The distinguishing characteristic of sustained thought, your majesty, is continual examination.
“Give me an analogy.
“Just as, your majesty, when a gong is struck and continues resounding afterwards, indeed so the striking is to be understood as applied thought, and the continuance of the resounding as sustained thought.
“You are clever, venerable Nagasena.”
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
On that occasion the Lord was instructing… the bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk connected with Nibbana, and those bhikkhus… were intent on listening to Dhamma.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Your yoked and finely caparisoned horses, strong and swift, are heading downward through the sky.
And these five hundred chariots, magically created, are following, the horses urged on by charioteers.
You stand in this excellent chariot, adorned, radiant and shining, like a blazing star.
I ask you of lovely slender form and exquisite beauty, from which company of gods have you come to visit the Unrivalled One?
From those who have reached the heights of sensual pleasures, said to be unsurpassed; the gods who delight in magical transformation and creation.
A nymph from that company able to assume any desired appearance has come here to worship the Unrivalled One.
What good conduct did you formerly practice here?
How is it that you live in immeasurable glory and have gained such pleasures?
Due to what have you acquired the unrivalled power to travel through the sky?
Why does your beauty radiate in the ten directions?
You are surrounded and honored by the gods.
From where did you decease before you came to a heavenly bourn, goddess?
Or of what teaching were you able to follow the word of instruction?
Tell me if you were a disciple of the Awakened One.
In a fine well-built city situated between hills, an attendant of a noble king endowed with good fortune, I was highly accomplished in dancing and singing.
As Sirima I was known in Rajagaha.
But then the Awakened One, the leader among seers, the guide, taught me of origination, of suffering and impermanence; of the unconditioned, of the cessation of suffering that is everlasting; and of this path, not crooked, straight, auspicious.
When I had learnt of the undying state, the unconditioned, through the instruction of the Tathagata, the Unrivalled One, I was highly and well restrained in the precepts and established in the Dhamma taught by the most excellent of men, the Awakened One.
When I knew the undefiled place, the unconditioned, taught by the Tathagata, the Unrivalled One, I then and there experienced the calm concentration.
That supreme certainty of release was mine.
When I gained the distinctive undying, assured, eminent in penetrative insight, not doubting, I was revered by many people and experienced much pleasure and enjoyment.
Thus I am a goddess, knowing the undying, a disciple of the Tathagata, the Unrivalled One; a knower of Dhamma established in the first fruit, a stream-enterer.
Henceforth there is no bad bourn for me.
I came to revere the Unrivalled One and the virtuous monks who delight in what is skilled; to worship the auspicious assembly of ascetics and the respectworthy Fortunate One, the Dhamma-king.
I am joyful and gladdened on seeing the sage, the Tathagata, the outstanding trainer of men capable of being trained, who has cut off craving, who delights in what is skilled, the guide.
I worship the supremely merciful Compassionate One.
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
On that occasion the Lord was instructing… the bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk connected with Nibbana, and those bhikkhus… were intent on listening to Dhamma.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
On that occasion the Lord was instructing… the bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk connected with Nibbana, and those bhikkhus… were intent on listening to Dhamma.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
On that occasion the Lord was instructing, rousing, inspiring, and gladdening the bhikkhus with a Dhamma talk connected with Nibbana, and those bhikkhus, being receptive and attentive and concentrating the whole mind, were intent on listening to Dhamma.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
At that time there were a number of recluses and brahmans, wanderers of various sects, living around Savatthi.
And they were of various views, of various beliefs, of various opinions, and they relied for their support on their various views.
There were some recluses and brahmans who asserted and held this view: “The world is eternal; only this is true, any other is false.” There were some recluses and brahmans who asserted: “The world is not eternal; only this is true, any other is false.” There were some who asserted: “The world is finite… The world is infinite… The life-principle and the body are the same… The life-principle and the body are different… The Tathagata exists beyond death… The Tathagata does not exist beyond death… The Tathagata both exists and does not exist beyond death; The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist beyond death; only this is true, any other is false.” And they lived quarrelsome, disputatious, and wrangling, wounding each other with verbal darts, saying: “Dhamma is like this, Dhamma is not like that!
Dhamma is not like this, Dhamma is like that!
Then a number of bhikkhus, having put on their robes in the forenoon and taken their bowls and outer cloaks, entered Savatthi for almsfood.
Having walked in Savatthi for almsfood and returned after the meal, they approached the Lord, prostrated themselves, sat down to one side, and said to the Lord: “At present, revered sir, there are a number of recluses and brahmans, wanderers of various sects, living around Savatthi.
And they are of various views… saying: 'Dhamma is like this!… Dhamma is like that!' “The wanderers of other sects, bhikkhus, are blind, unseeing.
They do not know what is beneficial, they do not know what is harmful.
They do not know what is Dhamma, they do not know what is not Dhamma.
Not knowing what is beneficial and what is harmful, not knowing what is Dhamma and what is not Dhamma, they are quarrelsome… saying: 'Dhamma is like this!… Dhamma is like that!'
“Formerly, bhikkhus, there was a certain king in this very Savatthi.
And that king addressed a man: 'Come now, my good man, bring together all those persons in Savatthi who have been blind from birth.'
“'Yes, your majesty,' that man replied, and after detaining all the blind people in Savatthi, he approached the king and said, 'All the blind people in Savatthi have been brought together, your majesty.'
“'Now, my man, show the blind people an elephant.'
“'Very well, your majesty,' the man replied to the king, and he presented an elephant to the blind people, saying, 'This, blind people, is an elephant.'
“To some of the blind people he presented the head of the elephant, saying, 'This is an elephant.' To some he presented an ear of the elephant, saying, 'This is an elephant.' To some he presented a tusk… the trunk… the body… the foot… the hindquarters… the tail… the tuft at the end of the tail, saying, 'This is an elephant.'
“Then, bhikkhus, the man, having shown the elephant to the blind people, went to the king and said, 'The blind people have been shown the elephant, your majesty.
Do now what you think is suitable.' Then the king approached those blind people and said, 'Have you been shown the elephant?'
“'Yes, your majesty, we have been shown the elephant.'
“'Tell me, blind people, what is an elephant like?'
“Those blind people who had been shown the head of the elephant replied, 'An elephant, your majesty, is just like a water jar.' Those blind people who had been shown the ear of the elephant replied.
“An elephant, your majesty, is just like a winnowing basket.' Those blind people who had been shown the tusk of the elephant replied, 'An elephant, your majesty, is just like a plowshare.' Those blind people who had been shown the trunk replied, 'An elephant, your majesty, is just like a plow pole.' Those blind people who had been shown the body replied, 'An elephant, your majesty, is just like a storeroom.' Those blind people who had been shown the foot replied, 'An elephant, your majesty, is just like a post.' Those blind people who had been shown the hindquarters replied, 'An elephant, your majesty, is just like a mortar.' Those blind people who had been shown the tail replied, 'An elephant, your majesty, is just like a pestle.' Those blind people who had been shown the tuft at the end of the tail replied, 'An elephant, your majesty, is just like a broom.'
“Saying 'An elephant is like this, an elephant is not like that!
An elephant is not like this, an elephant is like that!' they fought each other with their fists.
And the king was delighted.
“Even so, bhikkhus, are those wanderers of various sects blind, unseeing… saying, “Dhamma is like this!… Dhamma is like that!' Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Kosambi at the Ghosita monastery.
At that time the Lord was living hemmed in by bhikkhus and bhikkhunis, by male and female lay followers, by kings and royal ministers, by sectarian teachers and their disciples, and he lived in discomfort and not at ease.
Then the Lord thought: “At present I am living hemmed in by bhikkhus and bhikkhunis… by sectarian teachers and their disciples, and I live in discomfort and not at ease.
Suppose I were to live alone, secluded from the crowd?
Then the Lord, having put on his robe in the forenoon and taken his bowl and outer cloak, entered Kosambi for almsfood.
Having walked for almsfood in Kosambi and returned after the meal, he set his lodging in order by himself, took his bowl and cloak, and without informing his attendant or taking leave of the Order of bhikkhus, he set off alone, without a companion, for Parileyyaka.
Walking on tour by stages, he arrived at Parileyyaka and stayed near Parileyyaka in a protected forest at the foot of an auspicious sal-tree.
Now a certain bull elephant was living hemmed in by elephants and she-elephants, by elephant calves and sucklings; he ate grass with the tips pulled off and they ate the branches he had broken down.
He drank muddied water and on going down and coming out of the water he was jostled by she-elephants; and he lived in discomfort and not at ease.
Then that bull elephant thought: “At present I am living hemmed in by elephants and she-elephants, by elephant calves and sucklings; I eat grass with the tips pulled off and they eat the branches which I break down.
I drink muddied water and on going down and coming out of the water I am jostled by she-elephants; and I live in discomfort and not at ease.
Suppose I were to live alone, secluded from the crowd?
So that bull elephant left the herd and went to Parileyyaka, to the protected forest, and approached the Lord at the foot of the auspicious sal-tree.
On reaching the place where the Lord was staying that bull elephant kept the place free of grass and brought water with his trunk for the Lord's use.
Then, while the Lord was in solitude and seclusion, this thought arose in his mind: “Formerly I was living hemmed in by bhikkhus and bhikkhunis… and I was living in discomfort and not at ease.
But now I live not hemmed in by bhikkhus and bhikkhunis… in comfort and at ease.” And also this thought arose in that bull elephant's mind: “Formerly I was living hemmed in by elephants and she-elephants… and I was living in discomfort and not at ease, but now I live not hemmed in by elephants and she-elephants… I eat unbroken grass and do not eat the branches which I break down.
I drink clear water and on going down and coming out of the water I am not jostled by she-elephants, and I live in comfort and at ease.
Then the Lord, on observing his own solitude, understood with his mind the thought in the mind of that bull elephant, and uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Eastern Park at Migara's mother's mansion.
On that occasion the Lord was sitting surrounded by the Order of bhikkhus, as it was the day of the Uposatha observance.
Then, when the night was far advanced and the first watch had ended, the Venerable Ananda arose from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, raised his folded hands, and said to the Lord: “The night is far advanced, revered sir, the first watch has ended and the bhikkhus have been sitting for a long time.
Revered sir, let the Lord recite the Patimokkha to the bhikkhus.” When this was said the Lord remained silent.
When the night was advanced and the middle watch had ended, a second time the Venerable Ananda arose from his seat… and said to the Lord: “The night is far advanced, revered sir, the middle watch has ended and the bhikkhus have been sitting for a long time.
Revered sir, let the Lord recite the Patimokkha to the bhikkhus.” A second time the Lord remained silent.
When the night was advanced and the last watch had ended, as dawn was approaching and the night was drawing to a close, a third time the Venerable Ananda arose from his seat… and said to the Lord: “The night is far advanced, revered sir, the last watch has ended; dawn is approaching and the night is drawing to a close and the bhikkhus have been sitting for a long time.
Revered sir, let the Lord recite the Patimokka to the bhikkhus.
“The gathering is not pure, Ananda.
Then the Venerable Mahamoggallana thought: “Concerning which person has the Lord said, 'The gathering is not pure, Ananda'?” And the Venerable Mahamoggallana, comprehending the minds of the whole Order of bhikkhus with his own mind, saw that person sitting in the midst of the Order of bhikkhus — immoral, wicked, of impure and suspect behavior, secretive in his acts, no recluse though pretending to be one, not practicing the holy life though pretending to do so, rotten within, lustful and corrupt.
On seeing him he arose from his seat, approached that person, and said: “Get up, friend.
You are seen by the Lord.
You cannot live in communion with the bhikkhus.” But that person remained silent.
A second time and a third time the Venerable Mahamoggallana told that person to get up, and a second time and a third time that person remained silent.
Then the Venerable Mahamoggllana took that person by the arm, pulled him outside the gate, and bolted it.
Then he approached the Lord and said: “Revered sir, I have ejected that person.
The assembly is quite pure.
Revered sir, let the Lord recite the Patimokkha to the bhikkhus.
“It is strange, Moggallana, it is remarkable, Moggallana, how that stupid person should have waited until he was taken by the arm.
Then the Lord addressed the bhikkhus: “From now on, bhikkhus, I shall not participate in the Uposatha observance or recite the Patimokkha.
From now on you yourselves should participate in the Uposatha observance and recite the Patimokkha.
It is impossible, bhikkhus, it cannot happen, that the Tathagata should participate in the Uposatha observance and recite the Patimokkha with a gathering that is not pure.
“Bhikkhus, there are these eight wonderful and marvellous qualities of the great ocean, seeing which the asuras delight in the great ocean.
What are the eight?
“The great ocean, bhikkhus, gradually shelves, slopes, and inclines, and there is no sudden precipice.
Since the great ocean gradually shelves… this is the first wonderful and marvellous quality of the great ocean, seeing which the asuras delight in the great ocean.
“Furthermore, the great ocean is stable and does not exceed the limits of the tide-line.
This is the second wonderful and marvellous quality of the great ocean…
“Furthermore, the great ocean does not tolerate a dead body; for when there is a dead body in the great ocean, it soon conveys it to the shore and casts it up on dry land.
This is the third wonderful and marvellous quality of the great ocean…
“Furthermore, whatever great rivers there are — the Ganges, the Yamuna, the Aciravati, the Sarabhu, and the Mahi — on reaching the great ocean lose their former names and identities and are just called 'the great ocean.' This is the fourth wonderful and marvellous quality of the great ocean…
“Furthermore, although the rivers of the world flow into the great ocean and showers of rain fall from the sky, no lessening or filling up of the great ocean is evident.
This is the fifth wonderful and marvellous quality of the great ocean…
“Furthermore, the great ocean has one taste, the taste of salt.
This is the sixth wonderful and marvellous quality of the great ocean…
“Furthermore, the great ocean contains many precious substances, various precious substances, such as these: pearl, crystal, beryl, conch, quartz, coral, silver, gold, ruby, and cat's eye.
This is the seventh wonderful and marvellous quality of the great ocean…
“Furthermore, the great ocean is the abode of mighty creatures, of such creatures as these: the timi, timingala, timirapingala, asuras, nagas, and gandhabbas.
There exist in the great ocean beings a hundred yojanas in size, beings two hundred, three hundred, four hundred, and five hundred yojanas in size.
This is the eighth wonderful and marvellous quality of the great ocean…
“These, bhikkhus, are the eight wonderful and marvellous qualities of the great ocean, seeing which the asuras delight in the great ocean.
“Similarly, bhikkhus, there are eight wonderful and marvellous qualities in this Dhamma and Discipline, seeing which bhikkhus delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
What are the eight?
“Just as the great ocean gradually shelves, slopes, and inclines, and there is no sudden precipice, so also in this Dhamma and Discipline there is a gradual training, a gradual course, a gradual progression, and there is no sudden penetration to final knowledge.
Since, in this Dhamma and Discipline there is a gradual training,… this is the first wonderful and marvellous quality in this Dhamma and Discipline, seeing which bhikkhus delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
“Just as the great ocean is stable and does not exceed the limits of the tide-line, so also my disciples do not transgress a training rule laid down by me for disciples even for the sake of their lives.
This is the second wonderful and marvellous quality in this Dhamma and Discipline…
“Just as the great ocean does not tolerate a dead body… and casts it up on dry land, so also whatsoever person is immoral, wicked, of impure and suspect behavior, secretive in his acts, no recluse though pretending to be one, not practicing the holy life though pretending to do so, rotten within, lustful and corrupt, the Order does not associate with him, but when it has met together soon throws him out.
Even though he may be sitting in the midst of the Order of bhikkhus, yet he is far from the Order and the Order is far from him.
This is the third wonderful and marvellous quality in this Dhamma and Discipline…
“Just as whatever great rivers there are… on reaching the great ocean lose their former names and identities and are just called 'the great ocean,' so also the four castes — nobles, brahmans, merchants, and workers — having gone forth from home to the homeless state in the Dhamma and Discipline made known by the Tathagata, abandon their former names and identities and are just called 'recluses, the followers of the Sakyan son.' This is the fourth wonderful and marvellous quality in this Dhamma and Discipline…
“Just as, although the rivers of the world flow into the great ocean and showers of rain fall from the sky, no lessening or filling up of the great ocean is evident, so also, although many bhikkhus attain final Nibbana in the Nibbana-element with no residue left, no lessening or filling up of the Nibbana-element is evident.
This is the fifth wonderful and marvellous quality in this Dhamma and Discipline…
“Just as the great ocean has one taste, the taste of salt, so also this Dhamma and Discipline has one taste, the taste of liberation.
This is the sixth wonderful and marvellous quality in this Dhamma and Discipline…
“Just as the great ocean contains many precious substances, various precious substances… so also this Dhamma and Discipline contains many precious things, various precious things, such as these: the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right endeavors, the four bases for successful accomplishment, the five faculties, the five powers, the seven enlightenment factors, and the Noble Eightfold Path.
This is the seventh wonderful and marvellous quality in this Dhamma and Discipline…
“Just as the great ocean is the abode of mighty creatures… so also this Dhamma and Discipline is the abode of mighty creatures, such as these: the stream-enterer and the one who is on the way to realizing the fruit of stream-entry, the once-returner and the one who is on the way to realizing the fruit of once-returning, the non-returner and the one who is on the way to realizing the fruit of non-returning, the arahant and the one who is on the way to arahatship.
This is the eighth wonderful and marvellous quality in this Dhamma and Discipline.
“These, bhikkhus, are the eight wonderful and marvellous qualities in this Dhamma and Discipline, seeing which bhikkhus delight in this Dhamma and Discipline.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying at Calika on Calika Hill.
At that time the Venerable Meghiya was the Lord's attendant.
Then the Venerable Meghiya approached the Lord, prostrated himself, stood to one side, and said: “I wish to go into Jantu village for almsfood, revered sir.
“Do now, Meghiya, what you think it is time to do.
Then the Venerable Meghiya, having put on his robe in the forenoon and taken his bowl and outer cloak, entered Jantu village for almsfood.
Having walked in Jantu village for almsfood, after the meal, on returning from collecting almsfood, he approached the bank of the river Kimikala.
As he was walking and wandering up and down beside the river for exercise, he saw a pleasant and charming mango grove.
On seeing it he thought: “This mango grove is very pleasant and charming.
It is eminently suitable for the endeavor of a young man of good family who is intent on the endeavor.
If the Lord were to give me permission, I would come and endeavor in this mango grove.
Then the Venerable Meghiya approached the Lord, prostrated himself, sat down to one side, and said: “Revered sir, having put on my robe in the forenoon… I approached the bank of the river Kimikala and saw a pleasant and charming mango grove.
On seeing it I thought: 'This mango grove is very pleasant and charming.
It is eminently suitable for the endeavor of a young man of good family who is intent on the endeavor.
If the Lord were to give me permission, I would come and endeavor in this mango grove.' If, revered sir, the Lord gives me permission, I would go to that mango grove to endeavor.
When this was said the Lord replied to the Venerable Meghiya: “As we are alone, Meghiya, wait a while until some other bhikkhu comes.
A second time the Venerable Meghiya said to the Lord: “Revered sir, the Lord has nothing further that should be done and nothing to add to what has been done.
But for me, revered sir, there is something further that should be done and something to add to what has been done.
If, revered sir, the Lord gives me permission, I would go to that mango grove to endeavor.
A second time the Lord replied to the Venerable Meghiya: “As we are alone, Meghiya, wait a while until some other bhikkhu comes.
A third time the Venerable Meghiya said to the Lord: “Revered sir, the Lord has nothing further that should be done… I would go to that mango grove to endeavor.
“As you are talking of endeavoring, Meghiya, what can I say?
Do now, Meghiya, what you think it is time to do.
Then the Venerable Meghiya rose from his seat, prostrated himself before the Lord, and keeping his right side towards him, went to that mango grove.
On entering that mango grove he sat down at the foot of a certain tree for the rest period during the middle of the day.
Now while the Venerable Meghiya was staying in that mango grove, there kept occurring to him three bad, unwholesome kinds of thoughts: sensual thought, malevolent thought, and cruel thought.
The Venerable Meghiya then reflected: “It is indeed strange!
It is indeed remarkable!
Although I have gone forth out of faith from home to the homeless state, yet I am overwhelmed by these three bad, unwholesome kinds of thoughts: sensual thought, malevolent thought, and cruel thought.
Then the Venerable Meghiya, on emerging from seclusion in the late afternoon, approached the Lord, prostrated himself, sat down to one side, and said: “Revered sir, while I was staying in that mango grove there kept occurring to me three bad, unwholesome kinds of thoughts… and I thought: 'It is indeed strange!… I am overwhelmed by these three bad, unwholesome kinds of thoughts: sensual thought, malevolent thought, and cruel thought.' “When mind-deliverance is as yet immature, Meghiya, five things lead to its maturity.
What five?
“Here, Meghiya, a bhikkhu has good friends, good associates, good companions.
When mind-deliverance is as yet immature, Meghiya, this is the first thing that leads to its maturity.
“Furthermore, Meghiya, a bhikkhu is virtuous, he lives restrained by the restraint of the Patimokkha, endowed with conduct and resort; seeing danger in the smallest faults, he trains in the training rules he has accepted.
When mind-deliverance is as yet immature, Meghiya, this is the second thing that leads to its maturity.
“Furthermore, Meghiya, a bhikkhu obtains at will, with no trouble or difficulty, talk that is effacing, a help in opening up the mind, and which conduces to complete turning away, dispassion, cessation, peace, direct knowledge, enlightenment, and Nibbana — that is, talk about fewness of wishes, talk about contentment, talk about seclusion, talk about being non-gregarious, talk about putting forth energy, talk about virtue, talk about concentration, talk about wisdom, talk about deliverance, talk about the knowledge and vision of deliverance.
When mind-deliverance is as yet immature, Meghiya, this is the third thing that leads to its maturity.
“Furthermore, Meghiya, a bhikkhu lives with energy instigated for the abandoning of unwholesome states and the acquiring of wholesome states; he is vigorous, energetic, and persevering with regard to wholesome states.
When mind-deliverance is as yet immature, Meghiya, this is the fourth thing that leads to its maturity.
“Furthermore, Meghiya, a bhikkhu is wise, endowed with the noble ones' penetrative understanding of rise and disappearance leading to the complete ending of suffering.
When mind-deliverance is as yet immature, Meghiya, this is the fifth thing that leads to its maturity.
When mind-deliverance is as yet immature, Meghiya, these five things lead to its maturity.
“It is to be expected of a bhikkhu who has good friends, good associates, good companions, that he will be virtuous, that he will live restrained by the restraint of the Patimokkha, endowed with conduct and resort, and that seeing danger in the smallest faults, he will train in the training rules he has accepted.
It is to be expected of a bhikkhu who has good friends… that he will obtain at will, with no trouble or difficulty, talk that is effacing, a help in opening up the mind… talk about the knowledge and vision of deliverance.
It is to be expected of a bhikkhu who has good friends… that he will live with energy instigated… vigorous, energetic, and persevering with regard to wholesome states.
It is to be expected of a bhikkhu who has good friends… that he will be wise, endowed with the noble ones' penetrative understanding of rise and disappearance leading to the complete ending of suffering.
“A bhikkhu, Meghiya, who is established in these five things should also cultivate four additional things: foulness should be cultivated for overcoming lust; loving-kindness should be cultivated for overcoming malevolence; respiration-mindfulness should be cultivated for cutting off thinking; the perception of impermanence should be cultivated for the removal of the conceit 'I am.' For when one perceives impermanence, Meghiya, the perception of not-self is established.
When one perceives not-self one reaches the removal of the conceit 'I am,' which is called Nibbana here and now.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was journeying among the Mallas together with a large Order of bhikkhus and came to the brahman village of the Mallas called Thuna.
The brahman householders who lived in Thuna heard: “The recluse Gotama, the Sakyan son who went forth from the Sakya clan, has been journeying among the Mallas together with a large Order of bhikkhus and has arrived at Thuna.” They then filled the well to the brim with grass and chaff, thinking, “Don't let those shaven-headed recluses get water to drink.
Then the Lord stepped off the road, and going up to the foot of a certain tree, sat down on a seat prepared for him.
Sitting there the Lord addressed the Venerable Ananda: “Come, Ananda, fetch me some water from that well.
Thereupon the Venerable Ananda said to the Lord: “Just now, revered sir, the brahman householders living in Thuna filled the well to the brim with grass and chaff, thinking, 'Don't let those shaven-headed recluses get water to drink.' Then a second time the Lord addressed the Venerable Ananda: “Come, Ananda, fetch me some water…” And a second time the Venerable Ananda said to the Lord: “Just now, revered sir, the brahman householders filled the well to the brim with grass and chaff… Then for a third time the Lord addressed the Venerable Ananda: “Come, Ananda, fetch me some water from that well.
“Yes, revered sir,” the Venerable Ananda replied, and taking a bowl he went to the well.
Now as the Venerable Ananda was approaching it, the well threw up all its grass and chaff from its mouth and stood filled to the brim with pure, clean, clear water, as if it were overflowing.
Then the Venerable Ananda thought: “It is indeed wonderful, it is indeed marvellous, the great supernormal potency and power of the Tathagata!
As I was approaching this well, it threw up all that grass and chaff from its mouth and now stands filled to the brim with pure, clean, clear water, as if it were overflowing.” And taking some water in the bowl he approached the Lord and said: “It is indeed wonderful, it is indeed marvellous, the great supernormal potency and power of the Tathagata!
This well… now stands filled to the brim with pure, clean, clear water, as if it were overflowing.
Drink the water, Lord.
Drink the water, Sugata.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
On that occasion the Venerable Nanda, the Lord's brother, the son of his maternal aunt, informed a number of bhikkhus thus: “I am discontented with leading the holy life, friends.
I am unable to endure the holy life.
I will give up the training and return to the low life.
Then a certain bhikkhu approached the Lord, prostrated himself, sat down to one side, and said: “The Venerable Nanda, revered sir, the Lord's brother, the son of his maternal aunt, informed a number of bhikkhus thus: 'I am discontented with leading the holy life… I will give up the training and return to the low life.' Then the Lord addressed a certain bhikkhu: “Come, bhikkhu, in my name tell the bhikkhu Nanda, 'The Teacher calls you, friend Nanda.' “Very well, revered sir,” that bhikkhu replied, and approaching the Venerable Nanda, he said, “The Teacher calls you, friend Nanda.
“Very well friend,” the Venerable Nanda replied, and approaching the Lord he prostrated himself and sat down to one side.
The Lord then said to him: “Is it true, Nanda, that you informed a number of bhikkhus thus: 'I am discontented with leading the holy life… I will return to the low life'?
“Yes, revered sir.
“But why, Nanda, are you discontented with leading the holy life?
“On departing from home, revered sir, a Sakyan girl, the loveliest in the land, with her hair half-combed, looked up at me and said, 'May you return soon, master.' Recollecting that, revered sir, I am discontented with leading the holy life… I am unable to endure the holy life.
I will give up the training and return to the low life.
Then the Lord took the Venerable Nanda by the arm, and just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, even so did they vanish from the Jeta Wood and appear among the devas of the Tavatimsa heaven.
Now on that occasion about five hundred pink-footed nymphs had come to minister to Sakka, ruler of the devas.
And the Lord said to the Venerable Nanda, “Do you see those five hundred pink-footed nymphs?
“Yes, revered sir.
“What do you think, Nanda, who is more beautiful, more fair to behold, and more alluring — that Sakyan girl, the loveliest in the land, or these five hundred pink-footed nymphs?
“Revered sir, compared to these five hundred pink-footed nymphs, that Sakyan girl, the loveliest in the land, is like a mutilated she-monkey that has had its ears and nose chopped off.
She does not count; she is not worth a fraction compared to them; there is no comparison.
These five hundred nymphs are far more beautiful, more fair to behold, and more alluring.
“Rejoice, Nanda, rejoice, Nanda!
I guarantee that you will obtain five hundred pink-footed nymphs.
“If, revered sir, the Lord guarantees that I will obtain five hundred pink-footed nymphs, I shall be content in living the holy life under the Lord.
Then the Lord took the Venerable Nanda by the arm… even so did they vanish from among the devas of the Tavatimsa heaven and appear in the Jeta Wood.
The bhikkhus heard: “It is said that the Venerable Nanda, the Lord's brother, the son of his maternal aunt, is living the holy life for the sake of nymphs.
It is said that the Lord has guaranteed that he will obtain five hundred pink-footed nymphs.
Then the bhikkhu-friends of the Venerable Nanda went about calling him “hireling” and “menial,” saying: “The Venerable Nanda is a hireling!
The Venerable Nanda is a menial!
He is living the holy life for the sake of nymphs!
It is said that the Lord has guaranteed that he will obtain five hundred pink-footed nymphs!
Then the Venerable Nanda was humiliated, ashamed, and dismayed by his friends calling him “hireling” and “menial.” Living alone, secluded, diligent, ardent, and resolute, he soon realized even here and now through his own direct knowledge that unequalled goal of the holy life for the sake of which sons of good family rightly go forth from home to the homeless state, and entering into it he abode in it.
And he knew: “Finished is birth, lived is the holy life, done is what had to be done, there is no more of this state.” And the Venerable Nanda became one of the arahats.
Then, when the night was far advanced, a certain devata of surpassing beauty, illuminating the whole Jeta Wood, approached the Lord, prostrated himself and stood to one side.
Standing there that devata said to the Lord: “The Venerable Nanda, revered sir, the Lord's brother, the son of his maternal aunt, by the ending of the taints has realized here and now through his own direct knowledge the taintless mind-deliverance and wisdom-deliverance, and entering into it, he abides in it.
The knowledge also arose in the Lord: “Nanda, by the ending of the taints, has realized here and now the taintless mind-deliverance and wisdom-deliverance, and entering into it, he abides in it.
When that night had ended the Venerable Nanda approached the Lord, prostrated himself, sat down to one side, and said to the Lord: “Revered sir, as to the Lord's guarantee that I will obtain five hundred pink-footed nymphs, I release the Lord from that promise.
“But, Nanda, comprehending your mind with my mind, I knew: 'Nanda has realized here and now the taintless mind-deliverance and wisdom-deliverance.' Also, a devata told me: 'The Venerable Nanda, revered sir, has realized here and now the taintless mind-deliverance and wisdom-deliverance.' When, Nanda, your mind was released from the taints without grasping, I was then released from that promise.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
At Savatthi.
“Monks, there are these seven properties.
Which seven?
The property of light, the property of beauty, the property of the dimension of the infinitude of space, the property of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, the property of the dimension of nothingness, the property of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception, the property of the cessation of feeling & perception.
These are the seven properties.
When this was said, a certain monk addressed the Blessed One: “Lord, with regard to the property of light… the property of the cessation of feeling & perception: In dependence on what are these properties discerned?
“Monk, the property of light is discerned in dependence on darkness.
The property of beauty is discerned in dependence on the unattractive.
The property of the dimension of the infinitude of space is discerned in dependence on form.
The property of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness is discerned in dependence on the dimension of the infinitude of space.
The property of the dimension of nothingness is discerned in dependence on the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness.
The property of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception is discerned in dependence on the dimension of nothingness.
The property of the cessation of feeling & perception is discerned in dependence on cessation.
“But, lord, with regard to the property of light… the property of the cessation of feeling & perception: How is the attainment of these properties to be reached?
“Monk, the property of light, the property of beauty, the property of the dimension of the infinitude of space, the property of the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness, the property of the dimension of nothingness: These properties are to be reached as perception attainments.
The property of the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception is to be reached as a remnant-of-fabrications attainment.
The property of the cessation of feeling & perception is to be reached as a cessation attainment.”
Staying at Savatthi.
Then a brahman cosmologist went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Now, then, Master Gotama, does everything exist?
“'Everything exists' is the senior form of cosmology, brahman.
“Then, Master Gotama, does everything not exist?
“'Everything does not exist' is the second form of cosmology, brahman.
“Then is everything a Oneness?
“'Everything is a Oneness' is the third form of cosmology, brahman.
“Then is everything a Manyness?
“'Everything is a Manyness' is the fourth form of cosmology, brahman.
Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathagata teaches the Dhamma via the middle: From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Sangha of monks.
May Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded to him.
The Blessed One said, “Monks, once the devas & asuras were arrayed for battle.
Then Sakka, the chief of the devas, addressed the devas of the Thirty-three: 'If, dear sirs, when the devas have gone into battle, there should arise fear, terror, or horripilation, then on that occasion you should catch sight of the top of my standard.
For when you have caught sight of the top of my standard, whatever fear, terror, or horripilation there is will be abandoned.
“'If you can't catch sight of the top of my standard, then you should catch sight of the top of the deva-king Pajapati's standard.
For when you have caught sight of the top of the deva-king Pajapati's standard, whatever fear, terror, or horripilation there is will be abandoned.
“'If you can't catch sight of the top of the deva-king Pajapati's standard, then you should catch sight of the top of the deva-king Varuna's standard.
For when For when you have caught sight of the top of the deva-king Varuna's standard, whatever fear, terror, or horripilation there is will be abandoned.
“'If you can't catch sight of the top of the deva-king Varuna's standard, then you should catch sight of the top of the deva-king Isana's standard.
For when you have caught sight of the top of the deva-king Isana's standard, whatever fear, terror, or horripilation there is will be abandoned.'
“But, monks, when the top of the deva-chief Sakka's standard is caught sight of, or when the top of the deva-king Pajapati's standard is caught sight of, or when the top of the deva-king Varuna's standard is caught sight of, or when the top of the deva-king Isana's standard is caught sight of, whatever fear, terror, or horripilation there is may be abandoned or may not be abandoned.
Why is that?
Because Sakka the chief of the devas is not devoid of passion, not devoid of aversion, not devoid of delusion.
He feels fear, feels terror, feels dread.
He runs away.
“But I tell you this: If — when you have gone into the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building — there should arise fear, terror, or horripilation, then on that occasion you should recollect me: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' For when you have recollected me, whatever fear, terror, or horripilation there is will be abandoned.
“If you can't recollect me, then you should recollect the Dhamma: 'The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.' For when you have recollected the Dhamma, whatever fear, terror, or horripilation there is will be abandoned.
“If you can't recollect the Dhamma, then you should recollect the Sangha: 'The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four types of noble disciples when taken as pairs, the eight when taken as individual types — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the unexcelled field of merit for the world.' For when you have recollected the Sangha, whatever fear, terror, or horripilation where is will be abandoned.
Why is that?
Because the Tathagata — worthy & rightly self-awakened — is devoid of passion, devoid of aversion, devoid of delusion.
He feels no fear, feels no terror, feels no dread.
He doesn't run away.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One-well-gone, the Teacher, further said this:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Saṅgāmaji had arrived in Sāvatthī to see the Blessed One.
His former wife heard, “Master Saṅgāmaji, they say, has arrived in Sāvatthī.” Taking her small child, she went to Jeta's Grove.
On that occasion Ven.
Saṅgāmaji was sitting at the root of a tree for the day's abiding.
His former wife went to him and, on arrival, said to him, “Look after me, contemplative — with a little son.” When this was said, Ven.
Saṅgāmaji remained silent.
A second time… A third time, his former wife said to him, “Look after me, contemplative — with a little son.” A third time, Ven.
Saṅgāmaji remained silent.
Then his former wife, taking the baby and leaving him in front of Ven.
Saṅgāmaji, went away, saying, “That's your son, contemplative.
Look after him.
Then Ven.
Saṅgāmaji neither looked at the child nor spoke to him.
His wife, after going not far away, was looking back and saw Ven.
Saṅgāmaji neither looking at the child nor speaking to him.
On seeing this, the thought occurred to her, “The contemplative doesn't even care about his son.” Returning from there and taking the child, she left.
The Blessed One — with his divine eye, purified and surpassing the human — saw Ven.
Saṅgāmaji's former wife misbehaving in that way.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
At Savatthi.
Then a certain very rich brahman — shabby, shabbily dressed — went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After this exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “Why, brahman, are you shabby & shabbily dressed?
“Just now, Master Gotama, my four sons — at their wives instigation — threw me out of the house.
“In that case, brahman, memorize these verses and then recite them when a large assembly of people have gathered in the town hall and your sons are sitting there, too.
Then the very rich brahman, having memorized these verses in the presence of the Blessed One, recited them when a large assembly of people had gathered in the town hall and his sons were sitting there, too:
Then the brahman's sons, having led him home, bathed him, and each provided him in a pair of cloths.
So the brahman, taking one pair of cloths, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After this exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “We brahmans, Master Gotama, look for a teacher's fee for our teacher.
May Master Gotama accept this teacher's portion from me.
The Blessed One accepted it out of sympathy.
Then the very rich brahman said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to point out the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the community of monks.
May Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge from this day forward, for life.
See also: AN.
The composers of Pali poetry love to play on words — puns, alliteration, and double intentions abound in the verses that have emerged from the lost world of ancient India.
This poem is unique in its thorough repetition of the first phrase, which sets the tone of cyclical activity that drones on and on until the pattern is transformed.
Even the pronunciation of punappunam contributes to this: The first two syllables rise up in tone, a pause or break occurs at the double “p's,” and then the other two syllables descend 
Beginning with the cycles of nature and the on-flowing of the growing seasons, the poet turns the metaphor of re-turn to the essential Dhamma teaching of the cycles of birth and death that make up samsara, the flowing-on of the deluded from one womb to another.
Mando, or confusion, is the narrow limitation of mind that prevents our insight into the impermanence, selflessness and unsatisfactoriness of ourselves and the world.
It is transformed by the sort of wisdom that is as far-reaching, tranquil and stable as the wide earth itself — capable of holding everything with equanimity.
The entire poem is about that central Buddhist idea punabbhava, found in the final stanza, which is often translated as “renewed existence” or even “again-becoming.” In the process thinking that so characterizes Buddhism, people and things do not “exist” as much as they “become,” and this more dynamic form of the verb “to be” is usually preferred in the literature.
This life we cling to is merely an episode in a much larger drama of perpetual birth and death, with existence recurring “over and over,” and we will never sort it out until we are capable of holding this wider view of our situation.
The Buddha:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was living among the Magadhans at Dakkhinagiri in the brahman village of Ekanala.
Now at that time approximately of the brahman Kasi Bharadvaja's plows were yoked at the sowing time.
Then, in the early morning, putting on his lower robe and taking his bowl & robes, the Blessed One went to where Kasi Bharadvaja was working.
Now at that time Kasi Bharadvaja's food-distribution was underway.
So the Blessed One went to Kasi Bharadvaja's food-distribution and, on arrival, stood to one side.
Kasi Bharadvaja saw the Blessed One standing for alms, and on seeing him, said to him, “I, contemplative, plow & sow.
Having plowed & sown, I eat.
You, too, contemplative, should plow & sow.
Having plowed & sown, you eat.
“I, too, brahman, plow & sow.
Having plowed & sown, I eat.
“But, contemplative, I don't see the Master Gotama's yoke or plow, plowshare, goad, or oxen, and yet the Master Gotama says this: 'I, too, brahman, plow & sow.
Having plowed & sown, I eat.' Then the Kasi Bharadvaja addressed the Blessed One with a verse:
Then Kasi Bharadvaja, having heaped up milk-rice in a large bronze serving bowl, offered it to the Blessed One, “May Master Gotama eat milk-rice.
The master is a plowman, for the Master Gotama plows the plowing that has as its fruit the deathless.
“Then to whom, Master Gotama, should I give this milk-rice?
“Brahman, I don't see that person in this world — with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, in this generation with its royalty & common people — by whom this milk-rice, having been eaten, would be rightly digested, aside from a Tathagata or a Tathagata's disciple.
In that case, brahman, throw the milk-rice away in a place without vegetation, or dump it in water with no living beings.
So Kasi Bharadvaja dumped the milk-rice in water with no living beings.
And the milk-rice, when dropped in the water, hissed & sizzled, seethed & steamed.
Just as an iron ball heated all day, when tossed in the water, hisses & sizzles, seethes & steams, in the same way the milk-rice, when dropped in the water, hissed & sizzled, seethed & steamed.
Then Kasi Bharadvaja — in awe, his hair standing on end — went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, throwing himself down with his head at the Blessed One's feet, said to him, “Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Community of monks.
May Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.
Let me obtain the going forth in Master Gotama's presence, let me obtain admission.
Then the brahman Kasi Bharadvaja obtained the going forth in the Blessed One's presence, he obtained admission.
And not long after his admission — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the celibate life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the celibate life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And so Ven.
Bharadvaja became another one of the arahants.
At Savatthi.
Then the brahman Jata Bharadvaja went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After this exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he addressed the Blessed One with a verse:
When this was said, the brahman Jata Bharadvaja said to the Blessed One, “Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the community of monks.
Let me obtain the going forth in Master Gotama's presence, let me obtain admission.
Then the brahman Jata Bharadvaja received the going forth & the admission in the Blessed One's presence.
And not long after his admission — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And so Ven.
Bharadvaja became another one of the arahants.
… Now Akkosaka of the Bhaaradvaaja Brahmans heard Angry and displeased, he went to see the Blessed One, overwhelming him with abuse and reproaches.
At these words the Blessed One said: “What do you think, brahman?
Do you receive visits from friends and colleagues, blood-relations and others?
“Yes, good Gotama, sometimes such people come.
“What do you think?
Do you serve them with solid food, soft food and savories?
“Yes, good Gotama, sometimes.
“But supposing, brahman, they do not accept what you offer, whose is it?
“If they do not accept, good Gotama, then it belongs to us.
“So it is here, brahman.
The abuse, the scolding, the reviling you hurl at us who do not abuse or scold or revile, we do not accept from you.
It all belongs to you, brahman, it all belongs to you!
If a man replies to abuse with abuse, to scolding with scolding, to reviling with reviling, brahman, that is like you joining your guests for dinner.
But we are not joining you for dinner.
It is all yours, brahman, it is all yours!
“The king and his court believe that Gotama the recluse is an Arahant.
And yet the good Gotama can get angry!
And another Venerable Bhaaradvaaja became an Arahant.
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Blessed One was staying near Raajagaha, in the Bamboo Grove, at the Squirrels' Feeding-Place.
Now at that time the Brahman lady Dhanañjaani, wife of a certain Brahman of the Bhaaradvaaja family, was a fervent supporter of the Buddha, the Dhamma and the Sangha.
And this lady, while serving the Bhaaradvaaja Brahman with his dinner, came before him and burst out with this triple inspired utterance: “Praise to the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Fully Self-Enlightened One!
Praise to the Dhamma!
Praise to the Sangha!
At these words the Brahman said to her “Now then, now then!
Every chance she gets this wretched woman has to sing the praises of that shaveling recluse!
Now, woman, I'm going to tell that teacher of yours what I think of him!
“Oh, Brahman, I know of nobody in this world with its gods, Maaras and Brahmaas, with its recluses and brahmans, whether they be divine or human, who could thus rebuke the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Fully Self-Enlightened One.
But go on, Brahman, go and you will find out.
Then the Brahman, angry and displeased, went to see the Blessed One.
After exchanging greetings and compliments with the Blessed One in a friendly and courteous manner, he sat down to one side.
So seated, he addressed the Blessed One thus in verse:
At these words the Brahman said to the Blessed One: “Excellent, good Gotama, most excellent!
It is, good Gotama, as if someone were to set up something that had been knocked down, or to reveal what had been hidden, or to point out the right path to a man who had got lost, or to bring an oil lamp into a dark place so that those with eyes could see what was there — just so has the good Gotama shown me the truth in various ways!
I declare that I go to the Lord Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma and to the Sangha of monks, I wish to embrace the homeless life under the Lord Gotama, I wish to receive ordination.
So the Bhaaradvaaja Brahman was received into the homeless life under the Blessed One, and received ordination.
And not so long after his ordination the Venerable Bhaaradvaaja, remaining alone and secluded, heedful, ardent and resolute, quickly attained that for which young men of good birth rightly go forth from home into the homeless life, coming to realize for himself, in this present life, the unsurpassed goal of the holy life, realizing that “birth is destroyed, the holy life has been accomplished, what was to be done is done!
There is no further life in this world.
And that Bhaaradvaaja became an Arahant.
Translator's note: This discourse reports the way the Buddha passed away, giving four verses uttered by those who witnessed the event.
It is interesting to note that the verses ascribed to heavenly beings make general comments on how the nature of all beings — even a Buddha — is to pass away, whereas the verses ascribed to the monks comment specifically on the Buddha's display of mental mastery immediately prior to the moment of his total Unbinding.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Kusinara in Upavattana, the Sal Tree Grove of the Mallans, on the occasion of his total Unbinding.
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks, “I exhort you, monks: All fabrications are subject to decay.
Bring about completion by being heedful.” Those were the Tathagata's last words.
Then the Blessed One entered the first jhana.
Emerging from that he entered the second jhana.
Emerging from that, he entered the third… the fourth jhana… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Emerging from that, he entered the cessation of perception & feeling.
Then emerging from the cessation of perception & feeling, he entered the dimension of neither perception nor non-perception.
Emerging from that, he entered the dimension of nothingness… the dimension of the infinitude of consciousness… the dimension of the infinitude of space… the fourth jhana… the third… the second… the first jhana.
Emerging from the first jhana he entered the second… the third… the fourth jhana.
Emerging from the fourth jhana, he immediately was totally Unbound.
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, Sahampati Brahma uttered this verse:
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, Sakka, ruler of the gods, uttered this verse:
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, Ven.
Ananda uttered this verse:
When the Blessed One was totally Unbound, simultaneously with the total Unbinding, Ven.
Anuruddha uttered this verse:
I have heard that on one occasion, when the Blessed One was newly Self-awakened, he was staying at Uruvela on the bank of the Nerañjara River, at the foot of the Goatherd's Banyan Tree.
Then, while he was alone and in seclusion, this line of thinking arose in his awareness: “One suffers if dwelling without reverence or deference.
Now on what brahman or contemplative can I dwell in dependence, honoring and respecting him?
Then the thought occurred to him: “It would be for the sake of perfecting an unperfected aggregate of virtue that I would dwell in dependence on another brahman or contemplative, honoring and respecting him.
However, in this world with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, in this generation with its brahmans and contemplatives, its royalty and common-folk, I do not see another brahman or contemplative more consummate in virtue than I, on whom I could dwell in dependence, honoring and respecting him.
“It would be for the sake of perfecting an unperfected aggregate of concentration that I would dwell in dependence on another brahman or contemplative, honoring and respecting him.
However, in this world with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, in this generation with its brahmans and contemplatives, its royalty and common-folk, I do not see another brahman or contemplative more consummate in concentration than I, on whom I could dwell in dependence, honoring and respecting him.
“It would be for the sake of perfecting an unperfected aggregate of discernment that I would dwell in dependence on another brahman or contemplative, honoring and respecting him.
However, in this world with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, in this generation with its brahmans and contemplatives, its royalty and common-folk, I do not see another brahman or contemplative more consummate in discernment than I, on whom I could dwell in dependence, honoring and respecting him.
“It would be for the sake of perfecting an unperfected aggregate of release that I would dwell in dependence on another brahman or contemplative, honoring and respecting him.
However, in this world with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, in this generation with its brahmans and contemplatives, its royalty and common-folk, I do not see another brahman or contemplative more consummate in release than I, on whom I could dwell in dependence, honoring and respecting him.
“It would be for the sake of perfecting an unperfected aggregate of knowledge and vision of release that I would dwell in dependence on another brahman or contemplative, honoring and respecting him.
However, in this world with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, in this generation with its brahmans and contemplatives, its royalty and common-folk, I do not see another brahman or contemplative more consummate in knowledge and vision of release than I, on whom I could dwell in dependence, honoring and respecting him.
“What if I were to dwell in dependence on this very Dhamma to which I have fully awakened, honoring and respecting it?
Then, having known with his own awareness the line of thinking in the Blessed One's awareness — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — Brahma Sahampati disappeared from the Brahma-world and reappeared in front of the Blessed One.
Arranging his upper robe over one shoulder, he saluted the Blessed One with his hands before his heart and said to him: “So it is, Blessed One!
So it is, One-Well-Gone!
Those who were Arahants, Rightly Self-awakened Ones in the past — they, too, dwelled in dependence on the very Dhamma itself, honoring and respecting it.
Those who will be Arahants, Rightly Self-awakened Ones in the future — they, too, will dwell in dependence on the very Dhamma itself, honoring and respecting it.
And let the Blessed One, who is at present the Arahant, the Rightly Self-awakened One, dwell in dependence on the very Dhamma itself, honoring and respecting it.
That is what Brahma Sahampati said.
Having said that, he further said this:
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living at Dakkhinagiri, in the brahmana village Ekanala, in Magadha.
Now at that time, it being the sowing season, five hundred plows of the brahman Kasibharadvaja were put to use.
Then in the forenoon the Blessed One having dressed himself, took bowl and robe, and went to the place where brahman Kasibharadvaja's work was going on.
It was the time of food distribution by the brahman, and the Blessed One drew near, and stood at one side.
Bharadvaja seeing the Blessed One standing there for alms said to him:
“Recluse, I do plow, and do sow, and having plowed and sown I eat.
You also, recluse should plow and sow; having plowed and sown you should eat.
“I, too, brahman, plow and sow; having plowed and sown, I eat.
“We do not see the Venerable Gotama's yoke, or plow, or plowshare, or goad or oxen.
Nevertheless the Venerable Gotama says: 'I, too, brahman, plow and sow; having plowed and sown, I eat.' Thereupon the brahman addressed the Blessed One in a stanza:
“You profess to be a plowman, yet your plow we do not see; asked about your plow and the rest, tell us of them that we may know.
“Faith is my seed, austerity the rain, wisdom my yoke and plow, modesty is the pole, mind the strap, mindfulness is my plowshare and goad.
“Controlled in speech and conduct, guarded in deed and speech, abstemious in food, I make truth my weed cutter; arahantship, my deliverance complete.
“Exertion, my team in yoke, draws me to Nibbana's security, and on it goes without stopping, wither gone one does not suffer.
“Thuswise is this plowing plowed which bears the fruit of Deathlessness; having plowed this plowing one is freed from every ill.
Then brahman Kasibharadvaja filling a golden bowl with milk-rice offered it to the Blessed One saying: “May the Venerable Gotama partake of this milk rice; a plowman, indeed, is Venerable Gotama who plows a plow for the fruit of Deathlessness.
“What I receive by reciting verses, O brahman, I should not eat.
It is not the tradition of those who practice right livelihood.
The Buddhas reject what is received by reciting verses.
This brahman, is the conduct as long as Dhamma reigns.
“To those wholly consummate, taintless, and well-disciplines great sages, should thou offer other food and drink; sure field is that for merit-seeking men.
“To whom, then Venerable Gotama, shall I give this milk rice?
“Brahman, in the world of Devas, Maras, and Brahmas or among the generation of recluses, brahmanas, deities, and humans, there is no one by whom this milk rice, if eaten, could be wholly digested except by the Tathagata, or the disciple of a Tathagata.
Therefore, brahman, either cast this milk rice where there is no grass, or into water where there are no living creatures.
Thereupon the brahman flung that milk rice into water where there were no living creatures, and the milk rice thrown into the water smoked and steamed making the noise “cicchita, citicita,” just like a plowshare heated during the day, when thrown into water, smokes, and steams making the noise “cicchita, citicita.
Then the brahman Kasibharadvaja, alarmed, with hair standing on end, approached, and fell with his head at the Blessed One's feet and said as follows.
“Most excellent, O Gotama, is thy teaching, most excellent.
Just as a man would set upright what is overturned, reveal what is concealed, point out the way to one gone astray, bring an oil lamp into the darkness so that those with eyes could see objects, even so the Dhamma has been declared in many a manner by the Venerable Gotama.
I take refuge in the Venerable Gotama, in the Dhamma and in the Sangha.
I wish to receive the novice's ordination and higher ordination.
Brahman Kasibharadvaja duly received both the pabbajja and upasampada from the Blessed One.
Not long after his upasampada the Venrable Bharadvaja dwelling alone and aloof, diligent, strenuous, and resolute, ere long, by his own insight, here and now, realized and attained the highest perfection, the end of the Noble Life — for the sake of which men of good family go forth from home to live the homeless life.
Birth is destroyed, lived is the noble life, done is what has to be done, there is no more of this state.
The Venerable Bharadvaja became one of the arahants.
The nun Soma has entered Andhavana near Savatthi to practice meditation.
Mara, the embodiment of delusion, sees her there and desires to make her waver and abandon her concentration.
He addresses her with a verse:
This, in my view, is the definitive statement in the Buddhist tradition regarding the equality of the sexes.
Whatever other words have crept into the literature — from ancient times to the present — whatever attitudes may have been expressed by Theras, Lamas, Roshis or Teachers over the ages, this position of thoroughgoing equality in light of the Dhamma is plainly stated by Soma, one of the Buddha's contemporary nuns.
Soma was the daughter of the chief priest of King Bimbisara of Magadha, and was an early convert to the Buddha's teaching.
She spent many years as a lay supporter before eventually becoming a nun, and achieved awakening — like so many of her sisters — not long after joining the order.
In this exchange Mara is clearly trying to provoke and discourage Soma, but only reveals his delusion.
The expression he uses literally means “two fingers' “ of wisdom.
It may originally have been a reference to the domestic task of checking if rice is cooked by examining it between the fingers, but here it is obviously used pejoratively to impugn that women are less capable of liberation.
Soma not only refrains from getting offended, but calmly points out how ludicrous the statement is when viewed in light of the Buddha's higher teaching about the nature of personhood.
I have heard that on one occasion, when the Blessed One was newly Self-awakened, he was staying at Uruvela on the bank of the Nerañjara River, at the foot of the Goatherd's Banyan Tree.
Then, while he was alone and in seclusion, this line of thinking arose in his awareness: “This Dhamma that I have attained is deep, hard to see, hard to realize, peaceful, refined, beyond the scope of conjecture, subtle, to-be-experienced by the wise.
But this generation delights in attachment, is excited by attachment, enjoys attachment.
For a generation delighting in attachment, excited by attachment, enjoying attachment, this/that conditionality and dependent co-arising are hard to see.
This state, too, is hard to see: the resolution of all fabrications, the relinquishment of all acquisitions, the ending of craving; dispassion; cessation; Unbinding.
And if I were to teach the Dhamma and if others would not understand me, that would be tiresome for me, troublesome for me.
Just then these verses, unspoken in the past, unheard before, occurred to the Blessed One:
As the Blessed One reflected thus, his mind inclined to dwelling at ease, not to teaching the Dhamma.
Then Brahma Sahampati, having known with his own awareness the line of thinking in the Blessed One's awareness, thought: “The world is lost!
The world is destroyed!
The mind of the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Rightly Self-awakened One inclines to dwelling at ease, not to teaching the Dhamma!” Then, just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm, Brahma Sahampati disappeared from the Brahma-world and reappeared in front of the Blessed One.
Arranging his upper robe over one shoulder, he knelt down with his right knee on the ground, saluted the Blessed One with his hands before his heart, and said to him: “Lord, let the Blessed One teach the Dhamma!
Let the One-Well-Gone teach the Dhamma!
There are beings with little dust in their eyes who are falling away because they do not hear the Dhamma.
There will be those who will understand the Dhamma.
That is what Brahma Sahampati said.
Having said that, he further said this:
Then the Blessed One, having understood Brahma's invitation, out of compassion for beings, surveyed the world with the eye of an Awakened One.
As he did so, he saw beings with little dust in their eyes and those with much, those with keen faculties and those with dull, those with good attributes and those with bad, those easy to teach and those hard, some of them seeing disgrace and danger in the other world.
Just as in a pond of blue or red or white lotuses, some lotuses — born and growing in the water — might flourish while immersed in the water, without rising up from the water; some might stand at an even level with the water; while some might rise up from the water and stand without being smeared by the water — so too, surveying the world with the eye of an Awakened One, the Blessed One saw beings with little dust in their eyes and those with much, those with keen faculties and those with dull, those with good attributes and those with bad, those easy to teach and those hard, some of them seeing disgrace and danger in the other world.
Having seen this, he answered Brahma Sahampati in verse:
Then Brahma Sahampati, thinking, “The Blessed One has given his consent to teach the Dhamma,” bowed down to the Blessed One and, circling him on the right, disappeared right there.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Kosalans in a wilderness hut in a Himalayan district.
Then, as he was alone in seclusion, this train of thought arose in his awareness: “Is it possible to exercise rulership without killing or causing others to kill, without confiscating or causing others to confiscate, without sorrowing or causing others sorrow — righteously?
Then Mara, the Evil One, knowing with his awareness the train of thought in the Blessed One's awareness, went to him and on arrival said to him: “Exercise rulership, Blessed One!
Exercise rulership, O One Well-gone!
— without killing or causing others to kill, without confiscating or causing others to confiscate, without sorrowing or causing others sorrow — righteously!
“But what do you see in me, Evil One, that you say to me, 'Exercise rulership, Blessed One!
Exercise rulership, O One Well-gone!
— without killing or causing others to kill, without confiscating or causing others to confiscate, without sorrowing or causing others sorrow — righteously!'?
“Lord, the Blessed One has developed the four bases of power, pursued them, handed them the reins and taken them as a basis, given them a grounding, steadied them, consolidated them, and undertaken them well.
If he wanted to, he could resolve on the Himalayas, king of mountains, as gold, and it would become a mountain of gold.
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “The Blessed One knows me; the One Well-gone knows me” — vanished right there.
At Savatthi.
Now at that time the Blessed One was instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the monks with a Dhamma talk concerning Unbinding.
The monks — attentive, interested, lending ear, focusing their entire awareness — were listening to the Dhamma.
Then the thought occurred to Mara, the Evil One: “Gotama the contemplative is instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the monks with a Dhamma talk concerning Unbinding.
The monks — attentive, interested, lending ear, focusing their entire awareness — are listening to the Dhamma.
What if I were to go to Gotama the contemplative to obscure his vision?
Then Mara the Evil One, taking on the form of a farmer with a large plowshare over his shoulder, carrying a long goad stick — his hair disheveled, his clothes made of coarse hemp, his feet splattered with mud — went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, said, “Hey, contemplative.
Have you seen my oxen?
“And what are your oxen, Evil One?
“Mine alone is the eye, contemplative.
Mine are forms, mine is the sphere of consciousness & contact at the eye.
Where can you go to escape me?
Mine alone is the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… Mine alone is the intellect, contemplative.
Mine are ideas, mine is the sphere of consciousness & contact at the intellect.
Where can you go to escape me?
“Yours alone is the eye, Evil One.
Yours are forms, yours is the sphere of consciousness of contact at the eye.
Where no eye exists, no forms exist, no sphere of consciousness & contact at the eye exists: there, Evil One, you cannot go.
Yours alone is the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… Yours alone is the intellect, Evil One.
Yours are ideas, yours is the sphere of consciousness & contact at the intellect.
Where no intellect exists, no ideas exist, no sphere of consciousness of contact at the intellect exists: there, Evil One, you cannot go.
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “The Blessed One knows me; the One Well-gone knows me” — vanished right there.
At Savatthi.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala approached the Blessed One in the middle of the day and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him: “Well now, great king, where are you coming from in the middle of the day?
“Just now, lord, I was engaged in the sort of royal affairs typical of head-anointed noble-warrior kings intoxicated with the intoxication of sovereignty, obsessed by greed for sensual pleasures, who have attained stable control in their country, and who rule having conquered a great sphere of territory on earth.
“What do you think, great king?
Suppose a man, trustworthy and reliable, were to come to you from the east and on arrival would say: 'If it please your majesty, you should know that I come from the east.
There I saw a great mountain, as high as the clouds, coming this way, crushing all living beings.
Do whatever you think should be done.' Then a second man were to come to you from the west… Then a third man were to come to you from the north… Then a fourth man were to come to you from the south and on arrival would say: 'If it please your majesty, you should know that I come from the south.
There I saw a great mountain, as high as the clouds, coming this way, crushing all living beings.
Do whatever you think should be done.' If, great king, such a great peril should arise, such a terrible destruction of human life — the human state being so hard to obtain — what should be done?
“If, lord, such a great peril should arise, such a terrible destruction of human life — the human state being so hard to obtain — what else should be done but Dhamma-conduct, right conduct, skillful deeds, meritorious deeds?
“I inform you, great king, I announce to you, great king: aging and death are rolling in on you.
When aging and death are rolling in on you, great king, what should be done?
“As aging and death are rolling in on me, lord, what else should be done but Dhamma-conduct, right conduct, skillful deeds, meritorious deeds?
“There are, lord, elephant battles head-anointed noble-warrior kings intoxicated with the intoxication of sovereignty, obsessed by greed for sensual pleasures, who have attained stable control in their country, and who rule having conquered a great sphere of territory on earth; but there is no use for those elephant battles, no scope for them, when aging and death are rolling in.
There are cavalry battles… chariot battles… infantry battles… but there is no use for those infantry battles, no scope for them, when aging and death are rolling in.
In this royal court there are counselors who, when the enemies arrive, are capable of dividing them by their wits; but there is no use for those battles of wits, no scope for them, when aging and death are rolling in.
In this royal court there is abundant bullion and gold stored in vaults and depositories, and with such wealth we are capable of buying off enemies when they come; but there is no use for those battles of wealth, no scope for them, when aging and death are rolling in.
As aging and death are rolling in on me, lord, what else should be done but Dhamma-conduct, right conduct, skillful deeds, meritorious deeds?
“So it is, great king!
So it is, great king!
As aging and death are rolling in on you, what else should be done but Dhamma-conduct, right conduct, skillful deeds, meritorious deeds?
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, further said this:
Translator's note: See the introductory note to SN..
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha at the Maddakucchi Deer Reserve.
Now at that time his foot had been pierced by a stone sliver.
Excruciating were the bodily feelings that developed within him — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — but he endured them mindful, alert, & unperturbed.
Having had his outer robe folded in four and laid out, he lay down on his right side in the lion's posture — with one foot placed on top of the other — mindful & alert.
Then Mara the Evil One went to the Blessed One and recited this verse in his presence:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “The Blessed One knows me; the One Well-Gone knows me” — vanished right there.
This verse emerges from a discussion between the Buddha and the Kosala king Pasenadi, who generally feels secure behind his four-fold army, his conjurers and his treasury.
The Buddha asks him to imagine a situation — the fantastic closing-in of four mountain ranges — where all his royal resources will not help him meet the foe.
Such is the situation in which we actually all find ourselves — rich or poor, aristocrat or laborer — though we are reluctant to face it.
How do we respond to the inevitable onslaught of aging and death?
The answer given in the body of the sutta is “What else is there to do, save to live righteously and justly and to work good and meritorious deeds?” The verse summarizes this phrase by saying one should have confidence in the triple gem and practice the Buddha's teaching.
Ever practical, the Buddha often points out that in this way we are covering our bets: there are immediate benefits in this life, and in the next our chances are better of emerging well-off.
At Savatthi.
As he was sitting to one side, King Pasenadi Kosala said to the Blessed One: “Where, lord, should a gift be given?
“Wherever the mind feels confidence, great king.
“But a gift given where, lord, bears great fruit?
“This is one thing, great king — 'Where should a gift be given?' — while this — 'A gift given where bears great fruit?' — is something else entirely.
What is given to a virtuous person — rather than to an unvirtuous one — bears great fruit.
In that case, great king, I will ask you a counter-question.
Answer as you see fit.
“What do you think, great king?
There is the case where you have a war at hand, a battle imminent.
A noble-warrior youth would come along — untrained, unpracticed, undisciplined, undrilled, fearful, terrified, cowardly, quick to flee.
Would you take him on?
Would you have any use for a man like that?
“No, lord, I wouldn't take him on.
I wouldn't have any use for a man like that.
“Then a brahman youth… a merchant youth… a laborer youth would come along — untrained, unpracticed, undisciplined, undrilled, fearful, terrified, cowardly, quick to flee.
Would you take him on?
Would you have any use for a man like that?
“No, lord, I wouldn't take him on.
I wouldn't have any use for a man like that.
“Now, what do you think, great king?
There is the case where you have a war at hand, a battle imminent.
A noble-warrior youth would come along — trained, practiced, disciplined, drilled, fearless, unterrified, not cowardly, not quick to flee.
Would you take him on?
Would you have any use for a man like that?
“Yes, lord, I would take him on.
I would have use for a man like that.
“Then a brahman youth… a merchant youth… a laborer youth would come along — trained, practiced, disciplined, drilled, fearless, unterrified, not cowardly, not quick to flee.
Would you take him on?
Would you have any use for a man like that?
“Yes, lord, I would take him on.
I would have use for a man like that.
“In the same way, great king.
When someone has gone forth from the home life into homelessness — no matter from what clan — and he has abandoned five factors and is endowed with five, what is given to him bears great fruit.
“And which five factors has he abandoned?
He has abandoned sensual desire… ill will… sloth & drowsiness… restlessness & anxiety… uncertainty.
These are the five factors he has abandoned.
And with which five factors is he endowed?
He is endowed with the aggregate of virtue of one beyond training… the aggregate of concentration of one beyond training… the aggregate of discernment of one beyond training… the aggregate of release of one beyond training… the aggregate of knowledge & vision of release of one beyond training.
These are the five factors with which he is endowed.
“What is given to one who has abandoned five factors and is endowed with five factors in this way bears great fruit.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
At Savatthi.
As he was sitting to one side, King Pasenadi Kosala said to the Blessed One: “How many qualities of the world that, when arising, arise for harm, stress, & discomfort?
“Three qualities of the world, great king, when arising, arise for harm, stress, & discomfort.
Which three?
Greed, great king, is a quality of the world that, when arising, arises for harm, stress, & discomfort.
Aversion… Delusion is a quality of the world that, when arising, arises for harm, stress, & discomfort.
These are the three qualities of the world, great king, that when arising, arise for harm, stress, & discomfort.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
At Savatthi.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala went to the Blessed One in the middle of the day and, on arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “Well now, great king, where are you coming from in the middle of the day?
“Just now, lord, a money-lending householder died in Savatthi.
I have come from conveying his heirless fortune to the royal palace: eight million in silver, to say nothing of the gold.
But even though he was a money-lending householder, his enjoyment of food was like this: he ate broken rice & pickle brine.
His enjoyment of clothing was like this: he wore three lengths of hempen cloth.
His enjoyment of a vehicle was like this: he rode in a dilapidated little cart with an awning of leaves.
“That's the way it is, great king.
That's the way it is.
When a person of no integrity acquires lavish wealth, he doesn't provide for his own pleasure & satisfaction, nor for the pleasure & satisfaction of his parents, nor for the pleasure & satisfaction of his wife & children; nor for the pleasure & satisfaction of his slaves, servants, & assistants; nor for the pleasure & satisfaction of his friends.
He doesn't institute for brahmans & contemplatives offerings of supreme aim, heavenly, resulting in happiness, leading to heaven.
When his wealth isn't properly put to use, kings make off with it, or thieves make off with it, or fire burns it, or water sweeps it away, or hateful heirs make off with it.
Thus his wealth, not properly put to use, goes to waste and not to any good use.
“Just as with a pond in a place haunted by non-human beings, with clear water, cool water, fresh water, clean, with good fords, delightful: No people would draw water from it or drink it or bathe in it or apply it to their needs.
And so that water, not properly put to use, would go to waste and not to any good use.
In the same way, when a person of no integrity acquires lavish wealth… his wealth, not properly put to use, goes to waste and not to any good use.
“But when a person of integrity acquires lavish wealth, he provides for his own pleasure & satisfaction, for the pleasure & satisfaction of his parents, the pleasure & satisfaction of his wife & children; the pleasure & satisfaction of his slaves, servants, & assistants; and the pleasure & satisfaction of his friends.
He institutes for brahmans & contemplatives offerings of supreme aim, heavenly, resulting in happiness, leading to heaven.
When his wealth is properly put to use, kings don't make off with it, thieves don't make off with it, fire doesn't burn it, water doesn't sweep it away, and hateful heirs don't make off with it.
Thus his wealth, properly put to use, goes to a good use and not to waste.
“Just as with a pond not far from a town or village, with clear water, cool water, fresh water, clean, with good fords, delightful.
People would draw water from it or drink it or bathe in it or apply it to their needs.
And so that water, properly put to use, would go to a good use and not to waste.
In the same way, when a person of integrity acquires lavish wealth… his wealth, properly put to use, goes to a good use and not to waste.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
On that occasion a certain bhikkhu was sitting cross-legged not far from the Lord, holding his body erect, mindful and clearly comprehending, enduring without complaint feelings that were painful, acute, sharp and severe, the ripening of former action.
The Lord saw that bhikkhu sitting cross-legged not far away… enduring without complaint feelings that were painful, acute, sharp and severe, the ripening of former action.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying at Anupiya in the Mango Orchard.
At that time the Venerable Bhaddiya, Kaligodha's son, on going into the forest to the foot of a tree or to an empty place, constantly uttered, “Ah, what bliss!
Ah, what bliss!
A number of bhikkhus heard the Venerable Bhaddiya… constantly uttering, “Ah, what bliss!
Ah, what bliss!” and the thought came to them: “No doubt, friend, the Venerable Bhaddiya, Kaligodha's son, is dissatisfied with leading the holy life, since formerly when he was a householder he enjoyed the bliss of royalty.
And when recollecting that, on going into the forest… he utters, 'Ah, what bliss!
Ah, what bliss!' Then a number of bhikkhus approached the Lord, prostrated themselves, sat down to one side, and reported this to the Lord.
Then the Lord addressed a certain bhikkhu: “Come, bhikkhu, in my name tell the bhikkhu Bhaddiya, 'The Teacher calls you, friend Bhaddiya.' “Very well, revered sir,” the bhikkhu replied and approaching the Venerable Bhaddiya, Kaligodha's son, he said, “The Teacher calls you, friend Bhaddiya.
“Very well, friend,” the Venerable Bhaddiya replied, and approaching the Lord he prostrated himself and sat down to one side.
The Lord then said to him: “Is it true, Bhaddiya, that on going into the forest… you utter, 'Ah, what bliss!
Ah, what bliss!'?
“Yes, revered sir.
“But, Bhaddiya, what do you see that prompts you to do so?
“Formerly, revered sir, when I was a householder and enjoyed the bliss of royalty, inside and outside my inner apartments guards were appointed; inside and outside the city guards were appointed; inside and outside the district guards were appointed.
But, revered sir, although I was thus guarded and protected, I lived fearful, agitated, distrustful, and afraid.
But now, revered sir, on going alone into the forest, to the foot of a tree or to an empty place, I am fearless, unagitated, confident, and unafraid.
I live unconcerned, unruffled, my needs satisfied, with a mind become like a deer's.
Seeing this, revered sir, prompts me, on going to the forest… to utter constantly, 'Ah, what bliss!
Ah, what bliss!' Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying at Uruvela beside the river Nerañjara at the foot of the Mucalinda Tree, having just realized full enlightenment.
At that time the Lord sat cross-legged for seven days experiencing the bliss of liberation.
Now it happened that there occurred, out of season, a great rainstorm and for seven days there were rain clouds, cold winds, and unsettled weather.
Then Mucalinda the naga-king left his dwelling place and having encircled the Lord's body seven times with his coils, he stood with his great hood spread over the Lord's head to protect the Lord from cold and heat, from gadflies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, and the touch of creeping things.
At the end of those seven days the Lord emerged from that concentration.
Then Mucalinda the naga-king, seeing that the sky had cleared and the rain clouds had gone, removed his coils from the Lord's body.
Changing his own appearance and assuming the appearance of a youth, he stood in front of the Lord with his hands folded together venerating him.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
At that time Bahiya of the Bark-cloth was living by the seashore at Supparaka.
He was respected, revered, honored, venerated, and given homage, and was one who obtained the requisites of robes, almsfood, lodging, and medicines.
Now while he was in seclusion, this reflection arose in the mind of Bahiya of the Bark-cloth: “Am I one of those in the world who are arahats or who have entered the path to arahatship?
Then a devata who was a former blood-relation of Bahiya of the Bark-cloth understood that reflection in his mind.
Being compassionate and wishing to benefit him, he approached Bahiya and said: “You, Bahiya, are neither an arahant nor have you entered the path to arahatship.
You do not follow that practice whereby you could be an arahant or enter the path to arahatship.
“Then, in the world including the devas, who are arahats or have entered the path to arahatship?
“There is, Bahiya, in a far country a town called Savatthi.
There the Lord now lives who is the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One.
That Lord, Bahiya, is indeed an arahant and he teaches Dhamma for the realization of arahatship.
Then Bahiya of the Bark-cloth, profoundly stirred by the words of that devata, then and there departed from Supparaka.
Stopping only for one night everywhere, he went to Savatthi where the Lord was staying in the Jeta Wood at Anathapindika's monastery.
At that time a number of bhikkhus were walking up and down in the open air.
Then Bahiya of the Bark-cloth approached those bhikkhus and said: “Where, revered sirs, is the Lord now living, the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One?
We wish to see that Lord who is the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One.
“The Lord, Bahiya, has gone for almsfood among the houses.
Then Bahiya hurriedly left the Jeta Wood.
Entering Savatthi, he saw the Lord walking for almsfood in Savatthi — pleasing, lovely to see, with calmed senses and tranquil mind, attained to perfect poise and calm, controlled, a perfected one, watchful with restrained senses.
On seeing the Lord he approached, fell down with his head at the Lord's feet, and said: “Teach me Dhamma, Lord; teach me Dhamma, Sugata, so that it will be for my good and happiness for a long time.
Upon being spoken to thus, the Lord said to Bahiya of the Bark-cloth: “It is an unsuitable time, Bahiya, we have entered among the houses for almsfood.
A second time Bahiya said to the Lord: “It is difficult to know for certain, revered sir, how long the Lord will live or how long I will live.
Teach me Dhamma, Lord; teach me Dhamma, Sugata, so that it will be for my good and happiness for a long time.” A second time the Lord said to Bahiya: “It is an unsuitable time, Bahiya, we have entered among the houses for almsfood.
A third time Bahiya said to the Lord: “It is difficult to know for certain… Teach me Dhamma, Sugata, so that it will be for my good and happiness for a long time.
“Herein, Bahiya, you should train yourself thus: 'In the seen will be merely what is seen; in the heard will be merely what is heard; in the sensed will be merely what is sensed; in the cognized will be merely what is cognized.' In this way you should train yourself, Bahiya.
“When, Bahiya, for you in the seen is merely what is seen… in the cognized is merely what is cognized, then, Bahiya, you will not be 'with that.' When, Bahiya, you are not 'with that,' then, Bahiya, you will not be 'in that.' When, Bahiya, you are not 'in that,' then, Bahiya, you will be neither here nor beyond nor in between the two.
Just this is the end of suffering.
Now through this brief Dhamma teaching of the Lord the mind of Bahiya of the Bark-cloth was immediately freed from the taints without grasping.
Then the Lord, having instructed Bahiya with this brief instruction, went away.
Not long after the Lord's departure a cow with a young calf attacked Bahiya of the Bark-cloth and killed him.
When the Lord, having walked for almsfood in Savatthi, was returning from the alms round with a number of bhikkhus, on departing from the town he saw that Bahiya of the Bark-cloth had died.
Seeing this he said to the bhikkhus: “Bhikkhus, take Bahiya's body, put it on a litter, carry it away and burn it, and make a stupa for it.
Your companion in the holy life has died.
“Very well, revered sir,” those bhikkhus replied to the Lord.
Taking Bahiya's body, they put it upon a litter, carried it away and burnt it, and made a stupa for it.
Then they went to the Lord, prostrated themselves, and sat down to one side.
Sitting there those bhikkhus said to the Lord: “Bahiya's body has been burnt revered sir, and a stupa has been made for it.
What is his destiny, what is his future birth?
“Bhikkhus, Bahiya of the Bark-cloth was a wise man.
He practiced according to Dhamma and did not trouble me by disputing about Dhamma.
Bhikkhus, Bahiya of the Bark-cloth has attained final Nibbana.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
This inspired utterance was spoken by the Lord also, so I did hear.
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying at Uruvela… for seven days experiencing the bliss of liberation.
Then, at the end of those seven days, the Lord… gave well-reasoned attention during the last watch of the night to dependent arising in both forward and reverse order, thus:
That is: with ignorance as condition, volitional activities come to be;… with birth as condition, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair come to be.
This is the origin of this whole mass of suffering.
But from the complete disappearance and cessation of ignorance, volitional activities cease;… from the cessation of birth, aging-and-death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief, and despair cease.
This is the ceasing of this whole mass of suffering.
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Translator's note: It might come as something of a surprise that the Buddha, in this discourse, seems to speak favorably of the lavish enjoyment of sensual pleasures.
Taken in light of his teachings in AN., his remarks here are less surprising.
There he points out that the enjoyment of pleasure is one of the legitimate rewards of wealth, although the proper enjoyment of wealth doesn't end there.
In this discourse, he speaks of a man who, because of his past kamma, couldn't even enjoy sensual pleasures.
This is a useful discourse for illustrating the point that the Buddha's ultimate rejection of sensual pleasure is not that of a man who was too aversive or stingy to enjoy them.
Rather, he rejects them because he was capable of enjoying them but realized that this sort of enjoyment was not the path to true happiness.
As for the moneylender mentioned in this discourse, even though his inability to enjoy his wealth can be traced to attitudes in the past, his unwillingness to make merit in this lifetime is not the fault of his past kamma.
People are always free to choose to practice the Dhamma at any time.
In his case, he chose not to.
Thus he got no legitimate use out of his wealth at all.
At Savatthi.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala went to the Blessed One in the middle of the day and, on arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “Well now, great king, where are you coming from in the middle of the day?
“Just now, lord, a money-lending householder died in Savatthi.
I have come from conveying his heirless fortune to the royal palace: ten million in silver, to say nothing of the gold.
But even though he was a money-lending householder, his enjoyment of food was like this: he ate broken rice & pickle brine.
His enjoyment of clothing was like this: he wore three lengths of hempen cloth.
His enjoyment of a vehicle was like this: he rode in a dilapidated little cart with an awning of leaves.
“That's the way it is, great king.
That's the way it is.
Once in the past that money-lending householder provided alms for the Private Buddha named Tagarasikhi.
Saying, 'Give alms to the contemplative,' he got up from his seat and left.
After giving, though, he felt regret: 'It would have been better if my slaves or servants had eaten those alms.' And he also murdered his brother's only heir for the sake of his fortune.
Now, the result of his action in having provided alms for the Private Buddha named Tagarasikhi was that he appeared seven times in a good destination, the heavenly world.
And through the remaining result of that action he acted as money-lender seven times in this very same Savatthi.
But the result of his action in feeling regret after giving alms — 'It would have been better if my slaves or servants had eaten those alms' — was that his mind didn't lend itself to the lavish enjoyment of food, didn't lend itself to the lavish enjoyment of clothing, didn't lend itself to the lavish enjoyment of a vehicle, didn't lend itself to the lavish enjoyment of the five strings of sensuality.
The result of his action in having murdered his brother's only heir for the sake of his fortune was that he boiled in hell for many years, many hundreds of years, many thousands of years, many hundred-thousands of years.
And through the remaining result of that action he has left this seventh heirless fortune to the royal treasury.
“Now, because of the wasting away of that money-lending householder's old merit and his non-accumulation of new merit, he is today boiling in the Great Roruva hell.
“So he has reappeared in the Great Roruva hell, lord?
“Yes, great king.
He has reappeared in the Great Roruva hell.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying at Uruvela… for seven days experiencing the bliss of liberation.
Then, at the end of those seven days, the Lord emerged from that concentration and gave well-reasoned attention during the middle watch of the night to dependent arising in reverse order, thus:
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying at Uruvela, beside the river Nerañjara at the foot of the Bodhi Tree, having just realized full enlightenment.
At that time the Lord sat cross-legged for seven days experiencing the bliss of liberation.
Then, at the end of those seven days, the Lord emerged from that concentration and gave well-reasoned attention during the first watch of the night to dependent arising in forward order, thus:
Then, on realizing its significance, the Lord uttered on that occasion this inspired utterance:
The Venerable Pingiya:
“I am old and feeble, the comeliness of youth has vanished.
My sight is weak and I am hard of hearing.
I do not wish to perish whilst still confused.
Teach me the Dhamma by understanding which I may abandon birth and decay.
The Lord:
“Seeing heedless people afflicted and suffering through their bodies, Pingiya, you should be heedful and renounce body so as to not come again to birth.
The Venerable Pingiya:
“In the ten directions — the four quarters, four between, and those above and below — there is nothing in the world not seen, heard, sensed or understood by you.
Teach me the Dhamma by understanding which I may abandon birth and decay.
The Lord:
“Seeing men caught in craving, Pingiya, tormented and afflicted by old age, you should be heedful and renounce craving so as to not come again to birth.”
The Venerable Mogharaja:
“Twice have I asked Sakka but the Seeing One has not answered me.
I have heard a divine sage replies when asked a third time.
I do not know the view of the greatly famous Gotama concerning this world, the next world and the Brahma-world with its deities.
To him of supreme vision I have come with a question: how should one regard the world so that one is not seen by the King of Death?
The Lord:
“Look upon the world as empty, Mogharaja, ever mindful; uprooting the view of self you may thus be one who overcomes death.
So regarding the world one is not seen by the King of Death.
The “world,” here and elsewhere, is not to be understood in the way we usually think of it, but is defined as the five aggregates of material form, feeling, perception, activities and consciousness, or as the eye and visible objects, the ear and sounds, etc., that is to say, the whole of our subjective and objective experience.
“I ask the Lord this question, may he tell me the answer to it.
I know him to be a master of knowledge and a perfected being.
From whence have arisen these many sufferings evident in the world?
“You have asked me the source of suffering.
Mettagu, I will tell it to you as it has been discerned by me.
These many sufferings evident in the world have arisen from worldly attachments.
Whoever ignorantly creates an attachment, that stupid person comes upon suffering again and again.
Therefore a man of understanding should not create attachment, seeing it is the source of suffering.
“What I did ask you have explained, now I ask another question.
Come tell me this: how do the wise cross the flood, birth and old age, sorrow and grief?
Explain it thoroughly to me, O sage, for this Dhamma has been understood by you.
The Lord: “I will set forth the Dhamma, Mettagu, a teaching to be directly perceived, not something based on hearsay, by experiencing which and living mindfully one may pass beyond the entanglements of the world.
Mettagu: “I rejoice in the thought of that highest Dhamma, great sage, by experiencing which and living mindfully one may pass beyond the entanglements of the world.
“Whatever you clearly comprehend, Mettagu, above, below, across and in between, get rid of delight in it.
Rid yourself of habitual attitudes and consciousness.
Do not continue in existence.
Living thus, mindful and vigilant, a bhikkhu who has forsaken selfish attachments may, by understanding, abandon suffering, birth and old age, sorrow and grief, even here in this life.
“I rejoice in the words of the great sage.
Well explained, O Gotama, is the state of non-attachment.
The Lord has surely abandoned suffering as this Dhamma has been realized by him.
They will certainly abandon suffering who are constantly admonished by you, O Sage.
Having understood, I venerate it, Noble One.
May the Lord constantly admonish me also.
“Whom you know as a true brahmana, a master of knowledge, owning nothing, not attached to sensual existence, he has certainly crossed this flood.
Having crossed beyond he is untainted and freed from doubt.
One who has discarded this clinging to renewal of existence is a man who has realized the highest knowledge.
Free from craving, undistressed, desireless, he has crossed beyond birth and old age, I say.”
Alas!
Now that I have departed from home to the homeless state, these reckless thoughts from the Dark One come upon me.
Mighty warriors, great archers, trained, steady bowmen, one thousand fearless men, might surround me on all sides.
Even if more women than these will come, they will not cause me to waver, for I am firmly established in the teaching.
In his presence I heard from the Awakened One, the Kinsman of the Sun, of this path leading to nibbana; it is there that my mind is attached.
Evil One, while I am living thus, if you assail me, so shall I act, O Death, that you will not see my path.
Entirely giving up disliking and liking, and the thinking associated with the life of a householder, one should not have craving for anything.
He indeed is a monk who is wholly without craving.
Whatever there is here of form, inhabiting the earth and the sky, immersed in the world, all is impermanent and decaying.
So understanding, the wise live their lives.
Regarding objects of attachment, people are greedy for what is to be seen and heard and touched and otherwise experienced.
Being unmoved, dispel desire for them, for they call him a sage who does not cling to them.
Then, caught in the sixty, full of thoughts, because of being outsiders, they are established in wrong teaching.
But one who is a monk would not take up a sectarian viewpoint, much less seize upon what is bad.
Intelligent, for a long time composed, not deceitful, wise, not envious, the sage has experienced the peaceful state, depending on which, attained to quenching, he awaits his time.
Abandon conceit, Gotama, get rid of the way of conceit completely.
Because of being infatuated by the way of conceit, for a long time you have been remorseful.
Soiled by contempt, destroyed by conceit, people fall into hell.
Persons destroyed by conceit grieve for a long time upon being reborn in hell.
A monk never grieves who is a knower of the path, one who has practiced it properly.
He experiences fame and happiness; truthfully they call him “a seer of Dhamma.
Therefore be without barrenness here, energetic, purified by abandoning the hindrances.
Having completely abandoned conceit, be an ender through knowledge and become one who dwells at peace.
“I burn with sensual desire, my mind is enflamed.
Out of pity please tell me, Gotama, the effective extinguishing of it.
“Your mind is enflamed because of distorted perception.
Shun the aspect of beauty associated with passion.

B.
“See constructions as other, as painful, not as self, extinguish strong passion; do not burn again and again.

“Devote the mind, one-pointed and well-composed, to the contemplation of foulness.
Let mindfulness be directed towards the body and be full of disenchantment for it.
“Contemplate the signless and cast out the underlying tendency to conceit.
Then by the penetration of conceit you will go about at peace.
One should speak only that word by which one would not torment oneself nor harm others.
That word is indeed well spoken.
One should speak only pleasant words, words which are acceptable.
What one speaks without bringing evils to others is pleasant.
Truth is indeed the undying word; this is an ancient verity.
Upon truth, the good say, the goal and the teaching are founded.
The sure word the Awakened One speaks for the attainment of nibbana, for making an end of suffering, is truly the best of words.
Of profound wisdom, intelligent, skilled in knowledge of the right and wrong path, Sariputta of great wisdom teaches Dhamma to the monks.
He teaches in brief, he speaks with detailed explanation, his voice is like that of the mynah bird; he demonstrates readiness of speech.
Listening to his sweet utterance while he is teaching with a voice that is captivating, pleasing, and lovely, the monks give ear, with minds elated and joyful.
Today on the fifteenth five hundred monks have gathered for the ceremony of purification, cutters of fetters and bonds, untroubled, seers finished with renewed existence.
-.
As a wheel-turning monarch, surrounded by his ministers, tours all around this ocean-girt earth, so do the disciples with the threefold knowledge, who have left death behind, attend upon the victor in battle, the unsurpassed caravan leader.
All are the Fortunate One's sons; there is no chaff found here.
I pay homage to the destroyer of the dart of craving, the Kinsman of the Sun.
More than a thousand monks attend upon the Happy One as he is teaching the stainless Dhamma concerning nibbana, where no fear can come from any quarter.
They hear the taintless Dhamma taught by the Fully Awakened One.
The Awakened One is truly resplendent as he is revered by the community of monks.
You are called a naga, Fortunate One; of seers, you are the best of seers.
Like a great rain-cloud, you rain down upon the disciples.
Leaving his daytime abode, wishing to see the Teacher, your disciple Vangisa pays homage at your feet, Great Hero.
Overcoming the devious ways and range of Mara, he walks, having broken up the things that make for barrenness of mind.
See him producing release from bonds, unattached, separating into its constituent parts.
He has shown the path in a variety of ways with the aim of guiding us across the flood.
Since the undying has been shown, the Dhamma-seers stand immovable.
The light-maker, having penetrated, saw the overcoming of all standpoints.
Having understood and experienced it, he taught the topmost to the five.
When the Dhamma has been thus well taught, what indolence could there be in those who know the Dhamma?
Therefore, vigilant and ever revering, one should follow the training in the Fortunate One's dispensation.
The Elder Kondañña, strong in energy, who was enlightened after the Awakened One, is repeatedly the obtainer of pleasurable abidings and seclusions.
Whatever is to be attained by a disciple who does the instruction of the Teacher, all that has been attained by him, vigilant and disciplined.
Having great power and the threefold knowledge, skilled in knowing the thoughts of others, Kondañña, the Awakened One's heir, pays homage at the Teacher's feet.
Disciples, possessors of the threefold knowledge who have left death behind, attend upon the sage seated on the mountain side, who has gone to the far shore beyond suffering.
Moggallana, of great supernormal powers, encompasses with his mind, seeking their minds, completely freed, without attachments.
Thus do they attend upon Gotama endowed with so many virtuous qualities, the sage possessed of all the attributes and gone to the far shore beyond suffering.
As the moon shines in the sky free from clouds, as also the spotless sun, even so, Resplendent One, Great Sage, do you outshine the whole world with your fame.
Intoxicated with skill in the poetic art, formerly we wandered from village to village, from town to town.
Then we saw the Awakened One gone to the far shore beyond all phenomena.
The sage gone to the far shore beyond suffering taught me the Dhamma.
On hearing the Dhamma we gained confidence in him; faith arose in us.
Having heard his word and learnt of the aggregates, bases, and elements, I went forth into homelessness.
Indeed Tathagatas appear for the good of the many men and women who practice their teaching.
Indeed the sage attained enlightenment for the good of those monks and nuns who see the course to be undergone.
Well taught are the Four Noble Truths by the Seeing One, the Awakened One, the Kinsman of the Sun, out of compassion for living beings.
Suffering, the origin of suffering, the overcoming of suffering, and the noble eightfold path leading to the allaying of suffering.
Thus these things, thus spoken of, have been seen by me as they really are.
The true goal has been reached by me; the Awakened One's instruction has been done.
It was good indeed for me, my coming into the presence of the Awakened One.
Among things shared out I obtained the best.
I have attained the perfection of the direct knowledges, I have purified the element of hearing, I have the threefold knowledge and obtained supernormal powers and am skilled in knowing the minds of others.
“I ask the teacher of superior wisdom, one who in this very life is the cutter-off of doubts: The monk, well known and famous, who has died at Agga.lava, was he completely quenched in mind?
“Nigrodhakappa was the name given to that brahmin by you, Fortunate One.
Looking for release, strenuously energetic, he went about revering you, O seer of the secure state.
“Sakka, All-seeing One, we all wish to know concerning that disciple.
Our ears are ready to hear.
You are the teacher, you are unsurpassed.
“Sever our doubt.
Tell me this, you of extensive wisdom, that he experienced quenching.
Speak in our very midst, All-seeing One, like the thousand-eyed Sakka in the midst of the gods.
“Whatever bonds exist here, ways of delusion, on the side of ignorance, bases for doubt, they no longer exist on reaching the Tathagata, for that vision of his is supreme among men.
“If no man were ever to disperse the defilements as the wind disperses a mass of clouds, the whole world, enveloped, would surely be darkness, and even illustrious men would not shine forth.
“But the wise are light-makers.
O Wise One, I think you are just such a one.
We have come upon him who knows and is gifted with insight.
Make evident to us, within the companies, the fate of Kappa.
“Quickly enunciate your beautiful utterance, O beautiful one!
Like a goose stretching forth, honk gently with your melodious and well-modulated voice; we are all listening to you attentively.
“Pressing the one who has completely abandoned birth and death, I shall urge the purified one to speak Dhamma.
For among outsiders there is no acting as they wish, but among Tathagatas there is acting with discretion.
“This full explanation of yours, one with upright wisdom, is well learnt.
This last salutation is proferred.
You of superior wisdom, knowing, do not keep us in ignorance.
“Having known the noble Dhamma in its full extent, you of superior energy, knowing, do not keep us in ignorance.
I long for your word as one overcome by heat in the hot season longs for water.
Rain down on our ears.
“Surely the purpose for which Kappayana practiced the holy life was not in vain.
Was he quenched or had he a residue remaining?
Let us hear in what way he was released.
“He cut off craving here for mind-and-materiality”, said the Fortunate One, “the stream of craving which for a long time had lain latent within him.
He has crossed beyond birth and death completely.” So spoke the Fortunate One, the foremost of the five.
“On hearing your word, O best of seers, I believe.
My question was truly not in vain; the brahmin did not deceive me.
“As he spoke, so he acted.
He was a disciple of the Awakened One.
He cut through the strong, spread-out net of Death the deceiver.
“Kappiya saw the starting point of grasping, O Fortunate One.
Kappayana has certainly gone beyond the realm of Death, so difficult to cross.
“I pay homage to you, the god of gods, and to your son, O best of bipeds, to the great hero born in your tracks, a naga, a true son of the naga.”
“To him who is free from craving, who has seen the root I have come with a question: for what reason did sages, warriors, brahmanas and other men prepare, here in this world, various sacrificial gifts for the gods?
I ask the Lord this, let him tell me the answer.
“Whatever sages, warriors, brahmanas and other men, Punnaka, prepared various sacrificial gifts for the gods, they did so in the hope of this or that existence, being induced by old age and decay.
“By preparing various sacrificial gifts for the gods, being zealous in sacrificing, do they cross beyond birth and decay, Lord?
“They hope and extol, pray and sacrifice for things of the senses, Punnaka.
For the sake of such reward they pray.
These devotees of sacrifice, infatuated by their passion for existence, do not cross beyond birth and decay, I say.
“If these devotees of sacrifice do not cross beyond birth and decay through sacrifice, Sir, then by what practice does one cross beyond birth and decay in this world of gods and men?
“He who has comprehended in the world the here and the beyond, in whom there is no perturbation by anything in the world, who is calm, free from the smoldering fires, untroubled and desireless — he has crossed beyond birth and decay, I say.”
“By what is the world enveloped?
Because of what is it not known?
With what do you say it is soiled?
What is its great fear?
“The world is enveloped by ignorance, Ajita.
Because of wrongly directed desire and heedlessness it is not known.
It is soiled by longings and its great fear is suffering.
“Everywhere flow the streams.
What is the obstruction for the streams, tell me the restricting of them, by what are they cut off?
“Whatever streams are in the world, it is mindfulness that obstructs them and restricts them, and by wisdom they are cut off.
“It is just wisdom and mindfulness.
Now mind-and-body, sir, explain this: where does it cease?
“This question you have asked, Ajita, I will answer for you: where mind-and-body completely cease.
By the cessation of consciousness they cease.
“Those who have fully understood the Dhamma, those who are training and the other individuals here, explain their conduct.
“Not craving for sensual pleasures and with a mind that is pure and tranquil a bhikkhu should mindfully go forth, skillful in all situations.”
“Violence breeds misery; look at people quarreling.
I will relate the emotion agitating me.
“Having seen people struggling and contending with each other like fish in a small amount of water, fear entered me.
The world is everywhere insecure, every direction is in turmoil; desiring an abode for myself I did not find one uninhabited.
When I saw contention as the sole outcome, aversion increased in me; but then I saw an arrow here, difficult to see, set in the heart.
Pierced by it, one runs in every direction, but having pulled it out one does not run nor does one sink.

“Here follows the training:
“Whatever are worldly fetters, may you not be bound by them!
Completely break down sensual desires and practice so as to realize Nibbana for yourself!
“A sage should be truthful, not arrogant, not deceitful, not given to slandering others, and should be without anger.
He should remove the evil of attachment and wrongly directed longing; he should conquer drowsiness, lassitude and sloth, and not dwell in indolence.
A man whose mind is set on Nibbana should not be arrogant.
He should not lapse into untruth nor generate love for sense objects.
He should thoroughly understand conceit and abstain from violence.
He should not delight in what is past, nor be fond of what is new, nor sorrow for what is disappearing, nor crave for the attractive.
“Greed, I say, is a great flood; it is a whirlpool sucking one down, a constant yearning, seeking a hold, continually in movement; difficult to cross is the morass of sensual desire.
A sage does not deviate from truth, a brahmana stands on firm ground; renouncing all, he is truly called 'calmed.'
“Having actually experienced and understood the Dhamma he has realized the highest knowledge and is independent.
He comports himself correctly in the world and does not envy anyone here.
He who has left behind sensual pleasures, an attachment difficult to leave behind, does not grieve nor have any longing; has cut across the stream and is unfettered.
“Dry out that which is past, let there be nothing for you in the future.
If you do not grasp at anything in the present you will go about at peace.
One who, in regard to this entire mindbody complex, has no cherishing of it as 'mine,' and who does not grieve for what is non-existent truly suffers no loss in the world.
For him there is no thought of anything as 'this is mine' or 'this is another's'; not finding any state of ownership, and realizing, 'nothing is mine,' he does not grieve.
“To be not callous, not greedy, at rest and unruffled by circumstances — that is the profitable result I proclaim when asked about one who does not waver.
For one who does not crave, who has understanding, there is no production.
Refraining from initiating he sees security everywhere.
A sage does not speak in terms of being equal, lower or higher.
Calmed and without selfishness he neither grasps nor rejects.”
“A person who associates himself with certain views, considering them as best and making them supreme in the world, he says, because of that, that all other views are inferior; therefore he is not free from contention.
In what is seen, heard, cognized and in ritual observances performed, he sees a profit for himself.
Just by laying hold of that view he regards every other view as worthless.
Those skilled say that a bond if, relying on it, one regards everything else as inferior.
Therefore a bhikkhu should not depend on what is seen, heard or cognized, nor upon ritual observances.
He should not present himself as equal to, nor imagine himself to be inferior, nor better than, another.
Abandoning he had held and not taking up, he does not seek a support even in knowledge.
Among those who dispute he is certainly not one to take sides.
He does not recourse to a view at all.
In whom there is no inclination to either extreme, for becoming or non-becoming, here or in another existence, for him there does not exist a fixed viewpoint on investigating the doctrines assumed.
Concerning the seen, the heard and the cognized he does not form the least notion.
That brahmana who does not grasp at a view, with what could he be identified in the world?
“They do not speculate nor pursue; doctrines are not accepted by them.
A brahmana is beyond, does not fall back on views.”
“From what arise contentions and disputes, lamentations and sorrows, along with selfishness and conceit, and arrogance along with slander?
From where do these various things arise?
Come tell me this.
“From being too endeared arise contentions and disputes, lamentations and sorrows along with avarice, selfishness and conceit, arrogance and slander.
Contentions and disputes are linked with selfishness, and slander is born of contention.
“What are the sources of becoming endeared in the world?
What are the sources of whatever passions prevail in the world, of longings and fulfillments that are man's goal?
“Desires are the source of becoming endeared in the world, also of whatever passions prevail.
These are the sources of longings and fulfillments that are man's goal.
“Now what is the source of desire in the world?
What is the cause of judgments that arise; of anger, untruth, doubts and whatever other states that have been spoken of by the Recluse?
“It is pleasant, it is unpleasant,” so people speak in the world; and based upon that arises desire.
Having seen the appearing and disappearing of material things a man makes his judgments in the world.
Anger, untruth and doubts, these states arise merely because of the existence of this duality.
Let a doubter train himself by way of insight to understand these states as taught by the Recluse.
“What is the source of thinking things as pleasant or unpleasant?
When what is absent are these states not present?
What is the meaning of appearing and disappearing?
Explain the source of it to me.
“The pleasant and the unpleasant have their source in sense-impression.
When this sense-impression is absent, these states are not present.
The idea of appearing and disappearing is produced from this, I say.
“What is the source of sense-impression?
From what arises so much grasping?
By the absence of what is there no selfish attachment?
By the disappearance of what is sense-impression not experienced?
“Sense-impression is dependent upon the mental and the material.
Grasping has its source in wanting.
What not being present there is no selfish attachment.
By the disappearance of material objects sense-impression is not experienced.
“For whom does materiality disappear?
How do pleasure and discomfort cease to be?
Tell me how it ceases so that I may be satisfied in my mind that I have understood it.
“His perception is not the ordinary kind, nor is his perception abnormal; he is not without perception nor is his perception suspended.
— to such an one immateriality ceases.
Perception is indeed the source of the world of multiplicity.
“What we asked, you have explained.
We now ask another question.
Tell us the answer to it.
Do not some of the learned declare purification of the spirit as the highest state to be attained?
And do not others speak of something else as the highest?
“Some of the learned do declare purification of the spirit as the highest.
But contrary to them some teach a doctrine of annihilation.
Those clever ones declare this to be without basis of life's fuel remaining.
Knowing that these rely on a sage investigates that upon which they rely.
Having understood and being free he will not dispute with anyone.
The wise do not enter into any existence.”
“Short indeed is this life, this side of a hundred years one dies; whoever lives long even he dies from old age.
People grieve for things they are attached to, yet there exist no permanent possessions but just a state of separation.
Seeing this one should no longer live the household life.
That which a man imagines to be his will disappear at death.
Knowing this a wise man will have no attachment.
“As a man awakened from sleep no longer sees what happened in his dream, similarly one does not see a loved one who is dead.
Those people who were seen and heard and called by their names as such and such, only their names remain when they have passed away.
Those greedy for objects of attachment do not abandon sorrow, grief and avarice, but sages having got rid of possessions, live perceiving security.
For a bhikkhu with a detached mind, living in a secluded dwelling, it is right, they say, that he no longer shows himself in the abodes.
“A sage who is completely independent does not make close friends or enemies.
In him sorrow and selfishness do not stay, like water on a lotus leaf.
As a lotus is not wetted by water, so a sage is not affected by what is seen or heard, nor by what is perceived by the other senses.
A wise man is not deluded by what is perceived by the senses.
He does not expect purity by any other way.
He is neither pleased nor is he repelled.”
“'Here I see one who is pure, entirely free of sickness.
By seeing him a man may attain to purity!'
“Convinced of that and thinking it 'the highest,' he believes it to be knowledge when he contemplates 'the pure one.' But if by sights man can gain purification or if through such knowledge he could leave suffering behind, then, one who still has attachments could be purified by another.
However, this is merely the opinion of those who so assert.
“The brahmana has said one is not purified by another, nor by what is seen, heard or perceived, nor, by the performance of ritual observances.
He is not defiled by merit or demerit.
Having given up what he had grasped at, he no longer engages in producing.
Having left a former they attach themselves to another, dominated by craving they do not go beyond attachment.
They reject and seize, like a monkey letting go of a branch to take hold of another.
“A person having undertaken a ritual act goes this way and that, fettered by his senses.
But one with a wide wisdom, having understood and gone into the Dhamma with his experience, does not go this way and that.
For a person indifferent towards all conditions, whatever is seen, heard or cognized, he is one who sees it as it really is and lives with clarity.
With what could he be identified in the world?
“They do not speculate nor pursue, they do not claim perfect purity.
Loosening the knot with which they are bound, they do not have longing anywhere in the world.
The brahmana who has gone beyond limitations, having understood and seen there is no longer any assumption for him, he is neither disturbed by lust nor agitated by revulsion.
For him there is nothing upheld as 'the highest.'”
“See how the world together with the devas has self-conceit for what is not-self.
Enclosed by mind-and-body it imagines, 'This is real.' Whatever they imagine it to be, it is quite different from that.
It is unreal, of a false nature and perishable.
Nibbana, not false in nature, that the Noble Ones know as true.
Indeed, by the penetration of the true, they are completely stilled and realize final deliverance.
“Forms, sounds, tastes, scents, bodily contacts and ideas which are agreeable, pleasant and charming, all these, while they last, are deemed to be happiness by the world with its devas.
But when they cease that is agreed by all to be unsatisfactory.
By the Noble Ones, the cessation of the existing body is seen as happiness.
This is the reverse of the outlook of the whole world.
“What others call happiness, that the Noble Ones declare to be suffering.
What others call suffering, that the Noble Ones have found to be happiness.
See how difficult it is to understand the Dhamma!
Herein those without insight have completely gone astray.
For those under the veil it is obscured, for those who cannot see it is utter darkness.
But for the good and the wise it is as obvious as the light for those who can see.
Even though close to it, the witless who do not know the Dhamma, do not comprehend it.
“By those overcome by attachment to existence, those who drift with the stream of existence, those in the realm of Mara, this Dhamma is not properly understood.
Who other than the Noble Ones, are fit to fully understand that state, by perfect knowledge of which they realize final deliverance, free from defilements?
…
“Unindicated and unknown is the length of life of those subject to death.
Life is difficult and brief and bound up with suffering.
There is no means by which those who are born will not die.
Having reached old age, there is death.
This is the natural course for a living being.
With ripe fruits there is the constant danger that they will fall.
In the same way, for those born and subject to death, there is always the fear of dying.
Just as the pots made by a potter all end by being broken, so death is of life.
“The young and old, the foolish and the wise, all are stopped short by the power of death, all finally end in death.
Of those overcome by death and passing to another world, a father cannot hold back his son, nor relatives a relation.
See!
While the relatives are looking on and weeping, one by one each mortal is led away like an ox to slaughter.
“In this manner the world is afflicted by death and decay.
But the wise do not grieve, having realized the nature of the world.
You do not know the path by which they came or departed.
Not seeing either end you lament in vain.
If any benefit is gained by lamenting, the wise would do it.
Only a fool would harm himself.
Yet through weeping and sorrowing the mind does not become calm, but still more suffering is produced, the body is harmed and one becomes lean and pale, one merely hurts oneself.
One cannot protect a departed one by that means.
To grieve is in vain.
“By not abandoning sorrow a being simply undergoes more suffering.
Bewailing the dead he comes under the sway of sorrow.
See other men faring according to their deeds!
Hence beings tremble here with fear when they come into the power of death.
Whatever they imagine, it quite different from that.
This is the sort of disappointment that exists.
Look at the nature of the world!
If a man lives for a hundred years, or even more, finally, he is separated from his circle of relatives and gives up his life in the end.
Therefore, having listened to the arahant, one should give up lamenting.
Seeing a dead body, one should know, “He will not be met by me again.” As the fire in a burning house is extinguished with water, so a wise, discriminating, learned and sensible man should quickly drive away the sorrow that arises, as the wind a piece of cotton.
He who seeks happiness should withdraw the arrow: his own lamentations, longings and grief.
“With the arrow withdrawn, unattached, he would attain to peace of mind; and when all sorrow has been transcended he is sorrow-free and has realized Nibbana.
“When, near the river Nerañjara, I exerted myself in meditation for attaining to security from bondage, there came Namuci speaking words of compassion:
“'You are emaciated and ill-looking, you are near to death!
A thousand parts of you belong to death and only a fraction of you is alive.
Live, good Sir!
It is better to live.
Living you may perform meritorious deeds.
From practicing celibacy and tending the sacrificial fire much merit is made, but what is obtained from striving?
It is difficult to enter the path of exertion, it is difficult to do, difficult to maintain.' Mara spoke these words whilst standing in the presence of the Awakened One.
To Mara speaking thus, the Lord replied:
“You who are the friend of the negligent, O Evil One, for what reason have you come here?
Those who still have use for merit Mara may consider worthwhile addressing.
I have faith and energy and wisdom.
Being thus bent on striving why do you ask me to live?
This wind will wither the currents of the rivers, why should not my exertion dry up even the blood?
When the blood dries up, the bile and phlegm wither.
On the wasting away of the flesh the mind becomes more and more serene and my mindfulness, wisdom and concentration are established more firmly.
In me, who abides enduring such an extreme experience, the mind does not long for sensual pleasures.
See the purity of a being!
“Sensual desire is your first army, the second is called discontent, the third is hunger and thirst, the fourth craving, the fifth sluggishness and laziness, the sixth fear, the seventh indecision, and the eighth disparagement of others and stubbornness: gain, fame, honor, prestige wrongly acquired and whoever praises himself and despises others — these, Namuci, are your armies, the Dark One's striking forces.
A lazy, cowardly person cannot overcome them, but by conquering them one gains bliss.
“I wear muñja-grass!
Shame on life here in this world!
It is better for me to die in battle than to live defeated.
Some recluses and brahmanas are not seen here, so immersed are they.
They are not aware of that path by which those of perfect conduct walk.
“Seeing the surrounding army ready and Mara mounted, I am going out to fight so that he may not shift me from my position.
This army of yours which the world together with the devas is unable to subdue, that I will destroy with wisdom, like an unbaked clay-bowl with a stone.
Having mastered the mind and firmly established mindfulness I shall wander from country to country guiding many disciples.
And they will be diligent and energetic in practicing my teaching, the teaching of one without sensual desire, and they will go where, having gone, one does not grieve.
Mara: “For seven years I followed the Lord step by step but did not find an opportunity to defeat that mindful Awakened One.
A crow flew around a stone having the color of fat: 'Can we find even here something tender?
May it be something to eat?'
“Not finding anything edible the crow left that place.
As with the crow and the stone, we leave Gotama, having approached and become disheartened.
Overcome by sorrow his lute fell from his arm and thereupon the unhappy spirit disappeared from that place.
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi in the Jeta Grove at Anathapindika's monastery.
Now the lay-follower Dhammika with five hundred other lay-followers approached the Lord.
Having drawn near and having saluted the Lord respectfully he sat down at one side.
Sitting there the lay-follower Dhammika addressed the Lord as follows:
“I ask Gotama of extensive wisdom this: How acting is a disciple virtuous — both the disciple who has gone from home to the homeless state and the followers who are householders?
For you clearly understand the behavior of the world with the devas and the final release.
There is none equal to you who are skilled in seeing what is profound.
You are an illustrious Awakened One.
Having investigated all knowledge and being compassionate towards beings you have announced the Dhamma, a revealer of what is hidden, of comprehensive vision, stainless, you illuminate all the worlds.
“This Dhamma, subtle and pleasing and taught so clearly by you, Lord, it is this we all wish to hear.
Having been questioned, foremost Awakened One, tell us.
All these bhikkhus and also the layfollowers who have come to hear the truth, let them listen to the Dhamma awakened to by the Stainless One as the devas listen to the well-spoken words of Vasava.” 
“Listen to me, bhikkhus, I will teach you the ascetic practice, the mode of living suitable for those who have gone forth.
Do you all bear it in mind.
One who is intent upon what is good and who is thoughtful should practice it.
“A bhikkhu should not wander about at the wrong time but should walk the village for food at the right time, as one who goes about at the wrong time is obsessed by attachment, therefore Awakened Ones do not walk at the wrong time.
Sights, sounds, tastes, scents and bodily contacts overwhelm beings.
Being rid of desire for these sense objects, at the right time, one may enter for the morning meal.
Having duly obtained food, going back alone and sitting down in a secluded place, being inwardly thoughtful and not letting the mind go out to external objects, a bhikkhu should develop self-control.
“If he should speak with a lay-disciple, with someone else or with another bhikkhu, he should speak on the subtle Dhamma, not slandering others nor gossiping.
Some set themselves up as disputants in opposition to others; those of little wisdom we do not praise; attachments bind them and they are carried away by their emotions.

“Having heard the Dhamma taught by the Sugata and considered it, a disciple of Him of excellent wisdom should wisely make use of food, a dwelling, a bed, a seat and water for washing the robe.
But a bhikkhu should not be soiled by these things, as a lotus is not wetted by a drop of water.
“Now I will tell you the layman's duty.
Following it a lay-disciple would be virtuous; for it is not possible for one occupied with the household life to realize the complete bhikkhu practice.
“He should not kill a living being, nor cause it to be killed, nor should he incite another to kill.
Do not injure any being, either strong or weak, in the world.
“A disciple should avoid taking anything from anywhere knowing it.
He should not steal nor incite another to steal.
He should completely avoid theft.
“A wise man should avoid unchastity as a pit of glowing charcoal.
If unable to lead a celibate life, he should not go to another's wife.
“Having entered a royal court or a company of people he should not speak lies.
He should not speak lies nor incite others to do so.
He should completely avoid falsehood.
“A layman who has chosen to practice this Dhamma should not indulge in the drinking of intoxicants.
He should not drink them nor encourage others to do so; realizing that it leads to madness.
Through intoxication foolish people perform evil deeds and cause other heedless people to do likewise.
He should avoid intoxication, this occasion for demerit, which stupefies the mind, and is the pleasure of foolish people.
“This is called the eight-factored observance made known by the Awakened One who has reached the end of suffering.
“With a gladdened mind observe the observance day, complete with its eight factors, on the fourteenth, fifteenth and eighth days of the fortnight and also the special holiday of the half month.
In the morning, with a pure heart and a joyful mind, a wise man, after observing the uposatha, should distribute suitable food and drink to the community of bhikkhus.
He should support his mother and father as his duty and engage in lawful trading.
A layman who carries this out diligently goes to the devas called “Self-radiant.” 
“Rouse yourself!
Sit up!
What good is there in sleeping?
For those afflicted by disease, struck by the arrow, what sleep is there?
“Rouse yourself!
Sit up!
Resolutely train yourself to attain peace.
Do not let the king of death, seeing you are careless, lead you astray and dominate you.
“Go beyond this clinging, to which devas and men are attached, and they seek.
Do not waste your opportunity.
When the opportunity has passed they sorrow when consigned to Niraya-hell.
“Negligence is a taint, and so is the negligence growing from it.
By earnestness and understanding withdraw the arrow.”
“By developing what habit, what conduct, what actions may man be correctly established in and arrive at the highest goal?
“He should respect his elders and not be envious of them.
He should know the right time for seeing his teacher.
If a talk on Dhamma has started he should know the value of the opportunity and should listen carefully to the well-spoken words.

“When the time is right let him go to his teacher's presence, unassuming, putting aside stubbornness.
Let him keep in mind and practice: the meaning and the text, self-control and the Holy Life.
Delighting in the Dhamma, devoted to the Dhamma, established in the Dhamma, skilled in investigating the Dhamma, let him not indulge in talk harmful to the Dhamma.
Let him be guided by well-spoken truths.
“Abandoning the uttering of laughter and lamentations; giving up anger, fraud, hypocrisy, longing, conceit, violence, harshness, moral taints and infatuation; let him live without pride, self controlled.
Understanding is essential to a well-spoken word.
Learning and understanding are essential to meditation, but a man who is hasty and heedless does not increase his wisdom and learning.
“Those who are devoted to the Dhamma made known by the Noble Ones are unsurpassed in speech, thought and action.
They are established in peace, gentleness and concentration, and have reached the essence of learning and wisdom.”
“He from whom a person learns the Dhamma should be venerated, as the devas venerate Inda, their Lord.
He, of great learning, thus venerated, will explain the Dhamma, being well-disposed towards one.
Having paid attention and considered it, a wise man, practicing according to Dhamma, becomes learned, intelligent and accomplished by associating himself diligently with such a teacher.
“But by following an inferior and foolish teacher who has not gained understanding of the Dhamma and is envious of others, one will approach death without comprehending the Dhamma and unrelieved of doubt.
“If a man going down into a river, swollen and swiftly flowing, is carried away by the current — how can he help others across?
“Even so, he who has not comprehended the Dhamma, has not paid attention to the meaning as expounded by the learned, being himself without knowledge and unrelieved of doubt — how can he make others understand?
“But if knows the method and is skilled and wise, by boarding a strong boat equipped with oars and a rudder, he can, with its help, set others across.
Even so, he who is experienced and has a well-trained mind, who is learned and dependable, clearly knowing, he can help others to understand who are willing to listen and ready to receive.
“Surely, therefore, one should associate with a good man who is wise and learned.
By understanding the meaning of what one has learned and practicing accordingly one who has Dhamma-experience attains happiness.” 
“A quarrelsome bhikkhu shrouded by delusion, does not comprehend the Dhamma taught by the Awakened One when it is revealed.
Annoying those practiced in meditation, being led by ignorance, he is not aware that his defiled path leads to Niraya-hell.
Falling headlong, passing from womb to womb, from darkness to darkness, such a bhikkhu undergoes suffering hereafter for certain.
“As a cesspool filled over a number of years is difficult to clean, similarly, whoever is full of impurity is difficult to make pure.
Whoever you know to be such, bhikkhus, bent on worldliness, having wrong desires, wrong thoughts, wrong behavior and resort, being completely united avoid him, sweep him out like dirt, remove him like rubbish.
Winnow like chaff the non-recluses.
Having ejected those of wrong desires, of wrong behavior and resort, be pure and mindful, dwelling with those who are pure.
Being united and prudent you will make an end to suffering.”
“One who, overstepping and despising a sense of shame, says, 'I am your friend,' but does not take upon himself any tasks he is capable of doing, is to be recognized as no friend.
One who speaks amiably to his companions, but whose actions do not conform to it, him the wise know for certain as a talker not a doer.
He is no friend who, anticipating conflict, is always alert in looking out for weaknesses.
But he on whom one can rely, like a child sleeping on its mother's breast, is truly a friend who cannot be parted from one by others.
“One who bears the human burden of responsibility, with its fruits and blessings in mind, he cultivates a cause of joy and happiness worthy of praise.
Having tasted the flavor of solitude and peace one is free from fear and wrong-doings imbibing the rapture of Dhamma.”
This was said by the Lord…
“Living with Brahma are those families where, within the home, mother and father are respected by their children.
Living with the early devas are those families where, within the home, mother and father are respected by their children.
Living with the early teachers are those families where, within the home, mother and father are respected by their children.
Living with those worthy of adoration are those families where, within the home, mother and father are respected by their children.
'Brahma,' bhikkhus, is a term for mother and father.
'Early devas' and 'early teachers' and 'those worthy of veneration' are terms for mother and father.
For what reason?
Because mother and father are very helpful to their children, they take care of them and bring them up and teach them about the world.
This was said by the Lord…
“Suppose, bhikkhus, a man was being borne along by the current of a river that seemed pleasant and agreeable.
But upon seeing him, a keen-sighted man standing on the bank would call out to him: 'Hey, good man!
Although you are being borne along by the current of a river that seems pleasant and agreeable, lower down there is a pool with turbulent waves and swirling eddies, with monsters and demons.
On reaching that pool you will die or suffer close to death.' Then, bhikkhus, upon hearing the words of that person, that man would struggle against the current with hands and feet.
“I have made use of this simile, bhikkhus, to illustrate the meaning.
And this is the meaning here: 'The current of the river' is a synonym for craving.
'Seeming pleasant and agreeable' is a synonym for the six internal sense-bases.
'The pool lower down' is a synonym for the five lower fetters.
'Turbulent waves' is a synonym for anger and frustration.
'Swirling eddies' is a synonym for the five strands of sensual pleasure.
'Monsters and demons' is a synonym for womenfolk.
'Against the current' is a synonym for renunciation.
'Struggling with hands and feet' is a synonym for instigating energy.
'The keen-sighted man standing on the bank' is a synonym for the Tathagata, the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One.
This was said by the Lord, said by the Arahant, so I heard:
“Bhikkhus, the world has been fully understood by the Tathagata; the Tathagata is released from the world.
The origin of the world has been fully understood by the Tathagata; the origin of the world has been abandoned by the Tathagata.
The cessation of the world has been fully understood by the Tathagata; the cessation of the world has been realized by the Tathagata.
The course leading to the cessation of the world has been fully understood by the Tathagata; the course leading to the cessation of the world has been developed by the Tathagata.
“Bhikkhus, in the world with its devas, maras, and brahmas, with its recluses and brahmans, among humankind with its princes and people, whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought, and reflected upon by the mind — that is fully understood by the Tathagata: therefore he is called the Tathagata.
“Bhikkhus, from the night when the Tathagata awakened to unsurpassed full enlightenment until the night when he passes away into the Nibbana-element with no residue left, whatever he speaks, utters, and explains — all that is just so and not otherwise: therefore he is called the Tathagata.
“As the Tathagata says, so he does; as the Tathagata does, so he says: therefore he is called the Tathagata.
“In the world with its devas, maras, and brahmas, with its recluses and brahmans, among humankind with its princes and people, the Tathagata is the conqueror, unvanquished, all-seer, wielding power: therefore he is called the Tathagata.
This too is the meaning of what was said by the Lord, so I heard.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, these two bright principles protect the world.
What are the two?
Shame and fear of wrongdoing.
If, bhikkhus, these two bright principles did not protect the world, there would not be discerned respect for mother or maternal aunt or maternal uncle's wife or a teacher's wife or the wives of other honored persons, and the world would have fallen into promiscuity, as with goats, sheep, chickens, pigs, dogs, and jackals.
But as these two bright principles protect the world, there is discerned respect for mother… and the wives of other honored persons.
This was said by the Lord…
“There is, bhikkhus, a not-born, a not-brought-to-being, a not-made, a not-conditioned.
If, bhikkhus, there were no not-born, not-brought-to-being, not-made, not-conditioned, no escape would be discerned from what is born, brought-to-being, made, conditioned.
But since there is a not-born, a not-brought-to-being, a not-made, a not-conditioned, therefore an escape is discerned from what is born, brought-to-being, made, conditioned.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, there are these two Nibbana-elements.
What are the two?
The Nibbana-element with residue left and the Nibbana-element with no residue left.
“What, bhikkhus, is the Nibbana-element with residue left?
Here a bhikkhu is an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, the holy life fulfilled, who has done what had to be done, laid down the burden, attained the goal, destroyed the fetters of being, completely released through final knowledge.
However, his five sense faculties remain unimpaired, by which he still experiences what is agreeable and disagreeable and feels pleasure and pain.
It is the extinction of attachment, hate, and delusion in him that is called the Nibbana-element with residue left.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the Nibbana-element with no residue left?
Here a bhikkhu is an arahant… completely released through final knowledge.
For him, here in this very life, all that is experienced, not being delighted in, will be extinguished.
That, bhikkhus, is called the Nibbana-element with no residue left.
“These, bhikkhus, are the two Nibbana-elements.
This was said by the Lord…
“And how, bhikkhus, do some hold back?
Devas and humans enjoy being, delight in being, are satisfied with being.
When Dhamma is taught to them for the cessation of being, their minds do not enter into it or acquire confidence in it or settle upon it or become resolved upon it.
Thus, bhikkhus, do some hold back.
“How, bhikkhus, do some overreach?
Now some are troubled, ashamed, and disgusted by this very same being and they rejoice in non-being, asserting: 'In as much as this self, good sirs, when the body perishes at death, is annihilated and destroyed and does not exist after death — this is peaceful, this is excellent, this is reality!' Thus, bhikkhus, do some overreach.
“How, bhikkhus, do those with vision see?
Herein a bhikkhu sees what has come to be as having come to be.
Having seen it thus, he practices the course for turning away, for dispassion, for the cessation of what has come to be.
Thus, bhikkhus, do those with vision see.
This too is the meaning of what was said by the Lord, so I heard.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, the skeletons of a single person, running on and wandering in samsara for an aeon, would make a heap of bones, a quantity of bones as large as this Mount Vepulla, if there were someone to collect them and if the collection were not destroyed.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, I say that for an individual who transgresses in one thing, there is no evil deed whatsoever he would not do.
What is that one thing?
It is this, bhikkhus: deliberately telling a lie.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, if beings knew, as I know, the result of giving and sharing, they would not eat without having given, nor would they allow the stain of meanness to obsess them and take root in their minds.
Even if it were their last morsel, their last mouthful, they would not eat without having shared it, if there were someone to share it with.
But, bhikkhus, as beings do not know, as I know, the result of giving and sharing, they eat without having given, and the stain of meanness obsesses them and takes root in their minds.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, whatever grounds there are for making merit productive of a future birth, all these do not equal a sixteenth part of the mind-release of loving-kindness.
The mind-release of loving-kindness surpasses them and shines forth, bright and brilliant.
“Just as the radiance of all the stars does not equal a sixteenth part of the moon's radiance, but the moon's radiance surpasses them and shines forth, bright and brilliant, even so, whatever grounds there are for making merit productive of a future birth, all these do not equal a sixteenth part of the mind-release of loving-kindness…
“Just as in the last month of the rainy season, in the autumn, when the sky is clear and free of clouds, the sun, on ascending, dispels the darkness of space and shines forth, bright and brilliant, even so, whatever grounds there are for making merit productive of a future birth, all these do not equal a sixteenth part of the mind-release of loving-kindness…
“And just as in the night, at the moment of dawn, the morning star shines forth, bright and brilliant, even so, whatever grounds there are for making merit productive of a future birth, all these do not equal a sixteenth part of the mind-release of loving-kindness.
The mind-release of loving-kindness surpasses them and shines forth, bright and brilliant.
This too is the meaning of what was said by the Lord, so I heard.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, there are these three elements of escape.
What three?
The escape from sensual desires, that is, renunciation; the escape from form, that is, the formless; and the escape from whatever has come to be, from whatever is conditioned and dependently arisen, that is, cessation.
These, bhikkhus, are the three elements of escape.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, these three kinds of persons are found existing in the world.
What three?
One who is like a rainless cloud, one who rains locally, and one who rains everywhere.
“Now what kind of person, bhikkhus, is like a rainless cloud?
Here, a certain person is not a giver to anyone; he does not give food, drink, clothing, vehicles, garlands, scents, ointments, beds, lodging, and lamps to recluses and brahmans, to the poor, destitute, and needy.
This kind of person is like a rainless cloud.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the kind of person who rains locally?
Here, a certain person is a giver to some but not a giver to others.
Food, drink, clothing, vehicles, garlands, scents, ointments, beds, lodging, and lamps he gives only to some recluses and brahmans, to some of the poor, destitute, and needy, but not to others.
This is the kind of person who rains locally.
“Now what, bhikkhus, is the kind of person who rains everywhere?
Here, a certain person gives to all.
He gives food, drink, clothing, vehicles, garlands, scents, ointments, beds, lodging, and lamps to all recluses and brahmans, to the poor, destitute, and needy.
This is the kind of person who rains everywhere.
“These, bhikkhus, are the three kinds of persons found existing in the world.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, among the devas these three joyous utterances are proclaimed from time to time upon certain occasions.
What three?
“At the time when a noble disciple, having had his hair and beard shaved off and having clothed himself in the yellow robe, intends going forth from home into homelessness, at that time among the devas the joyous utterance is proclaimed: 'A noble disciple intends to do battle with Mara.' This is the first joyous utterance proclaimed among the devas from time to time upon a certain occasion.
“Again, bhikkhus, at the time when a noble disciple lives engaged in cultivating the seven groups of the requisites of enlightenment, at that time among the devas the joyous utterance is proclaimed: 'A noble disciple is doing battle with Mara.' This is the second joyous utterance proclaimed among the devas from time to time upon a certain occasion.
“And again, bhikkhus, at the time when a noble disciple, through realization by his own direct knowledge, here and now enters and abides in the mind-release and wisdom-release that is taintless by the destruction of the taints, at that time among the devas the joyous utterance is proclaimed: 'A noble disciple has won the battle.
He was in the forefront of the fight and he now dwells victorious.' This, bhikkhus, is the third joyous utterance proclaimed among the devas from time to time upon a certain occasion.
“These, bhikkhus, are the three joyous utterances… This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, these three persons appearing in the world appear for the welfare of many people, for the happiness of many people, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and humans.
What three?
“Here, bhikkhus, a Tathagata appears in the world, an Arahant, a Fully Enlightened One, possessing perfect knowledge and conduct, a sublime one, a world-knower, an unsurpassed leader of persons to be tamed, a teacher of devas and humans, an enlightened one, a Lord.
He teaches Dhamma that is good at the outset, good in the middle, and good at the end, with its correct meaning and wording, and he proclaims the holy life in its fulfillment and complete purity.
This, bhikkhus, is the first person appearing in the world who appears for the welfare of many people, for the happiness of many people, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and humans.
“Next, bhikkhus, there is a disciple of that teacher, an arahant, one whose taints are destroyed, the holy life fulfilled, who has done what had to be done, laid down the burden, attained the goal, destroyed the fetters of being, and is completely released through final knowledge.
He teaches Dhamma… and he proclaims the holy life in its fulfillment and complete purity.
This, bhikkhus, is the second person appearing in the world… for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and humans.
“And next, bhikkhus, there is a disciple of that teacher, a learner who is following the path, who has learned much and is of virtuous conduct.
He teaches Dhamma… and he proclaims the holy life in its fulfillment and complete purity.
This, bhikkhus, is the third person appearing in the world… for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and humans.
“These, bhikkhus, are the three persons appearing in the world who appear for the welfare of many people, for the happiness of many people, out of compassion for the world, for the good, welfare, and happiness of devas and humans.
This was said by the Lord…
“Bhikkhus, there are these three foremost kinds of faith.
What are the three?
“Whatever beings there are, whether footless or two-footed or four-footed, with form or without form, percipient or non-percipient or neither-percipient-nor-non-percipient, of these the Tathagata is reckoned foremost, the Arahant, the Fully Enlightened One.
Those who have faith in the Buddha have faith in the foremost, and for those with faith in the foremost the result will be foremost.
“Whatever states there are, whether conditioned or unconditioned, of these detachment is reckoned foremost, that is, the subduing of vanity, the elimination of thirst, the removal of reliance, the termination of the round, the destruction of craving, detachment, cessation, Nibbana.
Those who have faith in the Dhamma of detachment have faith in the foremost, and for those with faith in the foremost the result will be foremost.
“Whatever communities or groups there are, bhikkhus, of these the Sangha of the Tathagata's disciples is reckoned foremost, that is, the four pairs of persons, the eight individuals.
This Sangha of the Lord's disciples is worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of reverential salutation, the unsurpassable field of merit for the world.
Those who have faith in the Sangha have faith in the foremost, and for those with faith in the foremost the result will be foremost.
“These, bhikkhus, are the three foremost kinds of faith.”
Then King Milinda approached the Venerable Nagasena, greeted him and sat down at a respectful distance.
King Milinda, anxious to know, anxious to hear, anxious to remember, anxious to see the light of knowledge, anxious to break down the lack of knowledge, anxious to find the light of knowledge, anxious to expel the darkness of ignorance, aroused extreme steadfastness and zeal and mindfulness and clear consciousness, and spoke thus to the Venerable Nagasena: “Revered Nagasena, have you ever seen the Buddha?
“No, sire.
“But have your teachers ever seen the Buddha?
“No, sire.
“Revered Nagasena, if you have never seen the Buddha, and if your teachers have never seen the Buddha, well then, revered Nagasena, there is no Buddha; the Buddha is not manifested here.
“But, sire, did those former noble warriors exist who were the forerunners of your noble warrior dynasty?
“Yes, revered sir; what doubt is there?
“Have you, sire, ever seen the former noble warriors?
“No, revered sir.
“But have those who have instructed you, sire — priests, generals, judges, chief councilors — have these ever seen the former noble warriors?
“No, revered sir.
“But if you, sire, have not seen the former noble warriors and if your instructors have not seen the former noble warriors, where are the former noble warriors?
“Revered Nagasena, articles of use enjoyed by the former noble warriors are to be seen, that is to say, the white sunshade, the turban, the shoes, the yak-tail fan, the treasure of the sword of state, and the couches of great price.
By these we can know and can believe that the former noble warriors existed.
“Even so, sire, we may also know and believe in this Blessed One.
There is this reason according to which we may know and believe that there was this Blessed One.
What is the reason?
There are, sire, articles of use enjoyed by that Blessed One who knows and sees, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, that is to say, the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five spiritual faculties, the five powers, the seven factors of enlightenment, the Noble Eightfold Path.
By these the world with the devas knows and believes that there was this Blessed One.
For this reason, sire, for this cause, because of this method, because of this inference it should be known that there was this Blessed One.
“Revered Nagasena, make a simile.
“As sire, a city-architect, when he wants to build a city, first looks about for a district that is level, not elevated, not low-lying, free from gravel and stone, secure, irreproachable and delightful, and then when he has made level there what was not level and has had it cleared of stumps of trees and thorns, he might build a city there.
It would be fine and regular, well planned, the moats and encircling walls dug deep, the city gates, the watch-towers and the ramparts strong, the crossroads, squares, junctions and the places where three or four roads meet numerous, the main-roads clean, level and even, the bazar shops well laid out, the city full of parks, pleasances, lakes, lotus pools and wells, adorned with a wide variety of shrines to devas, the whole free from defects.
When that city was fully developed, he might go away to another district.
Then after a time that city might become rich and prosperous, well stocked with food, secure, successful, happy, without adversity, without accident, crowded with all kinds of people.
When these people had seen the city, new, well laid out, without a defect, irreproachable, delightful, they would know by inference: 'Clever indeed is that city-architect who was the builder of the city.'
“Even so, sire, that Blessed One is without an equal, equal to the unequaled, equal to the matchless ones, unique, incomparable, boundless, immeasurable, of unmeasured special qualities, attained to perfection in special qualities, of infinite steadfastness, infinite incandescence, infinite energy, infinite power, gone to perfection in the powers of a Buddha; having overthrown Mara and his army, burst asunder the net of false views, made ignorance to be cast out and knowledge arise, borne aloft the torch of Dhamma; and having attained omniscience, unvanquished and victorious in the battle, he built the City of Dhamma.
“In the Blessed One's City of Dhamma the encircling walls are morality, the moats are conscience, the ramparts over the city gates are knowledge, the watch-towers are energy, the pillars are faith, the door-keepers are mindfulness, the cross roads are the Suttantas, the places where three or four roads meet is the Abhidhamma, the law-court is the Vinaya, the streetway is the foundations of mindfulness.
And in that streetway of the foundations of mindfulness such shops as these are offering goods for sale, that is to say, a flower shop, a perfume shop, a fruit shop, an antidote shop, a medicine shop, a nectar shop, a jewel shop and a general shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the flower shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“There are, sire, certain kinds of objective supports for meditation that have been pointed out by that Blessed One who knows and sees, the Arahant, the Perfectly Enlightened One, that is to say, the perception of impermanence, the perception of non-self, the perception of the foul, the perception of peril, the perception of abandonment, the perception of dispassion, the perception of cessation, the perception of not delighting in anything in the world, the perception of the impermanence of all formations, mindfulness of breathing; the perception of a swollen corpse, the perception of a discolored corpse, the perception of a decomposing corpse, the perception of a fissured corpse, the perception of a corpse gnawed by animals, the perception of a corpse with bones scattered, the perception of a corpse hacked up and scattered, the perception of a corpse still bleeding, the perception of a worm-infested corpse, the perception of a skeleton; the perception of loving-kindness, the perception of compassion, the perception of sympathetic joy, the perception of equanimity; mindfulness of death; mindfulness occupied with the body.
“Whoever is anxious to get free from old age and death chooses one of these objective supports for meditation and, with this objective support for meditation, he is freed from lust, freed from hatred, freed from delusion, freed from pride, freed from false views; he crosses over samsara, stems the stream of craving, cleanses away the threefold stain; and when he has slain all the defilements and has entered the City of Nibbana that is stainless, dustless, pure, fair, birthless, ageless, deathless, blissful, cooled, and without fear, he sets free his mind in arahantship.
This sire, is called the Blessed One's flower shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the perfume shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“There are, sire, certain kinds of morality that have been pointed out by that Blessed One.
Anointed with the perfume of this morality, the Blessed One's sons make fragrant and pervade the world with the devas with the perfume of morality, and they breathe it forth and fill the quarters and the intermediate points and the following winds and the head-winds with it, and when they have suffused the world, they stand firm.
And what, sire, are these various kinds of morality?
The morality of going for refuge, the five precepts, the eight precepts and the ten precepts, the morality of restraint by the Patimokkha as included in the five recitations.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's perfume shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the fruit shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Fruits, sire, have been pointed out by the Blessed One, that is to say, the fruit of stream-entry, the fruit of once-return, the fruit of non-return, the fruit of arahantship, the attainment of the fruit of emptiness, the attainment of the fruit of the signless, the attainment of the fruit of the undirected.
Whatever fruit anyone wishes for, he, giving the price of the transaction, buys the fruit he prefers.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the antidote shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Antidotes, sire, have been pointed out by the Blessed One.
By means of these antidotes the Blessed One sets free the world with the devas from the poison of the defilements.
And what are these antidotes?
These Four Noble Truths have been pointed out by the Blessed One, sire, that is to say, the noble truth of suffering, the noble truth of the arising of suffering, the noble truth of the cessation of suffering, the noble truth of the way leading to the cessation of suffering.
Those who therein are longing for profound knowledge and hear the Dhamma of the Four Truths, they are set free from birth, aging and death, from sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
This sire, is called the Blessed One's antidote shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the medicine shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Medicines, sire, have been pointed out by the Blessed One.
By means of these medicines the Blessed One cures devas and humans, that is to say, the four foundations of mindfulness, the four right efforts, the four bases of psychic power, the five spiritual faculties, the five powers, the seven factors of enlightenment, and the Noble Eightfold Path.
By means of these medicines the Blessed One purges people of wrong views, of wrong aspiration, of wrong speech, of wrong action, of wrong mode of livelihood, of wrong endeavor, of wrong mindfulness, and of wrong concentration; he has an emetic given for the vomiting up of lust, hatred, delusion, pride, false view, doubt, agitation, lethargy and drowsiness, shamelessness and lack of fear of wrongdoing; he has an emetic for the vomiting up of all the defilements.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's medicine shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the nectar shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Nectar, sire, has been pointed out by the Blessed One.
With this nectar the Blessed One sprinkles the world with the devas; when the devas and the humans have been sprinkled with this nectar, they are set free from birth, aging, disease, death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
What is this nectar?
It is mindfulness occupied with the body.
And this too, sire, was said by the Blessed One: 'Monks, they partake of nectar who partake of mindfulness that is occupied with the body.' This, sire, is called the Blessed One's nectar shop.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the jewel shop of the Buddha, the Blessed One?
“Jewels have been pointed out by the Blessed One, sire, adorned with which the Blessed One's sons shine forth, they illuminate and irradiate the world, burn and blaze up, and display light above, below, across.
What are these jewels?
The jewel of morality, the jewel of concentration, the jewel of wisdom, the jewel of emancipation, the jewel of the knowledge and vision of emancipation, the jewel of the analytical knowledges, the jewel of the factors of enlightenment.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of morality?
It is the morality of restraint by the Patimokkha, the morality of restraint of the sense faculties, the morality of purity of livelihood, the morality of reflection on the requisites of the monk's life, the minor code of morality, the middle code of morality, the major code of morality, the morality of those who are on the paths, the morality of those who have attained the fruits.
The world with the devas, the creatures with the Maras, with the Brahmas, with recluses and Brahmans, long for and desire the person who is adorned with the jewel of morality.
The monk who has bedecked himself with the jewel of morality, sire, shines forth, shines mightily in the quarters, in the intermediate points and above and below and across, surpassing, excelling and overwhelming all the jewels from Avici Hell below to the acme of becoming above, and in between.
Such, sire, are the Blessed One's jewels of morality that are offered for sale in the Blessed One's jewel shop.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of morality.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of concentration?
It is concentration with applied thought and sustained thought, concentration without applied thought but with sustained thought, concentration without applied thought and without sustained thought, concentration on emptiness, concentration on the signless, concentration on the undirected.
And when a monk is bedecked with the jewel of concentration, sire, then thoughts of sense pleasures, thoughts of malevolence, thoughts of harming which are based on pride, agitation, false views, doubts and the defilements, and are varieties of wrong thoughts — all these, on coming in contact with concentration, disperse, dissolve and scatter, they do not remain, they do not adhere.
It is, sire, as water on a lotus-leaf disperses, dissolves, scatters, does not remain, does not adhere.
What is the cause of that?
The complete purity of the lotus.
Even so, sire, it is with the monk bedecked with concentration; those evil thoughts disperse, dissolve and scatter, they do not remain, they do not adhere.
What is the cause of that?
The utter purity of concentration.
Such are the jewels of concentration, sire, that are offered for sale in the Blessed One's jewel shop.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of wisdom?
The wisdom by which a noble disciple comprehends as it really is: 'This is wholesome, this is unwholesome, this is blamable, this is blameless, this is to be followed, this is not to be followed, this is low, this is excellent, this is dark, this is bright, this is dark and bright in an even mixture, this is suffering, this is the arising of suffering, this is the cessation of suffering, this is the way leading to the cessation of suffering.' This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of wisdom.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of emancipation?
The jewel of emancipation is called arahantship, sire, and the monk who has attained arahantship is called bedecked with the jewel of emancipation.
As, sire, a man who is adorned with garlands, perfumes and jewels shines forth, surpassing all other men, even so, sire, he who has attained arahantship, his cankers destroyed, bedecked with the jewel of emancipation, shines forth, surpassing all other monks who are only partly emancipated.
What is the cause of this?
Of all the bedeckings, sire, this is the highest bedecking, that is to say, the bedecking with emancipation.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of emancipation.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of knowledge and vision of emancipation?
This is called the knowledge of reviewing, sire, by which knowledge the noble disciple reviews the paths, the fruits, and Nibbana, and the defilements that have been got rid of and the remaining defilements.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of the analytical knowledges?
Four, sire, are the analytical knowledges: of meanings, of Dhamma, of language, and of perspicuity in expression and knowledge.
Sire, whatever the company a monk approaches who is adorned with these four analytical knowledges, whether it be a company of nobles, a company of brahmans, a company of householders or a company of recluses, he approaches it with confidence, untroubled, without fear, undismayed, without nervousness.
As, sire, a warrior, a hero in battle, when he is armed with his five weapons, enters the battle undaunted and thinks: 'If the enemy are far off I shall destroy them with arrows, if they are nearer than that I shall strike them with my sword, if they are nearer than that I shall strike them with my spear, if they come right up I shall hew them in two with my saber, if they come against my body I shall pierce them through and through with my knife' — even so, sire, the monk who is embellished with the jewel of the four analytical knowledges approaches a company fearlessly, thinking: 'Whoever shall ask me a question on the analytical knowledge of meaning, to him I shall speak comparing meaning with meaning, reason with reason, cause with cause, method with method.
I shall resolve his doubts, dispel his perplexity, I shall delight him with explanations of his question.
Whoever shall ask me a question on the analytical knowledge of Dhamma, to him I shall speak comparing doctrine with doctrine, the deathless with the deathless, the unconditioned with the unconditioned, Nibbana with Nibbana, emptiness with emptiness, the signless with the signless, the undirected with the undirected, the imperturbable with the imperturbable.
I shall resolve his doubts, dispel his perplexity, I shall delight him with explanations of his question.
Whoever shall ask me a question on the analytical knowledge of language, to him I shall speak comparing word with word, the next following word with the next following word, syllable with syllable, liaison with liaison, consonant with consonant, the next following expression with the next following expression, sound with sound, vowel with vowel, concept with concept, common usage with common usage.
I shall resolve his doubts, dispel his perplexity, I shall delight him with explanations of his question.
Whoever shall ask me a question on the analytical knowledge of perspicuity, to him I shall speak comparing perspicuity with perspicuity, simile with simile, characteristic mark with characteristic mark, essence with essence.
I shall resolve his doubts, dispel his perplexity, I shall delight him with explanations of his question.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of analytical knowledge.
“What, sire, is the Blessed One's jewel of the factors of enlightenment?
These are the seven factors, sire: mindfulness, investigation of states, energy, rapture, tranquility, concentration and equanimity.
When a monk is adorned with these seven factors, sire, vanquishing all darkness, he illumines and irradiates the world and generates light.
This, sire, is called the Blessed One's jewel of the factors of enlightenment.
“Revered Nagasena, what is the Blessed One's general shop?
“The Blessed One's general shop, sire, is the nine-limbed Word of the Buddha, the shrines of his bodily relics and the things he used, and it is the jewel of the Order.
And in the Blessed One's general shop, sire, the bliss of high birth is put on sale, the bliss of wealth, of long life, of good health, of beauty, of wisdom, human bliss, deva-like bliss, is put on sale, the bliss of Nibbana is put on sale.
Whichever bliss they want, then, having given the price of the transaction, they buy the bliss desired.
Some buy through undertaking morality, some buy through observing the formal acts of the Observance, and, in respect of this and that, they acquire the blisses from the smallest price of the transaction onwards.
“Such people as these, sire, dwell in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma: those versed in the discourses, those versed in the discipline, those versed in the Abhidhamma, speakers on Dhamma, Jataka-repeaters, Digha-repeaters, Majjhima-repeaters, Samyutta-repeaters, Anguttara-repeaters, Khudaka-repeaters; those possessed of morality, those possessed of concentration, those possessed of wisdom; those who delight in the factors of enlightenment, those with insight, those intent on their own goal; forest-dwellers, those living at the roots of trees, in the open air, on a heap of straw, in cemeteries, those who maintain a sitting posture; those who are practicing rightly, those enjoying fruition, stream-enterers, once-returners, non-returners, arahants; those with the threefold knowledge, those with the six super-knowledges, those of psychic power, those gone to the perfection of wisdom; those skilled in the foundations of mindfulness, the right efforts, the bases of psychic power, the spiritual faculties, the powers, the factors of enlightenment, the excellent path; meditation, the liberations, form and formlessness, and the attainments that are peaceful and happy.
The City of Dhamma is peopled and packed, crowded and teeming with these arahants like a grove of reeds.
“Those monks, sire, who are experts in the unlimited noble knowledge, who are without attachment, whose special qualities are unequaled, whose fame, strength and incandescence are beyond measure, who are turners of the Wheel of Dhamma, gone to the perfection of wisdom — monks such as these, sire, are called Generals of Dhamma in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are of psychic power, masters of the analytical knowledges, attained to confidence, movers through the sky, difficult to equal, difficult to overcome, movers without a support, able to shake the earth with its seas and mountains, able to touch the moon and the sun, skilled in assuming different forms and making volitional determinations and resolves — monks such as these, sire, are called royal priests in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks who conform to the ascetic practices, who are of few wants, contented, detesters of not seeking alms according to the disciplinary code, who go on uninterrupted rounds for almsfood like bees that, having drunk in successive scents, enter secluded groves, who are reckless of body and life, having attained to arahantship, are proclaimed eminent in a special quality of ascetic practice — monks such as these, sire, are called judges in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are completely purified, stainless, without defilements and, won to perfection in deva-vision, are skilled in the knowledge of the deceasing here and arising elsewhere of beings — monks such as these, sire, are called lighters of the city in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who have heard much, to whom the tradition has been handed down, experts in Dhamma, experts in the Vinaya, experts in the Summaries, skilled in the exact determination of the syllables into those which have mutes and sonants, longs and shorts, and as to their heaviness and lightness, skilled in the nine limbs of the Teaching — monks such as these, sire, are called guardians of the Dhamma in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are knowledgeable in the Vinaya, learned in the Vinaya, skilled in the provenances of the rules and readings, skilled in what are offenses, what are not offenses, in what can be corrected, what cannot be corrected, in the removal of offenses, the confession of offenses, repudiation of offenses, making amends for offenses, in restoration to the Order, in being sent away from the Order, in acts of protection, who have won perfection in the Vinaya — monks such as these, sire, are called able money-lenders in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who have bound on the garland of flowers of noble emancipation, have attained to the noble, distinguished, very valuable and best state, who are desired and longed for by the manyfolk — monks such as these, sire, are called flower-sellers in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who have penetrated to the understanding of the Four Noble Truths, seen the truths, understood the Teaching, who have crossed over perplexity in regard to the four fruits of recluseship and, having obtained the bliss of the fruits, share these fruits with others who are practicing rightly — monks such as these, sire, are called fruit-sellers in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are anointed with the sweet scent of the noble morality, bearers of many and varied special qualities, dispellers of the evil smell of the stains of the defilements — monks such as these, sire, are called perfume-sellers in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who delight in Dhamma, to whom the utterance of it is dear, who rejoice exceedingly in the Abhidhamma and Vinaya, who are forest-gone and gone to the roots of trees and empty places, who drink the juice of the noble Dhamma and plunge into it in body, speech and thought, who, most powerful in perspicuity, are practicing the quest of Dhamma in various doctrines, and whenever there is talk on wanting little, on contentment, aloofness, ungregariousness, stirring up energy, morality, concentration, wisdom, emancipation, and the knowledge and vision of emancipation, these monks, going there from wherever they may be, drink in the juice of that talk — monks such as these, sire, are called addicted drunkards in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who always pass the days and nights intent on the practice of watchfulness whether they be lying down, standing, or pacing up and down, who are intent on the practice of mental development, who are pursuing their own goal by warding off the defilements — monks such as these, sire, are called city watchmen in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who teach and recite, speak and repeat the nine-limbed Word of the Buddha in its literal senses and developed meanings, with its methods, reasons, causes and examples — monks such as these, sire, are called sellers of Dhamma in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who are wealthy and rich in the wealth and jewels of Dhamma, in the wealth of tradition, the scriptures and what they have heard, who have comprehension of the expressions, vowels and consonants and the characteristics of the speech of the Buddha, who are full of intelligence — monks such as these, sire, are called merchants of Dhamma in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“And those monks, sire, who have penetration of the glorious Teaching, attended by the classifications and exegeses of objective supports for meditation, who have won perfection in the special qualities of the training — monks such as these, sire, are called famous Dhamma-men in the Blessed One's City of Dhamma.
“Thus well planned, sire, is the Blessed One's City of Dhamma, it is well constructed thus, well appointed thus, well filled thus, well guarded thus, well watched thus, and thus difficult for adversaries and enemies to subdue.
According to this reason, sire, you may know that there was this Blessed One.
“With a hundred reasons such as these, sire, with a thousand reasons, with a hundred causes, a thousand causes, with a hundred methods, a thousand methods, with a hundred similes, a thousand similes, it is possible to point to the power of the Buddha.
As, sire, a clever garland-maker, from a heap of different flowers and by following the instruction of his teachers and as a man acting on his own initiative, may make a heap of variegated clusters of flowers and garlands — even so, sire, that Blessed One, like the heap of variegated flowers, is of infinite special qualities, immeasurable special qualities, and I, at this time, am like a garland-maker in the Conqueror's Dispensation, a stringer of flowers, who by following the way of the teachers of old and by my own power of discernment and with an incalculable number of reasons, could show forth by inference the power of the Buddha.
But, as to this, you must generate the desire to hear.
“It is difficult for others, revered Nagasena, to point to the power of the Buddha by inference through reasons such as these.
I am satisfied, revered Nagasena, by your extremely variegated exposition of the question.”
Good is restraint over the eye; good is restraint over the ear; good is restraint over the nose; good is restraint over the tongue.
Good is restraint in the body; good is restraint in speech; good is restraint in thought.
Restraint everywhere is good.
The monk restrained in every way is freed from all suffering.
He who has control over his hands, feet and tongue; who is fully controlled, delights in inward development, is absorbed in meditation, keeps to himself and is contented — him do people call a monk.
That monk who has control over his tongue, is moderate in speech, unassuming and who explains the Teaching in both letter and spirit — whatever he says is pleasing.
The monk who abides in the Dhamma, delights in the Dhamma, meditates on the Dhamma, and bears the Dhamma well in mind — he does not fall away from the sublime Dhamma.
One should not despise what one has received, nor envy the gains of others.
The monk who envies the gains of others does not attain to meditative absorption.
A monk who does not despise what he has received, even though it be little, who is pure in livelihood and unremitting in effort — him even the gods praise.
He who has no attachment whatsoever for the mind and body, who does not grieve for what he has not — he is truly called a monk.
The monk who abides in universal love and is deeply devoted to the Teaching of the Buddha attains the peace of Nibbana, the bliss of the cessation of all conditioned things.
Empty this boat, O monk!
Emptied, it will sail lightly.
Rid of lust and hatred, you shall reach Nibbana.
Cut off the five, abandon the five, and cultivate the five.
The monk who has overcome the five bonds is called one who has crossed the flood.

Meditate, O monk!
Do not be heedless.
Let not your mind whirl on sensual pleasures.
Heedless, do not swallow a red-hot iron ball, lest you cry when burning, “O this is painful!
There is no meditative concentration for him who lacks insight, and no insight for him who lacks meditative concentration.
He in whom are found both meditative concentration and insight, indeed, is close to Nibbana.
The monk who has retired to a solitary abode and calmed his mind, who comprehends the Dhamma with insight, in him there arises a delight that transcends all human delights.
Whenever he sees with insight the rise and fall of the aggregates, he is full of joy and happiness.
To the discerning one this reflects the Deathless.

Control of the senses, contentment, restraint according to the code of monastic discipline — these form the basis of holy life here for the wise monk.
Let him associate with friends who are noble, energetic, and pure in life, let him be cordial and refined in conduct.
Thus, full of joy, he will make an end of suffering.
Just as the jasmine creeper sheds its withered flowers, even so, O monks, should you totally shed lust and hatred!
The monk who is calm in body, calm in speech, calm in thought, well-composed and who has spewn out worldliness — he, truly, is called serene.
By oneself one must censure oneself and scrutinize oneself.
The self-guarded and mindful monk will always live in happiness.
One is one's own protector, one is one's own refuge.
Therefore, one should control oneself, even as a trader controls a noble steed.
Full of joy, full of faith in the Teaching of the Buddha, the monk attains the Peaceful State, the bliss of cessation of conditioned things.
That monk who while young devotes himself to the Teaching of the Buddha illumines this world like the moon freed from clouds.
Exert yourself, O holy man!
Cut off the stream, and discard sense desires.
Knowing the destruction of all the conditioned things, become, O holy man, the knower of the Uncreated!

When a holy man has reached the summit of two paths, he knows the truth and all his fetters fall away.
He for whom there is neither this shore nor the other shore, nor yet both, he who is free of cares and is unfettered — him do I call a holy man.

He who is meditative, stainless and settled, whose work is done and who is free from cankers, having reached the highest goal — him do I call a holy man.
The sun shines by day, the moon shines by night.
The warrior shines in armor, the holy man shines in meditation.
But the Buddha shines resplendent all day and all night.
Because he has discarded evil, he is called a holy man.
Because he is serene in conduct, he is called a recluse.
And because he has renounced his impurities, he is called a renunciate.
One should not strike a holy man, nor should a holy man, when struck, give way to anger.
Shame on him who strikes a holy man, and more shame on him who gives way to anger.
Nothing is better for a holy man than when he holds his mind back from what is endearing.
To the extent the intent to harm wears away, to that extent does suffering subside.
He who does no evil in deed, word and thought, who is restrained in these three ways — him do I call a holy man.
Just as a brahman priest reveres his sacrificial fire, even so should one devoutly revere the person from whom one has learned the Dhamma taught by the Buddha.
Not by matted hair, nor by lineage, nor by birth does one become a holy man.
But he in whom truth and righteousness exist — he is pure, he is a holy man.
What is the use of your matted hair, O witless man?
What of your garment of antelope's hide?
Within you is the tangle; only outwardly do you cleanse yourself.

The person who wears a robe made of rags, who is lean, with veins showing all over the body, and who meditates alone in the forest — him do I call a holy man.
I do not call him a holy man because of his lineage or high-born mother.
If he is full of impeding attachments, he is just a supercilious man.
But who is free from impediments and clinging — him do I call a holy man.
He who, having cut off all fetters, trembles no more, who has overcome all attachments and is emancipated — him do I call a holy man.
He who has cut off the thong, the band, and the rope, together with the appurtenances, he who has removed the crossbar and is enlightened — him do I call a holy man.
He who without resentment endures abuse, beating and punishment; whose power, real might, is patience — him do I call a holy man.
He who is free from anger, is devout, virtuous, without craving, self-subdued and bears his final body — him do I call a holy man.
Like water on a lotus leaf, or a mustard seed on the point of a needle, he who does not cling to sensual pleasures — him do I call a holy man.
He who in this very life realizes for himself the end of suffering, who has laid aside the burden and become emancipated — him do I call a holy man.
He who has profound knowledge, who is wise, skilled in discerning the right or wrong path, and has reached the highest goal — him do I call a holy man.
He who holds aloof from householders and ascetics alike, and wanders about with no fixed abode and but few wants — him do I call a holy man.
He who has renounced violence towards all living beings, weak or strong, who neither kills nor causes others to kill — him do I call a holy man.
He who is friendly amidst the hostile, peaceful amidst the violent, and unattached amidst the attached — him do I call a holy man.
He whose lust and hatred, pride and hypocrisy have fallen off like a mustard seed from the point of a needle — him do I call a holy man.
He who utters gentle, instructive and truthful words, who imprecates none — him do I call a holy man.
He who in this world takes nothing that is not given to him, be it long or short, small or big, good or bad — him do I call a holy man.
He who wants nothing of either this world or the next, who is desire-free and emancipated — him do I call a holy man.
He who has no attachment, who through perfect knowledge is free from doubts and has plunged into the Deathless — him do I call a holy man.
He who in this world has transcended the ties of both merit and demerit, who is sorrowless, stainless and pure — him do I call a holy man.
He, who, like the moon, is spotless and pure, serene and clear, who has destroyed the delight in existence — him do I call a holy man.
He who, having traversed this miry, perilous and delusive round of existence, has crossed over and reached the other shore; who is meditative, calm, free from doubt, and, clinging to nothing, has attained to Nibbana — him do I call a holy man.
He who, having abandoned sensual pleasures, has renounced the household life and become a homeless one; has destroyed both sensual desire and continued existence — him do I call a holy man.
He who, having abandoned craving, has renounced the household life and become a homeless one, has destroyed both craving and continued existence — him do I call a holy man.
He who, casting off human bonds and transcending heavenly ties, is wholly delivered of all bondages — him do I call a holy man.
He who, having cast off likes and dislikes, has become tranquil, is rid of the substrata of existence and like a hero has conquered all the worlds — him do I call a holy man.
He who in every way knows the death and rebirth of all beings, and is totally detached, blessed and enlightened — him do I call a holy man.
He whose track no gods, no angels, no humans trace, the arahant who has destroyed all cankers — him do I call a holy man.
He who clings to nothing of the past, present and future, who has no attachment and holds on to nothing — him do I call a holy man.
He, the Noble, the Excellent, the Heroic, the Great Sage, the Conqueror, the Passionless, the Pure, the Enlightened one — him do I call a holy man.
He who knows his former births, who sees heaven and hell, who has reached the end of births and attained to the perfection of insight, the sage who has reached the summit of spiritual excellence — him do I call a holy man.
The craving of one given to heedless living grows like a creeper.
Like the monkey seeking fruits in the forest, he leaps from life to life.
Whoever is overcome by this wretched and sticky craving, his sorrows grow like grass after the rains.
But whoever overcomes this wretched craving, so difficult to overcome, from him sorrows fall away like water from a lotus leaf.
This I say to you: Good luck to all assembled here!
Dig up the root of craving, like one in search of the fragrant root of the birana grass.
Let not Mara crush you again and again, as a flood crushes a reed.
Just as a tree, though cut down, sprouts up again if its roots remain uncut and firm, even so, until the craving that lies dormant is rooted out, suffering springs up again and again.
The misguided man in whom the thirty-six currents of craving strongly rush toward pleasurable objects, is swept away by the flood of his passionate thoughts.

Everywhere these currents flow, and the creeper sprouts and grows.
Seeing that the creeper has sprung up, cut off its root with wisdom.
Flowing in and watered by craving, feelings of pleasure arise in beings.
Bent on pleasures and seeking enjoyment, these men fall prey to birth and decay.
Beset by craving, people run about like an entrapped hare.
Held fast by mental fetters, they come to suffering again and again for a long time.
Beset by craving, people run about like an entrapped hare.
Therefore, one who yearns to be passion-free should destroy his own craving.
There is one who, turning away from desire takes to the life of the forest.
But after being freed from the household, he runs back to it.
Behold that man!
Though freed, he runs back to that very bondage!

-.
That is not a strong fetter, the wise say, which is made of iron, wood or hemp.
But the infatuation and longing for jewels and ornaments, children and wives — that, they say, is a far stronger fetter, which pulls one downward and, though seemingly loose, is hard to remove.
This, too, the wise cut off.
Giving up sensual pleasure, and without any longing, they renounce the world.
Those who are lust-infatuated fall back into the swirling current like a spider on its self-spun web.
This, too, the wise cut off.
Without any longing, they abandon all suffering and renounce the world.
Let go of the past, let go of the future, let go of the present, and cross over to the farther shore of existence.
With mind wholly liberated, you shall come no more to birth and death.
For a person tormented by evil thoughts, who is passion-dominated and given to the pursuit of pleasure, his craving steadily grows.
He makes the fetter strong, indeed.
He who delights in subduing evil thoughts, who meditates on the impurities and is ever mindful — it is he who will make an end of craving and rend asunder Mara's fetter.
He who has reached the goal, is fearless, free from craving, passionless, and has plucked out the thorns of existence — for him this is the last body.
He who is free from craving and attachment, is perfect in uncovering the true meaning of the Teaching, and knows the arrangement of the sacred texts in correct sequence — he, indeed, is the bearer of his final body.
He is truly called the profoundly wise one, the great man.
A victor am I over all, all have I known.
Yet unattached am I to all that is conquered and known.
Abandoning all, I am freed through the destruction of craving.
Having thus directly comprehended all by myself, whom shall I call my teacher?

The gift of Dhamma excels all gifts; the taste of the Dhamma excels all tastes; the delight in Dhamma excels all delights.
The Craving-Freed vanquishes all suffering.
Riches ruin only the foolish, not those in quest of the Beyond.
By craving for riches the witless man ruins himself as well as others.
Weeds are the bane of fields, lust is the bane of mankind.
Therefore, what is offered to those free of lust yields abundant fruit.
Weeds are the bane of fields, hatred is the bane of mankind.
Therefore, what is offered to those free of hatred yields abundant fruit.
Weeds are the bane of fields, delusion is the bane of mankind.
Therefore, what is offered to those free of delusion yields abundant fruit.
Weeds are the bane of fields, desire is the bane of mankind.
Therefore, what is offered to those free of desire yields abundant fruit.
As an elephant in the battlefield withstands arrows shot from bows all around, even so shall I endure abuse.
There are many, indeed, who lack virtue.
A tamed elephant is led into a crowd, and the king mounts a tamed elephant.
Best among men is the subdued one who endures abuse.
Excellent are well-trained mules, thoroughbred Sindhu horses and noble tusker elephants.
But better still is the man who has subdued himself.
Not by these mounts, however, would one go to the Untrodden Land, as one who is self-tamed goes by his own tamed and well-controlled mind.
Musty during rut, the tusker named Dhanapalaka is uncontrollable.
Held in captivity, the tusker does not touch a morsel, but only longingly calls to mind the elephant forest.
When a man is sluggish and gluttonous, sleeping and rolling around in bed like a fat domestic pig, that sluggard undergoes rebirth again and again.
Formerly this mind wandered about as it liked, where it wished and according to its pleasure, but now I shall thoroughly master it with wisdom as a mahout controls with his ankus an elephant in rut.
Delight in heedfulness!
Guard well your thoughts!
Draw yourself out of this bog of evil, even as an elephant draws himself out of the mud.
If for company you find a wise and prudent friend who leads a good life, you should, overcoming all impediments, keep his company joyously and mindfully.
If for company you cannot find a wise and prudent friend who leads a good life, then, like a king who leaves behind a conquered kingdom, or like a lone elephant in the elephant forest, you should go your way alone.
Better it is to live alone; there is no fellowship with a fool.
Live alone and do no evil; be carefree like an elephant in the elephant forest.
Good are friends when need arises; good is contentment with just what one has; good is merit when life is at an end, and good is the abandoning of all suffering.
In this world, good it is to serve one's mother, good it is to serve one's father, good it is to serve the monks, and good it is to serve the holy men.
Good is virtue until life's end, good is faith that is steadfast, good is the acquisition of wisdom, and good is the avoidance of evil.
If by renouncing a lesser happiness one may realize a greater happiness, let the wise man renounce the lesser, having regard for the greater.
Entangled by the bonds of hate, he who seeks his own happiness by inflicting pain on others, is never delivered from hatred.
The cankers only increase for those who are arrogant and heedless, who leave undone what should be done and do what should not be done.
The cankers cease for those mindful and clearly comprehending ones who always earnestly practice mindfulness of the body, who do not resort to what should not be done, and steadfastly pursue what should be done.
Having slain mother, father, two warrior-kings, and destroyed a country together with its treasurer, ungrieving goes the holy man.
Having slain mother, father, two brahman kings, and a tiger as the fifth, ungrieving goes the holy man.
Those disciples of Gotama ever awaken happily who day and night constantly practice the Recollection of the Qualities of the Buddha.
Those disciples of Gotama ever awaken happily who day and night constantly practice the Recollection of the Qualities of the Dhamma.
Those disciples of Gotama ever awaken happily who day and night constantly practice the Recollection of the Qualities of the Sangha.
Those disciples of Gotama ever awaken happily who day and night constantly practice Mindfulness of the Body.
Those disciples of Gotama ever awaken happily whose minds by day and night delight in the practice of non-violence.
Those disciples of Gotama ever awaken happily whose minds by day and night delight in the practice of meditation.
Difficult is life as a monk; difficult is it to delight therein.
Also difficult and sorrowful is the household life.
Suffering comes from association with unequals; suffering comes from wandering in samsara.
Therefore, be not an aimless wanderer, be not a pursuer of suffering.
He who is full of faith and virtue, and possesses good repute and wealth — he is respected everywhere, in whatever land he travels.
The good shine from afar, like the Himalaya mountains.
But the wicked are unseen, like arrows shot in the night.
He who sits alone, sleeps alone, and walks alone, who is strenuous and subdues himself alone, will find delight in the solitude of the forest.
The liar goes to the state of woe; also he who, having done, says, “I did not do it.” Men of base actions both, on departing they share the same destiny in the other world.
There are many evil characters and uncontrolled men wearing the saffron robe.
These wicked men will be born in states of woe because of their evil deeds.
It would be better to swallow a red-hot iron ball, blazing like fire, than as an immoral and uncontrolled monk to eat the alms of the people.
Four misfortunes befall the reckless man who consorts with another's wife: acquisition of demerit, disturbed sleep, ill-repute, and states of woe.
Such a man acquires demerit and an unhappy birth in the future.
Brief is the pleasure of the frightened man and woman, and the king imposes heavy punishment.
Hence, let no man consort with another's wife.
Just as kusa grass wrongly handled cuts the hand, even so, a recluse's life wrongly lived drags one to states of woe.
Any loose act, any corrupt observance, any life of questionable celibacy — none of these bear much fruit.
If anything is to be done, let one do it with sustained vigor.
A lax monastic life stirs up the dust of passions all the more.
An evil deed is better left undone, for such a deed torments one afterwards.
But a good deed is better done, doing which one repents not later.
Just as a border city is closely guarded both within and without, even so, guard yourself.
Do not let slip this opportunity.
For those who let slip this opportunity grieve indeed when consigned to hell.
Those who are ashamed of what they should not be ashamed of, and are not ashamed of what they should be ashamed of — upholding false views, they go to states of woe.
Those who see something to fear where there is nothing to fear, and see nothing to fear where there is something to fear — upholding false views, they go to states of woe.
Those who imagine evil where there is none, and do not see evil where it is — upholding false views, they go to states of woe.
Those who discern the wrong as wrong and the right as right — upholding right views, they go to realms of bliss.
Translator's note: The setting: seven weeks after the Buddha's enlightenment/awakening, he goes to five former companions that he had previously practiced extreme asceticism with.
After trying asceticism, he had given this up for a more moderate approach based on a healthy body and jhāna ).
The following is seen as the first teaching he gave to anyone.
In other contexts, the Buddha taught the Four True Realities for the Spiritually Ennobled Ones to people after first giving them a preparatory discourse to ensure they were in the right frame of mind be able to fully benefit from the teaching:
“Then the Blessed One gave the householder Upāli a step-by-step discourse, that is, talk on giving, talk on moral virtue, talk on the heaven worlds; he made known the danger, the inferior nature of and tendency to defilement in sense-pleasures, and the advantage of renouncing them.
When the Blessed One knew that the householder Upāli's mind was ready, open, without hindrances, inspired and confident, then he expounded to him the elevated Dhamma-teaching of the buddhas: dukkha, its origination, its cessation, the path.” 
The four true realities taught by the Buddha are not as such things to “believe” but to be open to, see and contemplate, and respond to appropriately: by fully understanding dukkha/pain/the painful, abandoning that which originates it, personally experiencing its cessation, and cultivating the path that leads to this.
These four true realities are the four fundamental dimensions of experience, as seen by a spiritually noble person with deep wisdom: the conditioned world, that which originates it, the cessation/transcending of it, and the path to this.
Indeed, it is by insight into these that a person becomes spiritually ennobled.
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Blessed One was dwelling at Bārāṇasī in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
There the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus of the group of five thus: “Bhikkhus, these two extremes should not be followed by one gone forth.
What two?
That which is this pursuit of sensual happiness in sense pleasures, which is low, vulgar, the way of the ordinary person, ignoble, not connected to the goal; and that which is this pursuit of self-mortification, which is painful, ignoble, not connected to the goal.
Bhikkhus, without veering towards either of these two extremes, the One Attuned to Reality has awakened to the middle way, which gives rise to vision, which gives rise to knowledge, which leads to peace, to higher knowledge, to full awakening, to Nibbāna.
“And what, bhikkhus, is that middle way awakened to by the One Attuned to Reality which gives rise to vision, which gives rise to knowledge, which leads to peace, to higher knowledge, to full awakening, to Nibbāna?
It is just this Noble Eight-factored Path, that is to say, right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right mental unification.
This, bhikkhus, is that middle way awakened to by the One Attuned to Reality, which gives rise to vision, which gives rise to knowledge, which leads to peace, to higher knowledge, to full awakening, to Nibbāna.
“Now this, bhikkhus, for the spiritually ennobled ones, is the true reality which is pain: birth is painful, aging is painful, illness is painful, death is painful; sorrow, lamentation, physical pain, unhappiness and distress are painful; union with what is disliked is painful; separation from what is liked is painful; not to get what one wants is painful; in brief, the five bundles of grasping-fuel are painful.
“Now this, bhikkhus, for the spiritually ennobled ones, is the pain-originating true reality.
It is this craving which leads to renewed existence, accompanied by delight and attachment, seeking delight now here now there; that is, craving for sense-pleasures, craving for existence, craving for extermination.
“Now this, bhikkhus, for the spiritually ennobled ones, is the pain-ceasing true reality.
It is the remainderless fading away and cessation of that same craving, the giving up and relinquishing of it, freedom from it, non-reliance on it.
“Now this, bhikkhus, for the spiritually ennobled ones, is the true reality which is the way leading to the cessation of pain.
It is this Noble Eight-factored Path, that is to say, right view, right resolve, right speech, right action, right livelihood, right effort, right mindfulness, right mental unification.
“'This, for the spiritually ennobled ones, is the true reality of pain': in me, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“Now on this, 'This — for the spiritually ennobled ones, the true reality of pain — is to be fully understood': in me, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
“Now on this, 'This — for the spiritually ennobled ones, the true reality of pain — has been fully understood': in me, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge, and light.
” in me, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge and light, with respect to: 'This, for the spiritually ennobled ones, is the pain-originating true reality,' 'This — for the spiritually ennobled ones, the pain-originating true reality — is to be abandoned,' and 'This — for the spiritually ennobled ones, the pain-originating true reality — has been abandoned.'
” in me, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge and light, with respect to: 'This, for the spiritually ennobled ones, is the pain-ceasing true reality,' 'This — for the spiritually ennobled ones, the pain-ceasing true reality — is to be personally experienced' and 'This — for the spiritually ennobled ones, the pain-ceasing true reality — has been personally experienced.'
” in me, bhikkhus, in regard to things unheard before, there arose vision, knowledge, wisdom, true knowledge and light, with respect to: 'This, for the spiritually ennobled ones, is the true reality which is the way leading to the cessation of pain,' 'This — for the spiritually ennobled ones, the true reality which is the way leading to the cessation of pain — is to be developed,' and 'This — for the spiritually ennobled ones, the true reality which is way leading to the cessation of pain — has been developed.'
“So long, bhikkhus, as my knowledge and seeing of these four true realities for the spiritually ennobled ones, as they really are in their three phases and twelve modes was not thoroughly purified in this way, then so long, in the world with its devas, māras and brahmās, in this population with its renunciants and brahmans, its devas and humans, I did not claim to be fully awakened to the unsurpassed perfect awakening.
But when, bhikkhus, my knowledge and vision of these four true realities for the spiritually ennobled ones, as they really are in their three phases and twelve modes was thoroughly purified in this way, then, in the world with its devas, māras and brahmās, in this population with its renunciants and brahmans, its devas and humans, I claimed to be fully awakened to the unsurpassed perfect awakening.
Indeed, knowledge and seeing arose in me: 'Unshakeable is the liberation of my mind; this is my last birth: now there is no more renewed existence.' This is what the Blessed One said.
Elated, the bhikkhus of the group of five delighted in the Blessed One's statement.
And while this explanation was being spoken, there arose in the venerable Koṇḍañña the dust-free, stainless vision of the Basic Pattern: “whatever is patterned with an origination, all that is patterned with a cessation.
And when the Wheel of the Basic Pattern had been set in motion by the Blessed One, the earth-dwelling devas raised a cry: “At Bārāṇasī, in the Deer Park at Isipatana, the unsurpassed Wheel of the Basic Pattern has been set in motion by the Blessed One, which cannot be stopped by any renunciant or brahman or māra or brahmā or by anyone in the world.” Having heard the cry of the earth-dwelling devas, the devas of the Four Great Kings raised the same cry.
Having heard it, the Thirty-three devas took it up, then the Yāma devas, then the Contented devas, then the devas Who Delight in Creating, then the devas With Mastery in the Creations of Others, and then the devas of the brahmā group.
Thus at that moment, at that instant, at that second, the cry spread as far as the brahmā world, and this ten thousandfold world system shook, quaked, and trembled, and an immeasurable glorious radiance appeared in the world, surpassing the divine majesty of the devas.
Then the Blessed One uttered this inspiring utterance: “the honorable Koṇḍañña has indeed understood!
The honorable Koṇḍañña has indeed understood!
In this way, the venerable Koṇḍañña acquired the name Koṇḍañña Who Has Understood.
Ariya-sacca, usually translated “Noble Truth,” but K.R.Norman sees this as “the least likely of all the possibilities” for the meaning of ariya-sacca.
He points out that the commentators interpret it as: “'truth of the noble one,' 'truth of the noble ones,' 'truth for a noble one,' i.e., the truth that will make one noble, as well as the translation 'noble truth' so familiar to us.
The last possibility, however, they put at the very bottom of the list of possibilities, if they mention it at all”.
He prefers “truth of the noble one,” but acknowledges that the term may be deliberately multivalent.
At S v, the Buddha is “the Spiritually Ennobled One,” but the term also applies to any of the ennobled persons.
They are different from the “ordinary person,” the puthujjana, though an ordinary person can become a Noble person by insight into Dhamma.
As regards the translation of sacca, this means “truth” in many contexts, but as an adjective it means both “true” and “real.” Taking sacca as meaning “truth” in the term ariya-sacca is problematic as in the above discourse it is said that the second ariya-sacca is “to be abandoned”; but surely, the “truth” on the origination of pain/the painful should not be abandoned.
Rather, the “true reality” which is the origination of pain/the painful — craving — should be abandoned.
Moreover, the discourse says that the Buddha understood, “This is the ariya-sacca which is pain,” not “The ariya-sacca 'This is pain,'” which would be the case if sacca here meant a truth whose content was expressed in words in quote marks.
The ariya-saccas as “true realities for the spiritually ennobled ones” are reminiscent of such passages as S iv, which says that, “That in the world by which one is a perceiver of the world, a conceiver of the world — this is called the world in the discipline of the spiritually ennobled one.” That is, spiritually ennobled ones understand things in a different way from ordinary people.
Indeed, at Suttanipāta p., it is said, 'Whatever, bhikkhus, is regarded as “this is true reality” by the world… that is well seen by the spiritually ennobled ones with right wisdom as it really is as “this is deceptive”', and vice versa.
Sn.
p.
then says 'Whatever, bhikkhus, is regarded as “This is pleasant” by the world… this is well seen by the spiritually ennobled ones with right wisdom as “this is painful “', and vice versa.
This is because desirable sense-objects are impermanent and bring pain when they end, and because spiritually ennobled ones, unlike ordinary people, see the five 'bundles of grasping fuel' — the conditioned world — as painful.
While ordinary people do not agree with this, or that 'birth', that is, being born, is painful, they may of course agree that, for example, 'not to get what one wants is painful'.
Of all the paths the Eightfold Path is the best; of all the truths the Four Noble Truths are the best; of all things passionlessness is the best: of men the Seeing One is the best.
This is the only path; there is none other for the purification of insight.
Tread this path, and you will bewilder Mara.
Walking upon this path you will make an end of suffering.
Having discovered how to pull out the thorn of lust, I make known the path.
You yourselves must strive; the Buddhas only point the way.
Those meditative ones who tread the path are released from the bonds of Mara.
“All conditioned things are impermanent” — when one sees this with wisdom, one turns away from suffering.
This is the path to purification.
“All conditioned things are unsatisfactory” — when one sees this with wisdom, one turns away from suffering.
This is the path to purification.
“All things are not-self” — when one sees this with wisdom, one turns away from suffering.
This is the path to purification.
The idler who does not exert himself when he should, who though young and strong is full of sloth, with a mind full of vain thoughts — such an indolent man does not find the path to wisdom.
Let a man be watchful of speech, well controlled in mind, and not commit evil in bodily action.
Let him purify these three courses of action, and win the path made known by the Great Sage.
Wisdom springs from meditation; without meditation wisdom wanes.
Having known these two paths of progress and decline, let a man so conduct himself that his wisdom may increase.
Cut down the forest, but not the tree; from the forest springs fear.
Having cut down the forest and the underbrush, be passionless, O monks!

For so long as the underbrush of desire, even the most subtle, of a man towards a woman is not cut down, his mind is in bondage, like the sucking calf to its mother.
Cut off your affection in the manner of a man who plucks with his hand an autumn lotus.
Cultivate only the path to peace, Nibbana, as made known by the Exalted One.
“Here shall I live during the rains, here in winter and summer” — thus thinks the fool.
He does not realize the danger.
As a great flood carries away a sleeping village, so death seizes and carries away the man with a clinging mind, doting on his children and cattle.
For him who is assailed by death there is no protection by kinsmen.
None there are to save him — no sons, nor father, nor relatives.
Realizing this fact, let the wise man, restrained by morality, hasten to clear the path leading to Nibbana.
Not by passing arbitrary judgments does a man become just; a wise man is he who investigates both right and wrong.
He who does not judge others arbitrarily, but passes judgment impartially according to the truth, that sagacious man is a guardian of law and is called just.
One is not wise because one speaks much.
He who is peaceable, friendly and fearless is called wise.
A man is not versed in Dhamma because he speaks much.
He who, after hearing a little Dhamma, realizes its truth directly and is not heedless of it, is truly versed in the Dhamma.
A monk is not an elder because his head is gray.
He is but ripe in age, and he is called one grown old in vain.
One in whom there is truthfulness, virtue, inoffensiveness, restraint and self-mastery, who is free from defilements and is wise — he is truly called an Elder.
Not by mere eloquence nor by beauty of form does a man become accomplished, if he is jealous, selfish and deceitful.
But he in whom these are wholly destroyed, uprooted and extinct, and who has cast out hatred — that wise man is truly accomplished.
Not by shaven head does a man who is indisciplined and untruthful become a monk.
How can he who is full of desire and greed be a monk?
He who wholly subdues evil both small and great is called a monk, because he has overcome all evil.
He is not a monk just because he lives on others' alms.
Not by adopting outward form does one become a true monk.
Whoever here lives a holy life, transcending both merit and demerit, and walks with understanding in this world — he is truly called a monk.
Not by observing silence does one become a sage, if he be foolish and ignorant.
But that man is wise who, as if holding a balance-scale accepts only the good.
The sage rejecting the evil, is truly a sage.
Since he comprehends both worlds, he is called a sage.
He is not noble who injures living beings.
He is called noble because he is harmless towards all living beings.
-.
Not by rules and observances, not even by much learning, nor by gain of absorption, nor by a life of seclusion, nor by thinking, “I enjoy the bliss of renunciation, which is not experienced by the worldling” should you, O monks, rest content, until the utter destruction of cankers is reached.
Like a withered leaf are you now; death's messengers await you.
You stand on the eve of your departure, yet you have made no provision for your journey!
Make an island for yourself!
Strive hard and become wise!
Rid of impurities and cleansed of stain, you shall enter the celestial abode of the Noble Ones.
Your life has come to an end now; You are setting forth into the presence of Yama, the king of death.
No resting place is there for you on the way, yet you have made no provision for the journey!
Make an island unto yourself!
Strive hard and become wise!
Rid of impurities and cleansed of stain, you shall not come again to birth and decay.
One by one, little by little, moment by moment, a wise man should remove his own impurities, as a smith removes his dross from silver.
Just as rust arising from iron eats away the base from which it arises, even so, their own deeds lead transgressors to states of woe.
Non-repetition is the bane of scriptures; neglect is the bane of a home; slovenliness is the bane of personal appearance, and heedlessness is the bane of a guard.
Unchastity is the taint in a woman; niggardliness is the taint in a giver.
Taints, indeed, are all evil things, both in this world and the next.
A worse taint than these is ignorance, the worst of all taints.
Destroy this one taint and become taintless, O monks!
Easy is life for the shameless one who is impudent as a crow, is backbiting and forward, arrogant and corrupt.
Difficult is life for the modest one who always seeks purity, is detached and unassuming, clean in life, and discerning.
-.
One who destroys life, utters lies, takes what is not given, goes to another man's wife, and is addicted to intoxicating drinks — such a man digs up his own root even in this world.
Know this, O good man: evil things are difficult to control.
Let not greed and wickedness drag you to protracted misery.
People give according to their faith or regard.
If one becomes discontented with the food and drink given by others, one does not attain meditative absorption, either by day or by night.
But he in who this is fully destroyed, uprooted and extinct, he attains absorption, both by day and by night.
There is no fire like lust; there is no grip like hatred; there is no net like delusion; there is no river like craving.
Easily seen is the fault of others, but one's own fault is difficult to see.
Like chaff one winnows another's faults, but hides one's own, even as a crafty fowler hides behind sham branches.
He who seeks another's faults, who is ever censorious — his cankers grow.
He is far from destruction of the cankers.
There is no track in the sky, and no recluse outside.
Mankind delights in worldliness, but the Buddhas are free from worldliness.

There is no track in the sky, and no recluse outside.
There are no conditioned things that are eternal, and no instability in the Buddhas.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the squirrels' sanctuary.
Now at that time a certain monk by the name of Elder was one who lived alone and extolled the virtues of living alone.
Alone he entered the village for alms, alone he returned, alone he sat withdrawn, alone he did walking meditation.
Then a large number of monks went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they informed him: “Lord, there is a certain monk by the name of Elder who lives alone and extols the virtues of living alone.
Then the Blessed One told a certain monk, “Come, monk.
In my name, call the monk named Elder, saying, 'The Teacher calls you, my friend.' “As you say, lord,” the monk answered and, having gone to Ven.
Elder, on arrival he said, “The Teacher calls you, my friend.
“As you say, my friend,” Ven.
Elder replied.
Then he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Is it true, Elder, that you live alone and extol the virtues of living alone?
“Yes, lord.
“But how do you live alone and extol the virtues of living alone?
“Lord, alone I enter the village for alms, alone I return, alone I sit withdrawn, alone I do walking meditation.
That is how I live alone and extol the virtues of living alone.
“There is that way of living alone, Elder.
I don't say that there isn't.
Still, listen well to how your living alone is perfected in its details, and pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” Ven.
Elder responded.
The Blessed One said: “And how is living alone perfected in its details?
There is the case where whatever is past is abandoned, whatever is future is relinquished, and any passion & desire with regard to states of being attained in the present is well subdued.
That is how living alone is perfected in its details.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said it, the One Well-gone further said this:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rājagaha at the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
And on that occasion two factions in Rājagaha were infatuated with a certain courtesan, their minds enthralled.
Arguing, quarreling, & disputing, they attacked one another with fists, attacked one another with clods of dirt, attacked one another with sticks, attacked one another with knives, so that they fell into death or death-like pain.
Then in the early morning, a large number of monks adjusted their under robes and — carrying their bowls & robes — went into Sāvatthī for alms.
Having gone for alms in Sāvatthī, after the meal, returning from their alms round, they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One, “At present, two factions in Rājagaha are infatuated with a certain courtesan, their minds enthralled.
Arguing, quarreling, & disputing, they attack one another with fists, attack one another with clods of dirt, attack one another with sticks, attack one another with knives, so that they fall into death or death-like pain.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rājagaha at the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
And on that occasion, when Ven.
Upasena Vaṅgantaputta was alone in seclusion, this line of thinking appeared to his awareness: “What a gain, what a true gain it is for me that my teacher is the Blessed One, worthy and fully self-awakened; that I have gone forth from home to the homeless life in a well-taught Dhamma & Vinaya; that my companions in the holy life are virtuous and endowed with admirable qualities; that I have achieved culmination in terms of the precepts; that my mind is unified and well-concentrated; that I am an arahant, with effluents ended; that I have great power & great might.
Fortunate has been my life; fortunate will be my death.
Then the Blessed One, comprehending with his awareness the line of thinking that had appeared to Ven.
Upasena Vaṅgantaputta's awareness, on that occasion exclaimed:
“Renouncing the five pleasures of sense that entrance and delight the mind, and in faith departing from home, become one who makes an end of suffering!
“Associate with good friends and choose a remote lodging, secluded, with little noise.
Be moderate in eating.
Robes, alms-food, remedies and a dwelling — do not have craving for these things; do not be one who returns to the world.
Practice restraint according to the Discipline, and control the five sense-faculties.
“Practice mindfulness of the body and continually develop dispassion.
Avoid the sign of the beautiful connected with passion; by meditating on the foul cultivate a mind that is concentrated and collected.
“Meditate on the Signless and get rid of the tendency to conceit.
By thoroughly understanding and destroying conceit you will live in the peace.
In this manner the Lord repeatedly exhorted the Venerable Rahula.
In AN., Ven.
Ananda asks the Buddha, “Could it be that a monk could attain a concentration of such a sort such that, with regard to this conscious body, he would have no 'I'-making or 'mine'-making or obsession of conceit, such that with regard to all external themes he would have no 'I'-making or 'mine'-making or obsession of conceit, and that he would enter & remain in the awareness-release & discernment-release in which there is no 'I'-making or 'mine'-making or obsession of conceit?
The Buddha answers that it is possible, and that such a concentration can be attained when one is percipient in this way: “This is peace, this is exquisite — the resolution of all mental processes; the relinquishment of all acquisitions; the ending of craving; dispassion; cessation; Unbinding.” He then adds that it was in connection to this state of mind that he uttered the last verse in this poem.
In AN., the Buddha identifies four ways of developing concentration: “There is the development of concentration that, when developed & pursued, leads to a pleasant abiding in the here & now.
There is the development of concentration that, when developed & pursued, leads to the attainment of knowledge & vision.
There is the development of concentration that, when developed & pursued, leads to mindfulness & alertness.
There is the development of concentration that, when developed & pursued, leads to the ending of the effluents.” The Buddha then adds that he uttered the last verse of this poem in connection with these four ways of developing concentration.
On one occasion Ven.
Pindola Bharadvaja was staying in Kosambi at Ghosita's monastery.
Then King Udena went to him and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After this exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, the king sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to Ven.
Pindola Bharadvaja: “What is the reason, master Bharadvaja, what is the cause why young monks — black-haired, endowed with the blessings of youth in the first stage of life — without having played with sensual pleasures nevertheless follow the lifelong chaste life, perfect & pure, and make it last their entire lives?
“Great king, this was said by the Blessed One who knows & sees, worthy and rightly self-awakened: 'Come now, monks: with regard to women who are old enough to be your mother, establish the attitude you would have toward your mother.
With regard to women who are old enough to be your sister, establish the attitude you'd have toward a sister.
With regard to women who are young enough to be your daughter, establish the attitude you'd have toward a daughter.' This is one reason, this is one cause, great king, why young monks — black-haired, endowed with the blessings of youth in the first stage of life — without having played with sensual pleasures nevertheless follow the lifelong chaste life, perfect & pure, and make it last their entire lives.
“The mind is unruly, master Bharadvaja.
Sometimes thoughts of greed arise even for women who are old enough to be your mother… your sister… young enough to be your daughter.
Is there another reason, another cause, why young monks… without having played with sensual pleasures nevertheless follow the lifelong chaste life, perfect & pure, and make it last their entire lives?
“Great king, this was said by the Blessed One who knows & sees, worthy and rightly self-awakened: 'Come now, monks: reflect on this very body, from the soles of the feet on up, from the crown of the head on down, surrounded by skin, full of all sorts of unclean things: “In this body there are head hairs, body hairs, nails, teeth, skin, flesh, tendons, bones, bone marrow, kidneys, heart, liver, pleura, spleen, lungs, large intestines, small intestines, gorge, feces, bile, phlegm, pus, blood, sweat, fat, tears, skin-oil, saliva, mucus, fluid in the joints, urine.”' This too is a reason, this too is a cause, great king, why young monks — black-haired, endowed with the blessings of youth in the first stage of life — without having played with sensual pleasures nevertheless follow the lifelong chaste life, perfect & pure, and make it last their entire lives.
“For those who are developed in body, developed in virtue, developed in mind, developed in discernment, master Bharadvaja, that isn't hard to do.
But for those who are undeveloped in body, undeveloped in virtue, undeveloped in mind, undeveloped in discernment, that is hard to do.
Sometimes when one thinks, 'Let's regard this as unattractive,' it actually comes to be attractive.
Is there another reason, another cause, why young monks… without having played with sensual pleasures nevertheless follow the lifelong chaste life, perfect & pure, and make it last their entire lives?
“Great king, this was said by the Blessed One who knows & sees, worthy and rightly self-awakened: 'Come now, monks: Keep guarding the doors to your sense faculties.
On seeing a form with the eye, do not grasp at any theme or variations by which — if you were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the eye — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail you.
Practice with restraint.
Guard the faculty of the eye.
Achieve restraint with regard to the faculty of the eye.
“'On hearing a sound with the ear…
“'On smelling an aroma with the nose…
“'On tasting a flavor with the tongue…
“'On feeling a tactile sensation with the body…
“'On cognizing an idea with the intellect, do not grasp at any theme or variations by which — if you were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the intellect — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail you.
Practice with restraint.
Guard the faculty of the intellect.
Achieve restraint with regard to the faculty of the intellect.'
“This too is a reason, this too is a cause, great king, why young monks — black-haired, endowed with the blessings of youth in the first stage of life — without having played with sensual pleasures nevertheless follow the lifelong chaste life, perfect & pure, and make it last their entire lives.
“Amazing, master Bharadvaja!
Stupendous!
How well that has been said by the Blessed One who knows & sees, worthy and rightly self-awakened!
This is the very reason, this the very cause, why young monks — black-haired, endowed with the blessings of youth in the first stage of life — without having played with sensual pleasures nevertheless follow the lifelong chaste life, perfect & pure, and make it last their entire lives.
I myself, master Bharadvaja: whenever I enter the inner apartments of the palace unguarded in body, unguarded in speech, unguarded in mind, with mindfulness unestablished and my senses unrestrained, I'm overcome with thoughts of greed.
But whenever I enter the inner apartments of the palace guarded in body, guarded in speech, guarded in mind, with mindfulness established and my senses restrained, then I'm not.
“Magnificent, master Bharadvaja!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to point out the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Bharadvaja — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the community of monks.
May master Bharadvaja remember me as a lay follower who has gone for refuge from this day forward, for life.”
At Savatthi.
As he was sitting to one side, King Pasenadi Kosala said to the Blessed One: “Is there, lord, any one quality that keeps both kinds of benefit secure — benefits in this life & benefits in lives to come?
“There is one quality, great king, that keeps both kinds of benefit secure — benefits in this life & benefits in lives to come.
“But what, lord, is that one quality…?
“Heedfulness, great king.
Just as the footprints of all living beings with legs can be encompassed by the footprint of the elephant, and the elephant's footprint is declared to be supreme among them in terms of its great size; in the same way, heedfulness is the one quality that keeps both kinds of benefit secure — benefits in this life & benefits in lives to come.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
At this time King Pasenadi of Kosala was on the upper terrace of the palace with Queen Mallikaa.
And the king asked her: “Mallikaa, is there anyone dearer to you than yourself?
“Your Majesty, there is no one dearer to me than myself.
And you, sire, is anyone dearer to you than yourself?
“Nor is there anyone dearer to me, Mallikaa, than myself.
Then the king went down from the palace and visited the Blessed One And the Blessed One, understanding, thereupon uttered this verse:
At Savatthi.
As he was sitting to one side, King Pasenadi Kosala said to the Blessed One: “Just now, lord, as I was sitting in judgment, I saw that even affluent nobles, affluent brahmans, & affluent householders — rich, with great wealth & property, with vast amounts of gold & silver, vast amounts of valuables & commodities, vast amounts of wealth & grain — tell deliberate lies with sensual pleasures as the cause, sensual pleasures as the reason, simply for the sake of sensual pleasures.
Then, the thought occured to me: 'I've had enough of this judging!
Let some other fine fellow be known for his judgments!' “That's the way it is, great king!
That's the way it is!
Even affluent nobles, affluent brahmans, & affluent householders… tell deliberate lies with sensual pleasures as the cause, sensual pleasures as the reason, simply for the sake of sensual pleasures.
That will lead to their long-term harm & pain.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
At Savatthi.
As he was sitting to one side, King Pasenadi Kosala said to the Blessed One: “Just now, lord, while I was alone in seclusion, this train of thought arose in my awareness: 'Who have themselves protected, and who leave themselves unprotected?' Then it occurred to me: 'Those who engage in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct leave themselves unprotected.
Even though a squadron of elephant troops might protect them, a squadron of cavalry troops, a squadron of chariot troops, a squadron of infantry troops might protect them, still they leave themselves unprotected.
Why is that?
Because that's an external protection, not an internal one.
Therefore they leave themselves unprotected.
But those who engage in good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct have themselves protected.
Even though neither a squadron of elephant troops, a squadron of cavalry troops, a squadron of chariot troops, nor a squadron of infantry troops might protect them, still they have themselves protected.
Why is that?
Because that's an internal protection, not an external one.
Therefore they have themselves protected.' “That's the way it is, great king!
That's the way it is!
Those who engage in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct leave themselves unprotected.
Even though a squadron of elephant troops might protect them, a squadron of cavalry troops, a squadron of chariot troops, a squadron of infantry troops might protect them, still they leave themselves unprotected.
Why is that?
Because that's an external protection, not an internal one.
Therefore they leave themselves unprotected.
But those who engage in good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct have themselves protected.
Even though neither a squadron of elephant troops, a squadron of cavalry troops, a squadron of chariot troops, nor a squadron of infantry troops might protect them, still they have themselves protected.
Why is that?
Because that's an internal protection, not an external one.
Therefore they have themselves protected.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
At Savatthi.
As he was sitting to one side, King Pasenadi Kosala said to the Blessed One: “Just now, lord, while I was alone in seclusion, this train of thought arose in my awareness: 'Few are those people in the world who, when acquiring lavish wealth, don't become intoxicated & heedless, don't become greedy for sensual pleasures, and don't mistreat other beings.
Many more are those who, when acquiring lavish wealth, become intoxicated & heedless, become greedy for sensual pleasures, and mistreat other beings.' “That's the way it is, great king!
That's the way it is!
Few are those people in the world who, when acquiring lavish wealth, don't become intoxicated & heedless, don't become greedy for sensual pleasures, and don't mistreat other beings.
Many more are those who, when acquiring lavish wealth, become intoxicated & heedless, become greedy for sensual pleasures, and mistreat other beings.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
At Savatthi.
As he was sitting to one side, King Pasenadi Kosala said to the Blessed One: “Just now, lord, while I was alone in seclusion, this train of thought arose in my awareness: 'Who are dear to themselves, and who are not dear to themselves?' Then it occurred to me: 'Those who engage in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct are not dear to themselves.
Even though they may say, “We are dear to ourselves,” still they aren't dear to themselves.
Why is that?
Of their own accord, they act toward themselves as an enemy would act toward an enemy; thus they aren't dear to themselves.
But those who engage in good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct are dear to themselves.
Even though they may say, “We aren't dear to ourselves,” still they are dear to themselves.
Why is that?
Of their own accord, they act toward themselves as a dear one would act toward a dear one; thus they are dear to themselves.' “That's the way it is, great king!
That's the way it is!
Those who engage in bodily misconduct, verbal misconduct, & mental misconduct are not dear to themselves.
Even though they may say, 'We are dear to ourselves,' still they aren't dear to themselves.
Why is that?
Of their own accord, they act toward themselves as an enemy would act toward an enemy; thus they aren't dear to themselves.
But those who engage in good bodily conduct, good verbal conduct, & good mental conduct are dear to themselves.
Even though they may say, 'We aren't dear to ourselves,' still they are dear to themselves.
Why is that?
Of their own accord, they act toward themselves as a dear one would act toward a dear one; thus they are dear to themselves.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After this exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “Now then, does Master Gotama claim, 'I have awakened to the unexcelled right self-awakening'?
“If, great king, one speaking rightly could say of anyone, 'He has awakened to the unexcelled right self-awakening,' one could rightly say that of me.
For I, great king, have awakened to the unexcelled right self-awakening.
“But Master Gotama, those brahmans & contemplatives each with his group, each with his community, each the teacher of his group, an honored leader, well-regarded by people at large — i.e., Purana Kassapa, Makkhali Gosala, Ajita Kesakambalin, Pakudha Kaccayana, Sañjaya Belatthaputta, and the Nigantha Nathaputta: even they, when I asked them whether they claimed to have awakened to the unexcelled right self-awakening, didn't make that claim.
So who is Master Gotama to do so when he is still young & newly gone-forth?
“There are these four things, great king, that shouldn't be despised & disparaged for being young.
Which four?
A noble warrior, great king, shouldn't be despised & disparaged for being young.
A snake… A fire… And a monk shouldn't be despised & disparaged for being young.
These are the four things that shouldn't be despised & disparaged for being young.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
When this was said, King Pasenadi Kosala said to the Blessed One: “Magnificent, lord!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Community of monks.
May the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.”
Thus have I heard.
Once a large number of bhikkhus were living among the Kosalans, on the slopes of the Himalayas, in a forest-lodging.
And they were haughty, unsteady, garrulous, of loose speech, unmindful, thoughtless, without concentration, with wandering minds and faculties uncontrolled.
Now Jantu, son of the devas, on a fifteenth-day Uposatha, came into the presence of those bhikkhus and addressed them in verse:
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi, in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then Rohitassa, the son of a deva, in the far extreme of the night, his extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he stood to one side.
As he was standing there he said to the Blessed One: “Is it possible, lord, by traveling, to know or see or reach a far end of the cosmos where one does not take birth, age, die, pass away or reappear?
“I tell you, friend, that it is not possible by traveling to know or see or reach a far end of the cosmos where one does not take birth, age, die, pass away, or reappear.
“It is amazing, lord, and awesome, how well that has been said by the Blessed One: 'I tell you, friend, that it is not possible by traveling to know or see or reach a far end of the cosmos where one does not take birth, age, die, pass away, or reappear.' Once I was a seer named Rohitassa, a student of Bhoja, a powerful sky-walker.
My speed was as fast as that of a strong archer — well-trained, a practiced hand, a practiced sharp-shooter — shooting a light arrow across the shadow of a palm tree.
My stride stretched as far as the east sea is from the west.
To me, endowed with such speed, such a stride, there came the desire: 'I will go traveling to the end of the cosmos.' I — with a one-hundred year life, a one-hundred year span — spent one hundred years traveling — apart from the time spent on eating, drinking, chewing & tasting, urinating & defecating, and sleeping to fight off weariness — but without reaching the end of the cosmos I died along the way.
So it is amazing, lord, and awesome, how well that has been said by the Blessed One: 'I tell you, friend, that it is not possible by traveling to know or see or reach a far end of the cosmos where one does not take birth, age, die, pass away, or reappear.' “I tell you, friend, that it is not possible by traveling to know or see or reach a far end of the cosmos where one does not take birth, age, die, pass away, or reappear.
But at the same time, I tell you that there is no making an end of suffering & stress without reaching the end of the cosmos.
Yet it is just within this fathom-long body, with its perception & intellect, that I declare that there is the cosmos, the origination of the cosmos, the cessation of the cosmos, and the path of practice leading to the cessation of the cosmos.”
At Rajagaha.
As he was standing to one side, Uttara the deva's son recited this verse in the Blessed One's presence:
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Savatthi at Jetavana at Anathapindika's monastery.
At that time Suriya, the sun deity, was seized by Rahu, Lord of Asuras.
Thereupon calling to mind the Blessed One, Suriya, the Sun deity, recited this stanza:
i.
“O Buddha, the Hero, thou art wholly free from all evil.
My adoration to thee.
I have fallen into distress.
Be thou my refuge.
Thereupon the Blessed One addressed a stanza to Rahu, Lord of Asuras, on behalf of Suriya thus:
ii.
“O Rahu, Suriya has gone for refuge to the Tathagata, the Consummate One.
Release Suriya.
The Buddhas radiate compassion on the world.
iii.
“O Rahu, swallow not the dispeller of darkness, the shining one, the radiant and effulgent traveler through the sky.
Rahu, release Suriya, my son.
Thereupon Rahu, Lord of Asuras, released Suriya, and immediately came to the presence of Vepacitta, Lord of Asuras, and stood beside him trembling with fear and with hair standing on end.
Then Vepacitta addressed Rahu in this stanza:
iv.
“Rahu, why did you suddenly release Suriya?
Why have you come trembling, and why are you standing here terrified?
“I have been spoken to by the Buddha in a stanza.
If I had not released Suriya my head would have split into seven pieces.
While yet I live, I should have had no happiness..
See also: SN.
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Savatthi, at Jetavana at Anathpindika's monastery.
At that time Candima, the moon deity, was seized by Rahu, lord of Asura.
Thereupon calling to mind the Blessed One, Candima, the moon deity, recited this stanza:
i.
“O Buddha, the Hero, thou art wholly free from all evil.
My adoration to thee.
I have fallen into distress.
Be thou my refuge.
Thereupon the Blessed One addressed a stanza to Rahu, Lord of Asuras, on behalf of Candima, thus:
ii.
“O Rahu, Candima has gone for refuge to the Tathagata, the Consummate One.
Release Candima.
The Buddhas radiate compassion on the world.
Thereupon Rahu, Lord of Asuras, released Candima, the deity, and immediately came to the presence of Vepacitta, Lord of Asuras, and stood beside him trembling with fear and with hair standing on end.
Then Vepacitta addressed Rahu in this stanza.
iii.
“Rahu.
Why did you suddenly release Candima?
Why have you come trembling, and why are you standing here terrified?
“I have been spoken to by the Buddha in a stanza.
If I had not released Candima my head would have split into seven pieces.
While yet I live, I should have had no happiness..
See also: SN.
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Blessed One was staying at Saavatthii…Then Taayana, son of the devas, formerly a teacher of a sect,… spoke thus in verse before the Blessed One:
So said Taayana the devas' son and, so saying, he passed with his right side to the Blessed One in salutation and vanished there and then.
And when the night was past the Blessed One addressed the bhikkhus.
“Bhikkhus, learn Taayana's verses, learn them by heart; Taayana's verses are for your good, they pertain to the fundamentals of the holy life.”
The first verse in this discourse focuses on jhana as a crucial element in the path to release.
The Buddha's “awakening to jhana” apparently refers to two points in his career as a bodhisatta: the point when, realizing the futility of self-torture, he surmised that jhana might form the path to awakening; and his realization of the extent to which jhana actually could lead to the knowledge that yielded in full awakening.
In the second verse, the Buddha expands on Pañcalacanda's understanding of the practice of jhana by pointing out that it has to be endowed with mindfulness to be genuinely right concentration.
This point is related to the fact that the various lists of activities constituting the path — such as the five faculties, the seven factors for awakening, and the noble eightfold path — always place right mindfulness before right concentration.
It's also related to the statement in MN that the four satipatthanas — establishings of mindfulness or frames of reference — form the nimitta, or theme, of right concentration.
AN.
contains an explanation of the first verse here, in which Ven.
Ananda identifies the first jhana as the opening offering escape from the confining place of sensual pleasures, and each successive level of jhana as the opening offering escape from the confining place of the preceeding jhana.
Finally, he says, the cessation of perception & feeling acts as the ultimate opening offering escape from all forms of confinement.
At Savatthi.
As he was standing to one side, Pañcalacanda the deva's son recited this verse in the Blessed One's presence:
As she was standing to one side, a devata recited this verse to the Blessed One:
Translator's note: Cullavagga VII tells of how Devadatta, the Buddha's cousin, tried unsuccessfully in various ways to wrest leadership of the Sangha from the Buddha.
In Cv VII.., he tries to kill the Buddha by hurling a rock down a mountainside.
The rock is crushed, and so misses the Buddha, but sends out a splinter that pierces the Buddha's foot, drawing blood.
According to the Commentary, this discourse together with SN.
describe the Buddha's reaction to this attempt on his life.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha at the Maddakucchi Deer Reserve.
Now at that time his foot had been pierced by a stone sliver.
Excruciating were the bodily feelings that developed within him — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — but he endured them mindful, alert, & unperturbed.
Having had his outer robe folded in four and laid out, he lay down on his right side in the lion's posture, with one foot placed on top of the other, mindful & alert.
Then devatas from the Satullapa retinue, in the far extreme of the night, their extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Maddakucchi, went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to him, they stood to one side.
As she was standing there, one of the devatas exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a naga is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a naga, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a lion is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a lion, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a thoroughbred is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a thoroughbred, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a peerless bull is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a peerless bull, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a strong burden-carrier is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a strong burden-carrier, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “What a tamed one is Gotama the contemplative!
And like a tamed one, when bodily feelings have arisen — painful, fierce, sharp, wracking, repellent, disagreeable — he endures them mindful, alert, & unperturbed!
Then another devata exclaimed in the Blessed One's presence: “See a concentration well-developed, a mind well-released — neither pressed down nor forced back, nor with mental fabrication kept blocked or suppressed.
Whoever would think that such a naga of a man, lion of a man, thoroughbred of a man, peerless bull of a man, strong burden-carrier of a man, such a tamed man should be violated: what else is that if not blindness?”
…the deva spoke this verse…:
…the deva spoke this verse…:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Lord was staying near Savatthi, at the Jeta Grove in Anathapindika's monastery.
Now when night was passing a certain devataa, lighting up the whole Jeta Grove with her surpassing beauty, approached the Lord.
Having drawn near and prostrated herself she stood to one side.
Standing there the devata said:
The Lord replied:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Blessed One was staying near Saavatthii, at Jeta Grove, in Anaathapi.n.dika's park.
Now a certain deva, as the night was passing away, lighting up the whole Jeta Grove with his effulgent beauty, approached the Blessed One and, having approached, stood on one side.
Standing thus on one side, the deva spoke this verse before the Blessed One:
Thus have I heard.
At one time the Blessed One was staying at Raajagaha in the Tapodaa Park.
Now the Venerable Samiddhi, as dawn approached, arose and went to the Hot Springs to bathe.
Having bathed, he came out of the Hot Springs and stood, clad in a single garment, drying his limbs.
Then a certain she-deva, as the night was passing away, lighting up the entire Hot Springs lake with her effulgent beauty, approached the Venerable Samiddhi and, hovering in the air, addressed him thus in verse:
Then the she-deva came down to earth and said to Samiddhi: “You are young, bhikkhu, to have left the world, black-haired, with the bloom of youth.
In your youthful prime you do not enjoy the pleasures of the senses.
Get your fill, bhikkhu, of human pleasures.
Don't reject the present moment to pursue what time will bring.
“I, friend, do not reject the present moment to pursue what time will bring.
I reject what time will bring to pursue the present moment.
Time's pleasures, friend, as the Blessed One has said, are fraught with pain, fraught with tribulation, leading to greater danger.
This Dhamma is here-present, out of time, inviting inspection, leading onward, to be realized by the wise each for himself.
“In what way, bhikkhu, has the Blessed One said that time's pleasures are fraught with pain, fraught with tribulation and leading to greater danger?
In what way is this Dhamma here-present, out of time, inviting inspection, leading onward, to be realized by the wise each for himself?
“I, friend, am fresh, having not long left the world, a newcomer.
I am not able to explain in detail this Dhamma and discipline.
But the Blessed One, the Arahant, the Fully Self-Enlightened One is staying at Raajagaha in the Tapodaa Park.
Go to the Blessed One and ask him about the matter.
Then bear in the mind the explanation he gives to you.
“It is not easy for us, bhikkhu, to approach the Blessed One.
He is surrounded by other devas of great power.
If you, bhikkhu, will approach the Blessed One and ask him about the matter, then perhaps we can come to hear the teaching.
“Very well, friend,” the Venerable Samiddhi replied to her, and he went to the Blessed One, made his obeisance and sat down to one side.
“If, Lord, that deva was telling the truth, she is right here, not far away.
When he had said this, the deva said to the Venerable Samiddhi: “Ask him, bhikkhu, ask him!
I've managed to get here!
Then the Blessed One addressed the deva in verse:
“Lord, I do not fully grasp the meaning of what Your Blessedness has expressed in brief.
It would be well for me, Lord, if your Blessedness would explain in full what has been expressed in brief, that I may know its meaning.
“Lord, neither do I full grasp the meaning of this which Your Blessedness has expressed in brief.
It would be well for me, Lord, if Your Blessedness would explain in full what has been explained in brief, that I may know its meaning.
“Lord, the meaning of what Your Blessedness has expressed in brief I understand in full like this:
Translator's note: The Pali canon is unique in its approach to the spirit world.
While confirming the existence of spirits and other more refined levels of beings, it insists that they are not worthy of worship.
The Buddha, after all, is the teacher not only of human beings but also of heavenly beings; and many heavenly beings are not especially knowledgeable or spiritually advanced, in spite of their refined state.
The Canon illustrates this point in a number of gentle satires.
The most famous is the Kevatta Sutta, where the ignorance & pomposity of a supposedly all-knowing creator is lampooned.
This discourse is another entertaining example of the same genre, pointing out the difficulties of teaching more advanced Dhamma to any being — human or divine — who is obsessed with sensual pleasures.
On hearing some verses concerning the awakened one's state of mind — which is not subject to time and is visible here-&-now — the devata cannot understand them, and is able to grasp only a few very basic principles of Dhamma practice.
It's unusual for the Buddha to aim his words so far over the heads of his listeners.
Perhaps in this case, as in SN., he wants to subdue the devata's pride.
At any rate, there is hope for her: as the Commentary points out, her understanding covers in a rudimentary fashion all the elements of the Noble Eightfold Path.
If she follows through with her understanding, she's on the road to the higher attainments.
This discourse also contains some word play on the words “time” and “subject to time”.
“Time” can mean not only time in the general sense, but also one's time of death.
These two meanings of the word underlie the first exchange between Ven.
Samiddhi and the devata.
“Subject to time” can mean “obtainable only after a certain time” or “good only for a certain length of time”: these meanings underlie their second exchange.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha at Tapoda monastery.
Then Ven.
Samiddhi, as night was ending, got up & went to the Tapoda Hot Springs to bathe his limbs.
Having bathed his limbs and gotten out of the springs, he stood wearing only his lower robe, letting his limbs dry.
Then a certain devata, in the far extreme of the night, her extreme radiance lighting up the entire Tapoda Hot Springs, approached Ven.
Samiddhi.
On arrival, while standing in the air, she addressed him with this verse:
Then the devata, coming down to earth, said to Ven.
Samiddhi, “You have gone forth while young, monk — black-haired, endowed with the blessings of youth in the first stage of life — without having played with sensual pleasures.
Enjoy human sensuality, monk.
Don't drop what is visible here-&-now in pursuit of what's subject to time.
“My friend, I'm not dropping what's visible here-&-now in pursuit of what's subject to time.
I'm dropping what's subject to time in pursuit of what's visible here-&-now.
For the Blessed One has said that sensual pleasures are subject to time, of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks; whereas this Dhamma is visible here-&-now, not subject to time, inviting all to come & see, pertinent, to be known by the wise for themselves.
“But, monk, in what way has the Blessed One said that sensual pleasures are subject to time, of much stress, much despair, & greater drawbacks?
And how is this Dhamma visible here-&-now, not subject to time, inviting all to come & see, pertinent, to be known by the wise for themselves?
“I'm new, my friend, not long gone forth, only recently come to this Dhamma & discipline.
I can't explain it in detail.
But the Blessed One, worthy & rightly self-awakened, is staying here in Rajagaha at Tapoda monastery.
Having gone to him, ask him this matter.
As he explains it, that's how you should remember it.
“Monk, it's not easy for us to go to the Blessed One, as he is surrounded by other devas of great influence.
But if you go to the Blessed One and ask him this matter, I will come along to hear the Dhamma.
Responding to the devata, “As you say, my friend,” Ven.
Samiddhi went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, he bowed down to the Blessed One and sat to one side.
As he was sitting there.
“Now, lord, if that devata was telling the truth, she is not far from here.
When this was said, the devata said to Ven.
Samiddhi, “Ask, monk!
Ask!
I've gotten through.
Then the Blessed One recited this verse to the devata:
“I don't understand, lord, the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement.
It would be good if the Blessed One would speak in such a way that I would understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement.
“I don't understand, lord, the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement.
It would be good if the Blessed One would speak in such a way that I would understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement.
“Lord, here's how I understand the detailed meaning of the Blessed One's brief statement:
One should give up anger, renounce pride, and overcome all fetters.
Suffering never befalls him who clings not to mind and body and is detached.
He who checks rising anger as a charioteer checks a rolling chariot, him I call a true charioteer.
Others only hold the reins.
Overcome the angry by non-anger; overcome the wicked by goodness; overcome the miser by generosity; overcome the liar by truth.
Speak the truth; yield not to anger; when asked, give even if you only have a little.
By these three means can one reach the presence of the gods.
Those sages who are inoffensive and ever restrained in body, go to the Deathless State, where, having gone, they grieve no more.
Those who are ever vigilant, who discipline themselves day and night, and are ever intent upon Nibbana — their defilements fade away.
O Atula!
Indeed, this is an ancient practice, not one only of today: they blame those who remain silent, they blame those who speak much, they blame those who speak in moderation.
There is none in the world who is not blamed.
There never was, there never will be, nor is there now, a person who is wholly blamed or wholly praised.
But the man whom the wise praise, after observing him day after day, is one of flawless character, wise, and endowed with knowledge and virtue.
Who can blame such a one, as worthy as a coin of refined gold?
Even the gods praise him; by Brahma, too, is he praised.
Let a man guard himself against irritability in bodily action; let him be controlled in deed.
Abandoning bodily misconduct, let him practice good conduct in deed.
Let a man guard himself against irritability in speech; let him be controlled in speech.
Abandoning verbal misconduct, let him practice good conduct in speech.
Let a man guard himself against irritability in thought; let him be controlled in mind.
Abandoning mental misconduct, let him practice good conduct in thought.
The wise are controlled in bodily action, controlled in speech and controlled in thought.
They are truly well-controlled.
Giving himself to things to be shunned and not exerting where exertion is needed, a seeker after pleasures, having given up his true welfare, envies those intent upon theirs.
Seek no intimacy with the beloved and also not with the unloved, for not to see the beloved and to see the unloved, both are painful.
Therefore hold nothing dear, for separation from the dear is painful.
There are no bonds for those who have nothing beloved or unloved.
From endearment springs grief, from endearment springs fear.
For one who is wholly free from endearment there is no grief, whence then fear?
From affection springs grief, from affection springs fear.
For one who is wholly free from affection there is no grief, whence then fear?
From attachment springs grief, from attachment springs fear.
For one who is wholly free from attachment there is no grief, whence then fear?
From lust springs grief, from lust springs fear.
For one who is wholly free from craving there is no grief; whence then fear?
From craving springs grief, from craving springs fear.
For one who is wholly free from craving there is no grief; whence then fear?
People hold dear him who embodies virtue and insight, who is principled, has realized the truth, and who himself does what he ought to be doing.
One who is intent upon the Ineffable, dwells with mind inspired, and is no more bound by sense pleasures — such a man is called “One Bound Upstream.” 
When, after a long absence, a man safely returns from afar, his relatives, friends and well-wishers welcome him home on arrival.
As kinsmen welcome a dear one on arrival, even so his own good deeds will welcome the doer of good who has gone from this world to the next.
Happy indeed we live, friendly amidst the hostile.
Amidst hostile men we dwell free from hatred.
Happy indeed we live, friendly amidst the afflicted.
Amidst afflicted men we dwell free from affliction.
Happy indeed we live, free from avarice amidst the avaricious.
Amidst the avaricious men we dwell free from avarice.
Happy indeed we live, we who possess nothing.
Feeders on joy we shall be, like the Radiant Gods.
Victory begets enmity; the defeated dwell in pain.
Happily the peaceful live, discarding both victory and defeat.
There is no fire like lust and no crime like hatred.
There is no ill like the aggregates and no bliss higher than the peace.

Hunger is the worst disease, conditioned things the worst suffering.
Knowing this as it really is, the wise realize Nibbana, the highest bliss.
Health is the most precious gain and contentment the greatest wealth.
A trustworthy person is the best kinsman, Nibbana the highest bliss.
Having savored the taste of solitude and peace, pain-free and stainless he becomes, drinking deep the taste of the bliss of the Truth.
Good is it to see the Noble Ones; to live with them is ever blissful.
One will always be happy by not encountering fools.
Indeed, he who moves in the company of fools grieves for longing.
Association with fools is ever painful, like partnership with an enemy.
But association with the wise is happy, like meeting one's own kinsmen.
Therefore, follow the Noble One, who is steadfast, wise, learned, dutiful and devout.
One should follow only such a man, who is truly good and discerning, even as the moon follows the path of the stars.
By what track can you trace that trackless Buddha of limitless range, whose victory nothing can undo, whom none of the vanquished defilements can ever pursue?
By what track can you trace that trackless Buddha of limitless range, in whom exists no longer, the entangling and embroiling craving that perpetuates becoming?
Those wise ones who are devoted to meditation and who delight in the calm of renunciation — such mindful ones, Supreme Buddhas, even the gods hold dear.
Hard is it to be born a man; hard is the life of mortals.
Hard is it to gain the opportunity of hearing the Sublime Truth, and hard to encounter is the arising of the Buddhas.
To avoid all evil, to cultivate good, and to cleanse one's mind — this is the teaching of the Buddhas.
Enduring patience is the highest austerity.
“Nibbana is supreme,” say the Buddhas.
He is not a true monk who harms another, nor a true renunciate who oppresses others.
Not despising, not harming, restraint according to the code of monastic discipline, moderation in food, dwelling in solitude, devotion to meditation — this is the teaching of the Buddhas.
-.
There is no satisfying sensual desires, even with the rain of gold coins.
For sensual pleasures give little satisfaction and much pain.
Having understood this, the wise man finds no delight even in heavenly pleasures.
The disciple of the Supreme Buddha delights in the destruction of craving.
Driven only by fear, do men go for refuge to many places — to hills, woods, groves, trees and shrines.
Such, indeed, is no safe refuge; such is not the refuge supreme.
Not by resorting to such a refuge is one released from all suffering.
-.
He who has gone for refuge to the Buddha, the Teaching and his Order, penetrates with transcendental wisdom the Four Noble Truths — suffering, the cause of suffering, the cessation of suffering, and the Noble Eightfold Path leading to the cessation of suffering.

This indeed is the safe refuge, this the refuge supreme.
Having gone to such a refuge, one is released from all suffering.
Hard to find is the thoroughbred man; he is not born everywhere.
Where such a wise man is born, that clan thrives happily.
Blessed is the birth of the Buddhas; blessed is the enunciation of the sacred Teaching; blessed is the harmony in the Order, and blessed is the spiritual pursuit of the united truth-seeker.
-.
He who reveres those worthy of reverence, the Buddhas and their disciples, who have transcended all obstacles and passed beyond the reach of sorrow and lamentation — he who reveres such peaceful and fearless ones, his merit none can compute by any measure.
Follow not the vulgar way; live not in heedlessness; hold not false views; linger not long in worldly existence.
Arise!
Do not be heedless!
Lead a righteous life.
The righteous live happily both in this world and the next.
Lead a righteous life; lead not a base life.
The righteous live happily both in this world and the next.
One who looks upon the world as a bubble and a mirage, him the King of Death sees not.
Come!
Behold this world, which is like a decorated royal chariot.
Here fools flounder, but the wise have no attachment to it.
He who having been heedless is heedless no more, illuminates this world like the moon freed from clouds.
He, who by good deeds covers the evil he has done, illuminates this world like the moon freed from clouds.
Blind is the world; here only a few possess insight.
Only a few, like birds escaping from the net, go to realms of bliss.
Swans fly on the path of the sun; men pass through the air by psychic powers; the wise are led away from the world after vanquishing Mara and his host.
For a liar who has violated the one law who holds in scorn the hereafter, there is no evil that he cannot do.
Truly, misers fare not to heavenly realms; nor, indeed, do fools praise generosity.
But the wise man rejoices in giving, and by that alone does he become happy hereafter.
Better than sole sovereignty over the earth, better than going to heaven, better even than lordship over all the worlds is the supramundane Fruition of Stream Entrance.

If one holds oneself dear, one should diligently watch oneself.
Let the wise man keep vigil during any of the three watches of the night.
One should first establish oneself in what is proper; then only should one instruct others.
Thus the wise man will not be reproached.
One should do what one teaches others to do; if one would train others, one should be well controlled oneself.
Difficult, indeed, is self-control.
One truly is the protector of oneself; who else could the protector be?
With oneself fully controlled, one gains a mastery that is hard to gain.
The evil a witless man does by himself, born of himself and produced by himself, grinds him as a diamond grinds a hard gem.
Just as a single creeper strangles the tree on which it grows, even so, a man who is exceedingly depraved harms himself as only an enemy might wish.
Easy to do are things that are bad and harmful to oneself.
But exceedingly difficult to do are things that are good and beneficial.
Whoever, on account of perverted views, scorns the Teaching of the Perfected Ones, the Noble and Righteous Ones — that fool, like the bamboo, produces fruits only for self destruction.

By oneself is evil done; by oneself is one defiled.
By oneself is evil left undone; by oneself is one made pure.
Purity and impurity depend on oneself; no one can purify another.
Let one not neglect one's own welfare for the sake of another, however great.
Clearly understanding one's own welfare, let one be intent upon the good.
When this world is ever ablaze, why this laughter, why this jubilation?
Shrouded in darkness, will you not see the light?
Behold this body — a painted image, a mass of heaped up sores, infirm, full of hankering — of which nothing is lasting or stable!
Fully worn out is this body, a nest of disease, and fragile.
This foul mass breaks up, for death is the end of life.
These dove-colored bones are like gourds that lie scattered about in autumn.
Having seen them, how can one seek delight?
This city is built of bones, plastered with flesh and blood; within are decay and death, pride and jealousy.
Even gorgeous royal chariots wear out, and indeed this body too wears out.
But the Dhamma of the Good does not age; thus the Good make it known to the good.
The man of little learning grows old like a bull.
He grows only in bulk, but, his wisdom does not grow.
Through many a birth in samsara have I wandered in vain, seeking the builder of this house.
Repeated birth is indeed suffering!
O house-builder, you are seen!
You will not build this house again.
For your rafters are broken and your ridgepole shattered.
My mind has reached the Unconditioned; I have attained the destruction of craving.

Those who in youth have not led the holy life, or have failed to acquire wealth, languish like old cranes in the pond without fish.
Those who in youth have not lead the holy life, or have failed to acquire wealth, lie sighing over the past, like worn out arrows a bow.
All tremble at violence; all fear death.
Putting oneself in the place of another, one should not kill nor cause another to kill.
All tremble at violence; life is dear to all.
Putting oneself in the place of another, one should not kill nor cause another to kill.
One who, while himself seeking happiness, oppresses with violence other beings who also desire happiness, will not attain happiness hereafter.
One who, while himself seeking happiness, does not oppress with violence other beings who also desire happiness, will find happiness hereafter.
Speak not harshly to anyone, for those thus spoken to might retort.
Indeed, angry speech hurts, and retaliation may overtake you.
If, like a broken gong, you silence yourself, you have approached Nibbana, for vindictiveness is no longer in you.
Just as a cowherd drives the cattle to pasture with a staff, so do old age and death drive the life force of beings.
When the fool commits evil deeds, he does not realize.
The witless man is tormented by his own deeds, like one burnt by fire.
He who inflicts violence on those who are unarmed, and offends those who are inoffensive, will soon come upon one of these ten states:
- Sharp pain, or disaster, bodily injury, serious illness, or derangement of mind, trouble from the government, or grave charges, loss of relatives, or loss of wealth, or houses destroyed by ravaging fire; upon dissolution of the body that ignorant man is born in hell.
Neither going about naked, nor matted locks, nor filth, nor fasting, nor lying on the ground, nor smearing oneself with ashes and dust, nor sitting on the heels can purify a mortal who has not overcome doubt.
Even though he be well-attired, yet if he is poised, calm, controlled and established in the holy life, having set aside violence towards all beings — he, truly, is a holy man, a renunciate, a monk.
Only rarely is there a man in this world who, restrained by modesty, avoids reproach, as a thoroughbred horse avoids the whip.
Like a thoroughbred horse touched by the whip, be strenuous, be filled with spiritual yearning.
By faith and moral purity, by effort and meditation, by investigation of the truth, by being rich in knowledge and virtue, and by being mindful, destroy this unlimited suffering.
Irrigators regulate the waters, fletchers straighten arrow shafts, carpenters shape wood, and the good control themselves.
Hasten to do good; restrain your mind from evil.
He who is slow in doing good, his mind delights in evil.
Should a person commit evil, let him not do it again and again.
Let him not find pleasure therein, for painful is the accumulation of evil.
Should a person do good, let him do it again and again.
Let him find pleasure therein, for blissful is the accumulation of good.
It may be well with the evil-doer as long as the evil ripens not.
But when it does ripen, then the evil-doer sees his evil deeds.
It may be ill with the doer of good as long as the good ripens not.
But when it does ripen, then the doer of good sees his good deeds.
Think not lightly of evil, saying, “It will not come to me.” Drop by drop is the water pot filled.
Likewise, the fool, gathering it little by little, fills himself with evil.
Think not lightly of good, saying, “It will not come to me.” Drop by drop is the water pot filled.
Likewise, the wise man, gathering it little by little, fills himself with good.
Just as a trader with a small escort and great wealth would avoid a perilous route, or just as one desiring to live avoids poison, even so should one shun evil.
If on the hand there is no wound, one may carry even poison in it.
Poison does not affect one who is free from wounds.
For him who does no evil, there is no ill.
Like fine dust thrown against the wind, evil falls back upon that fool who offends an inoffensive, pure and guiltless man.
Some are born in the womb; the wicked are born in hell; the devout go to heaven; the stainless pass into Nibbana.
Neither in the sky nor in mid-ocean, nor by entering into mountain clefts, nowhere in the world is there a place where one may escape from the results of evil deeds.
Neither in the sky nor in mid-ocean, nor by entering into mountain clefts, nowhere in the world is there a place where one will not be overcome by death.
Better than a thousand useless words is one useful word, hearing which one attains peace.
Better than a thousand useless verses is one useful verse, hearing which one attains peace.
Better than reciting a hundred meaningless verses is the reciting of one verse of Dhamma, hearing which one attains peace.
Though one may conquer a thousand times a thousand men in battle, yet he indeed is the noblest victor who conquers himself.
-.
Self-conquest is far better than the conquest of others.
Not even a god, an angel, Mara or Brahma can turn into defeat the victory of a person who is self-subdued and ever restrained in conduct.

Though month after month for a hundred years one should offer sacrifices by the thousands, yet if only for a moment one should worship those of perfected minds that honor is indeed better than a century of sacrifice.
Though for a hundred years one should tend the sacrificial fire in the forest, yet if only for a moment one should worship those of perfected minds, that worship is indeed better than a century of sacrifice.
Whatever gifts and oblations one seeking merit might offer in this world for a whole year, all that is not worth one fourth of the merit gained by revering the Upright Ones, which is truly excellent.
To one ever eager to revere and serve the elders, these four blessing accrue: long life and beauty, happiness and power.
Better it is to live one day virtuous and meditative than to live a hundred years immoral and uncontrolled.
Better it is to live one day wise and meditative than to live a hundred years foolish and uncontrolled.
Better it is to live one day strenuous and resolute than to live a hundred years sluggish and dissipated.
Better it is to live one day seeing the rise and fall of things than to live a hundred years without ever seeing the rise and fall of things.
Better it is to live one day seeing the Deathless than to live a hundred years without ever seeing the Deathless.
Better it is to live one day seeing the Supreme Truth than to live a hundred years without ever seeing the Supreme Truth.
The fever of passion exists not for him who has completed the journey, who is sorrowless and wholly set free, and has broken all ties.
The mindful ones exert themselves.
They are not attached to any home; like swans that abandon the lake, they leave home after home behind.
Those who do not accumulate and are wise regarding food, whose object is the Void, the Unconditioned Freedom — their track cannot be traced, like that of birds in the air.
He whose cankers are destroyed and who is not attached to food, whose object is the Void, the Unconditioned Freedom — his path cannot be traced, like that of birds in the air.
Even the gods hold dear the wise one, whose senses are subdued like horses well trained by a charioteer, whose pride is destroyed and who is free from the cankers.
There is no more worldly existence for the wise one who, like the earth, resents nothing, who is firm as a high pillar and as pure as a deep pool free from mud.
Calm is his thought, calm his speech, and calm his deed, who, truly knowing, is wholly freed, perfectly tranquil and wise.
The man who is without blind faith, who knows the Uncreated, who has severed all links, destroyed all causes, and thrown out all desires — he, truly, is the most excellent of men.

Inspiring, indeed, is that place where Arahants dwell, be it a village, a forest, a vale, or a hill.
Inspiring are the forests in which worldlings find no pleasure.
There the passionless will rejoice, for they seek no sensual pleasures.
Should one find a man who points out faults and who reproves, let him follow such a wise and sagacious person as one would a guide to hidden treasure.
It is always better, and never worse, to cultivate such an association.
Let him admonish, instruct and shield one from wrong; he, indeed, is dear to the good and detestable to the evil.
Do not associate with evil companions; do not seek the fellowship of the vile.
Associate with the good friends; seek the fellowship of noble men.
He who drinks deep the Dhamma lives happily with a tranquil mind.
The wise man ever delights in the Dhamma made known by the Noble One.
Irrigators regulate the rivers; fletchers straighten the arrow shaft; carpenters shape the wood; the wise control themselves.
Just as a solid rock is not shaken by the storm, even so the wise are not affected by praise or blame.
On hearing the Teachings, the wise become perfectly purified, like a lake deep, clear and still.
The good renounce everything.
The virtuous do not prattle with a yearning for pleasures.
The wise show no elation or depression when touched by happiness or sorrow.
He is indeed virtuous, wise, and righteous who neither for his own sake nor for the sake of another, who does not crave for sons, wealth, or kingdom, and does not desire success by unjust means.
Few among men are those who cross to the farther shore.
The rest, the bulk of men, only run up and down the hither bank.
But those who act according to the perfectly taught Dhamma will cross the realm of Death, so difficult to cross.
-.
Abandoning the dark way, let the wise man cultivate the bright path.
Having gone from home to homelessness, let him yearn for that delight in detachment, so difficult to enjoy.
Giving up sensual pleasures, with no attachment, let the wise man cleanse himself of defilements of the mind.
Those whose minds have reached full excellence in the factors of enlightenment, who, having renounced acquisitiveness, rejoice in not clinging to things — rid of cankers, glowing with wisdom, they have attained Nibbana in this very life.

Long is the night to the sleepless; long is the league to the weary.
Long is worldly existence to fools who know not the Sublime Truth.
Should a seeker not find a companion who is better or equal, let him resolutely pursue a solitary course; there is no fellowship with the fool.
The fool worries, thinking, “I have sons, I have wealth.” Indeed, when he himself is not his own, whence are sons, whence is wealth?
A fool who knows his foolishness is wise at least to that extent, but a fool who thinks himself wise is a fool indeed.
Though all his life a fool associates with a wise man, he no more comprehends the Truth than a spoon tastes the flavor of the soup.
Though only for a moment a discerning person associates with a wise man, quickly he comprehends the Truth, just as the tongue tastes the flavor of the soup.
Fools of little wit are enemies unto themselves as they move about doing evil deeds, the fruits of which are bitter.
Ill done is that action of doing which one repents later, and the fruit of which one, weeping, reaps with tears.
Well done is that action of doing which one repents not later, and the fruit of which one reaps with delight and happiness.
So long as an evil deed has not ripened, the fool thinks it as sweet as honey.
But when the evil deed ripens, the fool comes to grief.
Month after month a fool may eat his food with the tip of a blade of grass, but he still is not worth a sixteenth part of the those who have comprehended the Truth.
Truly, an evil deed committed does not immediately bear fruit, like milk that does not turn sour all at once.
But smoldering, it follows the fool like fire covered by ashes.
To his own ruin the fool gains knowledge, for it cleaves his head and destroys his innate goodness.
The fool seeks undeserved reputation, precedence among monks, authority over monasteries, and honor among householders.
“Let both laymen and monks think that it was done by me.
In every work, great and small, let them follow me” — such is the ambition of the fool; thus his desire and pride increase.
One is the quest for worldly gain, and quite another is the path to Nibbana.
Clearly understanding this, let not the monk, the disciple of the Buddha, be carried away by worldly acclaim, but develop detachment instead.
Just as a fletcher straightens an arrow shaft, even so the discerning man straightens his mind — so fickle and unsteady, so difficult to guard.
As a fish when pulled out of water and cast on land throbs and quivers, even so is this mind agitated.
Hence should one abandon the realm of Mara.
Wonderful, indeed, it is to subdue the mind, so difficult to subdue, ever swift, and seizing whatever it desires.
A tamed mind brings happiness.
Let the discerning man guard the mind, so difficult to detect and extremely subtle, seizing whatever it desires.
A guarded mind brings happiness.
Dwelling in the cave, the mind, without form, wanders far and alone.
Those who subdue this mind are liberated from the bonds of Mara.
Wisdom never becomes perfect in one whose mind is not steadfast, who knows not the Good Teaching and whose faith wavers.
There is no fear for an awakened one, whose mind is not sodden nor afflicted, and who has gone beyond both merit and demerit.

Realizing that this body is as fragile as a clay pot, and fortifying this mind like a well-fortified city, fight out Mara with the sword of wisdom.
Then, guarding the conquest, remain unattached.
Ere long, alas!
this body will lie upon the earth, unheeded and lifeless, like a useless log.
Whatever harm an enemy may do to an enemy, or a hater to a hater, an ill-directed mind inflicts on oneself a greater harm.
Neither mother, father, nor any other relative can do one greater good than one's own well-directed mind.
Who shall overcome this earth, this realm of Yama and this sphere of men and gods?
Who shall bring to perfection the well-taught path of wisdom as an expert garland-maker would his floral design?
A striver-on-the path shall overcome this earth, this realm of Yama and this sphere of men and gods.
The striver-on-the-path shall bring to perfection the well-taught path of wisdom, as an expert garland-maker would his floral design.

Realizing that this body is like froth, penetrating its mirage-like nature, and plucking out Mara's flower-tipped arrows of sensuality, go beyond sight of the King of Death!
As a mighty flood sweeps away the sleeping village, so death carries away the person of distracted mind who only plucks the flowers.
The Destroyer brings under his sway the person of distracted mind who, insatiate in sense desires, only plucks the flowers.
As a bee gathers honey from the flower without injuring its color or fragrance, even so the sage goes on his alms-round in the village.

Let none find fault with others; let none see the omissions and commissions of others.
But let one see one's own acts, done and undone.
Like a beautiful flower full of color but without fragrance, even so, fruitless are the fair words of one who does not practice them.
Like a beautiful flower full of color and also fragrant, even so, fruitful are the fair words of one who practices them.
As from a great heap of flowers many garlands can be made, even so should many good deeds be done by one born a mortal.
Not the sweet smell of flowers, not even the fragrance of sandal, tagara, or jasmine blows against the wind.
But the fragrance of the virtuous blows against the wind.
Truly the virtuous man pervades all directions with the fragrance of his virtue.

Of all the fragrances — sandal, tagara, blue lotus and jasmine — the fragrance of virtue is the sweetest.
Faint is the fragrance of tagara and sandal, but excellent is the fragrance of the virtuous, wafting even amongst the gods.
Mara never finds the path of the truly virtuous, who abide in heedfulness and are freed by perfect knowledge.
Upon a heap of rubbish in the road-side ditch blooms a lotus, fragrant and pleasing.
Even so, on the rubbish heap of blinded mortals the disciple of the Supremely Enlightened One shines resplendent in wisdom.
Heedfulness is the path to the Deathless.
Heedlessness is the path to death.
The heedful die not.
The heedless are as if dead already.

Clearly understanding this excellence of heedfulness, the wise exult therein and enjoy the resort of the Noble Ones.

The wise ones, ever meditative and steadfastly persevering, alone experience Nibbana, the incomparable freedom from bondage.
Ever grows the glory of him who is energetic, mindful and pure in conduct, discerning and self-controlled, righteous and heedful.
By effort and heedfulness, discipline and self-mastery, let the wise one make for himself an island which no flood can overwhelm.
The foolish and ignorant indulge in heedlessness, but the wise one keeps his heedfulness as his best treasure.
Do not give way to heedlessness.
Do not indulge in sensual pleasures.
Only the heedful and meditative attain great happiness.
Just as one upon the summit of a mountain beholds the groundlings, even so when the wise man casts away heedlessness by heedfulness and ascends the high tower of wisdom, this sorrowless sage beholds the sorrowing and foolish multitude.
Heedful among the heedless, wide-awake among the sleepy, the wise man advances like a swift horse leaving behind a weak jade.
By Heedfulness did Indra become the overlord of the gods.
Heedfulness is ever praised, and heedlessness ever despised.

The monk who delights in heedfulness and looks with fear at heedlessness advances like fire, burning all fetters, small and large.
The monk who delights in heedfulness and looks with fear at heedlessness will not fall.
He is close to Nibbana.
Mind precedes all mental states.
Mind is their chief; they are all mind-wrought.
If with an impure mind a person speaks or acts suffering follows him like the wheel that follows the foot of the ox.
Mind precedes all mental states.
Mind is their chief; they are all mind-wrought.
If with a pure mind a person speaks or acts happiness follows him like his never-departing shadow.
“He abused me, he struck me, he overpowered me, he robbed me.” Those who harbor such thoughts do not still their hatred.
“He abused me, he struck me, he overpowered me, he robbed me.” Those who do not harbor such thoughts still their hatred.
Hatred is never appeased by hatred in this world.
By non-hatred alone is hatred appeased.
This is a law eternal.
There are those who do not realize that one day we all must die.
But those who do realize this settle their quarrels.
Just as a storm throws down a weak tree, so does Mara overpower the man who lives for the pursuit of pleasures, who is uncontrolled in his senses, immoderate in eating, indolent, and dissipated.

Just as a storm cannot prevail against a rocky mountain, so Mara can never overpower the man who lives meditating on the impurities, who is controlled in his senses, moderate in eating, and filled with faith and earnest effort.

Whoever being depraved, devoid of self-control and truthfulness, should don the monk's yellow robe, he surely is not worthy of the robe.
But whoever is purged of depravity, well-established in virtues and filled with self-control and truthfulness, he indeed is worthy of the yellow robe.
Those who mistake the unessential to be essential and the essential to be unessential, dwelling in wrong thoughts, never arrive at the essential.
Those who know the essential to be essential and the unessential to be unessential, dwelling in right thoughts, do arrive at the essential.
Just as rain breaks through an ill-thatched house, so passion penetrates an undeveloped mind.
Just as rain does not break through a well-thatched house, so passion never penetrates a well-developed mind.
The evil-doer grieves here and hereafter; he grieves in both the worlds.
He laments and is afflicted, recollecting his own impure deeds.
The doer of good rejoices here and hereafter; he rejoices in both the worlds.
He rejoices and exults, recollecting his own pure deeds.
The evil-doer suffers here and hereafter; he suffers in both the worlds.
The thought, “Evil have I done,” torments him, and he suffers even more when gone to realms of woe.
The doer of good delights here and hereafter; he delights in both the worlds.
The thought, “Good have I done,” delights him, and he delights even more when gone to realms of bliss.
Much though he recites the sacred texts, but acts not accordingly, that heedless man is like a cowherd who only counts the cows of others — he does not partake of the blessings of the holy life.
Little though he recites the sacred texts, but puts the Teaching into practice, forsaking lust, hatred, and delusion, with true wisdom and emancipated mind, clinging to nothing of this or any other world — he indeed partakes of the blessings of a holy life.
Once the Blessed One was staying at Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove near the Squirrels' Feeding Place.
Now the brahman Akkosa Bharadvaja heard this: “The brahman Bharadvaja, it seems, has become a monk under the Great Monk Gotama.” Angry and unhappy, he went to where the Blessed One was.
Having approached the Blessed One, he abused and criticized the Blessed One in foul and harsh words.
Thus reviled, the Blessed One spoke to the brahman Akkosa Bharadvaja: 'Well, brahman, do friends, confidants, relatives, kinsmen and guests visit you?
“Yes, Gotama, sometimes friends, confidants, relatives, kinsmen and guests do visit me.
“Well, brahman, do you not offer them snacks or food or tidbits?
“Yes, Gotama, sometimes I do offer them snacks or food or tidbits.
“But if, brahman, they do not accept it, who gets it?
“If Gotama, they do not accept it, I get it back.
“Even so, brahman, you are abusing us who do not abuse, you are angry with us who do not get angry, you are quarreling with us who do not quarrel.
All this of yours we don't accept.
You alone, brahman, get it back; all this, brahman, belongs to you.
“When, brahman, one abuses back when abused, repays anger in kind, and quarrels back when quarreled with, this is called, brahman, associating with each other and exchanging mutually.
This association and mutual exchange we do not engage in.
Therefore you alone, brahman, get it back; all this, brahman, belongs to you.
“People, including the king, know the Venerable Gotama thus: 'The Monk Gotama is the Worthy One.' When does the Venerable Gotama become angry?
Said the Buddha:
When the Lord proclaimed this, the brahman Akkosa Bharadvaja said this to the Blessed One: “Wonderful, indeed, O Venerable Gotama!
Herewith I go to the Venerable Gotama for refuge, to his Teaching and to his Holy Order of Monks.
Most venerable sir, may I have the privilege to receive at the hands of the revered Lord Gotama the initial monastic ordination and also the higher ordination of a bhikkhu.
And the brahman Akkosa Bharadvaja received at the hands of the Blessed One the initial monastic ordination and he also received the higher ordination of a bhikkhu.
And within a short time of his ordination, the Venerable Akkosa Bharadvaja, living alone, secluded, diligent, zealous and unrelenting, reached that incomparable consummation of holiness for which sons of noble families, having totally abandoned the household life, take to the life of homelessness.
With direct knowledge he realized the ultimate, then and there, and lived having access to it.
He saw with his supernormal vision: “Ceased is rebirth, lived is the holy life, completed is the spiritual task and henceforth there is nothing higher to be achieved.
The Venerable Akkosa Bharadvaja, indeed, became one of the Arahats.
While staying at Savatthi the Exalted One said:
“The destruction of the cankers, monks, is for one who knows and sees, I say, not for one who does not know and does not see.
Knowing what, seeing what does the destruction of the cankers occur?
'Such is material form, such is the arising of material form, such is the passing away of material form.
Such is feeling… perception… mental formations… consciousness; such is the arising of consciousness, such is the passing away of consciousness' — for one who knows and sees this, monks, the destruction of the cankers occurs.
“The knowledge of destruction with respect to destruction has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for the knowledge of destruction?
'Emancipation' should be the reply.
“Emancipation, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for emancipation?
'Dispassion' should be the reply.
“Dispassion, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for dispassion?
'Disenchantment' should be the reply.
“Disenchantment, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for disenchantment?
'The knowledge and vision of things as they really are' should be the reply.
“The knowledge and vision of things as they really are, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for the knowledge and vision of things as they really are?
'Concentration' should be the reply.
“Concentration, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for concentration?
'Happiness' should be the reply.
“Happiness, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for happiness?
'Tranquillity' should be the reply.
“Tranquillity, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for tranquillity?
'Rapture' should be the reply.
“Rapture, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for rapture?
'Joy' should be the reply.
“Joy, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for joy?
'Faith' should be the reply.
“Faith, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for faith?
'Suffering' should be the reply.
“Suffering, monks, also has a supporting condition, I say, it does not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for suffering?
'Birth' should be the reply.
“And what is the supporting condition for birth?.
'Existence' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for existence?
'Clinging' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for clinging?
'Craving' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for craving?
'Feeling' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for feeling?
'Contact' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for contact?
'The sixfold sense base' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for the sixfold sense base?
'Mentality-materiality' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for mentality-materiality?
'Consciousness' should be the reply.
“What is the supporting condition for consciousness?
'Kamma formations' should be the reply.
“Kamma formations, monks, also have a supporting condition, I say, they do not lack a supporting condition.
And what is the supporting condition for kamma formations?
'Ignorance' should be the reply.
“Thus, monks, ignorance is the supporting condition for kamma formations, kamma formations are the supporting condition for consciousness, consciousness is the supporting condition for mentality-materiality, mentality-materiality is the supporting condition for the sixfold sense base, the sixfold sense base is the supporting condition for contact, contact is the supporting condition for feeling, feeling is the supporting condition for craving, craving is the supporting condition for clinging, clinging is the supporting condition for existence, existence is the supporting condition for birth, birth is the supporting condition for suffering, suffering is the supporting condition for faith, faith is the supporting condition for joy, joy is the supporting condition for rapture, rapture is the supporting condition for tranquillity, tranquillity is the supporting condition for happiness, happiness is the supporting condition for concentration, concentration is the supporting condition for the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are is the supporting condition for disenchantment, disenchantment is the supporting condition for dispassion, dispassion is the supporting condition for emancipation, and emancipation is the supporting condition for the knowledge of the destruction.
“Just as, monks, when rain descends heavily upon some mountaintop, the water flows down along with the slope, and fills the clefts, gullies, and creeks; these being filled fill up the pools; these being filled fill up the ponds; these being filled fill up the streams; these being filled fill up the rivers; and the rivers being filled fill up the great ocean — in the same way, monks, ignorance is the supporting condition for kamma formations, kamma formations are the supporting condition for consciousness, consciousness is the supporting condition for mentality-materiality, mentality-materiality is the supporting condition for the sixfold sense base, the sixfold sense base is the supporting condition for contact, contact is the supporting condition for feeling, feeling is the supporting condition for craving, craving is the supporting condition for clinging, clinging is the supporting condition for existence, existence is the supporting condition for birth, birth is the supporting condition for suffering, suffering is the supporting condition for faith, faith is the supporting condition for joy, joy is the supporting condition for rapture, rapture is the supporting condition for tranquillity, tranquillity is the supporting condition for happiness, happiness is the supporting condition for concentration, concentration is the supporting condition for the knowledge and vision of things as they really are, the knowledge and vision of things as they really are is the supporting condition for disenchantment, disenchantment is the supporting condition for dispassion, dispassion is the supporting condition for emancipation, and emancipation is the supporting condition for the knowledge of the destruction.”
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Vajira dressed and, taking bowl and robe, entered Savatthi for alms.
When she had walked for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Blind Men's Grove for the day's abiding.
Having plunged into the Blind Men's Grove, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in the bhikkhuni Vajira, desiring to make her fall away from concentration, approached her and addressed her in verse:
Then it occurred to the bhikkhuni Vajira: “Now who is this that recited the verse — a human being or a non-human being?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited the verse desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in me, desiring to make me fall away from concentration.
Then the bhikkhuni Vajira, having understood, “This is Mara the Evil One,” replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Vajira knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Sela dressed… she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in the bhikkhuni Sela, desiring to make her fall away from concentration, approached her and addressed her in verse:
Then it occurred to the bhikkhuni Sela: “Now who is this…?
This is Mara the Evil One… desiring to make me fall away from concentration.
Then the bhikkhuni Sela, having understood, “This is Mara the Evil One,” replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Sela knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Sisupacala dressed… she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One approached the bhikkhuni Sisupacala and said to her: “Whose creed do you approve of, bhikkhuni?
“I don't approve of anyone's creed, friend.
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Sisupacala knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Upacala dressed… she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One approached the bhikkhuni Upacala and said to her: “Where do you wish to be reborn, bhikkhuni?
“I do not wish to be reborn anywhere, friend.
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Upacala knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Cala dressed… she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One approached the bhikkhuni Cala and said to her: “What don't you approve of, bhikkhuni?
“I don't approve of birth, friend.
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Cala knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Uppalavanna dressed… she stood at the foot of a sala tree in full flower.
Then Mara the Evil One, desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in the bhikkhuni Uppalavanna, desiring to make her fall away from concentration, approached her and addressed her in verse:
Then it occurred to the bhikkhuni Uppalavanna: “Now who is this…?
This is Mara the Evil One… desiring to make me fall away from concentration.
Then the bhikkhuni Uppalavanna, having understood, “This is Mara the Evil One,” replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Uppalavanna knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Vijaya dressed… she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then it occurred to the bhikkhuni Vijaya: “Now who is this…?
This is Mara the Evil One… desiring to make me fall away from concentration.
Then the bhikkhuni Vijaya, having understood, “This is Mara the Evil One,” replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing “The bhikkhuni Vijaya knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Soma dressed and, taking bowl and robe, entered Savatthi for alms.
When she had walked for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Blind Men's Grove for the day's abiding.
Having plunged into the Blind Men's Grove, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in the bhikkhuni Soma, desiring to make her fall away from concentration, approached her and addressed her in verse:
Then it occurred to the bhikkhuni Soma: “Now who is this that recited the verse — a human being or a non-human being?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited the verse desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in me, desiring to make me fall away from concentration.
Then the bhikkhuni Soma, having understood, “This is Mara the Evil One,” replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Soma knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Setting at Savatthi.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Kisagotami dressed and, taking bowl and robe, entered Savatthi for alms.
When she had walked for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Blind Men's Grove for the day's abiding.
Having plunged into the Blind Men's Grove, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in the bhikkhuni Kisagotami, desiring to make her fall away from concentration, approached her and addressed her in verse:
Then it occurred to the bhikkhuni Kisagotami: “Now who is this that recited the verse — a human being or a non-human being?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited the verse desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in me, desiring to make me fall away from concentration.
Then the bhikkhuni Kisagotami, having understood, “This is Mara the Evil One,” replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Kisagotami knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
Thus have I heard.
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's Park.
Then, in the morning, the bhikkhuni Alavika dressed and, taking bowl and robe, entered Savatthi for alms.
When she had walked for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Blind Men's Grove seeking seclusion.
Then Mara the Evil One, desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in the bhikkhuni Alavika, desiring to make her fall away from seclusion, approached her and addressed her in verse:
Then it occurred to the bhikkhuni Alavika: “Now who is it that recited the verse — a human being or a non-human being?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited the verse desiring to arouse fear, trepidation, and terror in me, desiring to make me fall away from seclusion.
Then the bhikkhuni Alavika, having understood, “This is Mara the Evil One,” replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One, realizing, “The bhikkhuni Alavika knows me,” sad and disappointed, disappeared right there.
I have heard that on one occasion, the Blessed One was staying at Uruvelā on the bank of the Nerañjarā River at the root of the Bodhi tree — the tree of awakening — newly awakened.
And on that occasion he sat at the root of the Bodhi tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
Then, with the passing of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, in the first watch of the night, he gave close attention to dependent co-arising in forward order, thus:
In other words:
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
Notice that dependent co-arising is expressed in terms of processes — of events and actions — without reference to a framework containing those processes.
In other words, it doesn't mention the existence or non-existence of agents doing the actions, or of a framework in time and space in which these processes happen.
Thus it makes possible a way of understanding the causes of suffering and stress without reference to the existence or non-existence of an “I” or an “other” responsible for those events.
Instead, the events are viewed simply as events in the context of the process — a way of viewing that makes it possible to abandon clinging for any of these events, so as to bring suffering to an end.
Even the idea of an “I” or an “other” is seen simply as part of the process.
This is what makes possible the abandoning of any attachment to the conceit “I am,” as mentioned in Ud:,:,:, and:.
In this way, the treatment of dependent co-arising in the first three udānas, while terse, actually sets the stage for understanding some of the more paradoxical teachings that appear later in the collection.
For a discussion of dependent co-arising in general, see The Shape of Suffering.
For further discussion of its role in framing and abandoning thoughts of “I am,” see Skill in Questions, chapters and.
I have heard that on one occasion, the Blessed One was staying at Uruvelā on the bank of the Nerañjarā River at the root of the Bodhi tree — the tree of awakening — newly awakened.
And on that occasion he sat at the root of the Bodhi tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
Then, with the passing of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, in the second watch of the night, he gave close attention to dependent co-arising in reverse order, thus:
In other words:
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
On one occasion Ven.
Sabhiya Kaccana was staying at Ñatika in the Brick Hall.
Then Vacchagotta the wanderer went to him and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sabhiya Kaccana, “Now then, Master Kaccana, does the Tathagata exist after death?
“Vaccha, that has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata exists after death.' “Well then, Master Kaccana, does the Tathagata not exist after death?
“Vaccha, that too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata does not exist after death.' “Then does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?
“That has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.' “Well then, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?
“That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.' “Now, Master Kaccana, when asked if the Tathagata exists after death, you say, 'That has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata exists after death.”' When asked if the Tathagata does not exist after death, you say, 'That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata does not exist after death.”' When asked if the Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death, you say, 'That has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.”' When asked if the Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death, you say, 'That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.”' Now, what is the cause, what is the reason, why that has not been declared by Gotama the contemplative?
“Vaccha, whatever cause, whatever reason there would be for describing him as 'possessed of form' or 'formless' or 'percipient' or 'non-percipient' or 'neither percipient nor non-percipient': If that cause, that reason, were to cease totally everywhere, totally in every way without remainder, then describing him by what means would one describe him as 'possessed of form' or 'formless' or 'percipient' or 'non-percipient' or 'neither percipient nor non-percipient'?
“How long has it been since you went forth, Master Kaccana?
“Not long, my friend.
Three years.
“Whoever has gained just this much in this much time has gained a great deal, my friend — to say nothing of the things he has thus gone beyond.
See also: other suttas in the Avyakata Samyutta; AN..
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans near Kapilavatthu in Nigrodha's Park.
Then Nandiya the Sakyan went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, the disciple of the noble ones in whom the factors of stream entry are altogether & in every way lacking: Is he called a disciple of the noble ones who lives heedlessly?
“Nandiya, the person in whom the factors of stream entry are altogether & in every way lacking I call an outsider, one who stands in the faction of the run-of-the-mill.
But as to how a disciple of the noble ones lives heedlessly and heedfully, listen well and pay attention, I will speak “As you say, lord,” Nandiya the Sakyan responded.
The Blessed One said, “And how, Nandiya, does a disciple of the noble ones live heedlessly?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Awakened One: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' Content with that verified confidence in the Awakened One, he does not exert himself further in solitude by day or seclusion by night.
For him, living thus heedlessly, there is no joy.
There being no joy, there is no rapture.
There being no rapture, there is no serenity.
There being no serenity, he dwells in pain.
When pained, the mind does not become centered.
When the mind is uncentered, phenomena do not become manifest.
When phenomena are not manifest, he is reckoned simply as one who dwells heedlessly.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma: 'The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.' Content with that verified confidence in the Dhamma, he does not exert himself further in solitude by day or seclusion by night.
For him, living thus heedlessly, there is no joy.
There being no joy, there is no rapture.
There being no rapture, there is no serenity.
There being no serenity, he dwells in pain.
When pained, the mind does not become centered.
When the mind is uncentered, phenomena do not become manifest.
When phenomena are not manifest, he is reckoned simply as one who dwells heedlessly.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Sangha: 'The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four types of noble disciples when taken as pairs, the eight when taken as individual types — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.' Content with that verified confidence in the Sangha, he does not exert himself further in solitude by day or seclusion by night.
For him, living thus heedlessly, there is no joy.
There being no joy, there is no rapture.
There being no rapture, there is no serenity.
There being no serenity, he dwells in pain.
When pained, the mind does not become centered.
When the mind is uncentered, phenomena do not become manifest.
When phenomena are not manifest, he is reckoned simply as one who dwells heedlessly.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones is endowed with virtues that are appealing to the noble ones: untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration.
Content with those virtues pleasing to the noble ones, he does not exert himself further in solitude by day or seclusion by night.
For him, living thus heedlessly, there is no joy.
There being no joy, there is no rapture.
There being no rapture, there is no serenity.
There being no serenity, he dwells in pain.
When pained, the mind does not become centered.
When the mind is uncentered, phenomena do not become manifest.
When phenomena are not manifest, he is reckoned simply as one who dwells heedlessly.
“This is how a disciple of the noble ones lives heedlessly.
“And how, Nandiya, does a disciple of the noble ones live heedfully?
There is the case where a disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Awakened One… Not content with that verified confidence in the Awakened One, he exerts himself further in solitude by day or seclusion by night.
For him, living thus heedfully, joy arises.
In one who has joy, rapture arises.
In one who has rapture, the body becomes serene.
When the body is serene, one feels pleasure.
Feeling pleasure, the mind becomes centered.
When the mind is centered, phenomena become manifest.
When phenomena are manifest, he is reckoned as one who dwells heedfully.
“Furthermore, the disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma… verified confidence in the Sangha… virtues that are appealing to the noble ones: untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration.
Not content with those virtues pleasing to the noble ones, he exerts himself further in solitude by day or seclusion by night.
For him, living thus heedfully, joy arises.
In one who has joy, rapture arises.
In one who has rapture, the body becomes serene.
When the body is serene, one feels pleasure.
Feeling pleasure, the mind becomes centered.
When the mind is centered, phenomena become manifest.
When phenomena are manifest, he is reckoned as one who dwells heedfully.
“This is how a disciple of the noble ones lives heedfully.
See also: SN.; SN..
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Ajjheya on the bank of the river Ganges.
He saw a large log being carried along by the current near the bank of the river Ganges, and on seeing it said to the monks: “Monks, do you see that large log being carried along by the current of the river Ganges?
“Yes, lord.
“Monks, if that log doesn't veer toward the near shore, doesn't veer toward the far shore, doesn't sink in the middle, doesn't get washed up on high ground, doesn't get snared by human beings, doesn't get snared by non-human beings, doesn't get snared in a whirlpool, and doesn't become rotten inside, it will tend to the ocean, tilt to the ocean, incline to the ocean.
Why is that?
Because the current of the river Ganges tends to the ocean, tilts to the ocean, inclines to the ocean.
“In the same way, monks, if you don't veer toward the near shore, don't veer toward the far shore, don't sink in the middle, don't get washed up on high ground, don't get snared by human beings, don't get snared by non-human beings, don't get snared in a whirlpool, and don't become rotten inside, you will tend to Unbinding, tilt to Unbinding, incline to Unbinding.
Why is that?
Because right view tends to Unbinding, tilts to Unbinding, inclines to Unbinding.
When this was said, a certain monk addressed the Blessed One: “What, lord, is the near shore?
What is the far shore?
What is sinking in the middle?
What is being washed up on high ground?
What is being snared by human beings?
What is being snared by non-human beings?
What is being snared by a whirlpool?
What is becoming rotten inside?
“'The near shore,' monks, stands for the six internal sense media.
'The far shore' stands for the six external sense media.
'Sinking in the middle' stands for passion & delight.
'Being washed up on high ground' stands for the conceit, 'I am.'
“And what, monks, is being snared by human beings?
There is the case where a monk lives entangled with householders, delighting with them and sorrowing with them, happy when they are happy, pained when they are in pain, taking on their affairs as his own duty.
This is called being snared by human beings.
“And what, monks, is being snared by non-human beings?
There is the case where a certain monk lives the holy life in hopes of a certain company of devas, 'By means of this virtue or practice or austerity or holy life I will become one sort of deva or another.' This is called being snared by non-human beings.
“'Being snared by a whirlpool' stands for the five strings of sensuality.
” And what, monks, is becoming rotten inside?
There is the case where a certain monk is unprincipled, evil, unclean and suspect in his undertakings, hidden in his actions, not a contemplative though claiming to be one, not leading the holy life though claiming to do so, inwardly rotten, oozing with desire, filthy by nature.
This is called becoming rotten inside.
Now at that time Nanda the cowherd was standing not far from the Blessed One.
Then he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, I don't veer toward the near shore, I don't veer toward the far shore, I won't sink in the middle, I won't get washed up on high ground, I won't get snared by human beings, I won't get snared by non-human beings, I won't get snared in a whirlpool, and I won't become rotten inside.
It would be good, lord, if I could obtain the Going-forth, if I could obtain the Full Acceptance.
“In that case, Nanda, lead the cows back to their owners.
“The cows will go back, lord, out of attachment for their calves.
“Lead the cows back to their owners, Nanda.
Then, having led the cows back to their owners, Nanda the cowherd went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, told him, “The cows, lord, have been led back to their owners.
Let me obtain the Going-forth in the Blessed One's presence!
Let me obtain the Full Acceptance!
So Nanda the cowherd obtained the Going-forth in the Blessed One's presence, he obtained the Full Acceptance.
And not long after his Acceptance — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus Ven.
Nanda became another one of the arahants.
I have heard that on one occasion, the Blessed One was staying at Uruvelā on the bank of the Nerañjarā River at the root of the Bodhi tree — the tree of awakening — newly awakened.
And on that occasion he sat at the root of the Bodhi tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
Then, with the passing of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, he surveyed the world with the eye of an Awakened One.
As he did so, he saw living beings burning with the many fevers and aflame with the many fires born of passion, aversion, & delusion.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, he on that occasion exclaimed:
Whatever contemplatives or brahmans say that liberation from becoming is by means of becoming, all of them are not released from becoming, I say.
And whatever contemplatives or brahmans say that escape from becoming is by means of non-becoming, all of them have not escaped from becoming, I say.
I have heard that on one occasion, the Blessed One was staying at Uruvelā on the bank of the Nerañjarā River at the root of the Muccalinda tree, newly awakened.
And on that occasion he sat for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
And on that occasion a great, out-of-season storm-cloud rose up, with seven days of rainy weather, cold winds, & intense darkness.
Then Muccalinda the nāga king — leaving his dwelling place and encircling the Blessed One's body seven times with his coils — stood with his great hood spread over the Blessed One, “Don't let the Blessed One be disturbed by cold.
Don't let the Blessed One be disturbed by heat.
Don't let the Blessed One be disturbed by the touch of flies, mosquitoes, wind, sun, & creeping things.
Then, with the passing of seven days, the Blessed One emerged from that concentration.
Muccalinda the nāga king, realizing that the sky had cleared and was free of clouds, unraveled his coils from the body of the Blessed One, dropped his own appearance and, assuming the appearance of a young man, stood in front of the Blessed One with hands before his heart, paying homage.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rājagaha at the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
And on that occasion Ven.
Sāriputta and Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna were staying in Pigeon Cave.
Then, on a moonlit night, Ven.
Sāriputta — his head newly shaven — was sitting in the open air, having attained a certain level of concentration.
And on that occasion two yakkhas who were companions were flying from north to south on some business or other.
They saw Ven.
Sāriputta — his head newly shaven — sitting in the open air.
Seeing him, the first yakkha said to the second, “I'm inspired to give this contemplative a blow on the head.
When this was said, the second yakkha said to the first, “Enough of that, my good friend.
Don't lay a hand on the contemplative.
He's an outstanding contemplative, of great power & great might.
A second time, the first yakkha said to the second, “I'm inspired to give this contemplative a blow on the head.
A second time, the second yakkha said to the first, “Enough of that, my good friend.
Don't lay a hand on the contemplative.
He's an outstanding contemplative, of great power & great might.
A third time, the first yakkha said to the second, “I'm inspired to give this contemplative a blow on the head.
A third time, the second yakkha said to the first, “Enough of that, my good friend.
Don't lay a hand on the contemplative.
He's an outstanding contemplative, of great power & great might.
Then the first yakkha, ignoring the second yakkha, gave Ven.
Sāriputta a blow on the head.
And with that blow he might have knocked over an elephant seven or eight cubits tall, or split a great rocky crag.
But right there the yakkha — yelling, “I'm burning!” — fell into the Great Hell.
Now, Ven.
Moggallāna — with his divine eye, pure and surpassing the human — saw the yakkha give Ven.
Sāriputta a blow on the head.
Seeing this, he went to Ven.
Sāriputta and, on arrival, said to him, “I hope you are well, friend Sāriputta.
I hope you are comfortable.
I hope you are feeling no pain.
“I am well, friend Moggallāna.
I am comfortable.
But I do have a slight headache.
“How amazing, friend Sāriputta!
How astounding!
How great your power & might!
Just now a yakkha gave you a blow on the head.
So great was that blow that he might have knocked over an elephant seven or eight cubits tall, or split a great rocky crag.
But all you say is this: 'I am well, friend Moggallāna.
I am comfortable.
But I do have a slight headache'!
“How amazing, friend Moggallāna!
How astounding!
How great your power & might!
Where you saw a yakkha just now, I didn't even see a dust devil!
The Blessed One — with the divine ear-property, pure and surpassing the human — heard those two great beings conversing in this way.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
A variant of this verse is attributed to Ven.
Khitaka at Thag.:
Then Vacchagotta the wanderer went to Ven.
Maha Moggallana and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Maha Moggallana, “Now then, Master Moggallana, is the cosmos eternal?
“That has not been declared by the Blessed One, Vaccha: 'The cosmos is eternal.' “Well then, Master Moggallana, is the cosmos not eternal?
“Vaccha, that too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The cosmos is not eternal.' “Then is the cosmos finite?”… “Is the cosmos infinite?”… “Is the body the same as the soul?”… “Is the body one thing, and the soul another?”… “Does the Tathagata exist after death?”… “Does the Tathagata not exist after death?”… “Does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?”… “Does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?
“Vaccha, that too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.
“Now, Master Moggallana, what is the cause, what is the reason why — when wanderers of other sects are asked in this way, they answer that 'The cosmos is eternal' or 'The cosmos is not eternal' or 'The cosmos is finite' or 'The cosmos is infinite' or 'The body is the same as the soul' or 'The body is one thing and the soul another' or 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death” or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death,' yet when Gotama the contemplative is asked in this way, he does not answer that 'The cosmos is eternal' or 'The cosmos is not eternal' or 'The cosmos is finite' or 'The cosmos is infinite' or 'The body is the same as the soul' or 'The body is one thing and the soul another' or 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death” or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death'?
“Vaccha, the members of other sects assume of the eye that 'This is mine, this is my self, this is what I am.' They assume of the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… the intellect that 'This is mine, this is my self, this is what I am.' That is why, when asked in this way, they answer that 'The cosmos is eternal'… or that 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.' But the Tathagata, worthy and rightly self-awakened, does not assume of the eye that 'This is mine, this is my self, this is what I am.' He does not assume of the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body… the intellect that 'This is mine, this is my self, this is what I am.' That is why, when asked in this way, he does not answer that 'The cosmos is eternal'… or that 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.' Then Vacchagotta the wanderer, getting up from his seat, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he.
“Amazing, Master Gotama!
Astounding!
How the meaning and phrasing of the teacher and disciple agree, coincide, and do not diverge from one another with regard to the supreme teaching!
Just now, Master Gotama, I went to the contemplative Moggallana and, on arrival, asked him about this matter, and he answered me with the same words, the same phrasing, as Master Gotama.
Amazing, Master Gotama!
Astounding!
How the meaning and phrasing of the teacher and disciple agree, coincide, and do not diverge from one another with regard to the supreme teaching!
See also: other suttas in the Avyakata Samyutta; AN..
On viewing the world as void, see S.XXXV..
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Park.
Now at that time a new reception hall had just been built by the Kapilavatthu Sakyans, and it had not yet been dwelled in by any contemplative, brahman, or anyone at all in human form.
So the Kapilavatthu Sakyans went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there they said to him, “Lord, a new reception hall has just been built by the Kapilavatthu Sakyans, and it has not yet been dwelled in by any contemplative, brahman, or anyone at all in human form.
May the Blessed One be the first to use it.
When the Blessed One has used it first, the Kapilavatthu Sakyans will use it afterwards.
That will be for their long-term welfare & happiness.
The Blessed One acquiesced with silence.
Sensing his acquiescence, the Kapilavatthu Sakyans got up from their seats, bowed down to him, circumambulated him, and then went to the new reception hall.
On arrival, they spread it all over with felt rugs, arranged seats, set out a water vessel, and raised an oil lamp.
Then they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, stood to one side.
As they were standing there they said to him, “Lord, the reception hall has been covered all over with felt rugs, seats have been arranged, a water vessel has been set out, and an oil lamp raised.
It is now time for the Blessed One to do as he sees fit.
So the Blessed One, putting on his robe and taking up his bowl & outer robe, went together with a community of monks to the reception hall.
On arrival he washed his feet, entered the hall, and sat with his back to the central post, facing east.
The community of monks washed their feet, entered the hall, and sat with their backs to the western wall, facing east, ranged around the Blessed One.
The Kapilavatthu Sakyans washed their feet, entered the hall, and sat with their backs to the eastern wall, facing west, ranged around the Blessed One.
Then the Blessed One — having spent most of the night instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the Kapilavatthu Sakyans with a Dhamma talk — dismissed them, saying, “The night is far past, Gotamas.
Do what you now think it is time to do.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” the Kapilavatthu Sakyans rose from their seats, bowed down to the Blessed One, and — circumambulating him, keeping him to their right — departed.
Then not long after the Kapilavatthu Sakyans had left, the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Maha Moggallana: “Moggallana, the community of monks is free of drowsiness.
Give them a Dhamma talk of your own devising.
My back aches.
I will rest it.
Ven.
Maha Moggallana responded, “As you say, lord.
Then the Blessed One, having arranged his outer robe folded in four, lay down on his right side in the lion's sleeping posture, with one foot on top of the other, mindful & alert, having made a mental note to get up.
Then Ven.
Maha Moggallana addressed the monks, “Friend monks!
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded.
Ven.
Maha Moggallana said, “Friends, I will teach you a discourse on being soggy and a discourse on not being soggy.
Listen and pay careful attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, friend,” the monks replied.
Ven.
Maha Moggallana said, “And how is one soggy?
There is the case where a monk, when seeing a form via the eye, is, in the case of pleasing forms, committed to forms and, in the case of displeasing forms, afflicted by forms.
He remains with body-mindfulness not present, and with limited awareness.
And he does not discern, as it actually is present, the awareness-release & discernment-release where those evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen cease without trace.
“When hearing a sound via the ear…
“When smelling an aroma via the nose…
“When tasting a flavor via the tongue…
“When touching a tactile sensation via the body…
“When cognizing an idea via the intellect, he is, in the case of pleasing ideas, committed to ideas and, in the case of displeasing ideas, afflicted by ideas.
He remains with body-mindfulness not present, and with limited awareness.
And he does not discern, as it actually is present, the awareness-release & discernment-release where those evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen cease without trace.
“This is called a monk who is soggy with forms cognizable via the eye, soggy with sounds cognizable via the ear, soggy with aromas cognizable via the nose, soggy with flavors cognizable via the tongue, soggy with tactile sensations cognizable via the body, soggy with ideas cognizable via the intellect.
“When a monk dwells in this way, then if Mara comes to him via the eye, Mara gains entry, Mara gains a foothold.
If Mara comes to him via the ear… nose… tongue… body… intellect, Mara gains entry, Mara gains a foothold.
Just as if there were a shack made of reeds or a shack made of grass — dry, desiccated, more than a year old — and if a man were to come to it from the east with a burning grass torch, fire would gain entry, fire would gain a foothold.
If a man were to come to it from the west… north… south… from below… from above… From whatever direction the man would come to it with a burning grass torch, fire would gain entry, fire would gain a foothold.
In the same way, when a monk dwells in this way, then if Mara comes to him via the eye, Mara gains entry, Mara gains a foothold.
If Mara comes to him via the ear… nose… tongue… body… intellect, Mara gains entry, Mara gains a foothold.
“And when a monk dwells in this way, forms overpower him.
He does not overpower forms.
Sounds overpower him… Aromas… Flavors… Tactile sensations… Ideas overpower him.
He does not overpower ideas.
This is called a monk overpowered by forms, overpowered by sounds, overpowered by aromas, overpowered by flavors, overpowered by tactile sensations, overpowered by ideas — one overpowered who does not overpower.
He is overpowered by evil, unskillful qualities that defile, that lead to further becoming, that are miserable, that result in suffering & stress, that tend toward future birth, aging, & death.
“It's in this way, friends, that one is soggy.
“And how is one not soggy?
There is the case where a monk, when seeing a form via the eye, is not, in the case of pleasing forms, committed to forms nor, in the case of displeasing forms, afflicted by forms.
He remains with body-mindfulness present, and with immeasurable awareness.
And he discerns, as it actually is present, the awareness-release & discernment-release where those evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen cease without trace.
“When hearing a sound via the ear…
“When smelling an aroma via the nose…
“When tasting a flavor via the tongue…
“When touching a tactile sensation via the body…
“When cognizing an idea via the intellect, he is not, in the case of pleasing ideas, committed to ideas nor, in the case of displeasing ideas, afflicted by ideas.
He remains with body-mindfulness present, and with immeasurable awareness.
And he discerns, as it actually is present, the awareness-release & discernment-release where those evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen cease without trace.
“This is called a monk who is not soggy with forms cognizable via the eye, not soggy with sounds cognizable via the ear, not soggy with aromas cognizable via the nose, not soggy with flavors cognizable via the tongue, not soggy with tactile sensations cognizable via the body, not soggy with ideas cognizable via the intellect.
“When a monk dwells in this way, then if Mara comes to him via the eye, Mara gains no entry, Mara gains no foothold.
If Mara comes to him via the ear… nose… tongue… body… intellect, Mara gains no entry, Mara gains no foothold.
Just as if there were a peaked house or hall thickly plastered with fine clay, and if a man were to come to it from the east with a burning grass torch, fire would gain no entry, fire would gain no foothold.
If a man were to come to it from the west… north… south… from below… from above… From whatever direction the man would come to it with a burning grass torch, fire would gain no entry, fire would gain no foothold.
In the same way, when a monk dwells in this way, then if Mara comes to him via the eye, Mara gains no entry, Mara gains no foothold.
If Mara comes to him via the ear… nose… tongue… body… intellect, Mara gains no entry, Mara gains no foothold.
“And when a monk dwells in this way, he overpowers forms.
Forms do not overpower him.
He overpowers sounds… aromas… flavors… tactile sensations… ideas.
Ideas do not overpower him.
This is called a monk who overpowers forms, overpowers sounds, overpowers aromas, overpowers flavors, overpowers tactile sensations, overpowers ideas — one who overpowers and is not overpowered.
He overpowers evil, unskillful qualities that defile, that lead to further becoming, that are miserable, that result in suffering & stress, that tend toward future birth, aging, & death.
“It's in this way, friends, that one is not soggy.
Then the Blessed One got up and said to Ven.
Maha Moggallana, “Good, good, Moggallana.
What you have said to the monks about the discourse on being soggy and the discourse on not being soggy is good.
That is what Ven.
Maha Moggallana said, and the Teacher approved.
Gratified, the monks delighted in Ven.
Maha Moggallana's words.
right up to the “sphere of neither-perception-nor-non-perception.”]
“Then, friends, I thought: 'The signless concentration of the heart, the signless concentration of the heart, they say — now what is that?'
“Then I thought: 'In this a monk, paying no attention to any distinguishing signs, enters on and dwells in that concentration of the heart which is without signs.
This is called “The signless concentration of heart.”'
“Then, friends, paying no attention to any distinguishing signs, I entered on and dwelt in that concentration of the heart which is without signs.
But as I dwelt thus, the consciousness-conforming-to-signs arose.
“And then, friends, the Blessed One came to me by his powers and said: 'Moggallaana, Moggallaana, Brahman, do not slacken off in the signless concentration, make your mind steady, make the mind one-pointed, concentrate your mind in the signless concentration!'
“And after that, friends, paying no attention to any distinguishing signs, I entered on and dwelt in the signless concentration of the heart.
“Now, friends, if anyone were to truly declare: 'Through the Teacher's compassion the disciple gained great super-knowledge,' he could rightly declare this of me.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
There Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna addressed the monks, “Friend monks!
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded to him.
Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna said, “Friends, once as I was withdrawn in seclusion, this train of thought arose to my awareness, ' “Noble silence, noble silence,” it is said.
But what is noble silence?' Then the thought occurred to me, 'There is the case where a monk, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, enters & remains in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
This is called noble silence.' So, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, I entered & remained in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
While I remained in that dwelling, I was assailed by perceptions & attention connected with directed thought.
“Then the Blessed One, coming to me through his power, said, 'Moggallāna.
Moggallāna.
Brahman, don't be heedless of noble silence.
Establish your mind in noble silence.
Make your mind unified in noble silence.
Concentrate your mind in noble silence.' So at a later time, with the stilling of directed thoughts & evaluations, I entered & remained in the second jhāna: rapture & pleasure born of concentration, unification of awareness free from directed thought & evaluation — internal assurance.
“When one, speaking rightly, would say of someone, 'A disciple attained to greatness of direct knowledge through the assistance of the Teacher,' it's of me that one speaking rightly would say, 'A disciple attained to greatness of direct knowledge through the assistance of the Teacher.'”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at the Eastern Monastery, the palace of Migāra's mother.
And on that occasion a dear and beloved grandson of Visākhā, Migāra's mother, had died.
So Visākhā, Migāra's mother — her clothes wet, her hair wet — went to the Blessed One in the middle of the day and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As she was sitting there the Blessed One said to her: “Why have you come here, Visākhā — your clothes wet, your hair wet — in the middle of the day?
When this was said, she said to the Blessed One, “My dear and beloved grandson has died.
This is why I have come here — my clothes wet, my hair wet — in the middle of the day.
“Visākhā, would you like to have as many children & grandchildren as there are people in Sāvatthī?
“Yes, lord, I would like to have as many children & grandchildren as there are people in Sāvatthī.
“But how many people in Sāvatthī die in the course of a day?
“Sometimes ten people die in Sāvatthī in the course of a day, sometimes nine… eight… seven… six… five… four… three… two… Sometimes one person dies in Sāvatthī in the course of a day.
Sāvatthī is never free from people dying.
“So what do you think, Visākhā?
Would you ever be free of wet clothes & wet hair?
“No, lord.
Enough of my having so many children & grandchildren.
“Visākhā, those who have a hundred dear ones have a hundred sufferings.
Those who have ninety dear ones have ninety sufferings.
Those who have eighty… seventy… sixty… fifty… forty… thirty… twenty… ten… nine… eight… seven… six… five… four… three… two… Those who have one dear one have one suffering.
Those who have no dear ones have no sufferings.
They are free from sorrow, free from stain, free from lamentation, I tell you.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
This noble teaching on how to respond when faced with anger is placed in a mythical setting.
The story is told by the Buddha of a great war between devas and asuras that took place in ancient times.
The devas are ultimately victorious and capture Vepacitti, the ruler of the asuras.
Bound in chains, he is brought to Tavatimsa and into the presence of Sakka, ruler of the gods.
Being the demon that he his, Vepacitti hurls a torrent of abuse at his captor, calling him all sorts of insulting names.
Sakka, however, is unmoved, inspiring Matali, his charioteer, to begin the following poetic exchange:
The poem is in the prevalent vatta meter, with eight syllables per line, and contains much subtle word-play.
For example, the words bala and bala dance with one another throughout the piece, nowhere more intimately than in the frolicking alliteration of lines and.
The linking of the word titikkhati with the similarly sounding tikicchati is also a poignant touch that is hardly accidental.
This exchange shows well how the Buddha adapted the heroic ideals of his warrior's heritage to the inner struggle for self-mastery.
The strength of the victorious Sakka lies in his wisdom and forbearance.
The weakness of the vanquished asura comes from his lack of understanding, which renders him helpless to resist the passions raging within.
Though these verses were penned, years ago, the truth behind them is timeless.
It is the same that has helped many non-violent social and political reform movements achieve dramatic results in our own century.
Conquest is only the apparent victory of the short-sighted, while transformation of oneself and others is the more lasting victory of the wise.
Remaining unprovoked in the face of anger and hostility still offers the best hope for healing our troubled world.
What a vivid image of insight meditation!
The practice of mindfulness requires the focused attention of an acrobat balancing on a bamboo pole.
One lapse, one moment of distraction or carelessness, and he tumbles to the ground.
The picture is one of intensive inner awareness and concentration — almost a matter of life and death.
But the Buddha's parable goes even further, for the safety and well being of the bamboo acrobat's beloved assistant also hangs upon the master's successful practice of mindfulness.
The story is telling us that ultimately we are responsible for our own balance, and would be foolish to direct our attention to others while neglecting our own inner focus.
And yet others are directly affected by how well we do this.
Insight meditation is not a selfish undertaking, because the quality of our interaction with all those around us depends on the degree of our own self-understanding and self-control.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at the Eastern Monastery, the palace of Migāra's mother.
And on that occasion, Visākhā, Migāra's mother, had some dealings with King Pasenadi Kosala that he did not settle as she had wished.
So in the middle of the day she went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As she was sitting there the Blessed One said to her, “Well now, Visākhā, where are you coming from in the middle of the day?
“Just now, lord, I had some dealings with King Pasenadi Kosala that he did not settle as I had wished.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
Translator's note: This discourse dramatizes a problem that often arises in meditation practice — a speculative question arises that, if followed, pulls one out of concentration.
Sister Vajira shows how to deal with the situation: recognize that the terms in which the question is expressed are just that — terms — and that whatever reality there is in the issue raised by the question can be reduced to phenomena observable in the immediate present.
In ultimate terms, this comes down to the arising and passing away of stress, which should be observed and comprehended to the point where one can see through to that which neither arises nor passes away.
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Vajira the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from concentration, approached her & addressed her in verse:
Then the thought occurred to Vajira the nun: “Now who has recited this verse — a human being or a non-human one?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited this verse wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in me, wanting to make me fall away from concentration.
Then, having understood that “This is Mara the Evil One,” she replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Vajira the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
“It would be well for me, Lord, if the Blessed One would teach me briefly a doctrine so that having heard it I might dwell alone, in seclusion, unwearied, ardent and resolute.
“Monk, if you cling to anything, you are in bondage to Maara.
If you do not cling, you are free of the Evil One.
“I have understood, Blessed One, I have understood, Well-farer!
“But how, monk, do you understand in full what I have stated in brief?
“Lord, if one clings to the body, one is in bondage to Maara.
If one does not cling to the body, one is free of the Evil One.
That, Lord, is how I understand in full the sense of what the Blessed One has stated in brief.
“Good, good, monk!
You have well understood in full the sense of what I stated in brief.
If you cling to the body,… feelings,… perceptions,… mental formations,… consciousness, you are in bondage to Maara.
If you do not cling, you are free of the Evil One.
That is how the sense of what I have stated in brief is to be understood in full.”
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Sela the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from concentration, approached her & addressed her in verse:
Then the thought occurred to Sela the nun: “Now who has recited this verse — a human being or a non-human one?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited this verse wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in me, wanting to make me fall away from concentration.
Then, having understood that “This is Mara the Evil One,” she replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Sela the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
“In the sky, O monks, various kinds of winds are blowing: winds from the east, west, north and south, winds carrying dust and winds without dust, winds hot and cold, gentle and fierce.
Similarly, monks, there arise in this body various kinds of feelings: pleasant feelings arise, painful feelings arise and neutral feelings arise.”
Staying at Savatthi.
“Monks, gains, offerings, & fame are a cruel thing, a harsh, bitter obstacle to the attainment of the unexcelled rest from bondage.
“Once, monks, a large family of turtles had lived for a long time in a certain freshwater lake.
Then one turtle said to another, 'My dear turtle, don't go to that area.' But the turtle went to that area, and because of that a hunter lanced him with a harpoon.
So he went back to the first turtle.
The first turtle saw him coming from afar, and on seeing him said to him, 'I hope, dear turtle, that you didn't go to that area.'
“'I went to that area, dear turtle.'
“'Then I hope you haven't been wounded or hurt.'
“'I haven't been wounded or hurt, but there's this cord that keeps dragging around behind me.'
“'Yes, dear turtle, you're wounded, you're hurt.
It was because of that cord that your father & grandfather fell into misfortune & disaster.
Now go, dear turtle.
You are no longer one of us.'
“The hunter, monks, stands for Mara, the Evil One.
The harpoon stands for gains, offerings, & fame.
The cord stands for delight & passion.
Any monk who relishes & revels in gains, offerings, & fame that have arisen is called a monk lanced by the harpoon, who has fallen into misfortune & disaster.
The Evil One can do with him as he will.
That's how cruel gains, offerings, & fame are: a harsh, bitter obstacle to the attainment of the unexcelled rest from bondage.
“So you should train yourselves: 'We will put aside any gains, offerings, & fame that have arisen; and we will not let any gains, offerings, & fame that have arisen keep our minds consumed.' That's how you should train yourselves.
See also: SN.; SN.
Staying at Savatthi.
“Suppose, monks, that there were a pond fifty leagues wide, fifty leagues long, & fifty leagues deep, filled to overflowing with water so that a crow could drink from it, and a man would draw some water out of it with the tip of a blade of grass.
What do you think?
Which would be greater: the water drawn out with the tip of the blade of grass or the water in the pond?
“The water in the pond would be far greater, lord.
The water drawn out with the tip of the blade of grass would be next to nothing.
It wouldn't be a hundredth, a thousandth, a one hundred-thousandth — the water drawn out with the tip of the blade of grass — when compared with the water in the pond.
“In the same way, monks, for a disciple of the noble ones who is consummate in view, an individual who has broken through, the suffering & stress that is totally ended & extinguished is far greater.
That which remains in the state of having at most seven remaining lifetimes is next to nothing: it's not a hundredth, a thousandth, a one hundred-thousandth, when compared with the previous mass of suffering.
That's how great the benefit is of breaking through to the Dhamma, monks.
That's how great the benefit is of obtaining the Dhamma eye.”
“Monks, suppose that this great earth were totally covered with water, and a man were to toss a yoke with a single hole there.
A wind from the east would push it west, a wind from the west would push it east.
A wind from the north would push it south, a wind from the south would push it north.
And suppose a blind sea-turtle were there.
It would come to the surface once every one hundred years.
Now what do you think: would that blind sea-turtle, coming to the surface once every one hundred years, stick his neck into the yoke with a single hole?
“It would be a sheer coincidence, lord, that the blind sea-turtle, coming to the surface once every one hundred years, would stick his neck into the yoke with a single hole.
“It's likewise a sheer coincidence that one obtains the human state.
It's likewise a sheer coincidence that a Tathagata, worthy & rightly self-awakened, arises in the world.
It's likewise a sheer coincidence that a doctrine & discipline expounded by a Tathagata appears in the world.
Now, this human state has been obtained.
A Tathagata, worthy & rightly self-awakened, has arisen in the world.
A doctrine & discipline expounded by a Tathagata appears in the world.
“Therefore your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress.' Your duty is the contemplation, 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'”
“Monks, when a monk knows as they really are both the arising and the destruction of states productive of suffering, then indeed the sense-pleasures are truly seen by him.
When he sees the sense-pleasures, the desire and love for sense-pleasures, the infatuation and feverish longing for sense-pleasures that is inherent in them, all this does not obsess him.
His life and practice are so informed with wisdom that, living thus, he is not assailed by longing and depression, which are evil and unskilled states.
“When, monks, a monk lives and practices like this, it occasionally happens that, through a lapse of mindfulness, evil and unskilled states arise, memories and thoughts pertaining to the fetters.
His mindfulness is aroused only slowly, but then he soon abandons that state, drives it out, abolishes it, puts an end to it.
Just as if, monks, a man were to let fall two or three drops of water into an iron pot that had been heated all day, those few drops would soon be wiped out and vanish — in the same way it occasionally happens to a monk living and practicing like this… but he soon puts an end to it.
“Thus, monks, if a monk's life and practice are so informed with wisdom that, living thus, he is not assailed by longing and depression, which are evil states, then, monks, if a king's ministers, friends, favorites, kinsmen or blood-relations should come and offer him wealth, saying: 'Come, good master!
Why let these yellow robes torment you?
Why go around with shaven head and bowl?
Come on, return to the lower life, enjoy possessions and do works of merit!' — monks, for a monk so living and practicing to reject the training and revert to the lower life would just be impossible.”
“Once upon a time, monks, a hard-shelled tortoise was foraging for food in the evening along the shore of a lake.
And a jackal was also foraging for food in the evening along the shore of the lake.
The tortoise saw the jackal from afar, foraging for food, and so — withdrawing its four legs, with its neck as a fifth, into its own shell — it remained perfectly quiet and still.
But the jackal also saw the tortoise from afar, foraging for food, and so it went to the tortoise and, on arrival, hovered around it, “As soon as the tortoise stretches out one or another of its four limbs — or its neck as a fifth — I'll seize it right there, tear it off, and eat it.” But when the tortoise didn't stretch out any of its four limbs — or its neck as a fifth — the jackal, not having gotten any opportunity, lost interest and left.
“In the same way, monks, Mara is continually, ceaselessly, hovering around you, 'Perhaps I'll get an opportunity by means of the eye… the ear… the nose… the tongue… the body.
Perhaps I'll get an opportunity by means of the intellect.' Thus, monks, you should dwell with the doors to your senses well-guarded.
“On seeing a form with the eye, do not grasp at any theme or details by which — if you were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the eye — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail you.
Practice for its restraint.
Guard the faculty of the eye.
Secure your restraint with regard to the faculty of the eye.
“On hearing a sound with the ear…
“On smelling an aroma with the nose…
“On tasting a flavor with the tongue…
“On touching a tactile sensation with the body…
“On cognizing an idea with the intellect, do not grasp at any theme or details by which — if you were to dwell without restraint over the faculty of the intellect — evil, unskillful qualities such as greed or distress might assail you.
Practice for its restraint.
Guard the faculty of the intellect.
Secure your restraint with regard to the faculty of the intellect.
“When you dwell with the doors to your senses well-guarded, Mara, not getting any opportunity, will lose interest and leave, just as the jackal did with the tortoise.
See also: SN.
I have heard that on one occasion, the Blessed One was staying at Uruvelā on the bank of the Nerañjarā River at the root of the Bodhi tree — the tree of awakening — newly awakened.
And on that occasion he sat at the root of the Bodhi tree for seven days in one session, sensitive to the bliss of release.
Then, with the passing of seven days, after emerging from that concentration, in the third watch of the night, he gave close attention to dependent co-arising in forward and reverse order, thus:
In other words:
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
At Savatthi.
There the Blessed One said, “Monks, suppose there were a river, flowing down from the mountains, going far, its current swift, carrying everything with it, and — holding on to both banks — kasa grasses, kusa grasses, reeds, birana grasses, & trees were growing.
Then a man swept away by the current would grab hold of the kasa grasses, but they would tear away, and so from that cause he would come to disaster.
He would grab hold of the kusa grasses… the reeds… the birana grasses… the trees, but they would tear away, and so from that cause he would come to disaster.
“In the same way, there is the case where an uninstructed, run-of-the-mill person — who has no regard for noble ones, is not well-versed or disciplined in their Dhamma; who has no regard for men of integrity, is not well-versed or disciplined in their Dhamma — assumes form to be the self, or the self as possessing form, or form as in the self, or the self as in form.
That form tears away from him, and so from that cause he would come to disaster.
“He assumes feeling to be the self, or the self as possessing feeling, or feeling as in the self, or the self as in feeling.
That feeling tears away from him, and so from that cause he would come to disaster.
“He assumes perception to be the self, or the self as possessing perception, or perception as in the self, or the self as in perception.
That perception tears away from him, and so from that cause he would come to disaster.
“He assumes fabrications to be the self, or the self as possessing fabrications, or fabrications as in the self, or the self as in fabrications.
Those fabrications tear away from him, and so from that cause he would come to disaster.
“He assumes consciousness to be the self, or the self as possessing consciousness, or consciousness as in the self, or the self as in consciousness.
That consciousness tears away from him, and so from that cause he would come to disaster.
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“…Is feeling constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.”…
”…Is perception constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.”…
”…Are fabrications constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.”…
“What do you think, monks — Is consciousness constant or inconstant?
“Inconstant, lord.
“And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?
“Stressful, lord.
“And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: 'This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am'?
“No, lord.
“Thus, monks, any form whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: every form is to be seen as it actually is with right discernment as: 'This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.'
“Any feeling whatsoever…
“Any perception whatsoever…
“Any fabrications whatsoever…
“Any consciousness whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: every consciousness is to be seen as it actually is with right discernment as: 'This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.'
“Seeing thus, the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with fabrications, disenchanted with consciousness.
Disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he is fully released.
With full release, there is the knowledge, 'Fully released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.'”
Translator's note: A comparative study among the records of various early Buddhist schools suggests that the verses here, like those in I., were originally separate poems, spoken on separate occasions, and that they have been gathered together because they share the same refrain.
Staying at Savatthi.
“Monks, suppose there were a sharp-bladed spear, and a man were to come along saying, 'With my hand or fist I will bend back this sharp-bladed spear, fold it in two, and roll it up.' What do you think?
Would that man be able with his hand or fist to bend back that sharp-bladed spear, fold it in two, and roll it up?
“No, lord.
Why is that?
Because a sharp-bladed spear isn't easy to bend back, fold in two, or roll up.
The man would simply reap his share of trouble & vexation.
“In the same way, monks, when a monk's awareness-release through good-will is cultivated, developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, & well-undertaken, any non-human being who would think of possessing that monk's mind would simply reap his share of trouble & vexation.
“Thus you should train yourselves: 'Our awareness-release through good-will will be cultivated, developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, & well-undertaken.
That's how you should train yourselves.
See also: AN..
Translator's note: The refrain in this sutta is a subject of controversy.
The text literally says, “Wander alone like a 'sword-horn,' which is the Pali term for rhinoceros.
The commentary, however, insists that this term refers not to the animal but to its horn, for the Indian rhinoceros, unlike the African, has only one horn.
Still, some scholars have noted that while the Indian rhinoceros is a solitary animal, rhinoceros horns don't wander, and that in other verses in the Pali canon, the phrase “wander alone like…” takes a person or an animal, not an animal part, for its object.
Thus, for example, in Dhp, one is told to “wander alone like a king renouncing his kingdom, like the elephant in the Matanga woods, his herd.” It's possible that the rhinoceros was chosen here as an example of solitary wandering both because of its habits and because of its unusual single horn.
However, in a translation, it's necessary to choose one reading over the other.
Thus, because wandering “like a rhinoceros” sounds more natural than wandering “like a horn,” I have chosen the former rendering.
Keep in mind, though, that the singularity of the rhinoceros' horn reinforces the image.
As noted under I., there is evidence suggesting that the verses here were originally separate poems, composed on separate occasions, and that they have been gathered together because of their common refrain.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Vesali in the Great Wood, at the Gabled Hall.
Now on that occasion the Blessed One, with many lines of reasoning, was giving the monks a talk on the unattractiveness, was speaking in praise of unattractiveness, was speaking in praise of the development of unattractiveness.
Then the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Monks, I wish to go into seclusion for half a month.
I am not to be approached by anyone at all except for the one who brings almsfood.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded to him.
And no one approached the Blessed One except for the one who brought almsfood.
Then the monks — “The Blessed One, with many lines of reasoning, has given a talk on the unattractiveness, has spoken in praise of unattractiveness, has spoken in praise of the development of unattractiveness” — remained committed to the development of unattractiveness in many modes & manners.
They — ashamed, repelled, & disgusted with this body — sought for an assassin.
In one day, ten monks took the knife.
In one day, twenty monks took the knife.
In one day, thirty monks took the knife.
Then the Blessed One, emerging from his seclusion after half a month's time, said to Ven.
Ananda, “Ananda, why does the community of monks seem so depleted?
“Because, lord, the Blessed One, with many lines of reasoning, gave the monks a talk on the unattractiveness, spoke in praise of unattractiveness, spoke in praise of the development of unattractiveness.
The monks — 'The Blessed One, with many lines of reasoning, has given a talk on the unattractiveness, has spoken in praise of unattractiveness, has spoken in praise of the development of unattractiveness' — remained committed to the development of unattractiveness in many modes & manners.
They — ashamed, repelled, & disgusted with this body — sought for an assassin.
In one day, ten monks took the knife.
In one day, twenty monks took the knife.
In one day, thirty monks took the knife.
It would be good, lord, if the Blessed One would explain another method so that this community of monks might be established in gnosis.
“In that case, Ananda, gather in the assembly hall all the monks who live in dependence on Vesali.
“As you say, lord,” Ven.
Ananda responded.
When he had gathered in the assembly hall all the monks who lived in dependence on Vesali, he went to the Blessed One and said, “The community of monks is gathered, lord.
Now is the time to do as the Blessed One sees fit.
Then the Blessed One went to the assembly hall and sat down on a seat made ready.
As he was sitting there, he addressed the monks: “Monks, this concentration through mindfulness of in-&-out breathing, when developed & pursued, is both peaceful & exquisite, a refreshing & pleasant abiding that immediately disperses & allays any evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen.
Just as when, in the last month of the hot season, a great rain-cloud out of season immediately disperses & allays the dust & dirt that have been stirred up, in the same way this concentration through mindfulness of in-&-out breathing, when developed & pursued, is both peaceful & exquisite, a refreshing & pleasant abiding that immediately disperses & allays any evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen.
“And how is concentration through mindfulness of in-&-out breathing developed & pursued so as to be both peaceful & exquisite, a refreshing & pleasant abiding that immediately disperses & allays any evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen?
“There is the case where a monk, having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building, sits down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect, and setting mindfulness to the fore.
Always mindful, he breathes in; mindful he breathes out.
” Breathing in long, he discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long.' Or breathing in short, he discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, he discerns, 'I am breathing out short.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming bodily fabrication.'
” He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to rapture.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to rapture.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to pleasure.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to pleasure.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to mental fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to mental fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming mental fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming mental fabrication.'
” He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in gladdening the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out gladdening the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in steadying the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out steadying the mind.
He trains himself, 'I will breathe in releasing the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out releasing the mind.'
” He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on inconstancy.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on inconstancy.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on dispassion.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on dispassion.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on cessation.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on cessation.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on relinquishment.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on relinquishment.'
“This is how concentration through mindfulness of in-&-out breathing is developed & pursued so as to be both peaceful & exquisite, a refreshing & pleasant abiding that immediately disperses & allays any evil, unskillful qualities that have arisen.”
Dhaniya the cattleman:
The Buddha:
The Buddha:
The Buddha:
The Buddha:
The Buddha:
The Buddha:
The Buddha:
At Savatthi.
There the Blessed One addressed the monks: “Monks.
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “Monks, there are these five means of propagation.
Which five?
Root-propagation, stem-propagation, joint-propagation, cutting-propagation, & seed-propagation as the fifth.
And if these five means of propagation are not broken, not rotten, not damaged by wind & sun, mature, and well-buried, but there is no earth and no water, would they exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation?
“No, lord.
“And if these five means of propagation are broken, rotten, damaged by wind & sun, immature, and poorly-buried, but there is earth & water, would they exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation?
“No, lord.
“And if these five means of propagation are not broken, not rotten, not damaged by wind & sun, mature, and well-buried, and there is earth & water, would they exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation?
“Yes, lord.
“Like the earth property, monks, is how the four standing-spots for consciousness should be seen.
Like the liquid property is how delight & passion should be seen.
Like the five means of propagation is how consciousness together with its nutriment should be seen.
“Should consciousness, when taking a stance, stand attached to form, supported by form, established on form, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“Should consciousness, when taking a stance, stand attached to feeling, supported by feeling, established on feeling, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“Should consciousness, when taking a stance, stand attached to perception, supported by perception, established on perception, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“Should consciousness, when taking a stance, stand attached to fabrications, supported by fabrications, established on fabrications, watered with delight, it would exhibit growth, increase, & proliferation.
“Were someone to say, 'I will describe a coming, a going, a passing away, an arising, a growth, an increase, or a proliferation of consciousness apart from form, from feeling, from perception, from fabrications,' that would be impossible.
“If a monk abandons passion for the property of form…
“If a monk abandons passion for the property of feeling…
“If a monk abandons passion for the property of perception…
“If a monk abandons passion for the property of fabrications…
“If a monk abandons passion for the property of consciousness, then owing to the abandonment of passion, the support is cut off, and there is no base for consciousness.
Consciousness, thus unestablished, not proliferating, not performing any function, is released.
Owing to its release, it is steady.
Owing to its steadiness, it is contented.
Owing to its contentment, it is not agitated.
Not agitated, he is totally unbound right within.
He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.' See also: SN.; SN.
Sariputta was the Buddha's leading follower, particularly praised for his wisdom.
These verses, containing eight syllables per line, have been extracted from a longer poem of thirty seven verses preserved in the Theragatha.
They describe a man who continues to spend his time in solitary meditation in the forest, even after having attained the full awakening of the arahant.
The elder keeps the dharma wheel of the Buddha's teaching rolling by such dedication to meditation practice, and by exemplifying the attitude of non-attachment in all that he does.
The phrase may also refer to Sariputta's pivotal role in the development of the Abhidhamma tradition.
“'The ocean, the ocean!,' monks, says the ignorant worldling.
But that is not the ocean in the Ariyan discipline, that is just a great heap of water, a great flood of water.
“The human eye, monks, is the ocean; its impulsion is produced by visible forms.
Whoever withstands its buffeting produced by visible forms, is said to have 'crossed over': 'the Brahman has traversed and passed over the ocean of the eye with its waves and whirlpools, its crocodiles and monsters and stands on dry land.'
The teacher declared:
Dwelling at Savatthi.
“Monks, gains, offerings, & fame are a cruel thing, a harsh, bitter obstacle to the attainment of the unexcelled rest from bondage.
“Have you heard the jackal howling in the last hours of the night?
“Yes, lord.
“That jackal is suffering from mange.
He finds no pleasure whether he goes to a bluff, to the foot of a tree, or to the open air.
Wherever he goes, wherever he stands, wherever he sits, wherever he lies down, he is sunk in misery.
“In the same way there is the case where a certain monk is conquered by gains, offerings, & fame, his mind consumed.
He finds no pleasure whether he goes to an empty dwelling, to the foot of a tree, or to the open air.
Wherever he goes, wherever he stands, wherever he sits, wherever he lies down, he is sunk in misery.
That's how cruel gains, offerings, & fame are: a harsh, bitter obstacle to the attainment of the unexcelled rest from bondage.
“Thus you should train yourselves: 'We will put aside any gains, offerings, & fame that have arisen; and we will not let any gains, offerings, & fame that have arisen keep our minds consumed.' That's how you should train yourselves.
See also: SN.; SN.
“Monks, be islands unto yourselves, be your own refuge, having no other; let the Dhamma be an island and a refuge to you, having no other.
Those who are islands unto themselves… should investigate to the very heart of things: 'What is the source of sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair?
How do they arise?' 
“Here, monks, the uninstructed worldling Change occurs in this man's body, and it becomes different.
On account of this change and difference, sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair arise..
“But seeing the body's impermanence, its change-ability, its waning, its ceasing, he says 'formerly as now, all bodies were impermanent and unsatisfactory, and subject to change.' Thus, seeing this as it really is, with perfect insight, he abandons all sorrow, lamentation, pain, grief and despair.
He is not worried at their abandonment, but unworried lives at ease, and thus living at ease he is said to be 'assuredly delivered.'”.
Staying at Savatthi.
“Suppose, monks, that the great ocean were to go to extinction, to its total end, except for two or three drops of water.
What do you think?
Which would be greater: the water in the great ocean that had gone to extinction, to its total end, or the two or three remaining drops of water?
“Lord, the water in the great ocean that had gone to extinction, to its total end, would be far greater.
The two or three remaining drops of water would be next to nothing.
They wouldn't be a hundredth, a thousandth, a one hundred-thousandth — the two or three remaining drops of water — when compared with the water in the great ocean that had gone to extinction, to its total end.
“In the same way, monks, for a disciple of the noble ones who is consummate in view, an individual who has broken through, the suffering & stress that is totally ended & extinguished is far greater.
That which remains in the state of having at most seven remaining lifetimes is next to nothing: it's not a hundredth, a thousandth, a one hundred-thousandth, when compared with the previous mass of suffering.
That's how great the benefit is of breaking through to the Dhamma, monks.
That's how great the benefit is of obtaining the Dhamma eye.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then a certain devata, in the far extreme of the night, her extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, stood to one side.
As she was standing there, she recited these verses in the Blessed One's presence:
“Monks, if anyone were to say, 'Without having broken through to the noble truth of stress as it actually is present, without having broken through to the noble truth of the origination of stress… the cessation of stress… the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress, as it actually is present, I will bring about the right ending of stress,' that would be an impossibility.
Just as if someone were to say, 'Without having built the lower story of a gabled building, I will put up the upper story,' that would be an impossibility; in the same way, if anyone were to say, 'Without having broken through to the noble truth of stress as it actually is present, without having broken through to the noble truth of the origination of stress… the cessation of stress… the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress, as it actually is present, I will bring about the right ending of stress,' that would be an impossibility.
“If anyone were to say, 'Having broken through to the noble truth of stress as it actually is present, having broken through to the noble truth of the origination of stress… the cessation of stress… the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress, as it actually is present, I will bring about the right ending of stress,' that would be a possibility.
Just as if someone were to say, 'Having built the lower story of a gabled building, I will put up the upper story,' that would be a possibility; in the same way, if anyone were to say, 'Having broken through to the noble truth of stress as it actually is present, having broken through to the noble truth of the origination of stress… the cessation of stress… the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress, as it actually is present, I will bring about the right ending of stress,' that would be a possibility.
“Therefore, monks, your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress.' Your duty is the contemplation, 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' See also: SN.
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Upacala the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from concentration, approached her & said, “Where do you want to reappear, nun?
“I don't want to reappear anywhere, my friend.
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Upacala the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Sisupacala the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall from solitude, approached her & said, “Whose philosophy do you approve of, nun?
“I don't approve of anyone's philosophy, my friend.
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Sisupacala the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Uppalavanna the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from concentration, approached her & addressed her in verse:
Then the thought occurred to Uppalavanna the nun: “Now who has recited this verse — a human being or a non-human one?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited this verse wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in me, wanting to make me fall away from concentration.
Then, having understood that “This is Mara the Evil One,” she replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Uppalavanna the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Vijaya the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from concentration, approached her & addressed her in verse:
Then the thought occurred to Vijaya the nun: “Now who has recited this verse — a human being or a non-human one?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited this verse wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in me, wanting to make me fall away from concentration.
Then, having understood that “This is Mara the Evil One,” she replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Vijaya the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Soma the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from concentration, approached her & addressed her in verse:
Then the thought occurred to Soma the nun: “Now who has recited this verse — a human being or a non-human one?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited this verse wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in me, wanting to make me fall away from concentration.
Then, having understood that “This is Mara the Evil One,” she replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Soma the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Alavika the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from seclusion, approached her & addressed her in verse:
Then the thought occurred to Alavika the nun: “Now who has recited this verse — a human being or a non-human one?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited this verse wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in me, wanting to make me fall away from seclusion.
Then, having understood that “This is Mara the Evil One,” she replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Alavika the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
The woman who is said to have composed this poem was Pajapati, the Buddha's stepmother and a Queen of the Sakyas.
Her younger sister was Maya, married to King Suddhodana only after Pajapati herself was unable to conceive an heir.
Queen Maya died in childbirth, and it was Pajapati who raised Gotama as her own son.
After his enlightenment, Pajapati also left the palace and became the first of the bhikkhunis, the order of nuns.
The third stanza suggests that her attainments included the recollection of past lives, by which she was able to verify empirically the truth of continual rebirth —the “flowing on” from one life to another.
This process, as she mentions in her poem, is fueled by craving and by “not understanding.” In the second and fourth stanzas Pajapati declares her attainment of nibbana, of final and complete liberation in this very life.
It is remarkable to think that when Maya is remembered in the last stanza, the author has in mind not the icon of motherhood and sacrifice that Maya became in the Buddhist tradition, but a dearly-loved younger sister who died tragically young —without ever seeing what her son had become.
Then Ven.
Malunkyaputta, who was ardent & resolute, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One: “It would be good, lord, if the Blessed One would teach me the Dhamma in brief so that, having heard the Dhamma from the Blessed One, I might dwell alone in seclusion: heedful, ardent, & resolute.
“Here now, Malunkyaputta: What will I say to the young monks when you — aged, old, elderly, along in years, come to the last stage of life — ask for an admonition in brief?
“Lord, even though I'm aged, old, elderly, along in years, come to the last stage of life, may the Blessed One teach me the Dhamma in brief!
May the One Well-gone teach me the Dhamma in brief!
It may well be that I'll understand the Blessed One's words.
It may well be that I'll become an heir to the Blessed One's words.
“What do you think, Malunkyaputta: the forms cognizable via the eye that are unseen by you — that you have never before seen, that you don't see, and that are not to be seen by you: Do you have any desire or passion or love there?
“No, lord.
“The sounds cognizable via the ear…
“The aromas cognizable via the nose…
“The flavors cognizable via the tongue…
“The tactile sensations cognizable via the body…
“The ideas cognizable via the intellect that are uncognized by you — that you have never before cognized, that you don't cognize, and that are not to be cognized by you: Do you have any desire or passion or love there?
“No, lord.
“Then, Malunkyaputta, with regard to phenomena to be seen, heard, sensed, or cognized: In reference to the seen, there will be only the seen.
In reference to the heard, only the heard.
In reference to the sensed, only the sensed.
In reference to the cognized, only the cognized.
That is how you should train yourself.
When for you there will be only the seen in reference to the seen, only the heard in reference to the heard, only the sensed in reference to the sensed, only the cognized in reference to the cognized, then, Malunkyaputta, there is no you in connection with that.
When there is no you in connection with that, there is no you there.
When there is no you there, you are neither here nor yonder nor between the two.
This, just this, is the end of stress.
“I understand in detail, lord, the meaning of what the Blessed One has said in brief:
“It's in this way, lord, that I understand in detail the meaning of what the Blessed One said in brief.
“Good, Malunkyaputta.
Very good.
It's good that you understand in detail this way the meaning of what I said in brief.
“It's in this way, Malunkyaputta, that the meaning of what I said in brief should be regarded in detail.
Then Ven.
Malunkyaputta, having been admonished by the admonishment from the Blessed One, got up from his seat and bowed down to the Blessed One, circled around him, keeping the Blessed One to his right side, and left.
Then, dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute, he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And thus Ven.
Malunkyaputta became another one of the arahants.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Vesali, in the Great Wood, at the Hall of the Gabled Pavilion.
Then Mahali the Licchavi went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Purana Kassapa says this: 'There is no cause, no requisite condition, for the defilement of beings.
Beings are defiled without cause, without requisite condition.
There is no cause, no requisite condition, for the purification of beings.
Beings are purified without cause, without requisite condition.' What does the Blessed One say about this?
“Mahali, there is cause, there is requisite condition, for the defilement of beings.
Beings are defiled with cause, with requisite condition.
There is cause, there is requisite condition, for the purification of beings.
Beings are purified with cause, with requisite condition.
“And what, lord, is the cause, what the requisite condition, for the defilement of beings?
How are beings defiled with cause, with requisite condition?
“Mahali, if form were exclusively stressful — followed by stress, infused with stress and not infused with pleasure — beings would not be infatuated with form.
But because form is also pleasurable — followed by pleasure, infused with pleasure and not infused with stress — beings are infatuated with form.
Through infatuation, they are captivated.
Through captivation, they are defiled.
This is the cause, this the requisite condition, for the defilement of beings.
And this is how beings are defiled with cause, with requisite condition.
“If feeling were exclusively stressful…
“If perception were exclusively stressful…
“If fabrications were exclusively stressful…
“If consciousness were exclusively stressful — followed by stress, infused with stress and not infused with pleasure — beings would not be infatuated with consciousness.
But because consciousness is also pleasurable — followed by pleasure, infused with pleasure and not infused with stress — beings are infatuated with consciousness.
Through infatuation, they are captivated.
Through captivation, they are defiled.
This is the cause, this the requisite condition, for the defilement of beings.
And this is how beings are defiled with cause, with requisite condition.
“And what, lord, is the cause, what the requisite condition, for the purification of beings?
How are beings purified with cause, with requisite condition?
“Mahali, if form were exclusively pleasurable — followed by pleasure, infused with pleasure and not infused with stress — beings would not be disenchanted with form.
But because form is also stressful — followed by stress, infused with stress and not infused with pleasure — beings are disenchanted with form.
Through disenchantment, they grow dispassionate.
Through dispassion, they are purified.
This is the cause, this the requisite condition, for the purification of beings.
And this is how beings are purified with cause, with requisite condition.
“If feeling were exclusively pleasurable…
“If perception were exclusively pleasurable…
“If fabrications were exclusively pleasurable…
“If consciousness were exclusively pleasurable — followed by pleasure, infused with pleasure and not infused with stress — beings would not be disenchanted with consciousness.
But because consciousness is also stressful — followed by stress, infused with stress and not infused with pleasure — beings are disenchanted with consciousness.
Through disenchantment, they grow dispassionate.
Through dispassion, they are purified.
This is the cause, this the requisite condition, for the purification of beings.
And this is how beings are purified with cause, with requisite condition.”
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Park.
Now at that time many monks were at work making robes for the Blessed One, “When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.
Mahanama the Sakyan heard that many monks were at work making robes for the Blessed One, “When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.” So he approached the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “I have heard that many monks are at work making robes for the Blessed One, 'When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.' But I haven't heard in the Blessed One's presence, haven't learned in the Blessed One's presence, how a discerning lay follower who is diseased, in pain, severely ill should be instructed by discerning lay follower.
“Mahanama, a discerning lay follower who is diseased, in pain, severely ill should be reassured by another discerning lay follower with four reassurances: 'Be reassured, friend, that you are endowed with verified confidence in the Awakened One: “Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.
“'Be reassured, friend, that you have verified confidence in the Dhamma: “The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.
“'Be reassured, friend, that you have verified confidence in the Sangha: “The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four pairs, the eight individuals — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.
“'Be reassured, friend, that you have virtues that are appealing to the noble ones: untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration.'
“Mahanama, when a discerning lay follower who is diseased, in pain, severely ill has been reassured by another discerning lay follower with these four reassurances, he should be asked: 'Friend, are you concerned for your mother & father?' If he should say, 'I am concerned for my mother & father,' he should be told, 'You, my dear friend, are subject to death.
If you feel concern for your mother & father, you're still going to die.
If you don't feel concern for your mother & father, you're still going to die.
It would be good if you abandoned concern for your mother & father.'
“If he should say, “My concern for my mother & father has been abandoned,' he should be asked, 'Friend, are you concerned for your wife & children?' If he should say, 'I am concerned for my wife & children,' he should be told, 'You, my dear friend, are subject to death.
If you feel concern for your wife & children, you're still going to die.
If you don't feel concern for your wife & children, you're still going to die.
It would be good if you abandoned concern for your wife & children.'
“If he should say, “My concern for my wife & children has been abandoned,' he should be asked, 'Friend, are you concerned for the five strings of human sensuality?' If he should say, 'I am concerned for the five strings of human sensuality,' he should be told, 'Friend, divine sensual pleasures are more splendid & more refined than human sensual pleasures.
It would be good if, having raised your mind above human sensual pleasures, you set it on the Devas of the Four Great Kings.'
“If he should say, 'My mind is raised above human sensual pleasures and is set on the Devas of the Four Great Kings,' he should be told, 'Friend, the Devas of the Thirty-three are more splendid & more refined than the Devas of the Four Great Kings.
It would be good if, having raised your mind above the Devas of the Four Great Kings, you set it on the Devas of the Thirty-three.'
“If he should say, 'My mind is raised above the Devas of the Four Great Kings and is set on the Devas of the Thirty-three,' he should be told, 'Friend, the Devas of the Hours are more splendid & more refined than the Devas of the Thirty-three.
It would be good if, having raised your mind above the Devas of the Thirty-three, you set it on the Devas of the Hours.'
“If he should say, 'My mind is raised above the Devas of the Thirty-three and is set on the Devas of the Hours,' he should be told, 'Friend, the Contented Devas are more splendid & more refined than the Devas of the Hours… the Devas Delighting in Creation are more splendid & more refined than the Contented Devas… the Devas Wielding Power over the Creations of Others are more splendid & more refined than the Devas Delighting in Creation… the Brahma world is more splendid and more refined than the Devas Wielding Power over the Creations of Others.
It would be good if, having raised your mind above the Devas Wielding Power over the Creations of Others, you set it on the Brahma world.'
“If he should say, 'My mind is raised above the Devas Wielding Power over the Creations of Others and is set on the Brahma world,' he should be told, 'Friend, even the Brahma world is inconstant, impermanent, included in self-identity.
It would be good if, having raised your mind above the Brahma world, you brought it to the cessation of self-identity.'
“If he should say, 'My mind is raised above the Brahma worlds and is brought to the cessation of self-identity,' then, I tell you, Mahanama, there is no difference — in terms of release — between the release of that lay follower whose mind is released and the release of a monk whose mind is released.”
The Buddha:
The Buddha:
The Buddha:
If we assume that the instrumental case in the first sentence is meant in the sense of “by means of,” then we are dealing — as Magandiya asserts — with plain nonsense: the first sentence would say that a person cannot achieve purity by means of views, etc., while the second sentence would be saying that he cannot achieve purity by means of no view, etc.
The fact that the two sentences place the relevant terms in different grammatical cases, though, suggests that they are talking about two different kinds of relationships.
If we take the instrumental in the first sentence in the sense of “in terms of,” then the stanza not only makes sense but also fits in with teachings of the rest of the Pali discourses: a person cannot be said to be pure simply because he/she holds to a particular view, body of learning, etc.
Purity is not defined in those terms.
The second sentence goes on to say that a person doesn't arrive at purity from a lack of view, etc.
Putting the two sentences together with the third, the message is this: One uses right views, learning, knowledge, precepts, & practices as a path, a means for arriving at purity.
Once one arrives, one lets go of the path, for the purity of inner peace, in its ultimate sense, is something transcending the means by which it is reached.
In the stanza immediately following this one, it's obvious that Magandiya has not caught this distinction.
For further illustrations of the role of Right View in taking one to a dimension beyond all views, see AN., AN., and MN.
See also sections III/H and III/H/i in The Wings to Awakening.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was wandering among the Kosalans with a large community of monks.
And on that occasion, a large number of youths passed by as if jeering not far from the Blessed One.
The Blessed One saw the large number of youths passing by as if jeering not far away.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rājagaha at the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
And on that occasion Ven.
Mahā Kassapa was staying at the Pipphali Cave, sitting for seven days in a single session, having attained a certain level of concentration.
Then, with the passing of seven days, he emerged from that concentration.
To him, emerging from that concentration, the thought occurred: “What if I were to go into Rājagaha for alms?
Now on that occasion devatās were in a state of eagerness for the chance to give alms to Ven.
Mahā Kassapa.
But Ven.
Mahā Kassapa, turning down those devatās, early in the morning adjusted his under robe and — carrying his bowl & robes — went into Rājagaha for alms.
Now on that occasion Sakka, the deva-king, wanted to give alms to Ven.
Mahā Kassapa.
So, assuming the appearance of a weaver, he was working a loom, while Sujātā, an asura-maiden, filled the shuttle.
Then, as Ven.
Mahā Kassapa was going on an almsround that bypassed no donors in Rājagaha, he arrived at Sakka's home.
Sakka saw him coming from afar and, on seeing him, came out of house to meet him.
Taking the bowl from his hand, entered the house, took cooked rice from the pot, filled the bowl, and gave it back to Ven.
Mahā Kassapa.
And that gift of alms included many kinds of curry, many kinds of sauces.
The thought occurred to Ven.
Mahā Kassapa, “Now, who is this being with such power & might as this?” Then the thought occurred to him, “This is Sakka, the deva-king, isn't it?” On realizing this, he said to Sakka, “Is this your doing, Kosiya?
Don't ever do anything like this again.
“We, too, need merit, Ven.
Kassapa.
We, too, have use for merit.
Then, bowing down to Ven.
Mahā Kassapa and circling him to the right, Sakka rose up into the air and, while up in the sky, exclaimed three times:
“O the alms, the foremost alms, well-established in Kassapa!
“O the alms, the foremost alms, well-established in Kassapa!
“O the alms, the foremost alms, well-established in Kassapa!
The Blessed One — with his divine hearing-property, surpassing that of the human — heard Sakka the deva-king, while up in the sky, exclaiming three times:
“O the alms, the foremost alms, well-established in Kassapa!
“O the alms, the foremost alms, well-established in Kassapa!
“O the alms, the foremost alms, well-established in Kassapa!
On realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Kisa Gotami the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from concentration, approached her & addressed her in verse:
Then the thought occurred to Kisa Gotami the nun: “Now who has recited this verse — a human being or a non-human one?” Then it occurred to her: “This is Mara the Evil One, who has recited this verse wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in me, wanting to make me fall away from concentration.
Then, having understood that “This is Mara the Evil One,” she replied to him in verses:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Kisa Gotami the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi at Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
And on that occasion the bhikkhuni Khema, wandering on tour among the Kosalans, had taken up residence between Savatthi and Saketa at Toranavatthu.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala, while traveling from Saketa to Savatthi, took up a one-night residence between Savatthia and Saketa at Toranavatthu.
Then he addressed a certain man, “Come, now, my good man.
Find out if in Toranavatthu there's the sort of brahman or contemplative I might visit today.
“As you say, sire,” the man replied to the king, but having roamed all over Toranavatthu he did not see the sort of brahman or contemplative the king might visit.
But he did see the bhikkhuni Khema residing in Toranavatthu.
On seeing her, he went to King Pasenadi Kosala and on arrival said to him, “Sire, in Toranavatthu there is no brahman or contemplative of the sort your majesty might visit.
But there is, however, a bhikkhuni named Khema, a disciple of the Blessed One, worthy and rightly self-awakened.
And of this lady, this admirable report has spread about: 'She is wise, competent, intelligent, learned, a fluent speaker, admirable in her ingenuity.' Let your majesty visit her.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala went to the bhikkhuni Khema and, on arrival, having bowed down to her, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to her, “Now then, lady, does the Tathagata exist after death?
“That, great king, has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata exists after death.' “Well then, lady, does the Tathagata not exist after death?
“Great king, that too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata does not exist after death.' “Then does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?
“That has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.' “Well then, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?
“That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.' “Now, lady, when asked if the Tathagata exists after death, you say, 'That has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata exists after death.”' When asked if the Tathagata does not exist after death… both exists and does not exist after death… neither exists nor does not exist after death, you say, 'That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.”' Now, what is the cause, what is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“Very well, then, great king, I will question you in return about this very same matter.
Answer as you see fit.
What do you think great king: Do you have an accountant or actuary or mathematician who can count the grains of sand in the river Ganges as 'so many grains of sand' or 'so many hundreds of grains of sand' or 'so many thousands of grains of sand' or 'so many hundreds of thousands of grains of sand'?
“No, lady.
“Then do you have an accountant or calculator or mathematician who can count the water in the great ocean as 'so many buckets of water' or 'so many hundreds of buckets of water' or 'so many thousands of buckets of water' or 'so many hundreds of thousands of buckets of water'?
“No, lady.
Why is that?
The great ocean is deep, boundless, hard to fathom.
“Even so, great king, any physical form by which one describing the Tathagata would describe him: That the Tathagata has abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Freed from the classification of form, great king, the Tathagata is deep, boundless, hard to fathom, like the ocean.
'The Tathagata exists after death' doesn't apply.
'The Tathagata doesn't exist after death doesn't apply.
'The Tathagata both exists and doesn't exist after death' doesn't apply.
'The Tathagata neither exists nor doesn't exist after death' doesn't apply.
“Any feeling… Any perception… Any mental fabrication…
“Any consciousness by which one describing the Tathagata would describe him: That the Tathagata has abandoned, its root destroyed, made like a palmyra stump, deprived of the conditions of development, not destined for future arising.
Freed from the classification of consciousness, great king, the Tathagata is deep, boundless, hard to fathom, like the ocean.
'The Tathagata exists after death' doesn't apply.
'The Tathagata doesn't exist after death doesn't apply.
'The Tathagata both exists and doesn't exist after death' doesn't apply.
'The Tathagata neither exists nor doesn't exist after death' doesn't apply.” 
Then King Pasenadi Kosala, delighting in & approving of the bhikkhuni Khema's words, got up from his seat, bowed down to her and — keeping her to his right — departed.
Then at another time he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there 
“Amazing, lord!
Astounding!
How the meaning and phrasing of the teacher and disciple agree, coincide, and do not diverge from one another with regard to the supreme teaching!
Recently, lord, I went to the bhikkhuni Khema and, on arrival, asked her about this matter, and she answered me with the same words, the same phrasing, as the Blessed One.
Amazing, lord!
Astounding!
How the meaning and phrasing of the teacher and disciple agree, coincide, and do not diverge from one another with regard to the supreme teaching!
“Now, lord, we must go.
Many are our duties, many our responsibilities.
“Then do, great king, what you think it is now time to do.
So King Pasenadi Kosala, delighting in and approving of the Blessed One's words, got up from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One and — keeping him to his right — departed.
This explanation, which borrows from Sister Vajira's verse in SN., misses an important point raised in SN.
and SN..
In SN.
the Buddha states that one is measured and classified by what one is obsessed with.
If one is not obsessed with anything, then one is not measured or classified by it in the here and now.
In SN.
the Buddha points out that the term “being” applies only where there is craving and passion.
The Tathagata, freed from craving and passion, is thus indescribable in the present, even though he obviously still functions in the present.
SN.
elaborates on this point in great detail.
Another problem raised by the Commentary's explanation for this sutta is how it would define the Tathagata's qualities and character, for what are they composed of aside from aggregates?
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rājagaha at the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
And on that occasion Ven.
Mahā Kassapa was staying at the Pipphali Cave, afflicted, in pain, & seriously ill.
Then, at a later time, he recovered from his illness.
When he had recovered from the illness, the thought occurred to him: “What if I were to go into Rājagaha for alms?
Now on that occasion devatās were in a state of eagerness for the chance to give alms to Ven.
Mahā Kassapa.
But Ven.
Mahā Kassapa, turning down those devatās, early in the morning adjusted his under robe and — carrying his bowl & robes — went into Rājagaha for alms along the streets of the poor, the streets of the indigent, the streets of the weavers.
The Blessed One saw that Ven.
Mahā Kassapa had gone into Rājagaha for alms along the streets of the poor, the streets of the indigent, the streets of the weavers.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
“Monks, just as if a fisherman were to cast a baited hook into a deep lake and a fish with its eye out for food would swallow it — so that the fish that had thus swallowed the fisherman's hook would fall into misfortune & disaster, and the fisherman could do with it as he will — in the same way, there are these six hooks in the world for the misfortune of beings, for the slaughter of those that breathe.
Which six?
“There are forms, monks, cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
If a monk relishes them, welcomes them, & remains fastened to them, he is said to be a monk who has swallowed Mara's hook, who has fallen into misfortune & disaster.
The Evil One can do with him as he will.
“There are sounds cognizable via the ear…
“There are aromas cognizable via the nose…
“There are flavors cognizable via the tongue…
“There are tactile sensations cognizable via the body…
“There are ideas cognizable via the intellect — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
If a monk relishes them, welcomes them, & remains fastened to them, he is said to be a monk who has swallowed Mara's hook, who has fallen into misfortune & disaster.
The Evil One can do with him as he will.
“Now, there are forms cognizable via the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
If a monk does not relish them, welcome them, or remain fastened to them, he is said to be a monk who has not swallowed Mara's hook, who has snapped the hook, who has broken the hook, who has not fallen into misfortune & disaster.
The Evil One cannot do with him as he will.
“There are sounds cognizable via the ear…
“There are aromas cognizable via the nose…
“There are flavors cognizable via the tongue…
“There are tactile sensations cognizable via the body…
“There are ideas cognizable via the intellect — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
If a monk does not relish them, welcome them, or remain fastened to them, he is said to be a monk who has not swallowed Mara's hook, who has snapped the hook, who has broken the hook, who has not fallen into misfortune & disaster.
The Evil One cannot do with him as he will.”
“Once a hawk suddenly swooped down on a quail and seized it.
Then the quail, as it was being carried off by the hawk, lamented, 'O, just my bad luck and lack of merit that I was wandering out of my proper range and into the territory of others!
If only I had kept to my proper range today, to my own ancestral territory, this hawk would have been no match for me in battle.'
“'But what is your proper range?' the hawk asked.
'What is your own ancestral territory?'
“'A newly plowed field with clumps of earth all turned up.'
“So the hawk, without bragging about its own strength, without mentioning its own strength, let go of the quail.
'Go, quail, but even when you have gone there you won't escape me.'
“Then the quail, having gone to a newly plowed field with clumps of earth all turned up and climbing up on top of a large clump of earth, stood taunting the hawk, 'Now come and get me, you hawk!
Now come and get me, you hawk!'
“So the hawk, without bragging about its own strength, without mentioning its own strength, folded its two wings and suddenly swooped down toward the quail.
When the quail knew, 'The hawk is coming at me full speed,' it slipped behind the clump of earth, and right there the hawk shattered its own breast.
“This is what happens to anyone who wanders into what is not his proper range and is the territory of others.
“For this reason, you should not wander into what is not your proper range and is the territory of others.
In one who wanders into what is not his proper range and is the territory of others, Mara gains an opening, Mara gains a foothold.
And what, for a monk, is not his proper range and is the territory of others?
The five strands of sensuality.
Which five?
Forms cognizable by the eye — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
Sounds cognizable by the ear… Aromas cognizable by the nose… Flavors cognizable by the tongue… Tactile sensations cognizable by the body — agreeable, pleasing, charming, endearing, fostering desire, enticing.
These, for a monk, are not his proper range and are the territory of others.
“Wander, monks, in what is your proper range, your own ancestral territory.
In one who wanders in what is his proper range, his own ancestral territory, Mara gains no opening, Mara gains no foothold.
And what, for a monk, is his proper range, his own ancestral territory?
The four frames of reference.
Which four?
There is the case where a monk remains focused on the body in & of itself — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
He remains focused on feelings in & of themselves… mind in & of itself… mental qualities in & of themselves — ardent, alert, & mindful — putting aside greed & distress with reference to the world.
This, for a monk, is his proper range, his own ancestral territory.
See also: SN.
Once the Blessed One was staying at Kosambi in the simsapa forest.
Then, picking up a few simsapa leaves with his hand, he asked the monks, “What do you think, monks: Which are more numerous, the few simsapa leaves in my hand or those overhead in the simsapa forest?
“The leaves in the hand of the Blessed One are few in number, lord.
Those overhead in the simsapa forest are more numerous.
“In the same way, monks, those things that I have known with direct knowledge but have not taught are far more numerous.
And why haven't I taught them?
Because they are not connected with the goal, do not relate to the rudiments of the holy life, and do not lead to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding.
That is why I have not taught them.
“And what have I taught?
'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress… This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress': This is what I have taught.
And why have I taught these things?
Because they are connected with the goal, relate to the rudiments of the holy life, and lead to disenchantment, to dispassion, to cessation, to calm, to direct knowledge, to self-awakening, to Unbinding.
This is why I have taught them.
“Therefore your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress.' Your duty is the contemplation, 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha in the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
Then the brahman Akkosaka Bharadvaja heard that a brahman of the Bharadvaja clan had gone forth from the home life into homelessness in the presence of the Blessed One.
Angered & displeased, he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, insulted & cursed him with rude, harsh words.
When this was said, the Blessed One said to him: “What do you think, brahman: Do friends & colleagues, relatives & kinsmen come to you as guests?
“Yes, Master Gotama, sometimes friends & colleagues, relatives & kinsmen come to me as guests.
“And what do you think: Do you serve them with staple & non-staple foods & delicacies?
“Yes, sometimes I serve them with staple & non-staple foods & delicacies.
“And if they don't accept them, to whom do those foods belong?
“If they don't accept them, Master Gotama, those foods are all mine.
“In the same way, brahman, that with which you have insulted me, who is not insulting; that with which you have taunted me, who is not taunting; that with which you have berated me, who is not berating: that I don't accept from you.
It's all yours, brahman.
It's all yours.
“Whoever returns insult to one who is insulting, returns taunts to one who is taunting, returns a berating to one who is berating, is said to be eating together, sharing company, with that person.
But I am neither eating together nor sharing your company, brahman.
It's all yours.
It's all yours.
“The king together with his court know this of Master Gotama — 'Gotama the contemplative is an arahant' — and yet still Master Gotama gets angry.
When this was said, the brahman Akkosaka Bharadvaja said to the Blessed One, “Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, & to the community of monks.
Let me obtain the going forth in Master Gotama's presence, let me obtain admission.
Then the brahman Akkosaka Bharadvaja received the going forth & the admission in the Blessed One's presence.
And not long after his admission — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the holy life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And so Ven.
Bharadvaja became another one of the arahants.
“In a guest house, O monks, people from the east may take lodgings, or people from the west, north or south.
People from the warrior caste may come and take lodgings there, and also Brahmans, middle class people and menials.
“Similarly, O monks, there arise in this body various kinds of feelings; there arise pleasant feelings, painful feelings and neutral feelings; worldly feelings that are pleasant, painful or neutral, and unworldly feelings that are pleasant, painful and neutral.”
Standing to one side, a devata addressed the Blessed One with a verse:
Translator's note: This discourse opens the Samyutta Nikaya with a paradox.
The Commentary informs us that the Buddha teaches the devata in terms of the paradox in order to subdue her pride.
To give this paradox some context, you might want to read other passages from the Canon that discuss right effort.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then a certain devata, in the far extreme of the night, her extreme radiance lighting up the entirety of Jeta's Grove, went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to him, she stood to one side.
As she was standing there, she said to him, “Tell me, dear sir, how you crossed over the flood.
“I crossed over the flood without pushing forward, without staying in place.
“But how, dear sir, did you cross over the flood without pushing forward, without staying in place?
“When I pushed forward, I was whirled about.
When I stayed in place, I sank.
And so I crossed over the flood without pushing forward, without staying in place.
That is what the devata said.
The Teacher approved.
Realizing that “The Teacher has approved of me,” she bowed down to him, circumambulated him — keeping him to her right — and then vanished right there.
At Savatthi.
“Monks, there are these four floods.
Which four?
The flood of sensuality, the flood of becoming, the flood of views, & the flood of ignorance.
These are the four floods.
“Now, this noble eightfold path is to be developed for direct knowledge of, comprehension of, the total ending of, & the abandoning of these four floods.
Which noble eightfold path?
There is the case where a monk develops right view dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in letting go.
He develops right resolve… right speech… right action… right livelihood… right effort… right mindfulness… right concentration dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in letting go.
This noble eightfold path is to be developed for direct knowledge of, for comprehension of, for the total ending of, & for the abandoning of these four floods.
See also: SN.; AN.; Sn.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Ayojjhans on the banks of the Ganges River.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks, suppose that a large glob of foam were floating down this Ganges River, and a man with good eyesight were to see it, observe it, & appropriately examine it.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in a glob of foam?
In the same way, a monk sees, observes, & appropriately examines any form that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in form?
“Now suppose that in the autumn — when it's raining in fat, heavy drops — a water bubble were to appear & disappear on the water, and a man with good eyesight were to see it, observe it, & appropriately examine it.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in a water bubble?
In the same way, a monk sees, observes, & appropriately examines any feeling that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in feeling?
“Now suppose that in the last month of the hot season a mirage were shimmering, and a man with good eyesight were to see it, observe it, & appropriately examine it.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in a mirage?
In the same way, a monk sees, observes, & appropriately examines any perception that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in perception?
“Now suppose that a man desiring heartwood, in quest of heartwood, seeking heartwood, were to go into a forest carrying a sharp ax.
There he would see a large banana tree: straight, young, of enormous height.
He would cut it at the root and, having cut it at the root, would chop off the top.
Having chopped off the top, he would peel away the outer skin.
Peeling away the outer skin, he wouldn't even find sapwood, to say nothing of heartwood.
Then a man with good eyesight would see it, observe it, & appropriately examine it.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in a banana tree?
In the same way, a monk sees, observes, & appropriately examines any fabrications that are past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near.
To him — seeing them, observing them, & appropriately examining them — they would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in fabrications?
“Now suppose that a magician or magician's apprentice were to display a magic trick at a major intersection, and a man with good eyesight were to see it, observe it, & appropriately examine it.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in a magic trick?
In the same way, a monk sees, observes, & appropriately examines any consciousness that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near.
To him — seeing it, observing it, & appropriately examining it — it would appear empty, void, without substance: for what substance would there be in consciousness?
“Seeing thus, the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with fabrications, disenchanted with consciousness.
Disenchanted, he grows dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he's released.
With release there's the knowledge, 'Released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.' That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying in Gaya, at Gaya Head, with, monks.
There he addressed the monks:
“Monks, the All is aflame.
What All is aflame?
The eye is aflame.
Forms are aflame.
Consciousness at the eye is aflame.
Contact at the eye is aflame.
And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the eye — experienced as pleasure, pain or neither-pleasure-nor-pain — that too is aflame.
Aflame with what?
Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion.
Aflame, I tell you, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“The ear is aflame.
Sounds are aflame…
“The nose is aflame.
Aromas are aflame…
“The tongue is aflame.
Flavors are aflame…
“The body is aflame.
Tactile sensations are aflame…
“The intellect is aflame.
Ideas are aflame.
Consciousness at the intellect is aflame.
Contact at the intellect is aflame.
And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the intellect — experienced as pleasure, pain or neither-pleasure-nor-pain — that too is aflame.
Aflame with what?
Aflame with the fire of passion, the fire of aversion, the fire of delusion.
Aflame, I say, with birth, aging & death, with sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
“Seeing thus, the well-instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with the eye, disenchanted with forms, disenchanted with consciousness at the eye, disenchanted with contact at the eye.
And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the eye, experienced as pleasure, pain or neither-pleasure-nor-pain: With that, too, he grows disenchanted.
“He grows disenchanted with the ear…
“He grows disenchanted with the nose…
“He grows disenchanted with the tongue…
“He grows disenchanted with the body…
“He grows disenchanted with the intellect, disenchanted with ideas, disenchanted with consciousness at the intellect, disenchanted with contact at the intellect.
And whatever there is that arises in dependence on contact at the intellect, experienced as pleasure, pain or neither-pleasure-nor-pain: He grows disenchanted with that too.
Disenchanted, he becomes dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he is fully released.
With full release, there is the knowledge, 'Fully released.' He discerns that 'Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.' That is what the Blessed One said.
Gratified, the monks delighted at his words.
And while this explanation was being given, the hearts of the, monks, through no clinging, were fully released from fermentation/effluents.
“Monks, there are these five faculties.
Which five?
The pleasure-faculty, the pain-faculty, the happiness-faculty, the distress-faculty, the equanimity-faculty.
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasure, the pleasure-faculty arises.
Being eased, one discerns, 'I am eased.' With the cessation of that very contact to be experienced as pleasure, one discerns, 'What was experienced as coming from that — the pleasure-faculty arising in dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasure — ceases & grows still.'
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as pain, the pain-faculty arises.
Being pained, one discerns, 'I am pained.' With the cessation of that very contact to be experienced as pain, one discerns, 'What was experienced as coming from that — the pain-faculty arising in dependence on a contact to be experienced as pain — ceases & grows still.'
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as happiness, the happiness-faculty arises.
Being happy, one discerns, 'I am happy.' With the cessation of that very contact to be experienced as happiness, one discerns, 'What was experienced as coming from that — the happiness-faculty arising in dependence on a contact to be experienced as happiness — ceases & grows still.'
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as distress, the distress-faculty arises.
Being distressed, one discerns, 'I am distressed.' With the cessation of that very contact to be experienced as distress, one discerns, 'What was experienced as coming from that — the distress-faculty arising in dependence on a contact to be experienced as distress — ceases & grows still.'
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as equanimity, the equanimity-faculty arises.
Being equanimous, one discerns, 'I am equanimous.' With the cessation of that very contact to be experienced as equanimity, one discerns, 'What was experienced as coming from that — the equanimity-faculty arising in dependence on a contact to be experienced as equanimity — ceases & grows still.'
“Just as when, from the conjunction & combining of two fire sticks, heat is generated & fire produced, while from the separation & laying down of those fire sticks the heat coming from them ceases & grows still; in the same way, in dependence on a contact to be experienced as pleasure, the pleasure-faculty arises…
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as pain, the pain-faculty arises…
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as happiness, the happiness-faculty arises…
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as distress, the distress-faculty arises…
“In dependence on a contact to be experienced as equanimity, the equanimity-faculty arises.
Being equanimous, one discerns, 'I am equanimous.' With the cessation of that very contact to be experienced as equanimity, one discerns, 'What was experienced as coming from that — the equanimity-faculty arising in dependence on a contact to be experienced as equanimity — ceases & grows still.'”
Dwelling at Savatthi.
There the Blessed One said to the monks: “In one who keeps focusing on the allure of clingable phenomena, craving develops.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origin of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
“Just as if a great mass of fire of ten… twenty… thirty or forty cartloads of timber were burning, and into it a man would time & again throw dried grass, dried cow dung, & dried timber, so that the great mass of fire — thus nourished, thus sustained — would burn for a long, long time.
In the same way, in one who keeps focusing on the allure of clingable phenomena, craving develops.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origin of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
“Now, in one who keeps focusing on the drawbacks of clingable phenomena, craving ceases.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging, illness & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering & stress.
“Just as if a great mass of fire of ten… twenty… thirty or forty cartloads of timber were burning, into which a man simply would not time & again throw dried grass, dried cow dung, or dried timber, so that the great mass of fire — its original sustenance being consumed, and no other being offered — would, without nutriment, go out.
In the same way, in one who keeps focusing on the drawbacks of clingable phenomena, craving ceases.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging, illness & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of suffering & stress.”
Staying at Savatthi.
Then the Blessed One, picking up a little bit of dust with the tip of his fingernail, said to the monks, “What do you think, monks?
Which is greater: the little bit of dust I have picked up with the tip of my fingernail, or the great earth?
“The great earth is far greater, lord.
The little bit of dust the Blessed One has picked up with the tip of his fingernail is next to nothing.
It doesn't even count.
It's no comparison.
It's not even a fraction, this little bit of dust the Blessed One has picked up with the tip of his fingernail, when compared with the great earth.
“In the same way, monks, few are the beings reborn among human beings.
Far more are those reborn elsewhere.
Thus you should train yourselves: 'We will live heedfully.' That's how you should train yourselves.
See also: Dhp.
Staying at Savatthi.
“Monks, if someone were to give a gift of one hundred serving dishes in the morning, one hundred at mid-day, and one hundred in the evening; and another person were to develop a mind of good-will — even for the time it takes to pull on a cow's udder — in the morning, again at mid-day, and again in the evening, this would be more fruitful than that.
“Thus you should train yourselves: 'Our awareness-release through good-will will be cultivated, developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, & well-undertaken.
That's how you should train yourselves.
See also: Iti.
“There is, monks, an inter-cosmic void, an unrestrained darkness, a pitch-black darkness, where even the light of the sun & moon — so mighty, so powerful — doesn't reach.
When this was said, one of the monks said to the Blessed One, “Wow, what a great darkness!
What a really great darkness!
Is there any darkness greater & more frightening than that?
“There is, monk, a darkness greater & more frightening than that.
“And which darkness, lord, is greater & more frightening than that?
“Any brahmans or contemplatives who do not know, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress'; who do not know, as it actually is present, that 'This is the origination of stress'… 'This is the cessation of stress'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress': They revel in fabrications leading to birth; they revel in fabrications leading to aging; they revel in fabrications leading to death; they revel in fabrications leading to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Reveling in fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they fabricate fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Fabricating fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they drop into the darkness of birth.
They drop into the darkness of aging… the darkness of death… darkness of sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
They are not totally released from birth, aging, death, sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
They are not totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“But as for any brahmans or contemplatives who do know, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress'; who know, as it actually is present, that 'This is the origination of stress'… 'This is the cessation of stress'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress': They don't revel in fabrications leading to birth; don't revel in fabrications leading to aging; don't revel in fabrications leading to death; don't revel in fabrications leading to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Not reveling in fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they don't fabricate fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Not fabricating fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they don't drop into the darkness of birth.
They don't drop into the darkness of aging, don't drop into the darkness of death, don't drop into the darkness of sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
They are totally released from birth, aging, death, sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
They are totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“Therefore, monks, your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress.' Your duty is the contemplation, 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' See also: SN.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rājagaha at the Bamboo Grove, the Squirrels' Sanctuary.
And on that occasion in Rājagaha there was a leper named Suppabuddha, a poor, miserable wretch of a person.
And on that occasion the Blessed One was sitting surrounded by a large assembly, teaching the Dhamma.
Suppabuddha the leper saw the large gathering of people from afar and thought to himself, “Without a doubt, someone must be distributing staple or non-staple food there.
Why don't I go over to that large group of people, and maybe there I'll get some staple or non-staple food.” So he went over to the large group of people.
Then he saw the Blessed One sitting surrounded by a large assembly, teaching the Dhamma.
On seeing this, he realized, “There's no one distributing staple or non-staple food there.
That's Gotama the contemplative surrounded, teaching the Dhamma.
Why don't I listen to the Dhamma?” So he sat down to one side right there, “I, too, will listen to the Dhamma.
Then the Blessed One, having encompassed the awareness of the entire assembly with his awareness, asked himself, “Now who here is capable of understanding the Dhamma?” He saw Suppabuddha the leper sitting in the assembly, and on seeing him the thought occurred to him, “This person here is capable of understanding the Dhamma.” So, aiming at Suppabuddha the leper, he gave a step-by-step talk, i.e., he proclaimed a talk on generosity, on virtue, on heaven; he declared the drawbacks, degradation, & corruption of sensuality, and the rewards of renunciation.
Then when the Blessed One knew that Suppabuddha the leper's mind was ready, malleable, free from hindrances, elevated, & clear, he then gave the Dhamma-talk peculiar to Awakened Ones, i.e., stress, origination, cessation, & path.
And just as a clean cloth, free of stains, would properly absorb a dye, in the same way, as Suppabuddha the leper was sitting in that very seat, the dustless, stainless Dhamma eye arose within him, “Whatever is subject to origination is all subject to cessation.
Having seen the Dhamma, reached the Dhamma, known the Dhamma, gained a foothold in the Dhamma, having crossed over & beyond doubt, having had no more perplexity, having gained fearlessness & independence from others with regard to the Teacher's message, he got up from his seat and went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to the Blessed One, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Magnificent, lord!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has the Blessed One — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to the Blessed One for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Community of monks.
May the Blessed One remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.
Then Suppabuddha the leper, having been instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged by the Blessed One's Dhamma talk, delighting in & approving of the Blessed One's words, got up from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One and left, circling him to the right.
Not long after his departure he was attacked & killed by a cow with a young calf.
Then a large number of monks went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One, “Lord, the leper named Suppabuddha, whom the Blessed One instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged with a Dhamma talk, has died.
What is his destination?
What is his future state?
“Monks, Suppabuddha the leper was wise.
He practiced the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma and did not pester me with issues related to the Dhamma.
With the destruction of the first three fetters, he is a stream-winner, not subject to states of deprivation, headed for self-awakening for sure.
When this was said, one of the monks said to the Blessed One, “Lord, what was the cause, what was the reason, why Suppabuddha the leper was such a poor, miserable wretch of a person?
“Once, monks, in this very Rājagaha, Suppabuddha the leper was the son of a rich money-lender.
While being escorted to a pleasure park, he saw Tagarasikhin the Private Buddha going for alms in the city.
On seeing him, the thought occurred to him, 'Who is this leper prowling about?' Spitting and disrespectfully turning his left side to Tagarasikhin the Private Buddha, he left.
As a result of that deed he boiled in hell for many years, many hundreds of years, many thousands of years, many hundreds of thousands of years.
And then as a remainder of the result of that deed he became a poor, miserable wretch of a person in this very Rājagaha.
But on encountering the Dhamma & Vinaya made known by the Tathāgata, he acquired conviction, virtue, learning, relinquishment, & discernment.
Having acquired conviction, virtue, learning, relinquishment, & discernment on encountering the Dhamma & Vinaya made known by the Tathāgata, now — on the break-up of the body, after death — he has reappeared in a good destination, the heavenly world, in company with the devas of the heaven of the Thirty-three.
There he outshines the other devas both in beauty & in rank.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha at Vulture's Peak.
Then he said to the monks, “Come, monks, let's go to Inspiration Peak for the day's abiding.
“As you say, lord,” the monks responded.
Then the Blessed One together with a large number of monks went to Inspiration Peak.
One of the monks saw the huge drop-off from Inspiration Peak and, on seeing it, said to the Blessed One, “Wow, what a huge drop-off!
What a really huge drop-off!
Is there any drop-off more huge & frightening than this?
“There is, monk, a drop-off more huge & frightening than this.
“And which drop-off, lord, is more huge & frightening than this?
“Any brahmans or contemplatives who do not know, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress'; who do not know, as it actually is present, that 'This is the origination of stress'… 'This is the cessation of stress'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress': They revel in fabrications leading to birth; they revel in fabrications leading to aging; they revel in fabrications leading to death; they revel in fabrications leading to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Reveling in fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they fabricate fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Fabricating fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they drop over the drop-off of birth.
They drop over the drop-off of aging… the drop-off of death… the drop-off of sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
They are not totally released from birth, aging, death, sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
They are not totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“But as for any brahmans or contemplatives who do know, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress'; who know, as it actually is present, that 'This is the origination of stress'… 'This is the cessation of stress'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress': They don't revel in fabrications leading to birth; don't revel in fabrications leading to aging; don't revel in fabrications leading to death; don't revel in fabrications leading to sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Not reveling in fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they don't fabricate fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
Not fabricating fabrications leading to birth… aging… death… sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair, they don't drop over the drop-off of birth.
They don't drop over the drop-off of aging, don't drop over the drop-off of death, don't drop over the drop-off of sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.
They are totally released from birth, aging, death, sorrows, lamentations, pains, distresses, & despairs.
They are totally released, I tell you, from suffering & stress.
“Therefore, monks, your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress.' Your duty is the contemplation, 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' See also: SN.
Once Ven.
Sariputta and Ven.
Upasena were staying near Rajagaha in the Cool Forest, at Snakeshood Grotto.
Then it so happened that a snake fell on Ven.
Upasena's body.
Then Ven.
Upasena said to the monks, “Quick, friends, lift this body of mine onto a couch and carry it outside before it is scattered like a fistful of chaff!
When this was said, Ven.
Sariputta said to Ven.
Upasena, “But we don't see any alteration in your body or change in your faculties.
Then Ven.
Upasena said, “Quick, friends, lift this body of mine onto a couch and carry it outside before it is scattered like a fistful of chaff!
Friend Sariputta, in anyone who had the thought, 'I am the eye' or 'The eye is mine,' 'I am the ear' or 'The ear is mine,' 'I am the nose' or 'The nose is mine,' 'I am the tongue' or 'The tongue is mine,' 'I am the body or 'The body is mine,' 'I am the intellect' or 'The intellect is mine': in him there would be an alteration in his body or a change in his faculties.
But as for me, the thought does not occur to me that 'I am the eye' or 'The eye is mine,'… 'I am the tongue' or 'The tongue is mine,'… 'I am the intellect' or 'The intellect is mine.' So what alteration should there be in my body, what change should there be in my faculties?
Now, Ven.
Upasena's I-making, my-making, & obsession with conceit had already been well rooted out for a long time, which is why the thought did not occur to him that “I am the eye” or “The eye is mine,”… “I am the tongue” or “The tongue is mine,”… “I am the intellect” or “The intellect is mine.
Then the monks lifted Ven.
Upasena's body on a couch and carried it outside.
And Ven.
Upasena's body was scattered right there like a fistful of chaff.
“Monks, when an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person makes the statement, 'There is a bottomless chasm in the ocean,' he is talking about something that doesn't exist, that can't be found.
The word 'bottomless chasm' is actually a designation for painful bodily feeling.
“When an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person is touched by a painful bodily feeling, he sorrows, grieves, & laments, beats his breast, becomes distraught.
This is called an uninstructed run-of-the-mill person who has not risen up out of the bottomless chasm, who has not gained a foothold.
“When a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones is touched by a painful bodily feeling, he does not sorrow, grieve, or lament, does not beat his breast or become distraught.
This is called a well-instructed disciple of the noble ones who has risen up out of the bottomless chasm, whose foothold is gained.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was living among the Sumbhas.
Now there is a Sumbhan town named Sedaka.
There the Blessed One addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said, “Once upon a time, monks, a bamboo acrobat, having erected a bamboo pole, addressed his assistant, Frying Pan: 'Come, my dear Frying Pan.
Climb up the bamboo pole and stand on my shoulders.'
“'As you say, Master,' Frying Pan answered the bamboo acrobat and, climbing the bamboo pole, stood on his shoulders.
“So then the bamboo acrobat said to his assistant, 'Now you watch after me, my dear Frying Pan, and I'll watch after you.
Thus, protecting one another, watching after one another, we'll show off our skill, receive our reward, and come down safely from the bamboo pole.'
“When he had said this, Frying Pan said to him, 'But that won't do at all, Master.
You watch after yourself, and I'll watch after myself, and thus with each of us protecting ourselves, watching after ourselves, we'll show off our skill, receive our reward, and come down safely from the bamboo pole.'
“What Frying Pan, the assistant, said to her Master was the right way in that case.
“Monks, the establishing of mindfulness is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after myself.' The establishing of mindfulness is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after others.' When watching after yourself, you watch after others.
When watching after others, you watch after yourself.
“And how do you watch after others when watching after yourself?
Through cultivating, through developing it, through pursuing it.
This is how you watch after others when watching after yourself.
“And how do you watch after yourself when watching after others?
Through endurance, through harmlessness, through a mind of goodwill, & through sympathy.
This is how you watch after yourself when watching after others.
“The establishing of mindfulness is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after myself.' The establishing of mindfulness is to be practiced with the thought, 'I'll watch after others.' When watching after yourself, you watch after others.
When watching after others, you watch after yourself.”
Staying at Savatthi.
“Monks, suppose there were four strong archers — well-trained, practiced, & drilled — standing in the four directions, and a man were to come along saying, 'I will catch & bring down the arrows let fly by these four strong archers — well-trained, practiced, & drilled — before they have fallen to the ground.' What do you think?
Would that be enough to call him a swift man, endowed with the foremost speed?
“Even if he were to catch & bring down the arrows let fly by one archer — well-trained, practiced, & drilled — before they fell to the ground, lord, that would be enough to call him a swift man, endowed with the foremost speed, to say nothing of four such archers.
“Faster than the speed of that man, monks, is the speed of the sun & moon.
Faster than the speed of that man, faster than the speed of the sun & moon, is the speed of the devas who rush ahead of the sun & moon.
Faster than the speed of that man, faster than the speed of the sun & moon, faster than the speed of the devas who rush ahead of the sun & moon, the force of one's life span comes to an end.
Thus you should train yourselves: 'We will live heedfully.' That's how you should train yourselves.
See also: SN.; Sn..
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was living among the Magadhans at Dakkhinagiri in the brahman village of Ekanala.
Now at that time approximately of the brahman Kasi Bharadvaja's plows were yoked at the sowing time.
Then, in the early morning, putting on his lower robe and taking his bowl & robes, the Blessed One went to where Kasi Bharadvaja was working.
Now at that time Kasi Bharadvaja's food-distribution was underway.
So the Blessed One went to Kasi Bharadvaja's food-distribution and, on arrival, stood to one side.
Kasi Bharadvaja saw the Blessed One standing for alms, and on seeing him, said to him, “I, contemplative, plow & sow.
Having plowed & sown, I eat.
You, too, contemplative, should plow & sow.
Having plowed & sown, you eat.
“I, too, brahman, plow & sow.
Having plowed & sown, I eat.
“But, contemplative, I don't see the Master Gotama's yoke or plow, plowshare, goad, or oxen, and yet the Master Gotama says this: 'I, too, brahman, plow & sow.
Having plowed & sown, I eat.' Then the Kasi Bharadvaja addressed the Blessed One with a verse:
Then Kasi Bharadvaja, having heaped up milk-rice in a large bronze serving bowl, offered it to the Blessed One, “May Master Gotama eat milk-rice.
The master is a plowman, for the Master Gotama plows the plowing that has as its fruit the deathless.
“Then to whom, Master Gotama, should I give this milk-rice?
“Brahman, I don't see that person in this world — with its devas, Maras, & Brahmas, in this generation with its royalty & common people — by whom this milk-rice, having been eaten, would be rightly digested, aside from a Tathagata or a Tathagata's disciple.
In that case, brahman, throw the milk-rice away in a place without vegetation, or dump it in water with no living beings.
So Kasi Bharadvaja dumped the milk-rice in water with no living beings.
And the milk-rice, when dropped in the water, hissed & sizzled, seethed & steamed.
Just as an iron ball heated all day, when tossed in the water, hisses & sizzles, seethes & steams, in the same way the milk-rice, when dropped in the water, hissed & sizzled, seethed & steamed.
Then Kasi Bharadvaja — in awe, his hair standing on end — went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, throwing himself down with his head at the Blessed One's feet, said to him, “Magnificent, Master Gotama!
Magnificent!
Just as if he were to place upright what was overturned, to reveal what was hidden, to show the way to one who was lost, or to carry a lamp into the dark so that those with eyes could see forms, in the same way has Master Gotama — through many lines of reasoning — made the Dhamma clear.
I go to Master Gotama for refuge, to the Dhamma, and to the Community of monks.
May Master Gotama remember me as a lay follower who has gone to him for refuge, from this day forward, for life.
Let me obtain the going forth in Master Gotama's presence, let me obtain admission.
Then the brahman Kasi Bharadvaja obtained the going forth in the Blessed One's presence, he obtained admission.
And not long after his admission — dwelling alone, secluded, heedful, ardent, & resolute — he in no long time reached & remained in the supreme goal of the celibate life, for which clansmen rightly go forth from home into homelessness, knowing & realizing it for himself in the here & now.
He knew: “Birth is ended, the celibate life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for the sake of this world.” And so Ven.
Bharadvaja became another one of the arahants.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Vesali at the Gabled Hall in the Great Forest.
Then in the early morning, Ven.
Ananda, having put on his robe and carrying his bowl and outer robe, went into Vesali for alms.
He saw a large number of Licchavi boys practicing archery in the stadium building.
From a distance they were shooting arrows through a tiny keyhole without missing, one right after the other.
On seeing this, the thought occurred to him, “How trained these Licchavi boys are, how well-trained these Licchavi boys are, in that from a distance they can shoot arrows through a tiny keyhole without missing, one right after the other!
Then, having gone for alms in Vesali, after his meal, returning from his alms round, Ven.
Ananda went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One: “Just now, lord, in the early morning, having put on my robe and carrying my bowl and outer robe, I went into Vesali for alms.
I saw a large number of Licchavi boys practicing archery in the stadium building.
From a distance they were shooting arrows through a tiny keyhole without missing, one right after the other.
On seeing this, the thought occurred to me 'How trained these Licchavi boys are, how well-trained these Licchavi boys are, in that from a distance they can shoot arrows through a tiny keyhole without missing, one right after the other!' “What do you think, Ananda: Which is harder to do, harder to master — to shoot arrows through a tiny keyhole without missing, one right after the other, or to take a horsehair split into seven strands and pierce tip with a tip?
“This, lord, is harder to do, harder to master — to take a horsehair split into seven strands and pierce tip with a tip.
“And they, Ananda, pierce what is even harder to pierce, those who pierce, as it actually is present, that 'This is stress'; who pierce, as it actually is present, that 'This is the origination of stress'… 'This is the cessation of stress'… 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.'
“Therefore, Ananda, your duty is the contemplation, 'This is stress… This is the origination of stress… This is the cessation of stress.' Your duty is the contemplation, 'This is the path of practice leading to the cessation of stress.' See also: SN.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at the Eastern Monastery, the palace of Migāra's mother.
And on that occasion the Blessed One, having emerged from his seclusion in the late afternoon, was sitting outside the doorway of the porch.
Then King Pasenadi Kosala went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
Now on that occasion seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven cloth-less ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, & seven wanderers — their nails, armpit-hair, & body-hair grown long, carrying containers on poles — walked past, not far from the Blessed One.
King Pasenadi Kosala saw the seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven cloth-less ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, & seven wanderers — their nails, armpit-hair, & body-hair grown long, carrying containers on poles — walking past, not far from the Blessed One.
On seeing them, he got up from his seat, arranged his upper robe over one shoulder, knelt down with his right knee on the ground, paid homage to the seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven cloth-less ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, & seven wanderers with his hands palm-to-palm in front his heart, and announced his name three times: “I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala.
I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala.
I am the king, venerable sirs, Pasenadi Kosala.
Then not long after the seven coiled-hair ascetics, seven Jain ascetics, seven cloth-less ascetics, seven one-cloth ascetics, & seven wanderers had passed, King Pasenadi Kosala went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Of those in the world who are arahants or on the path to arahantship, are these among them?
“Great king, as a layman enjoying sensual pleasures; living confined with children; using Kāsī fabrics & sandalwood; wearing garlands, scents, & creams; handling gold & silver, it's hard for you to know whether these are arahants or on the path to arahantship.
“It's through living together that a person's virtue may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“It's through trading with a person that his purity may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“It's through adversity that a person's endurance may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“It's through discussion that a person's discernment may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“Amazing, lord!
Astounding!
— how well that was put by the Blessed One!
'Great king, as a layman enjoying sensual pleasures; living confined with children; using Kāsī fabrics & sandalwood; wearing garlands, scents, & creams; handling gold & silver, it's hard for you to know whether these are arahants or on the path to arahantship.
“'It's through living together that a person's virtue may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“'It's through trading with a person that his purity may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“'It's through adversity that a person's endurance may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.
“'It's through discussion that a person's discernment may be known, and then only after a long period, not a short period; by one who is attentive, not by one who is inattentive; by one who is discerning, not by one who is not discerning.'
“These men, lord, are my spies, my scouts, returning after going out through the countryside.
They go out first, and then I go.
Now, when they have scrubbed off the dirt & mud, are well-bathed & well-perfumed, have trimmed their hair and beards, and have put on white clothes, they will go about endowed and provided with the five strings of sensuality.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
The verse in SN.
may seem more immediately relevant to the situation than the verse given here, but the verse given here is a more interesting and original response to what is happening.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans near Kapilavatthu in Nigrodha's Park.
Then Mahanama the Sakyan went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, this Kapilavatthu is rich & prosperous, populous & crowded, its alleys congested.
Sometimes, when I enter Kapilavatthu in the evening after visiting with the Blessed One or with the monks who inspire the mind, I meet up with a runaway elephant, a runaway horse, a runaway chariot, a runaway cart, or a runaway person.
At times like that my mindfulness with regard to the Blessed One gets muddled, my mindfulness with regard to the Dhamma… the Sangha gets muddled.
The thought occurs to me, 'If I were to die at this moment, what would be my destination?
What would be my future course?
“Have no fear, Mahanama!
Have no fear!
Your death will not be a bad one, your demise will not be bad.
If one's mind has long been nurtured with conviction, nurtured with virtue, nurtured with learning, nurtured with relinquishment, nurtured with discernment, then when the body — endowed with form, composed of the four primary elements, born from mother & father, nourished with rice & porridge, subject to inconstancy, rubbing, pressing, dissolution, & dispersion — is eaten by crows, vultures, hawks, dogs, hyenas, or all sorts of creatures, nevertheless the mind — long nurtured with conviction, nurtured with virtue, learning, relinquishment, & discernment — rises upward and separates out.
“Suppose a man were to throw a jar of ghee or a jar of oil into a deep lake of water, where it would break.
There the shards & jar-fragments would go down, while the ghee or oil would rise upward and separate out.
In the same way, if one's mind has long been nurtured with conviction, nurtured with virtue, nurtured with learning, nurtured with relinquishment, nurtured with discernment, then when the body… is eaten by crows, vultures, hawks, dogs, hyenas, or all sorts of creatures, nevertheless the mind… rises upward and separates out.
“Have no fear, Mahanama!
Have no fear!
Your death will not be a bad one, your demise will not be bad.
See also: SN.; AN.
On one occasion Ven.
Sariputta and Ven.
Maha Kotthita were staying near Varanasi in the Game Refuge at Isipatana.
Then in the evening, Ven.
Sariputta emerged from his seclusion and went to Ven.
Maha Kotthita and exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Maha Kotthita, “Now then, friend Kotthita, does the Tathagata exist after death?
“That, friend, has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata exists after death.' “Well then, friend Kotthita, does the Tathagata not exist after death?
“Friend, that too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata does not exist after death.' “Then does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?
“That has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.' “Well then, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?
“That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.' “Now, friend Kotthita, when asked if the Tathagata exists after death, you say, 'That has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata exists after death.”' When asked if the Tathagata does not exist after death… both exists and does not exist after death… neither exists nor does not exist after death, you say, 'That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.”' Now, what is the cause, what is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“For one who loves form, who is fond of form, who cherishes form, who does not know or see, as it actually is present, the cessation of form, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“For one who loves feeling…
“For one who loves perception…
“For one who loves fabrications…
“For one who loves consciousness, who is fond of consciousness, who cherishes consciousness, who does not know or see, as it actually is present, the cessation of consciousness, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“But for one who doesn't love form, who isn't fond of form, who doesn't cherish form, who knows & sees, as it actually is present, the cessation of form, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“For one who doesn't love feeling…
“For one who doesn't love perception…
“For one who doesn't love fabrication…
“For one who doesn't love consciousness, who isn't fond of consciousness, who doesn't cherish consciousness, who knows & sees, as it actually is present, the cessation of consciousness, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“This is the cause, this is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One.
“But, my friend, would there another line of reasoning, in line with which that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“There would, my friend.
“For one who loves becoming, who is fond of becoming, who cherishes becoming, who does not know or see, as it actually is present, the cessation of becoming, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“But for one who doesn't love becoming, who isn't fond of becoming, who doesn't cherish becoming, who knows & sees, as it actually is present, the cessation of becoming, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“This, too, is a line of reasoning in line with which that has not been declared by the Blessed One.
“But, my friend, would there another line of reasoning, in line with which that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“There would, my friend.
“For one who loves clinging/sustenance, who is fond of clinging/sustenance, who cherishes clinging/sustenance, who does not know or see, as it actually is present, the cessation of clinging/sustenance, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“But for one who doesn't love clinging/sustenance, who isn't fond of clinging/sustenance, who doesn't cherish clinging/sustenance, who knows & sees, as it actually is present, the cessation of clinging/sustenance, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“This, too, is a line of reasoning in line with which that has not been declared by the Blessed One.
“But, my friend, would there another line of reasoning, in line with which that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“There would, my friend.
“For one who loves craving, who is fond of craving, who cherishes craving, who does not know or see, as it actually is present, the cessation of craving, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“But for one who doesn't love craving, who isn't fond of craving, who doesn't cherish craving, who knows & sees, as it actually is present, the cessation of craving, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“This, too, is a line of reasoning in line with which that has not been declared by the Blessed One.
“But, my friend, would there another line of reasoning, in line with which that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“Now, what more do you want, friend Kotthita?
When a monk has been freed from the classification of craving, there exists no cycle for describing him.
See also: other suttas in the Avyakata Samyutta; AN..
On one occasion Ven.
Sariputta and Ven.
Maha Kotthita were staying near Varanasi in the Game Refuge at Isipatana.
Then in the evening, Ven.
Maha Kotthita emerged from his seclusion and went to Ven.
Sariputta and exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Now then, friend Sariputta, does the Tathagata exist after death?
“That, friend, has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata exists after death.' “Well then, friend Sariputta, does the Tathagata not exist after death?
“Friend, that too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata does not exist after death.' “Then does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?
“That has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.' “Well then, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?
“That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.' “Now, friend Sariputta, when asked if the Tathagata exists after death, you say, 'That has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata exists after death.”' When asked if the Tathagata does not exist after death… both exists and does not exist after death… neither exists nor does not exist after death, you say, 'That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.”' Now, what is the cause, what is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“For one who does not know & see form as it actually is present, who does not know & see the origination of form… the cessation of form… the path of practice leading to the cessation of form, as it actually is present, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“For one who does not know & see feeling as it actually is present…
“For one who does not know & see perception as it actually is present…
“For one who does not know & see fabrications as they actually are present…
“For one who does not know & see consciousness as it actually is present, who does not know & see the origination of consciousness… the cessation of consciousness… the path of practice leading to the cessation of consciousness, as it actually is present, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“But for one who knows & sees form as it actually is present, who knows & sees the origination of form… the cessation of form… the path of practice leading to the cessation of form, as it actually is present, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“For one who knows & sees feeling as it actually is present…
“For one who knows & sees perception as it actually is present…
“For one who knows & sees fabrications as they actually are present…
“For one who knows & sees consciousness as it actually is present, who knows & sees the origination of consciousness… the cessation of consciousness… the path of practice leading to the cessation of consciousness, as it actually is present, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“This is the cause, this is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One.
See also: other suttas in the Avyakata Samyutta.
On one occasion Ven.
Sariputta and Ven.
Maha Kotthita were staying near Varanasi in the Game Refuge at Isipatana.
Then in the evening, Ven.
Maha Kotthita emerged from his seclusion and went to Ven.
Sariputta and exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Now then, friend Sariputta, does the Tathagata exist after death?
“That, friend, has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata exists after death.' “Well then, friend Sariputta, does the Tathagata not exist after death?
“Friend, that too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata does not exist after death.' “Then does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?
“That has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.' “Well then, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?
“That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.' “Now, friend Sariputta, when asked if the Tathagata exists after death, you say, 'That has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata exists after death.”' When asked if the Tathagata does not exist after death… both exists and does not exist after death… neither exists nor does not exist after death, you say, 'That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.”' Now, what is the cause, what is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“'The Tathagata exists after death' is immersed in form.
'The Tathagata does not exist after death' is immersed in form.
'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' is immersed in form.
'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' is immersed in form.
“'The Tathagata exists after death' is immersed in feeling…
“'The Tathagata exists after death' is immersed in perception…
“'The Tathagata exists after death' is immersed in fabrication…
“'The Tathagata exists after death' is immersed in consciousness.
'The Tathagata does not exist after death' is immersed in consciousness.
'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' is immersed in consciousness.
'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' is immersed in consciousness.
“This is the cause, this is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One.
See also: other suttas in the Avyakata Samyutta; AN..
“Monks, it is in dependence on the Himalayas, the king of mountains, that serpents grow in body and gain in strength.
Having grown in body and gained strength there, they descend to the small lakes.
Having descended to the small lakes, they descend to the large lakes… the small rivers… the large rivers… to the great ocean.
There they attain greatness & prosperity in terms of the body.
“In the same way, it is in dependence on virtue, established on virtue, having developed & pursued the seven factors of Awakening, that a monk attains to greatness & prosperity in terms of mental qualities.
And how is it that a monk — in dependence on virtue, established on virtue, having developed & pursued the seven factors for Awakening — attains to greatness & prosperity in terms of mental qualities?
“There is the case where a monk develops mindfulness as a factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in relinquishment.
He develops analysis of qualities as a factor for Awakening…persistence as a factor for Awakening…rapture as a factor for Awakening…serenity as a factor for Awakening…concentration as a factor for Awakening…equanimity as a factor for Awakening dependent on seclusion, dependent on dispassion, dependent on cessation, resulting in relinquishment.
This is how a monk — in dependence on virtue, established on virtue, having developed & pursued the seven factors for Awakening — attains to greatness & prosperity in terms of mental qualities.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans near Kapilavatthu in Nigrodha's Park.
Then Mahanama the Sakyan went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, this Kapilavatthu is rich & prosperous, populous & crowded, its alleys congested.
Sometimes, when I enter Kapilavatthu in the evening after visiting with the Blessed One or with the monks who inspire the mind, I meet up with a runaway elephant, a runaway horse, a runaway chariot, a runaway cart, or a runaway person.
At times like that my mindfulness with regard to the Blessed One gets muddled, my mindfulness with regard to the Dhamma… the Sangha gets muddled.
The thought occurs to me, 'If I were to die at this moment, what would be my destination?
What would be my future course?
“Have no fear, Mahanama!
Have no fear!
Your death will not be a bad one, your demise will not be bad.
A disciple of the noble ones, when endowed with four qualities, leans toward Unbinding, slants toward Unbinding, inclines toward Unbinding.
Which four?

“There is the case where the disciple of the noble ones is endowed with verified confidence in the Awakened One: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.'
“He/she is endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma: 'The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.'
“He/she is endowed with verified confidence in the Sangha: 'The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well…who have practiced straight-forwardly…who have practiced methodically…who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four types of noble disciples when taken as pairs, the eight when taken as individual types — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.'
“He/she is endowed with virtues that are appealing to the noble ones: untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, leading to concentration.
“Suppose a tree were leaning toward the east, slanting toward the east, inclining toward the east.
When its root is cut, which way would it fall?
“In whichever way it was leaning, slanting, and inclining, lord.
“In the same way, Mahanama, a disciple of the noble ones, when endowed with four qualities, leans toward Unbinding, slants toward Unbinding, inclines toward Unbinding.
See also: SN.; AN.
This plaintive cry of the deva Kamada, concerning the difficulty of Buddhist practice, will resonate with almost anyone who has embarked on the temporary homelessness of a retreat at IMS or elsewhere.
The steady reply of the Buddha here admonishes Kamada to overcome his weaknesses and find the nobility within himself to tread the noble path.
The tone of this poem is so typical of the approach the Buddha displays throughout the Pali texts — compassionate yet firm, reasoned but profoundly inspiring.
The progression is also characteristic — from virtue to joy, tranquillity to diligent development, and finally cutting through the snares of death and rebirth and proceeding to undying nibbana.
Kamada is reminded that others have done, gotten and tamed what he is having such difficulty doing, getting and taming.
Others have taken the hard path to the goal, and all he lacks is the resolve, the hero's determination, to forge ahead despite the obstacles.
The lyrical almost sing-song quality of the verse has been hopefully retained by translating it in something like its original meter of eight syllables per line.
On one occasion a large number of senior monks were living near Macchikasanda in the Wild Mango Grove.
Then Citta the householder went to them and, on arrival, having bowed down to them, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to them: “Venerable sirs, may the senior monks acquiesce to tomorrow's meal from me.
The senior monks acquiesced by silence.
Then Citta the householder, sensing the senior monks' acquiescence, got up from his seat and, having bowed down to them, circumambulated them — keeping them to his right — and left.
When the night had passed, the senior monks put on their robes in the early morning and — taking their bowls & outer robes — went to Citta's residence.
There they sat down on the appointed seats.
Then Citta the householder, with his own hand, served & satisfied them with exquisite milk-rice mixed with ghee.
When the senior monks had finished eating and had rinsed their bowls & hands, they got up from their seats and left.
Citta the householder, having said, “Give away the rest,” followed behind the senior monks.
Now on that occasion it was hot & sweltering.
The senior monks went along with their bodies melting, as it were, from the meal they had finished.
And on that occasion Ven.
Mahaka was the most junior of all the monks in that Community.
He said to the senior monk: “Wouldn't it be nice, venerable elder, if a cool wind were to blow, and there were a thundering cloud, and rain would fall in scattered drops?
“Yes, friend Mahaka, that would be nice… Then Ven.
Mahaka willed a psychic feat such that a cool wind blew, a thundering cloud developed, and the rain fell in scattered drops.
The thought occurred to Citta the householder, “Such is the psychic power of the most junior of all the monks in this Community!
Then when Ven.
Mahaka reached the monastery/park, he said to the senior monk, “Is that enough, venerable sir?
“That's enough, friend Mahaka — what you have done, what you have offered.
Then the monks went to their separate dwellings, and Ven.
Mahaka went to his.
Then Citta the householder went to Ven.
Mahaka and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to him, “It would be good, venerable sir, if Master Mahaka would show me a superior human attainment, a miracle of psychic power.
“In that case, householder, spread out your upper robe on the porch and put a pile of grass on it.
Responding, “As you say, venerable sir,” Citta the householder spread out his upper robe on the porch and put a pile of grass on it.
Then Ven.
Mahaka, having entered his dwelling and bolted the door, willed a psychic feat such that flame shot through the keyhole and the space around the door, burning up the grass but not the robe.
Then Citta the householder, having shaken out the robe, stood to one side — in awe, his hair standing on end.
Ven.
Mahaka came out of his dwelling and said, “Is that enough, householder?
“That's enough, venerable sir — what you have done, what you have offered.
May Master Mahaka delight in the charming Wild Mango Grove at Macchikasanda.
I will be responsible for your robes, almsfood, lodgings, & medicinal requisites.
“That is admirably said, householder.
Then Ven.
Mahaka — having set his lodging in order and taking his bowl & robes — left Macchikasanda.
And in leaving Macchikasanda, he was gone for good and never returned.
On one occasion Ven.
Sariputta and Ven.
Maha Kotthita were staying near Varanasi in the Game Refuge at Isipatana.
Then in the evening, Ven.
Maha Kotthita emerged from his seclusion and went to Ven.
Sariputta and exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Now then, friend Sariputta, does the Tathagata exist after death?
“That, friend, has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata exists after death.' “Well then, friend Sariputta, does the Tathagata not exist after death?
“Friend, that too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata does not exist after death.' “Then does the Tathagata both exist and not exist after death?
“That has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death.' “Well then, does the Tathagata neither exist nor not exist after death?
“That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.' “Now, friend Sariputta, when asked if the Tathagata exists after death, you say, 'That has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata exists after death.”' When asked if the Tathagata does not exist after death… both exists and does not exist after death… neither exists nor does not exist after death, you say, 'That too has not been declared by the Blessed One: “The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.”' Now, what is the cause, what is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One?
“For one whose passion for form has not been removed, whose desire… affection… thirst… fever… craving for form has not been removed, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“For one whose passion for feeling has not been removed…
“For one whose passion for perception has not been removed…
“For one whose passion for fabrications has not been removed…
“For one whose passion for consciousness has not been removed, whose desire… affection… thirst… fever… craving for consciousness has not been removed, there occurs the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death.'
“But for one whose passion for form has been removed, whose desire… affection… thirst… fever… craving for form has been removed, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“For one whose passion for feeling has been removed…
“For one whose passion for perception has been removed…
“For one whose passion for fabrications has been removed…
“For one whose passion for consciousness has been removed, whose desire… affection… thirst… fever… craving for consciousness has been removed, the thought, 'The Tathagata exists after death' or 'The Tathagata does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata both exists and does not exist after death' or 'The Tathagata neither exists nor does not exist after death' doesn't occur.
“This is the cause, this is the reason, why that has not been declared by the Blessed One.
See also: other suttas in the Avyakata Samyutta; AN..
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Gayā at Gayā Head.
And on that occasion, many ascetics — on the cold winter nights of the “Between-the-Eights,” when the snow was falling in Gayā — jumped up in the water, jumped down in the water, did a jumping-up-&-down in the water, poured, and performed the fire sacrifice, “Through this there is purity.
The Blessed One saw those many ascetics — on the cold winter nights of the “Between-the-Eights,” when the snow was falling in Gayā — jumping up in the water, jumping down in the water, doing a jumping-up-&-down in the water, pouring, and performing the fire sacrifice, “Through this there is purity.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
Craving for becoming and non-becoming are the two most subtle forms of craving that lead to continued existence — and suffering — in the round of birth & death.
Staying at Savatthi.
“Monks, there once was a time when the Dasarahas had a large drum called 'Summoner.' Whenever Summoner was split, the Dasarahas inserted another peg in it, until the time came when Summoner's original wooden body had disappeared and only a conglomeration of pegs remained.

“In the same way, in the course of the future there will be monks who won't listen when discourses that are words of the Tathagata — deep, deep in their meaning, transcendent, connected with emptiness — are being recited.
They won't lend ear, won't set their hearts on knowing them, won't regard these teachings as worth grasping or mastering.
But they will listen when discourses that are literary works — the works of poets, elegant in sound, elegant in rhetoric, the work of outsiders, words of disciples — are recited.
They will lend ear and set their hearts on knowing them.
They will regard these teachings as worth grasping & mastering.
“In this way the disappearance of the discourses that are words of the Tathagata — deep, deep in their meaning, transcendent, connected with emptiness — will come about.
“Thus you should train yourselves: 'We will listen when discourses that are words of the Tathagata — deep, deep in their meaning, transcendent, connected with emptiness — are being recited.
We will lend ear, will set our hearts on knowing them, will regard these teachings as worth grasping & mastering.' That's how you should train yourselves.
See also:
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Rajagaha in the bamboo grove in the squirrels' feeding ground.
At that time, he was afflicted with a disease, was suffering therefrom, and was gravely ill.
Then the Venerable Maha Cunda 'arising from his solitude at eventide' approached the Blessed One, saluted him, and sat down beside him.
To the Venerable Maha Cunda thus seated, the Blessed One said:
“O Cunda, let the factors of enlightenment occur to your mind.
“These seven factors of enlightenment, bhante, are well expounded and are cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
They conduce to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
What are the seven?
i.
“Mindfulness, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One, and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
ii.
“Investigation of the Dhamma, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
iii.
“Persevering effort, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
iv.
“Rapture, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
v.
“Calm, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
vi.
“Concentration, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
vii.
“Equanimity, the factor of enlightenment, bhante, is well expounded by the Blessed One, and is cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
It conduces to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
These seven factors of enlightenment, bhante, are well expounded and cultivated and fully developed by the Blessed One.
They conduce to perfect understanding, to full realization and to Nibbana.
“Most assuredly Cunda, they are factors of enlightenment.
Most assuredly, Cunda, they are factors of enlightenment.
Thus said the Venerable Maha Cunda, and the Master approved of it.
Then the Blessed One recovered from his affliction, and thus disappeared his affliction.
This highly alliterated poem, attributed to the elder monk Culaka, plays with the prefix su-, which occurs no less than times in these two short stanzas.
It has three primary meanings, covered successively through the poem: ) lovely or well-formed; ) good, thorough, or well done; and ) it is often used as a simple intensive prefix, meaning something like “very” or “most.
The plaintive call of the peacock, commonplace during the three-month rainy season retreats undertaken by the Buddha's monks and nuns, is a favorite theme of their nature poetry preserved in the Theragatha and the Therigatha.
The first stanza reflects the balanced appreciation of the natural world that comes from the focused but equanimous mind in meditation.
Pleasurable sensations, such as the ones described here in response to the beauty of nature, can be experienced mindfully by those devoid of craving, without the tendency present in most of us to cling to the pleasure or resist its inevitable passing away.
Early Buddhist poetry often points out the beauties of nature, but seldom lingers on them.
The second stanza leads one on to higher aspirations.
It inspires the listener to give up the mundane pursuits of the worldly life, engage in the purifying and clarifying enterprise of meditation, tread diligently the straight path pointed out by the Buddha and, finally, attain in this very lifetime the perfection of the human condition.
On one occasion many elder monks were staying at Kosambi in Ghosita's Park.
And at that time Ven.
Khemaka was staying at the Jujube Tree Park, diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then in the late afternoon the elder monks left their seclusion and addressed Ven.
Dasaka, “Come, friend Dasaka.
Go to the monk Khemaka and on arrival say to him, 'The elders, friend Khemaka, say to you, “We hope you are getting better, friend.
We hope you are comfortable.
We hope that your pains are lessening and not increasing.
We hope that there are signs of their lessening, and not of their increasing.”' Replying, “As you say, friends,” to the elder monks, Ven.
Dasaka went to Ven.
Khemaka and on arrival said to him: “The elders, friend Khemaka, say to you, 'We hope you are getting better, friend.
We hope you are comfortable.
We hope that your pains are lessening and not increasing.
We hope that there are signs of their lessening, and not of their increasing.' “I am not getting better, my friend.
I am not comfortable.
My extreme pains are increasing, not lessening.
There are signs of their increasing, and not of their lessening.
Then Ven.
Dasaka went to the elder monks and, on arrival, said to them, “The monk Khemaka has said to me, 'I am not getting better, my friend.
I am not comfortable.
My extreme pains are increasing, not lessening.
There are signs of their increasing, and not of their lessening.' “Come, friend Dasaka.
Go to the monk Khemaka and on arrival say to him, 'The elders, friend Khemaka, say to you, “Concerning these five clinging-aggregates described by the Blessed One — i.e., form as a clinging-aggregate, feeling as a clinging-aggregate, perception as a clinging-aggregate, fabrications as a clinging-aggregate, consciousness as a clinging-aggregate: Do you assume anything with regard to these five clinging-aggregates to be self or belonging to self?”' Replying, “As you say, friends,” to the elder monks, Ven.
Dasaka went to Ven.
Khemaka and on arrival said to him, “The elders, friend Khemaka, say to you, 'Concerning these five clinging-aggregates described by the Blessed One — i.e., form as a clinging-aggregate, feeling as a clinging-aggregate, perception as a clinging-aggregate, fabrications as a clinging-aggregate, consciousness as a clinging-aggregate: Do you assume anything with regard to these five clinging-aggregates to be self or belonging to self?' “Friend, concerning these five clinging-aggregates described by the Blessed One — i.e., form as a clinging-aggregate… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness as a clinging-aggregate: With regard to these five clinging-aggregates, there is nothing I assume to be self or belonging to self.
Then Ven.
Dasaka went to the elder monks and, on arrival, said to them, “The monk Khemaka has said to me, 'Friend, concerning these five clinging-aggregates described by the Blessed One — i.e., form as a clinging-aggregate… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness as a clinging-aggregate: With regard to these five clinging-aggregates, there is nothing I assume to be self or belonging to self.' “Come, friend Dasaka.
Go to the monk Khemaka and on arrival say to him, 'The elders, friend Khemaka, say to you, “Concerning these five clinging-aggregates described by the Blessed One — i.e., form as a clinging-aggregate… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness as a clinging-aggregate: If, with regard to these five clinging-aggregates, Ven.
Khemaka assumes nothing to be self or belonging to self, then Ven.
Khemaka is an arahant, devoid of fermentations.”' Replying, “As you say, friends,” to the elder monks, Ven.
Dasaka went to Ven.
Khemaka and on arrival said to him, “The elders, friend Khemaka, say to you, 'Concerning these five clinging-aggregates described by the Blessed One — i.e., form as a clinging-aggregate… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness as a clinging-aggregate: If, with regard to these five clinging-aggregates, Ven.
Khemaka assumes nothing to be self or belonging to self, then Ven.
Khemaka is an arahant, devoid of fermentations.' “Friend, concerning these five clinging-aggregates described by the Blessed One — i.e., form as a clinging-aggregate… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness as a clinging-aggregate: With regard to these five clinging-aggregates, there is nothing I assume to be self or belonging to self, and yet I am not an arahant.
With regard to these five clinging-aggregates, 'I am' has not been overcome, although I don't assume that 'I am this.' Then Ven.
Dasaka went to the elder monks and, on arrival, said to them, “The monk Khemaka has said to me, 'Friend, concerning these five clinging-aggregates described by the Blessed One — i.e., form as a clinging-aggregate… feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness as a clinging-aggregate: With regard to these five clinging-aggregates, there is nothing I assume to be self or belonging to self, and yet I am not an arahant.
With regard to these five clinging-aggregates, “I am” has not been overcome, although I don't assume that “I am this.”' “Come, friend Dasaka.
Go to the monk Khemaka and on arrival say to him, 'The elders, friend Khemaka, say to you, “Friend Khemaka, this 'I am' of which you speak: what do you say 'I am'?
Do you say, 'I am form,' or do you say, 'I am something other than form'?
Do you say, 'I am feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness,' or do you say, 'I am something other than consciousness'?
This 'I am' of which you speak: what do you say 'I am'?”' Replying, “As you say, friends,” to the elder monks, Ven.
Dasaka went to Ven.
Khemaka and on arrival said to him, “The elders, friend Khemaka, say to you, 'Friend Khemaka, this “I am” of which you speak: what do you say “I am”?
Do you say, “I am form,” or do you say, “I am something other than form”?
Do you say, “I am feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness,” or do you say, “I am something other than consciousness”'?
This “I am” of which you speak: what do you say “I am”?' “Enough, friend Dasaka.
What is accomplished by this running back & forth?
Fetch me my staff.
I will go to the elder monks myself.
Then Ven.
Khemaka, leaning on his staff, went to the elder monks and, on arrival, exchanged courteous greetings with them.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the elder monks said to him, “Friend Khemaka, this 'I am' of which you speak: what do you say 'I am'?
Do you say, 'I am form,' or do you say, 'I am something other than form'?
Do you say, 'I am feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness,' or do you say, 'I am something other than consciousness''?
This 'I am' of which you speak: what do you say 'I am'?
“Friends, it's not that I say 'I am form,' nor do I say 'I am something other than form.' It's not that I say, 'I am feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness,' nor do I say, 'I am something other than consciousness.' With regard to these five clinging-aggregates, 'I am' has not been overcome, although I don't assume that 'I am this.'
“It's just like the scent of a blue, red, or white lotus: If someone were to call it the scent of a petal or the scent of the color or the scent of a filament, would he be speaking correctly?
“No, friend.
“Then how would he describe it if he were describing it correctly?
“As the scent of the flower: That's how he would describe it if he were describing it correctly.
“In the same way, friends, it's not that I say 'I am form,' nor do I say 'I am other than form.' It's not that I say, 'I am feeling… perception… fabrications… consciousness,' nor do I say, 'I am something other than consciousness.' With regard to these five clinging-aggregates, 'I am' has not been overcome, although I don't assume that 'I am this.'
“Friends, even though a noble disciple has abandoned the five lower fetters, he still has with regard to the five clinging-aggregates a lingering residual 'I am' conceit, an 'I am' desire, an 'I am' obsession.
But at a later time he keeps focusing on the phenomena of arising & passing away with regard to the five clinging-aggregates: 'Such is form, such its origin, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origin, such its disappearance.' As he keeps focusing on the arising & passing away of these five clinging-aggregates, the lingering residual 'I am' conceit, 'I am' desire, 'I am' obsession is fully obliterated.
“Just like a cloth, dirty & stained: Its owners give it over to a washerman, who scrubs it with salt earth or lye or cow-dung and then rinses it in clear water.
Now even though the cloth is clean & spotless, it still has a lingering residual scent of salt earth or lye or cow-dung.
The washerman gives it to the owners, the owners put it away in a scent-infused wicker hamper, and its lingering residual scent of salt earth, lye, or cow-dung is fully obliterated.
“In the same way, friends, even though a noble disciple has abandoned the five lower fetters, he still has with regard to the five clinging-aggregates a lingering residual 'I am' conceit, an 'I am' desire, an 'I am' obsession.
But at a later time he keeps focusing on the phenomena of arising & passing away with regard to the five clinging-aggregates: 'Such is form, such its origin, such its disappearance.
Such is feeling… Such is perception… Such are fabrications… Such is consciousness, such its origin, such its disappearance.' As he keeps focusing on the arising & passing away of these five clinging-aggregates, the lingering residual 'I am' conceit, 'I am' desire, 'I am' obsession is fully obliterated.
When this was said, the elder monks said to Ven.
Khemaka, “We didn't cross-examine Ven.
Khemaka with the purpose of troubling him, just that Ven.
Khemaka is capable of declaring the Blessed One's message, teaching it, describing it, setting it forth, revealing it, explaining it, making it plain — just as he has in fact declared it, taught it, described it, set it forth, revealed it, explained it, made it plain.
That is what Ven.
Khemaka said.
Gratified, the elder monks delighted in his words.
And while this explanation was being given, the minds of sixty-some monks, through no clinging, were fully released from fermentations — as was Ven.
Khemaka's.
On that occasion Citta the householder was diseased, in pain, severely ill.
Then a large number of garden devas, forest devas, tree devas, and devas inhabiting herbs, grasses, & forest giants assembled and said to him: “Make a wish, householder: 'In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!' When this was said, Citta the householder said to the garden devas, forest devas, tree devas, and devas inhabiting herbs, grasses, & forest giants: “Even that is inconstant; even that is impermanent; one must abandon even that when one passes on.
When this was said, Citta the householder's friends & companions, relatives and kinsmen, said to him: “Steady your mindfulness, master.
Don't ramble.
“What did I say that you say to me: 'Steady your mindfulness, master.
Don't ramble'?
“You said: 'Even that is inconstant; even that is impermanent; one must abandon even that when one passes on.' “That was because garden devas, forest devas, tree devas, and devas inhabiting herbs, grasses, & forest giants have assembled and said to me: 'Make a wish, householder: “In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!”' And I said to them: 'Even that is inconstant; even that is impermanent; one must abandon even that when one passes on.' “But what compelling reason do those garden devas, forest devas, tree devas, and devas inhabiting herbs, grasses, & forest giants see, master, that they say to you, 'Make a wish, householder: “In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!”'?
“It occurs to them: 'This Citta the householder is virtuous, of admirable character.
If he should wish: “In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!” — then, as he is virtuous, this wish of his would succeed because of the purity of his virtue.
A righteous one, he will wield righteous power.' Seeing this compelling reason, they assembled and said: 'Make a wish, householder: “In the future, may I become a king, a wheel-turning monarch!”' And I said to them: 'Even that is inconstant; even that is impermanent; one must abandon even that when one passes on.' “Then, master, instruct us, too.
“Then you should train yourselves: 'We will be endowed with verified confidence in the Buddha: “Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy & rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the cosmos, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.” “'We will be endowed with verified confidence in the Dhamma: “The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.
“'We will be possessed of verified confidence in the Sangha: “The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four types when taken as pairs, the eight when taken as individual types — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.
“'Whatever there may be in our family that can be given away, all that will be shared unstintingly with virtuous ones who are of admirable character.' That's how you should train yourselves.
Then, having enjoined his friends & colleagues, his relatives & kinsmen, to place confidence in the Buddha, Dhamma, & Sangha; having exhorted them to undertake generosity, Citta the householder passed away.
I have heard that on one occasion, while the Blessed One was wandering among the Mallans with a large community of monks, he arrived at Pāvā.
There he stayed near Pāvā in the mango grove of Cunda the silversmith.
Cunda the silversmith heard, “The Blessed One, they say, while wandering among the Mallans with a large community of monks and reaching Pāvā, is staying near Pāvā in my mango grove.
So Cunda went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged him with Dhamma-talk.
Then Cunda — instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged by the Blessed One's Dhamma-talk — said to him, “Lord, may the Blessed One acquiesce to my meal tomorrow, together with the community of monks.
The Blessed One acquiesced with silence.
Then Cunda, understanding the Blessed One's acquiescence, got up from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One, and left, circling him to the right.
Then, at the end of the night, after having exquisite staple & non-staple food — including a large amount of pig-delicacy — prepared in his own home, he announced the time to the Blessed One: “It's time, lord.
The meal is ready.
Then the Blessed One, early in the morning, adjusted his under robe and — carrying his bowl & robes — went together with the community of monks to Cunda's home.
On arrival, he sat down on the seat laid out.
Seated, he said to Cunda, “Cunda, serve me with the pig-delicacy you have had prepared, and the community of monks with the other staple & non-staple food you have had prepared.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Cunda served the Blessed One with the pig-delicacy he had had prepared, and the community of monks with the other staple & non-staple food he had had prepared.
Then the Blessed One said to him, “Cunda, bury the remaining pig-delicacy in a pit.
I don't see anyone in the world — together with its devas, Māras, & Brahmas, with its people with their contemplatives & brahmans, their royalty & commonfolk — in whom, when it was ingested, it would go to a healthy change, aside from the Tathāgata.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Cunda buried the remaining pig-delicacy in a pit, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, after bowing down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One — after instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging him with Dhamma-talk — got up from his seat and left.
Then in the Blessed One, after he had eaten Cunda's meal, there arose a severe illness accompanied with blood, with intense pains & deadly.
But the Blessed One endured it — mindful, alert, & not struck down by it.
Then he addressed Ven.
Ānanda, “Ānanda, we will go to Kusinarā.
Then the Blessed One, going down from the road, went to a certain tree and, on arrival, said to Ven.
Ānanda, “Ānanda, please arrange my outer robe folded in four.
I am tired.
I will sit down.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Ven.
Ānanda arranged the outer robe folded in four.
The Blessed One sat down on the seat laid out.
Seated, he said to Ven.
Ānanda, “Ānanda, please fetch me some water.
I am thirsty.
I will drink.
When this was said, Ven.
Ānanda said to the Blessed One, “Lord, just now carts have passed through.
The meager river — cut by the wheels — flows turbid & disturbed.
But the Kukuṭa river is not far away, with pristine water, pleasing water, cool water, pellucid water, with restful banks, refreshing.
There the Blessed One will drink potable water and cool his limbs.
A second time, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ānanda, “Ānanda, please fetch me some water.
I am thirsty.
I will drink.
A second time, Ven.
Ānanda said to the Blessed One, “Lord, just now carts have passed through.
The meager water — cut by the wheels — flows turbid & disturbed.
But the Kukuṭa River is not far away, with pristine water, pleasing water, cool water, pellucid water, with restful banks, refreshing.
There the Blessed One will drink potable water and cool his limbs.
A third time, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ānanda, “Ānanda, please fetch me some water.
I am thirsty.
I will drink.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Ven.
Ānanda — taking a bowl — went to the river.
And the meager river that, cut by the wheels, had been flowing turbid & disturbed, on his approach flowed pristine, clear, & undisturbed.
The thought occurred to him, “How amazing!
How astounding!
— the great power & great might of the Tathāgata!
— in that this meager river that, cut by the wheels, was flowing turbid & disturbed, on my approach flowed pristine, clear, & undisturbed!” Fetching water with the bowl, he went to the Blessed One and on arrival said, “How amazing!
How astounding!
— the great power & great might of the Tathāgata!
— in that this meager river that, cut by the wheels, was flowing turbid & disturbed, on my approach flowed pristine, clear, & undisturbed!
Drink the water, O Blessed One!
Drink the water, O One-Well-Gone!
Then the Blessed One drank the water.

Then the Blessed One, together with the community of monks, went to the Kukuṭa River and, after arriving at the Kukuṭa River, going down, bathing, drinking, & coming back out, went to a mango grove.
On arrival, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Cundaka, “Cundaka, please arrange my outer robe folded in four.
I am tired.
I will lie down.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Ven.
Cundaka arranged the outer robe folded in four.
The Blessed One, lying on his right side, took up the lion's posture, placing one foot on top of the other — mindful, alert, and attending to the perception of getting up.
Ven.
Cundaka sat in front of him.
Then the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Ānanda, “Ānanda, if anyone tries to incite remorse in Cunda the silversmith, saying, 'It's no gain for you, friend Cunda, it's ill-done by you, that the Tathāgata, having eaten your last alms, was totally unbound,' then Cunda's remorse should be allayed: 'It's a gain for you, friend Cunda, it's well-done by you, that the Tathāgata, having eaten your last alms, was totally unbound.
Face to face with the Blessed One have I heard it, face to face have I learned it, “These two alms are equal to each other in fruit, equal to each other in result, of much greater fruit & reward than any other alms.
Which two?
The alms that, after having eaten it, the Tathāgata awakens to the unexcelled right self-awakening.
And the alms that, after having eaten it, the Tathāgata is unbound by means of the unbinding property with no fuel remaining.
These are the two alms that are equal to each other in fruit, equal to each other in result, of much greater fruit & reward than any other alms.
Venerable Cunda the silversmith has accumulated kamma that leads to long life.
Venerable Cunda the silversmith has accumulated kamma that leads to beauty.
Venerable Cunda the silversmith has accumulated kamma that leads to happiness.
Venerable Cunda the silversmith has accumulated kamma that leads to heaven.
Venerable Cunda the silversmith has accumulated kamma that leads to rank.
Venerable Cunda the silversmith has accumulated kamma that leads to sovereignty.”' In this way, Ānanda, Cunda the silversmith's remorse should be allayed.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Kosambī at Ghosita's monastery.
And on that occasion the inner quarters of King Udena's royal park had burned down, and women, headed by Sāmāvatī, had died.
Then in the early morning, a large number of monks adjusted their under robes and — carrying their bowls & robes — went into Kosambī for alms.
Having gone for alms in Kosambī, after the meal, returning from their alms round, they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One, “Lord, the inner quarters of King Udena's royal park have burned down, and women, headed by Sāmāvatī, have died.
What is the destination of those female lay followers?
What is their future course?
“Monks, among those female lay followers are stream-winners, once-returners, & non-returners.
All of those female lay followers, monks, died not without fruit.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Cālikans, at Cālikā Mountain.
And on that occasion Ven.
Meghiya was his attendant.
Then Ven.
Meghiya went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, stood to one side.
As he was standing there he said to the Blessed One, “I would like to go into Jantu Village for alms.
“Then do, Meghiya, what you think it is now time to do.
Then in the early morning, Ven.
Meghiya adjusted his under robe and — carrying his bowl & robes — went into Jantu Village for alms.
Having gone for alms in Jantu Village, after the meal, returning from his alms round, he went to the bank of the Kimikālā River.
As he was walking up & down along the bank of the river to exercise his legs, he saw a pleasing, charming mango grove.
Seeing it, the thought occurred to him: “How pleasing & charming this mango grove!
It's enough for a young man of good family intent on exertion to exert himself.
If the Blessed One gives me permission, I would like to exert myself in this mango grove.
So Ven.
Meghiya went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Just now, in the early morning, I adjusted my under robe and — carrying my bowl & robes — went into Jantu Village for alms.
Having gone for alms in Jantu Village, after the meal, returning from my alms round, I went to the bank of the Kimikālā River.
As I was walking up & down along the bank of the river to exercise my legs, I saw a pleasing, charming mango grove.
Seeing it, the thought occurred to me: 'How pleasing & charming this mango grove!
It's enough for a young man of good family intent on exertion to exert himself.
If the Blessed One gives me permission, I would like to exert myself in this mango grove.' If the Blessed One gives me permission, I would like to go to the mango grove to exert myself.
When this was said, the Blessed One responded to Ven.
Meghiya, “As long as I am still alone, stay here until another monk comes.
A second time, Ven.
Meghiya said to the Blessed One, “Lord, the Blessed One has nothing further to do, and nothing further to add to what he has done.
I, however, have something further to do, and something further to add to what I have done.
If the Blessed One gives me permission, I would like to go to the mango grove to exert myself.
A second time, the Blessed One responded to Ven.
Meghiya, “As long as I am still alone, stay here until another monk comes.
A third time, Ven.
Meghiya said to the Blessed One, “Lord, the Blessed One has nothing further to do, and nothing further to add to what he has done.
I, however, have something further to do, and something further to add to what I have done.
If the Blessed One gives me permission, I would like to go to the mango grove to exert myself.
“As you are talking about exertion, Meghiya, what can we say?
Do what you think it is now time to do.
Then Ven.
Meghiya, rising from his seat, bowing down to the Blessed One and, circling him to the right, went to the mango grove.
On arrival, having gone deep into the grove, he sat down at the root of a certain tree for the day's abiding.
Now while Ven.
Meghiya was staying in the mango grove, he was for the most part assailed by three kinds of unskillful thoughts: thoughts of sensuality, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of doing harm.
The thought occurred to him: “How amazing!
How astounding!
Even though it was through faith that I went forth from home to the homeless life, still I am overpowered by these three kinds of unskillful thoughts: thoughts of sensuality, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of doing harm.
Emerging from his seclusion in the late afternoon, he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Just now, while I was staying in the mango grove, I was for the most part assailed by three kinds of unskillful thoughts: thoughts of sensuality, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of doing harm.
The thought occurred to me: 'How amazing!
How astounding!
Even though it was through faith that I went forth from home to the homeless life, still I am overpowered by these three kinds of unskillful thoughts: thoughts of sensuality, thoughts of ill will, and thoughts of doing harm.' “Meghiya, in one whose awareness-release is still immature, five qualities bring it to maturity.
Which five?
“There is the case where a monk has admirable people as friends, companions, & colleagues.
In one whose awareness-release is still immature, this is the first quality that brings it to maturity.
“Furthermore, the monk is virtuous.
He dwells restrained in accordance with the Pāṭimokkha, consummate in his behavior & range of activity.
He trains himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
In one whose awareness-release is still immature, this is the second quality that brings it to maturity.
“Furthermore, he gets to hear at will, easily and without difficulty, talk that is truly sobering and conducive to the opening of awareness, i.e., talk on modesty, contentment, seclusion, non-entanglement, arousing persistence, virtue, concentration, discernment, release, and the knowledge & vision of release.
In one whose awareness-release is still immature, this is the third quality that brings it to maturity.
“Furthermore, he keeps his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful qualities and for taking on skillful qualities.
He is steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful qualities.
In one whose awareness-release is still immature, this is the fourth quality that brings it to maturity.
“Furthermore, he is discerning, endowed with the discernment related to arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
In one whose awareness-release is still immature, this is the fifth quality that brings it to maturity.
“Meghiya, in one whose awareness-release is still immature, these are the five qualities that bring it to maturity.
“Meghiya, when a monk has admirable people as friends, companions, & colleagues, it is to be expected that he will be virtuous, will dwell restrained in accordance with the Pāṭimokkha, consummate in his behavior & range of activity, and will train himself, having undertaken the training rules, seeing danger in the slightest faults.
“When a monk has admirable people as friends & colleagues, it is to be expected that he will get to hear at will, easily and without difficulty, talk that is truly sobering and conducive to the opening of awareness, i.e., talk on modesty, contentment, seclusion, non-entanglement, arousing persistence, virtue, concentration, discernment, release, and the knowledge & vision of release.
“When a monk has admirable people as friends, companions, & colleagues, it is to be expected that he will keep his persistence aroused for abandoning unskillful qualities and for taking on skillful qualities — steadfast, solid in his effort, not shirking his duties with regard to skillful qualities.
“When a monk has admirable people as friends, companions, & colleagues, it is to be expected that he will be discerning, endowed with the discernment relating to arising & passing away — noble, penetrating, leading to the right ending of stress.
“And furthermore, when the monk is established in these five qualities, there are four additional qualities he should develop: He should develop the unattractive so as to abandon passion.
He should develop good will so as to abandon ill will.
He should develop mindfulness of in-&-out breathing so as to cut off thinking.
He should develop the perception of inconstancy so as to uproot the conceit, 'I am.' For a monk perceiving inconstancy, the perception of not-self is made steady.
One perceiving not-self attains the uprooting of the conceit, 'I am' — unbinding right in the here-&-now.”
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
At Savatthi.
Then, early in the morning, Cala the nun put on her robes and, taking her bowl & outer robe, went into Savatthi for alms.
When she had gone for alms in Savatthi and had returned from her alms round, after her meal she went to the Grove of the Blind to spend the day.
Having gone deep into the Grove of the Blind, she sat down at the foot of a tree for the day's abiding.
Then Mara the Evil One, wanting to arouse fear, horripilation, & terror in her, wanting to make her fall away from concentration, approached her & said, “What is it that you don't approve of, nun?
“I don't approve of birth, my friend.
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “Cala the nun knows me” — vanished right there.
Three entirely different moods are portrayed so sensitively in the first three stanzas of this poem by the monk Bhuta — the first wild and clamorous, the second bright and benevolent, the third dark and mysterious.
Constant among these dramatic changes of nature is the meditating monk, content in any setting.
Mindful awareness allows all things to be just what they are, undisturbed by the reconstructions of the petty ego.
Like the tiny figure in a Chinese landscape painting, the monk blends into phenomena because of his transparency of self.
The original tristubh meter is an alteration of and syllables per line, reproduced here in a and syllable translation that seems to work better in English.
The Pali images are so richly textured in this poem, one could easily use twice as many English words and still not capture the nuances.
The second line alone, for example, evokes the image of twisted streams of water cascading down the steep streambeds of a mountain gorge, and then transfers the image to the heavens, where the plunging rivulets now course down the invisible tracks left everywhere in the sky by the passage of birds.
That's a lot to fit into eleven syllables!
Translator's note: Passages in the Vinaya show that Ven.
Channa — apparently, Prince Siddhattha's horseman on the night of his Great Renunciation — was proud and obdurate.
After becoming a monk, he was unwilling to accept instruction from any of the other monks.
DN tells of how the Buddha, on the night of his parinibbana, imposed the brahma-punishment on him: he was to be left to his own ways without anyone to teach or correct him.
According to Cv.XI, news of this punishment so shocked Ven.
Channa that he fainted.
He then went off into seclusion and practiced diligently to the point of attaining arahantship.
As Ven.
Ananda later told him, his attainment nullified the punishment.
This sutta tells a different version of Channa's change of heart.
On one occasion many elder monks were staying near Varanasi in the Deer Park at Isipatana.
Then in the late afternoon Ven.
Channa left his seclusion and, taking his key, went from dwelling to dwelling, saying to the elder monks, “May the venerable elders exhort me, may the venerable elders teach me, may the venerable elders give me a Dhamma talk so that I might see the Dhamma.
When this was said, the elder monks said to Ven.
Channa, “Form, friend Channa, is inconstant.
Feeling is inconstant.
Perception is inconstant.
Fabrications are inconstant.
Consciousness is inconstant.
Form is not-self.
Feeling is not-self.
Perception is not-self.
Fabrications are not-self.
Consciousness is not-self.
All fabrications are inconstant.
All phenomena are not-self.
Then the thought occurred to Ven.
Channa, “I, too, think that form is inconstant, feeling is inconstant, perception is inconstant, fabrications are inconstant, consciousness is inconstant; form is not-self, feeling is not-self, perception is not-self, fabrications are not-self, consciousness is not-self; all fabrications are inconstant; all phenomena are not-self.
But still my mind does not leap up, grow confident, steadfast, & released in the resolution of all fabrications, the relinquishing of all acquisitions, the ending of craving, dispassion, cessation, Unbinding.
Instead, agitation & clinging arise, and my intellect pulls back, thinking, 'But who, then, is my self?' But this thought doesn't occur to one who sees the Dhamma.
So who might teach me the Dhamma so that I might see the Dhamma?
Then the thought occurred to Ven.
Channa, “This Ven.
Ananda is staying at Kosambi in Ghosita's Park.
He has been praised by the Teacher and is esteemed by his knowledgeable fellows in the holy life.
He is capable of teaching me the Dhamma so that I might see the Dhamma, and I have sudden trust in him.
Why don't I go to Ven.
Ananda?
So, setting his lodgings in order and carrying his robes & bowl, Ven.
Channa went to Kosambi to where Ven.
Ananda was staying in Ghosita's Park.
On arrival, he exchanged courteous greetings with the Ven.
Ananda.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he, “May Ven.
Ananda exhort me, may Ven.
Ananda teach me, may Ven.
Ananda give me a Dhamma talk so that I might see the Dhamma.
“Even this much makes me feel gratified & satisfied with Ven.
Channa, that he opens up & breaks down his stubbornness.
So lend ear, friend Channa.
You are capable of understanding the Dhamma.
Then a sudden great rapture & joy welled up in Ven.
Channa at the thought, “So I am capable of understanding the Dhamma!
“Face-to-face with the Blessed One have I heard this, friend Channa.
Face-to-face with him have I learned the exhortation he gave to the bhikkhu Kaccayanagotta: 'By & large, Kaccayana, this world is supported by a polarity, that of existence & non-existence.
But when one sees the origination of the world as it actually is with right discernment, “non-existence” with reference to the world does not occur to one.
When one sees the cessation of the world as it actually is with right discernment, “existence” with reference to the world does not occur to one.
“'By & large, Kaccayana, this world is in bondage to attachments, clingings, & biases.
But one such as this does not get involved with or cling to these attachments, clingings, fixations of awareness, biases, or obsessions; nor is he resolved on “my self.” He has no uncertainty or doubt that, when there is arising, only stress is arising; and that when there is passing away, stress is passing away.
In this, one's knowledge is independent of others.
It is to this extent, Kaccayana, that there is right view.
“' “Everything exists”: That is one extreme.
“Everything doesn't exist”: That is a second extreme.
Avoiding these two extremes, the Tathagata teaches the Dhamma via the middle: From ignorance as a requisite condition come fabrications.
From fabrications as a requisite condition comes consciousness.
From consciousness as a requisite condition comes name-&-form.
From name-&-form as a requisite condition come the six sense media.
From the six sense media as a requisite condition comes contact.
From contact as a requisite condition comes feeling.
From feeling as a requisite condition comes craving.
From craving as a requisite condition comes clinging/sustenance.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“'Now from the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance comes the cessation of fabrications.
From the cessation of fabrications comes the cessation of consciousness.
From the cessation of consciousness comes the cessation of name-&-form.
From the cessation of name-&-form comes the cessation of the six sense media.
From the cessation of the six sense media comes the cessation of contact.
From the cessation of contact comes the cessation of feeling.
From the cessation of feeling comes the cessation of craving.
From the cessation of craving comes the cessation of clinging/sustenance.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance comes the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming comes the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.'
“That's how it is, friend Ananda, for those who have friends in the holy life like Ven.
Ananda — sympathetic, helpful, exhorting, & teaching.
Just now, for me, listening to Ven.
Ananda's Dhamma-teaching, has the Dhamma been penetrated.”
Staying at Savatthi.
Then Ven.
Bhumija, arising from his seclusion in the late afternoon, went to Ven.
Sariputta.
On arrival, he exchanged courteous greetings with him.
After an exchange of friendly greetings & courtesies, he sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Friend Sariputta, there are some brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are self-made.
There are other brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are other-made.
Then there are other brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are self-made & other-made.
And then there are still other brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are neither self-made nor other-made, but arise spontaneously.
In this case, friend Sariputta, what is the Blessed One's doctrine?
What does he teach?
Answering in what way will I speak in line with what the Blessed One has said, not misrepresent the Blessed One with what is unfactual, and answer in line with the Dhamma so that no one whose thinking is in line with the Dhamma will have grounds for criticism?
“The Blessed One, my friend, has said that pleasure & pain are dependently co-arisen.
Dependent on what?
Dependent on contact.
One speaking in this way would be speaking in line with what the Blessed One has said, would not be misrepresenting the Blessed One with what is unfactual, and would be answering in line with the Dhamma so that no one whose thinking is in line with the Dhamma would have grounds for criticism.
“Whatever brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are self-made, even that is dependent on contact.
Whatever brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are other-made, even that is dependent on contact.
Whatever brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are self-made & other-made, even that is dependent on contact.
Whatever brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are neither self-made nor other-made, but arise spontaneously, even that is dependent on contact.
“That any brahmans & contemplatives — teachers of kamma who declare that pleasure & pain are self-made — would be sensitive to pleasure & pain otherwise than through contact: that isn't possible.
That any brahmans & contemplatives — teachers of kamma who declare that pleasure & pain are other-made… self-made & other-made… who declare that pleasure & pain are neither self-made nor other-made, but arise spontaneously — would be sensitive to pleasure & pain otherwise than through contact: that isn't possible.
Now it so happened that Ven.
Ananda overheard this conversation between Ven.
Sariputta & Ven.
Bhumija.
Then he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he reported the entire conversation to the Blessed One.
“Excellent, Ananda.
Excellent.
One rightly answering would answer as Ven.
Sariputta has done.
“I have said, Ananda, that pleasure & pain are dependently co-arisen.
Dependent on what?
Dependent on contact.
One speaking in this way would be speaking in line with what I have said, would not be misrepresenting me with what is unfactual, and would be answering in line with the Dhamma so that no one whose thinking is in line with the Dhamma would have grounds for criticism.
“Whatever brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are self-made, even that is dependent on contact.
Whatever brahmans & contemplatives, teachers of kamma, who declare that pleasure & pain are other-made… self-made & other-made… neither self-made nor other-made, but arise spontaneously, even that is dependent on contact.
“That any brahmans & contemplatives — teachers of kamma who declare that pleasure & pain are self-made — would be sensitive to pleasure & pain otherwise than through contact: that isn't possible.
That any brahmans & contemplatives — teachers of kamma who declare that pleasure & pain are other-made… self-made & other-made… neither self-made nor other-made, but arise spontaneously — would be sensitive to pleasure & pain otherwise than through contact: that isn't possible.
“When there is a body, pleasure & pain arise internally with bodily intention as the cause; or when there is speech, pleasure & pain arise internally with verbal intention as the cause; or when there is intellect, pleasure & pain arise internally with intellectual intention as the cause.
“From ignorance as a requisite condition, then either of one's own accord one fabricates bodily fabrication on account of which that pleasure & pain arise internally, or because of others one fabricates bodily fabrication on account of which that pleasure & pain arise internally.
Either alert one fabricates bodily fabrication on account of which that pleasure & pain arise internally, or unalert one fabricates bodily fabrication on account of which that pleasure & pain arise internally.

“Now, ignorance is bound up in these things.
From the remainderless fading & cessation of that very ignorance, there no longer exists the body on account of which that pleasure & pain internally arise.
There no longer exists the speech… the intellect on account of which that pleasure & pain internally arise.
There no longer exists the field, the site, the dimension, or the issue on account of which that pleasure & pain internally arise.”
Translator's note: The poetic exchange in this discourse emphasizes the difference between appearances and actual vision.
The brahman addressing the Buddha speaks in terms of conjecture and uses three compounds containing the word “rupa,” or “appearance” — gambhira-rupa, sucaru-rupa, and acchera-rupa.
The Buddha, however, emphasizes not his appearance but what he sees.
What's important about him is not how he looks to others, but how he looks at things.
Another contrast is that, whereas the brahman conjectures about the goal the Buddha is striving for in the wilderness — attaining the heavens of the Brahmas — the Buddha points out that he has already arrived at a goal that is hidden even to Brahmas.
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Kosalans in a certain forest grove.
Then a large number of firewood-gathering youths — students of a certain brahman of the Bharadvaja clan — went to the forest grove.
On arrival, they saw the Blessed One sitting in the grove — his legs folded crosswise, his body set straight, mindfulness established to the fore.
On seeing him, they went to the brahman of the Bharadvaja clan and, on arrival, said to him, “Sir, you should know that Gotama the contemplative is in that grove over there, sitting with his legs folded crosswise, his body set straight, mindfulness established to the fore.
So the brahman of the Bharadvaja clan, together with the youths, went to the forest grove.
On arrival, he saw the Blessed One sitting in the grove — his legs folded crosswise, his body set straight, mindfulness established to the fore.
On seeing him, he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, addressed him in verse:
The compound brahma-raho, “Brahma-private,” can be read in either of two ways: either private like a Brahma or private to — i.e., hidden from — Brahma.
The first reading would simply convey the fact that the practice of jhana puts one in a mental state equivalent to a Brahma.
The second reading points to the fact that the Buddha, in having gained Awakening, meditates in a way that even Brahmas cannot perceive or understand.
I have chosen this latter reading because it parallels the message in AN..
Thus it has been heard by me.
On one occasion the Blessed One was dwelling at Sāvatthi in the Jeta Forest in the private park owned by Anāthapiṇḍika.
Also at that time, where the Blessed One was, there Venerable Bhaddiya the Dwarf approached, close behind many monks.
The Blessed One saw Venerable Bhaddiya the Dwarf, even from afar, coming close behind many monks: of bad complexion, of bad appearance, dwarfish, of such a form as to be despised by most of the monks.
Having seen him, he addressed the monks:
“Monks, do you see that monk, even from afar, coming close behind many monks: of bad complexion, of bad appearance, dwarfish, of such a form as to be despised by most of the monks?
“Just so, Venerable Sir.
“Monks, that monk is of great power, of great eminence.
There is no well-gained attainment that has not already been attained by that monk.
For that benefit, for which sons of good lineage rightly go forth from home into homelessness, that ultimate conclusion of the holy life, even in this very life, by himself, having seen with his own eyes the higher knowledge, and having attained, he abides.
And then, having understood the meaning of that, in that moment he breathed forth this utterance:
Dwelling in Sāvatthi.
And then, there where the Blessed One was, there, Venerable Bhaddiya the Dwarf approached.
The Blessed One saw Venerable Bhaddiya the Dwarf approaching even from afar.
Having seen him, he addressed the monks:
“Do you see, monks, that monk approaching, of bad complexion, of bad appearance, dwarfish, of such a form as to be despised by the monks?
“Just so, Venerable Sir.
“Monks, that monk is of great power, of great eminence.
There is no well-gained attainment that has not already been attained by that monk.
For that benefit for which sons of good lineage rightly go forth from home into homelessness, that ultimate conclusion of the holy life: even in this very life, by himself having seen with his own eyes the higher knowledge, and having attained, he abides.
This was said by the Blessed One.
Having said that, the Fortunate One, the Teacher, also said this:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Anupiyā in the Mango Grove.
And on that occasion, Ven.
Bhaddiya, Kāḷigodhā's son, on going to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, would repeatedly exclaim, “What bliss!
What bliss!
A large number of monks heard Ven.
Bhaddiya, Kāḷigodhā's son, on going to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, repeatedly exclaim, “What bliss!
What bliss!” and on hearing him, the thought occurred to them, “There's no doubt but that Ven.
Bhaddiya, Kāḷigodhā's son, doesn't enjoy leading the holy life, for when he was a householder he knew the bliss of kingship, so that now, on recollecting that when going to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, he is repeatedly exclaiming, 'What bliss!
What bliss!' So they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they told him, “Ven.
Bhaddiya, Kāḷigodhā's son, lord, on going to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, repeatedly exclaims, 'What bliss!
What bliss!' There's no doubt but that Ven.
Bhaddiya doesn't enjoy leading the holy life, for when he was a householder he knew the bliss of kingship, so that now, on recollecting that when going to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, he is repeatedly exclaiming, 'What bliss!
What bliss!' Then the Blessed One told a certain monk, “Come, monk.
In my name, call Bhaddiya, saying, 'The Teacher calls you, friend Bhaddiya.' Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, the monk went to Ven.
Bhaddiya, Kāḷigodhā's son, and on arrival he said to him, “The Teacher calls you, friend Bhaddiya.
Responding, “As you say, my friend,” to the monk, Ven.
Bhaddiya, Kāḷigodhā's son, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “Is it true, Bhaddiya that — on going to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling — you repeatedly exclaim, 'What bliss!
What bliss!'?
“Yes, lord.
“What compelling reason do you have in mind that — when going to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling — you repeatedly exclaim, 'What bliss!
What bliss!'?
“Before, when I has a householder, maintaining the bliss of kingship, lord, I had guards posted within and without the royal apartments, within and without the city, within and without the countryside.
But even though I was thus guarded, thus protected, I dwelled in fear — agitated, distrustful, & afraid.
But now, on going alone to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, I dwell without fear, unagitated, confident, & unafraid — unconcerned, unruffled, my wants satisfied, with my mind like a wild deer.
This is the compelling reason I have in mind that — when going to the wilderness, to the root of a tree, or to an empty dwelling — I repeatedly exclaim, 'What bliss!
What bliss!' Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
Of all the monks and nuns who awakened under the guidance of the Buddha, none was more notorious than the author of these verses, the robber and murderer Angulimala.
Originally named Ahimsaka, he was the son of the brahman chaplain to the Kosala king and became a brilliant student in the medical school at Takkasila.
On account of a number of intrigues perpetrated by his jealous classmates, he set upon a course of ambushing victims on the road and cutting off their thumbs in order to assemble a “garland of thumbs” which is the translation of his monastic name Angulimala.
The Buddha fearlessly confronted the robber and helped him to see the error of his ways.
Then, in the face of tremendous opposition from the population, he allowed Angulimala to join the Sangha, and in due time he became an awakened Arahant.
The karma of his previous deeds still followed him, however, and he was later stoned in the street by an angry mob.
Coming into the teacher's presence “with blood running from his cut head, with his bowl broken, and with his outer robe torn,” the Buddha simply said, “Bear it!
brahman, Bear it!
You are experiencing here and now the result of deeds… It is within this context that the above verses were composed.
The author is clearly referring to his own emergence from negligence and unwholesome deeds into a wiser and more wholesome understanding.
I cannot help but feel this story is timely, whether referring to individuals who have committed terrible deeds yet being capable of radical transformation, or to a nation looking more closely at its impact in the world.
The goodness that fills our world may well be poised to emerge, like the bright moon, from behind the clouds which far too often obscure it.
At one time the Buddha was residing in Magadha, near Andhakavinda.
At that time the Buddha was seated under the open sky, in the deep darkness of the night, and the rain-god was making it rain, drop by drop.
Then the Brahma Sahampati, as the night was passing away, lighting up Andhakavinda with his surpassing brilliance, approached the Buddha and stood to one side.
As he stood to one side, the Brahma Sahampati offered up these verses in the presence of the Buddha:
The theme of Sahampati's first lines is fear, a present issue for the followers of the Buddha who were encouraged to practice alone in the depths of the wilderness.
Poisonous snakes are a source of fear, as are the thunder, lightning and profound darkness of the night.
The “dread” overcome by the bhikkhu in the last line of the verse is literally the wonderful phrase “the hair standing up on the back of one's neck.” It suggests the terrifying, creeping anxiety of threatening forces only partly imagined or understood.
The play on words in the second line is clever, equating freedom from fear with the liberation of nibbana, which is sometimes given the epithet “the fearless.” Since fear is always rooted in protection of the ego, working with fear is a useful practice for overcoming the ego's instinctive defenses.
Awakening results in fearlessness because one lets go of the need to protect the limited view of oneself as one gains a much wider perspective.
The second verse allows that dwelling as a hermit, though a powerful practice, may not be appropriate for everybody; for many it is better to live in community.
But one should not thereby consider oneself free from the objects of fear, because ultimately these forces are all within us.
Removed from the dangers of the wilderness, a person must be especially attentive to watching over the workings of their own mind.
In community, the serpents of ill will, the storms of desire, and the darkness of delusions are equally dangerous for those seeking the peace of liberation.
And mindfulness is our greatest ally in watching over or guarding the workings of our minds as we try to get along with others.
At Savatthi.
There the Blessed One said, “Monks, do you develop mindfulness of in-&-out breathing?
When this was said, Ven.
Arittha replied to the Blessed One, “I develop mindfulness of in-&-out breathing, lord.
“But how do you develop mindfulness of in-&-out breathing, Arittha?
“Having abandoned sensual desire for past sensual pleasures, lord, having done away with sensual desire for future sensual pleasures, and having thoroughly subdued perceptions of irritation with regard to internal & external events, I breathe in mindfully and breathe out mindfully.
“There is that mindfulness of in-&-out breathing, Arittha.
I don't say that there isn't.
But as to how mindfulness of in-&-out breathing is brought in detail to its culmination, listen and pay close attention.
I will speak.
“As you say, lord,” Ven.
Arittha responded to the Blessed One.
The Blessed One said, “And how, Arittha, is mindfulness of in-&-out breathing brought in detail to its culmination?
There is the case where a monk, having gone to the wilderness, to the shade of a tree, or to an empty building, sits down folding his legs crosswise, holding his body erect, and setting mindfulness to the fore.
Always mindful, he breathes in; mindful he breathes out.
” Breathing in long, he discerns, 'I am breathing in long'; or breathing out long, he discerns, 'I am breathing out long.' Or breathing in short, he discerns, 'I am breathing in short'; or breathing out short, he discerns, 'I am breathing out short.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the entire body.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming bodily fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming bodily fabrication.'
” He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to rapture.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to rapture.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to pleasure.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to pleasure.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to mental fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to mental fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in calming mental fabrication.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out calming mental fabrication.'
” He trains himself, 'I will breathe in sensitive to the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out sensitive to the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in satisfying the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out satisfying the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in steadying the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out steadying the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in releasing the mind.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out releasing the mind.'
” He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on inconstancy.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on inconstancy.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on dispassion.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on dispassion.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on cessation.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on cessation.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe in focusing on relinquishment.' He trains himself, 'I will breathe out focusing on relinquishment.'
“This, Arittha, is how mindfulness of in-&-out breathing is brought in detail to its culmination.
See also: MN; SN..

These mournful words were uttered by Ananda in the Theragatha, the Poems of the Elders, and reveal a very human side of one of the canon's most sensitive characters.
Ananda was the Buddha's cousin and personal attendant, and was always to be found at the master's side throughout the many years of wandering and teaching.
As Ananda put it: “For twenty five years I served the Lord with loving deeds, loving words and loving thoughts — when the Buddha paced to and fro, I paced along behind.” 
It is Ananda who washed his feet at the end of the day, who arranged his interviews and protected his solitude as best he could, and who tended him lovingly during his final illness.
It is Ananda also who we find weeping bitterly at the passing away of the Buddha, and being gently admonished for it by the teacher of non-attachment to changing phenomena.
After the Buddha's final passing Ananda seems to have been treated somewhat badly by some of the other monks, who were jealous of his close relationship with the master.
Poems like this one suggest that Ananda passed a lonely old age and never ceased mourning for his beloved teacher and friend.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks, “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded to him.
The Blessed One said, “When Dabba Mallaputta rose up into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, in space, entered & emerged from the fire property and was totally unbound, his body burned and was consumed so that neither ashes nor soot could be discerned.
Just as when ghee or oil is burned and consumed, neither ashes nor soot can be discerned, in the same way, when Dabba Mallaputta rose up into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, in space, entered & emerged from the fire property and was totally unbound, his body burned and was consumed so that neither ashes nor soot could be discerned.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
Then Ven.
Dabba Mallaputta went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “Now is the time for my total unbinding, O One-Well-Gone!
“Then do, Dabba, what you think it is now time to do.
Then Ven.
Dabba Mallaputta, rising from his seat, bowed down to the Blessed One and, circling him on the right, rose up into the air and sat cross-legged in the sky, in space.
Entering & emerging from the fire property, he was totally unbound.
Now, when Dabba Mallaputta rose up into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, in space, entered & emerged from the fire property and was totally unbound, his body burned and was consumed so that neither ashes nor soot could be discerned.
Just as when ghee or oil is burned and consumed, neither ashes nor soot can be discerned, in the same way, when Dabba Mallaputta rose up into the air and, sitting cross-legged in the sky, in space, entered & emerged from the fire property and was totally unbound, his body burned and was consumed so that neither ashes nor soot could be discerned.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion the Blessed One was instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the monks with Dhamma-talk concerned with unbinding.
The monks — receptive, attentive, focusing their entire awareness, lending ear — listened to the Dhamma.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion the Blessed One was instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the monks with Dhamma-talk concerned with unbinding.
The monks — receptive, attentive, focusing their entire awareness, lending ear — listened to the Dhamma.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Aññāta Koṇḍañña was sitting not far from the Blessed One, his legs crossed, his body held erect, reflecting on release through the total ending of craving.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Aññāta Koṇḍañña sitting not far away, his legs crossed, his body held erect, reflecting on release through the total ending of craving.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion the Blessed One was instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the monks with Dhamma-talk concerned with unbinding.
The monks — receptive, attentive, focusing their entire awareness, lending ear — listened to the Dhamma.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion the Blessed One was instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging the monks with Dhamma-talk concerned with unbinding.
The monks — receptive, attentive, focusing their entire awareness, lending ear — listened to the Dhamma.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion, most of the people in Sāvatthī were excessively attached to sensual pleasures.
They lived infatuated with, greedy for, addicted to, fastened to, absorbed in sensual pleasures.
Then early in the morning the Blessed One adjusted his under robe and — carrying his bowl & robes — went into Sāvatthī for alms.
He saw that most of the people in Sāvatthī were excessively attached to sensual pleasures, that they live infatuated with, greedy for, addicted to, fastened to, absorbed in sensual pleasures.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion, most of the people in Sāvatthī were excessively attached to sensual pleasures.
They lived infatuated with, greedy for, addicted to, fastened to, absorbed in sensual pleasures.
Then in the early morning, a large number of monks adjusted their under robes and — carrying their bowls & robes — went into Sāvatthī for alms.
Having gone for alms in Sāvatthī, after the meal, returning from their alms round, they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One, “Most of the people in Sāvatthī are excessively attached to sensual pleasures.
They live infatuated with, greedy for, addicted to, fastened to, absorbed in sensual pleasures.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
At that time Ven.
Sāriputta was — with a variety of approaches — instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging Ven.
Bhaddiya the Dwarf with Dhamma-talk to an even greater extent, as he thought that Bhaddiya was still just a learner.
The Blessed One saw that Ven.
Sāriputta was — with a variety of approaches — instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging Ven.
Bhaddiya the Dwarf with Dhamma-talk to an even greater extent, as he thought that Bhaddiya was still just a learner.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
At that time Ven.
Sāriputta was — with a variety of approaches — instructing, urging, rousing, & encouraging Ven.
Bhaddiya the Dwarf with Dhamma-talk.
As Ven.
Bhaddiya the Dwarf was — with a variety of approaches — being instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged by Ven.
Sāriputta with Dhamma-talk, his mind, through lack of clinging/sustenance, was released from the effluents.
The Blessed One saw that as Ven.
Bhaddiya the Dwarf was — with a variety of approaches — being instructed, urged, roused, & encouraged by Ven.
Sāriputta with Dhamma-talk, his mind, through lack of clinging/sustenance, was released from the effluents.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
Now on that occasion, in the pitch-black darkness of the night, the Blessed One was sitting in the open air while oil lamps were burning.
And on that occasion, many flying insects, flying into & around those lamps, were meeting their downfall, meeting their misfortune, meeting their downfall & misfortune in those oil lamps.
The Blessed One saw those flying insects, flying into & around those lamps, meeting their downfall, meeting their misfortune, meeting their downfall & misfortune in those oil lamps.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Subhūti was sitting not far from the Blessed One, his legs crossed, his body held erect, having attained a concentration free from directed thought.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Subhūti sitting not far away, his legs crossed, his body held erect, having attained a concentration free from directed thought.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion there were many contemplatives, brahmans, & wanderers of various sects living around Sāvatthī with differing views, differing opinions, differing beliefs, dependent for support on their differing views.
Some of the contemplatives & brahmans held this doctrine, this view: “The self & the cosmos are eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
Some of the contemplatives & brahmans held this doctrine, this view: “The self & the cosmos are not eternal”… “The self & the cosmos are both eternal and not eternal”… “The self & the cosmos are neither eternal nor not eternal”…
“The self & the cosmos are self-made”… “The self & the cosmos are other-made”… “The self & the cosmos are both self-made & other-made”… “The self & the cosmos — without self-making, without other-making — are spontaneously arisen”…
“Pleasure & pain, the self & the cosmos are self-made”… “other-made”… “both self-made & other-made”… “Pleasure & pain, the self & the cosmos — without self-making, without other-making — are spontaneously arisen.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
And they kept on arguing, quarreling, & disputing, wounding one another with weapons of the mouth, saying, “The Dhamma is like this, it's not like that.
The Dhamma's not like that, it's like this.
Then in the early morning, a large number of monks adjusted their under robes and — carrying their bowls & robes — went into Sāvatthī for alms.
Having gone for alms in Sāvatthī, after the meal, returning from their alms round, they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One, “Lord, there are many contemplatives, brahmans, & wanderers of various sects living around Sāvatthī with differing views, differing opinions, differing beliefs, dependent for support on their differing views… And they keep on arguing, quarreling, & disputing, wounding one another with weapons of the mouth, saying, 'The Dhamma is like this, it's not like that.
The Dhamma's not like that, it's like this.' “Monks, the wanderers of other sects are blind & eyeless.
They don't know what is beneficial and what is harmful.
They don't know what is the Dhamma and what is non-Dhamma.
Not knowing what is beneficial and what is harmful, not knowing what is Dhamma and what is non-Dhamma, they keep on arguing, quarreling, & disputing, wounding one another with weapons of the mouth, saying, 'The Dhamma is like this, it's not like that.
The Dhamma's not like that, it's like this.' Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion there were many contemplatives, brahmans, & wanderers of various sects living around Sāvatthī with differing views, differing opinions, differing beliefs, dependent for support on their differing views.
Some of the contemplatives & brahmans held this doctrine, this view: “The self & the cosmos are eternal.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
Some of the contemplatives & brahmans held this doctrine, this view: “The self & the cosmos are not eternal”… “The self & the cosmos are both eternal and not eternal”… “The self & the cosmos are neither eternal nor not eternal”…
“The self & the cosmos are self-made”… “The self & the cosmos are other-made”… “The self & the cosmos are both self-made & other-made”… “The self & the cosmos — without self-making, without other-making — are spontaneously arisen”…
“Pleasure & pain, the self & the cosmos are self-made”… “other-made”… “both self-made & other-made”… “Pleasure & pain, the self & the cosmos — without self-making, without other-making — are spontaneously arisen.
Only this is true; anything otherwise is worthless.
And they kept on arguing, quarreling, & disputing, wounding one another with weapons of the mouth, saying, “The Dhamma is like this, it's not like that.
The Dhamma's not like that, it's like this.
Then in the early morning, a large number of monks adjusted their under robes and — carrying their bowls & robes — went into Sāvatthī for alms.
Having gone for alms in Sāvatthī, after the meal, returning from their alms round, they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One, “Lord, there are many contemplatives, brahmans, & wanderers of various sects living around Sāvatthī with differing views, differing opinions, differing beliefs, dependent for support on their differing views… And they keep on arguing, quarreling, & disputing, wounding one another with weapons of the mouth, saying, 'The Dhamma is like this, it's not like that.
The Dhamma's not like that, it's like this.' “Monks, the wanderers of other sects are blind & eyeless.
They don't know what is beneficial and what is harmful.
They don't know what is the Dhamma and what is non-Dhamma.
Not knowing what is beneficial and what is harmful, not knowing what is Dhamma and what is non-Dhamma, they keep on arguing, quarreling, & disputing, wounding one another with weapons of the mouth, saying, 'The Dhamma is like this, it's not like that.
The Dhamma's not like that, it's like this.' Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion the Blessed One sat reflecting on the various evil, unskillful qualities that had been abandoned and on the various skillful qualities that had gone to the culmination of their development.
Then as he realized the various evil, unskillful qualities that had been abandoned and the various skillful qualities that had gone to the culmination of their development, he on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Revata the Doubter was sitting not far from the Blessed One, his legs crossed, his body held erect, reflecting on purification through the overcoming of doubt.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Revata the Doubter sitting not far away, his legs crossed, his body held erect, reflecting on purification through the overcoming of doubt.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Cūḷa Panthaka was sitting not far from the Blessed One, his legs crossed, his body held erect, with mindfulness established to the fore.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Cūḷa Panthaka sitting not far away, his legs crossed, his body held erect, with mindfulness established to the fore.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion, a large number of boys on the road between Sāvatthī & Jeta's Grove were catching fish.
Then early in the morning the Blessed One adjusted his under robe and — carrying his bowl & robes — went into Sāvatthī for alms.
He saw the large number of boys on the road between Sāvatthī & Jeta's Grove catching little fish.
Seeing them, he went up to them and, on arrival, said to them, “Boys, do you fear pain?
Do you dislike pain?
“Yes, lord, we fear pain.
We dislike pain.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion King Pasenadi Kosala had gone with Queen Mallikā to the upper palace.
Then he said to her, “Mallikā, is there anyone dearer to you than yourself?
“No, great king.
There is no one dearer to me than myself.
And what about you, great king?
Is there anyone dearer to you than yourself?
“No, Mallikā.
There is no one dearer to me than myself.
Then the king, descending from the palace, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Just now, when I had gone with Queen Mallikā to the upper palace, I said to her, 'Mallikā, is there anyone dearer to you than yourself?'
“When this was said, she said to me, 'No, great king.
There is no one dearer to me than myself.
And what about you, great king?
Is there anyone dearer to you than yourself?'
“When this was said, I said to her, 'No, Mallikā.
There is no one dearer to me than myself.' Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Sāriputta was sitting not far from the Blessed One — his legs crossed, his body held erect — reflecting on the peace within himself.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Sāriputta sitting not far away — his legs crossed, his body held erect — reflecting on the peace within himself.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Sāriputta was sitting not far from the Blessed One — his legs crossed, his body held erect — modest, content, solitary, unentangled, his persistence aroused, devoted to the heightened mind.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Sāriputta sitting not far away — his legs crossed, his body held erect — modest, content, solitary, unentangled, his persistence aroused, devoted to the heightened mind.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion a large number of monks, after the meal, on returning from their alms round, were sitting gathered together at the kareri-tree pavilion when this discussion arose: “Friends, an alms-collecting monk, while going for alms, periodically sees agreeable sights via the eye.
He periodically hears agreeable sounds via the ear… smells agreeable aromas via the nose… tastes agreeable flavors via the tongue… touches agreeable tactile sensations via the body.
An alms-collecting monk, while going for alms, is honored, respected, revered, venerated, and given homage.
“So, friends, let's become alms-collecting monks.
Then we, too, while going for alms, will periodically get to see agreeable sights via the eye… to hear agreeable sounds via the ear… to smell agreeable aromas via the nose… to taste agreeable flavors via the tongue… to touch agreeable tactile sensations via the body.
We, too, while going for alms, will be honored, respected, revered, venerated, and given homage.” And this discussion came to no conclusion.
Then the Blessed One, emerging from his seclusion in the late afternoon, went to the kareri-tree pavilion and, on arrival, sat down on a seat laid out.
Seated, he addressed the monks: “For what topic are you sitting together here?
And what was the discussion that came to no conclusion?
“Just now, lord, after the meal, on returning from our alms round, we were sitting gathered together here at the kareri-tree pavilion when this discussion arose: “
“It isn't proper, monks, that sons of good families, on having gone forth out of faith from home to the homeless life, should talk on such a topic.
When you have gathered you have two duties: either Dhamma-talk or noble silence.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Piṇḍola Bhāradvāja was sitting not far from the Blessed One, his legs crossed, his body held erect — a wilderness dweller, an alms-goer, a rag-robe wearer, an owner of only one set of three robes, modest, content, solitary, unentangled, his persistence aroused, an advocate of the ascetic practices, devoted to the heightened mind.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Piṇḍola Bhāradvāja sitting not far away, his legs crossed, his body held erect — a wilderness dweller, an alms-goer, a rag-robe wearer, an owner of only one set of three robes, modest, content, solitary, unentangled, his persistence aroused, an advocate of the ascetic practices, devoted to the heightened mind.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
This verse also occurs at Dhp, where it forms part of a set including Dhp -:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Sāriputta was sitting not far from the Blessed One, his legs crossed, his body held erect, having set mindfulness to the fore.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Sāriputta sitting not far away, his legs crossed, his body held erect, having set mindfulness to the fore.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna was sitting not far from the Blessed One, his legs crossed, his body held erect, having mindfulness immersed in the body well-established within.
The Blessed One saw Ven.
Mahā Moggallāna sitting not far away, his legs crossed, his body held erect, having mindfulness immersed in the body well-established within.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion a certain monk was sitting not far from the Blessed One, his legs crossed, his body held erect, enduring fierce pains, sharp & severe, that were the result of old kamma — mindful, alert, without suffering.
The Blessed One saw him sitting not far away, his legs crossed, his body held erect, enduring fierce pains, sharp & severe, that were the result of old kamma — mindful, alert, and not struck down by them.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion the dear and beloved only son of a certain lay follower had died.
So a large number of lay followers — their clothes wet, their hair wet — went to the Blessed One in the middle of the day and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there the Blessed One said to them: “Why have you come here — your clothes wet, your hair wet — in the middle of the day?
When this was said, the lay follower said to the Blessed One, “My dear and beloved only son, lord, has died.
This is why we have come here — our clothes wet, our hair wet — in the middle of the day.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion the young wife of a certain wanderer was pregnant and on the verge of delivery.
So she said to the wanderer, “Go, brahman, get some oil for my delivery.
When this was said, the wanderer said to her, “But where can I get any oil?
A second time, she said to him, “Go, brahman, get some oil for my delivery.
A second time, he said to her, “But where can I get any oil?
A third time, she said to him, “Go, brahman get some oil for my delivery.
Now on that occasion at the storehouse of King Pasenadi Kosala contemplatives & brahmans were being given as much oil or ghee as they needed to drink, but not to take away.
So the thought occurred to the wanderer, “At present at the storehouse of King Pasenadi Kosala contemplatives & brahmans are being given as much oil or ghee as they need to drink, but not to take away.
Suppose, having gone there, I were to drink as much oil as I need and, on returning home, vomiting it up, were to give it to use at this delivery?
So, having gone to the storehouse of King Pasenadi Kosala, he drank as much oil as he needed but, on returning home, was unable to bring it up or pass it down.
So he rolled back & forth, suffering from fierce pains, sharp & severe.
Then early in the morning the Blessed One adjusted his under robe and — carrying his bowl & robes — went into Sāvatthī for alms.
He saw the wanderer rolling back & forth, suffering from fierce pains, sharp & severe.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion a certain lay follower from Icchānaṅgalaka had arrived in Sāvatthī on some business affairs.
Having settled his affairs in Sāvatthī, he went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, the Blessed One said to him, “At long last you have managed to come here.
“For a long time, lord, have I wanted to come see the Blessed One, but being involved in one business affair after another, I have not been able to do so.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion the Blessed One was worshipped, revered, honored, venerated, and given homage — a recipient of robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick.
The community of monks was also worshipped, revered, honored, venerated, and given homage — a recipient of robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick.
But the wanderers of other sects were not worshipped, revered, honored, venerated, or given homage; nor were they recipients of robes, alms food, lodgings, or medicinal requisites for the sick.
So the wanderers of other sects, unable to stand the veneration given to the Blessed One and the community of monks, on seeing monks in village or wilderness, would insult, revile, irritate, & harass them with discourteous, abusive language.
Then a large number of monks went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to him, “At present the Blessed One is worshipped, revered, honored, venerated, and given homage — a recipient of robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick.
The community of monks is also worshipped, revered, honored, venerated, and given homage — a recipient of robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick.
But the wanderers of other sects are not worshipped, revered, honored, venerated, or given homage; nor are they recipients of robes, alms food, lodgings, or medicinal requisites for the sick.
So the wanderers of other sects, unable to stand the veneration given to the Blessed One and the community of monks, on seeing monks in village or wilderness, insult, revile, irritate, & harass them with discourteous, abusive language.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion, a large number of boys on the road between Sāvatthī & Jeta's Grove were hitting a snake with a stick.
Then early in the morning the Blessed One adjusted his under robe and — carrying his bowl & robes — went into Sāvatthī for alms.
He saw the large number of boys on the road between Sāvatthī & Jeta's Grove hitting the snake with a stick.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion a large number of monks, after the meal, on returning from their alms round, were sitting gathered together in the assembly hall when this discussion arose: “Friends, which of these two kings has greater wealth, greater possessions, the greater treasury, the larger realm, the greater stock of riding animals, the greater army, greater power, greater might: King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha or King Pasenadi of Kosala?” And this discussion came to no conclusion.
Then the Blessed One, emerging from his seclusion in the late afternoon, went to the assembly hall and, on arrival, sat down on a seat laid out.
Seated, he addressed the monks: “For what topic are you sitting together here?
And what was the discussion that came to no conclusion?
“Just now, lord, after the meal, on returning from our alms round, we were sitting gathered here at the assembly hall when this discussion arose: 'Friends, which of these two kings has greater wealth, greater possessions, the greater treasury, the larger realm, the greater stock of riding animals, the greater army, greater power, greater might: King Seniya Bimbisāra of Magadha or King Pasenadi of Kosala?' This was the discussion that had come to no conclusion when the Blessed One arrived.
“It isn't proper, monks, that sons of good families, on having gone forth out of faith from home to the homeless life, should talk on such a topic.
When you have gathered you have two duties: either Dhamma-talk or noble silence.” 
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth was living in Suppāraka by the seashore.
He was worshipped, revered, honored, venerated, and given homage — a recipient of robes, alms food, lodgings, & medicinal requisites for the sick.
Then, when he was alone in seclusion, this line of thinking appeared to his awareness: “Now, of those who in this world are arahants or have entered the path of arahantship, am I one?
Then a devatā who had once been a blood relative of Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth — compassionate, desiring his welfare, knowing with her own awareness the line of thinking that had arisen in his awareness — went to him and on arrival said to him, “You, Bāhiya, are neither an arahant nor have you entered the path of arahantship.
You don't even have the practice whereby you would become an arahant or enter the path of arahantship.
“Then who, in this world with its devas, are arahants or have entered the path to arahantship?
“Bāhiya, there is a city in the northern country named Sāvatthī.
There the Blessed One — an arahant, rightly self-awakened — is living now.
He truly is an arahant and teaches the Dhamma leading to arahantship.
Then Bāhiya, deeply chastened by the devatā, left Suppāraka right then and, in the space of one night, went all the way to where the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
Now on that occasion, a large number of monks were doing walking meditation in the open air.
He went to them and, on arrival, said, “Where, venerable sirs, is the Blessed One — the arahant, rightly self-awakened — now staying?
We want to see that Blessed One — the arahant, rightly self-awakened.
“The Blessed One has gone into town for alms.
Then Bāhiya, hurriedly leaving Jeta's Grove and entering Sāvatthī, saw the Blessed One going for alms in Sāvatthī — serene & inspiring serene confidence, calming, his senses at peace, his mind at peace, having attained the utmost tranquility & poise, tamed, guarded, his senses restrained, a Great One.
Seeing him, he approached the Blessed One and, on reaching him, threw himself down, with his head at the Blessed One's feet, and said, “Teach me the Dhamma, O Blessed One!
Teach me the Dhamma, O One-Well-Gone, that will be for my long-term welfare & bliss.
When this was said, the Blessed One said to him, “This is not the time, Bāhiya.
We have entered the town for alms.
A second time, Bāhiya said to the Blessed One, “But it is hard to know for sure what dangers there may be for the Blessed One's life, or what dangers there may be for mine.
Teach me the Dhamma, O Blessed One!
Teach me the Dhamma, O One-Well-Gone, that will be for my long-term welfare & bliss.
A second time, the Blessed One said to him, “This is not the time, Bāhiya.
We have entered the town for alms.
A third time, Bāhiya said to the Blessed One, “But it is hard to know for sure what dangers there may be for the Blessed One's life, or what dangers there may be for mine.
Teach me the Dhamma, O Blessed One!
Teach me the Dhamma, O One-Well-Gone, that will be for my long-term welfare & bliss.
“Then, Bāhiya, you should train yourself thus: In reference to the seen, there will be only the seen.
In reference to the heard, only the heard.
In reference to the sensed, only the sensed.
In reference to the cognized, only the cognized.
That is how you should train yourself.
When for you there will be only the seen in reference to the seen, only the heard in reference to the heard, only the sensed in reference to the sensed, only the cognized in reference to the cognized, then, Bāhiya, there is no you in connection with that.
When there is no you in connection with that, there is no you there.
When there is no you there, you are neither here nor yonder nor between the two.
This, just this, is the end of stress.
Through hearing this brief explanation of the Dhamma from the Blessed One, the mind of Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth right then and there was released from effluents through lack of clinging/sustenance.
Having exhorted Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth with this brief explanation of the Dhamma, the Blessed One left.
Now, not long after the Blessed One's departure, Bāhiya was attacked & killed by a cow with a young calf.
Then the Blessed One, having gone for alms in Sāvatthī, after the meal, returning from his alms round with a large number of monks, saw that Bāhiya had died.
On seeing him, he said to the monks, “Take Bāhiya's body, monks, and, placing it on a litter and carrying it away, cremate it and build him a memorial.
Your companion in the holy life has died.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, the monks — placing Bāhiya's body on a litter, carrying it away, cremating it, and building him a memorial — went to the Blessed One.
On arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to him, “Bāhiya's body has been cremated, lord, and his memorial has been built.
What is his destination?
What is his future state?
“Monks, Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth was wise.
He practiced the Dhamma in accordance with the Dhamma and did not pester me with issues related to the Dhamma.
Bāhiya of the Bark-cloth, monks, is totally unbound.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Sāriputta, Ven.
Mahā Moggalāna, Ven.
Mahā Kassapa, Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, Ven.
Mahā Koṭṭhita, Ven.
Mahā Kappina, Ven.
Mahā Cunda, Ven.
Anuruddha, Ven.
Revata, and Ven.
Nanda went to the Blessed One.
The Blessed One saw them coming from afar and, on seeing them, addressed the monks, “Monks, those are brahmans who are coming.
Monks, those are brahmans who are coming.
When this was said, a certain monk who was a brahman by birth said to the Blessed One, “To what extent, lord, is one a brahman?
And which are the qualities that make one a brahman?
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
There he addressed the monks: “Monks!
“Yes, lord,” the monks responded.
The Blessed One said: “Develop concentration, monks.
A concentrated monk discerns in line with what has come into being.
And what does he discern in line with what has come into being?
The origination & disappearance of form.
The origination & disappearance of feeling… perception… fabrications.
The origination & disappearance of consciousness.
“And what is the origination of form?…feeling?…perception?…fabrications?
What is the origination of consciousness?
“There is the case where one enjoys, welcomes, & remains fastened.
And what does one enjoy & welcome, to what does one remain fastened?
One enjoys, welcomes, & remains fastened to form.
As one enjoys, welcomes, & remains fastened to form, there arises delight.
Any delight in form is clinging.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“One enjoys, welcomes, & remains fastened to feeling… perception… fabrications…
“One enjoys, welcomes, & remains fastened to consciousness.
As one enjoys, welcomes, & remains fastened to consciousness, there arises delight.
Any delight in consciousness is clinging.
From clinging/sustenance as a requisite condition comes becoming.
From becoming as a requisite condition comes birth.
From birth as a requisite condition, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair come into play.
Such is the origination of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“This, monks, is the origination of form.
This, the origination of feeling… perception… fabrications.
This, the origination of consciousness.
“And what is the disappearance of form?…feeling?…perception?…fabrications?
What is the disappearance of consciousness?
“There is the case where one doesn't enjoy, welcome, or remain fastened.
And what does one not enjoy or welcome, to what does one not remain fastened?
One doesn't enjoy, welcome, or remain fastened to form.
As one doesn't enjoy, welcome, or remain fastened to form, any delight in form ceases.
From the cessation of delight comes the cessation of clinging.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance, the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming, the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“One doesn't enjoy, welcome, or remain fastened to feeling… perception… fabrications…
“One doesn't enjoy, welcome, or remain fastened to consciousness.
As one doesn't enjoy, welcome, or remain fastened to consciousness, any delight in consciousness ceases.
From the cessation of delight comes the cessation of clinging.
From the cessation of clinging/sustenance, the cessation of becoming.
From the cessation of becoming, the cessation of birth.
From the cessation of birth, then aging & death, sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair all cease.
Such is the cessation of this entire mass of stress & suffering.
“This, monks, is the disappearance of form.
This, the disappearance of feeling… perception… fabrications.
This, the disappearance of consciousness.
See also: MN; SN.; SN.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi at Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then the Blessed One, picking up a little bit of dust with the tip of his fingernail, said to the monks, “What do you think, monks?
Which is greater: the little bit of dust I have picked up with the tip of my fingernail, or the great earth?
“The great earth is far greater, lord.
The little bit of dust the Blessed One has picked up with the tip of his fingernail is next to nothing.
It's not a hundredth, a thousandth, a one hundred-thousandth — this little bit of dust the Blessed One has picked up with the tip of his fingernail — when compared with the great earth.
“In the same way, monks, for a disciple of the noble ones who is consummate in view, an individual who has broken through, the suffering & stress that is totally ended & extinguished is far greater.
That which remains in the state of having at most seven remaining lifetimes is next to nothing: it's not a hundredth, a thousandth, a one hundred-thousandth, when compared with the previous mass of suffering.
That's how great the benefit is of breaking through to the Dhamma, monks.
That's how great the benefit is of obtaining the Dhamma eye.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was wandering among the Mallans, together with a large community of monks, and came to a brahman village of the Mallans named Thūna.
The brahman householders of Thūna heard that “Gotama the Sakyan contemplative, gone forth from the Sakyan clan, is wandering among the Mallans together with a large community of monks, and has arrived at Thūna.” So they filled the well all the way to the brim with grass & chaff,, “Don't let these shaven-headed contemplatives draw drinking water.
Then the Blessed One, going down from the road, went to a certain tree, and on arrival sat down on a seat laid out.
Seated, he said to Ven.
Ānanda: “Please, Ānanda, fetch me some drinking water from that well.
When this was said, Ven.
Ānanda replied, “Just now, lord, the brahman householders of Thūna filled that well all the way to the brim with grass & chaff,, 'Don't let these shaven-headed contemplatives draw drinking water.' A second time, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ānanda: “Please, Ānanda, fetch me some drinking water from that well.
A second time, Ven.
Ānanda replied, “Just now, lord, the brahman householders of Thūna filled that well all the way to the brim with grass & chaff,, 'Don't let these shaven-headed contemplatives draw drinking water.' A third time, the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ānanda: “Please, Ānanda, fetch me some drinking water from that well.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Ven.
Ānanda — taking a bowl — went to the well.
As he was approaching the well, it expelled all the grass & chaff from its mouth and stood filled to the brim — streaming, as it were — with pristine water, undisturbed & clear.
The thought occurred to him, “How amazing!
How astounding!
— the great power & great might of the Tathāgata!
— in that, while I was approaching the well, it expelled all the grass & chaff from its mouth and stood filled to the brim — streaming, as it were — with pristine water, undisturbed & clear.
Taking drinking water in his bowl, he went to the Blessed One and on arrival said, “How amazing, lord!
How astounding!
— the great power & great might of the Tathāgata!
— in that, while I was approaching the well, it expelled all the grass & chaff from its mouth and stood filled to the brim — streaming, as it were — with pristine water, undisturbed & clear.
Drink the water, O Blessed One!
Drink the water, O One-Well-Gone!
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
Translator's note: In this discourse, Mara and the Buddha are speaking different languages.
By “acquisitions” Mara means one's family and physical possessions.
The Buddha uses the same word to mean a sense of possession for anything — physical or mental — at all.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then Mara the Evil One went to the Blessed One and recited this verse in his presence:
Then Mara the Evil One — sad & dejected at realizing, “The Blessed One knows me; the One Well-Gone knows me” — vanished right there.
Many discourses are set in Jeta's Grove, the monastery donated by Anathapindika.
Here we learn how Anathapindika first met the Buddha.
A dramatic point in the story revolves around the fact that most people knew of him by his epithet — Anathapindika means “Almsgiver to those without protection” — rather than by his given name.
Thus he is surprised to hear the Buddha, at their first meeting, address him correctly.
The Cullavagga gives this same story in greater detail and adds more incidents: After reciting the verse with which this discourse ends, the Buddha gives Anathapindika a step-by-step teaching, culminating in an explanation of the four noble truths.
At the end of the teaching, Anathapindika attains stream-entry.
He then returns home to Savatthi, purchases a grove from Prince Jeta at immense price, and establishes a monastery for the Buddha and the Sangha.
There, according to the commentaries, the Buddha spent more rains retreats than at any other monastery.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Rajagaha in the Cool Grove.
Now at that time Anathapindika the householder had arrived in Rajagaha on some business.
He heard, “An Awakened One, they say, has appeared in the world,” and he wanted to go right then to see the Blessed One.
Then the thought occurred to him, “Today is not the proper time to go to see the Blessed One.
Tomorrow I will go to see the Blessed One at the proper time.” With his mindfulness immersed in the Awakened One he lay down to sleep.
Three times he got up during the night, thinking it was light.
Then he went to the gate to the charnel ground.
Non-human beings opened the gate.
When Anathapindika the householder had left the city, the light vanished and darkness appeared.
Fear, terror, & horripilation arose, and because of that he wanted to turn back.
Then Sivaka the yakkha-spirit, invisible, proclaimed:
The darkness then vanished for Anathapindika and the light appeared.
The fear, terror, & horripilation he had felt subsided.
For a second time… a third time, the light vanished and darkness appeared.
Fear, terror, & horripilation arose, and because of that Anathapindika wanted to turn back.
Then for a third time, Sivaka the yakkha-spirit, invisible, proclaimed:
The darkness then vanished for Anathapindika and the light appeared.
The fear, terror, & horripilation he had felt subsided.
So Anathapindika went to the Cool Grove.
Now at that time, the Blessed One — having gotten up as the night was ending — was pacing back & forth in the open air.
He saw Anathapindika the householder coming from afar.
On seeing him, he got down from his meditation path and sat on a seat made ready.
As he was sitting there he said to Anathapindika, “Come, Sudatta.
Then Anathapindika, “The Blessed One is calling me by my given name!” threw himself down right there at the Blessed One's feet and said to him, “Lord, I hope the Blessed One has slept in ease.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion approximately monks, headed by Ven.
Yasoja, had arrived in Sāvatthī to see the Blessed One.
As these visiting monks were exchanging greetings with the resident monks, setting their lodgings in order, and putting away their robes & bowls, they made a loud racket, a great racket.
Then the Blessed One said to Ven.
Ānanda, “Ānanda, what is that loud racket, that great racket like fishermen with a catch of fish?
“Lord, those are approximately monks, headed by Ven.
Yasoja, who have arrived in Sāvatthī to see the Blessed One.
As these visiting monks are exchanging greetings with the resident monks, setting their lodgings in order, and putting away their robes & bowls, they are making a loud racket, a great racket.
“In that case, Ānanda, tell those monks in my name, 'The Teacher calls you, friends.' Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Ven.
Ānanda went to the monks and said, “The Teacher calls you, friends.
Responding, “As you say, friend,” to Ven.
Ānanda, the monks went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, the Blessed One said to them, “Monks, why were you making that loud racket, that great racket, like fishermen with a catch of fish?
When this was said, Ven.
Yasoja said to the Blessed One, “Lord, these monks have arrived in Sāvatthī to see the Blessed One.
As they were exchanging greetings with the resident monks, setting their lodgings in order, and putting away their robes & bowls, they made a loud racket, a great racket.
“Go away, monks.
I dismiss you.
You are not to stay in my vicinity.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, the monks got up from their seats, bowed down to the Blessed One, and left, circling him to the right.
Setting their lodgings in order and taking their robes & bowls, they went wandering among the Vajjians.
After wandering by stages among the Vajjians, they came to the River Vaggamudā.
There on the bank of the River Vaggamudā they made leaf-huts and entered the Rains Retreat.
Then Ven.
Yasoja addressed the monks as they entered the Rains Retreat: “Friends, the Blessed One dismissed us, wishing for our benefit, seeking our wellbeing, being sympathetic, and acting out of sympathy.
Let's live in such a way that the Blessed One will be gratified by our way of living.
“As you say, friend,” the monks responded to Ven.
Yasoja.
And so, living secluded, ardent, & resolute, every one of them realized the Three Knowledges in the course of that very Rains Retreat.
Then the Blessed One, having stayed as long as he liked in Sāvatthī, went wandering in the direction of Vesālī.
After wandering by stages, he arrived in Vesālī and stayed there in the Peaked Roof Pavilion in the Great Wood.
Then, encompassing with his awareness the awareness of the monks staying on the bank of the River Vaggamudā, he said to Ven.
Ānanda, “This direction seems bright to me, Ānanda.
This direction seems dazzling to me.
It's not at all repugnant for me to go & pay attention to where the monks on the bank of the River Vaggamudā are staying.
Send a messenger into their presence to say, 'The Teacher calls you, friends.
The Teacher wants to see you.' Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Ven.
Ānanda went to a certain monk and said, “Come now, friend.
Go to the monks on the bank of the River Vaggamudā and say to them, 'The Teacher calls you, friends.
The Teacher wants to see you.' Responding, “As you say, friend,” to Ven.
Ānanda, the monk — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — disappeared from the Peaked Roof Pavilion in the Great Wood and appeared in front of the monks on the bank of the River Vaggamudā.
Then he said to them, “The Teacher calls you, friends.
The Teacher wants to see you.
Responding, “As you say, friend,” to the monk, the monks set their lodgings in order and, taking their robes & bowls, disappeared from the bank of the River Vaggamudā — just as a strong man might extend his flexed arm or flex his extended arm — and appeared in the presence of the Blessed One in the Peaked Roof Pavilion in the Great Wood.
Now, at that time the Blessed One was sitting in imperturbable concentration.
The thought occurred to the monks, “Now, in which mental dwelling is the Blessed One now residing?” Then they realized, “He is residing in the imperturbable dwelling.” So they all sat in imperturbable concentration.
Then Ven.
Ānanda — when the night was far advanced, at the end of the first watch — got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, stood facing the Blessed One, paying homage with his hands placed palm-to-palm over his heart, and said to him, “The night, lord, is far advanced.
The first watch has ended.
The visiting monks have been sitting here a long time.
May the Blessed One greet them.” When this was said, the Blessed One remained silent.
Then a second time, when the night was far advanced, at the end of the middle watch, Ven.
Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, stood facing the Blessed One, paying homage to him with his hands placed palm-to-palm over his heart, and said to him, “The night, lord, is far advanced.
The middle watch has ended.
The visiting monks have been sitting here a long time.
May the Blessed One greet them.” When this was said, the Blessed One remained silent.
Then a third time, when the night was far advanced, at the end of the last watch, as dawn was approaching and the face of the night was beaming, Ven.
Ānanda got up from his seat, arranged his robe over one shoulder, stood facing the Blessed One, paying homage to him with his hands placed palm-to-palm over his heart, and said to him, “The night, lord, is far advanced.
The last watch has ended.
Dawn is approaching and the face of the night is beaming.
The visiting monks have been sitting here a long time.
May the Blessed One greet them.
Then the Blessed One, emerging from his imperturbable concentration, said to Ven.
Ānanda, “Ānanda, if you had known, not even that much would have occurred to you.
I, along with all of these monks, have been sitting in imperturbable concentration.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
Then Ven.
Ānanda, emerging from his seclusion in the late afternoon, went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One, “It's amazing, sir.
It's astounding — how short-lived the Blessed One's mother was.
Seven days after the Blessed One's birth she died and reappeared among the Contented group.
“That's the way it is, Ānanda.
That's the way it is, for the mothers of bodhisattas are short-lived.
Seven days after the bodhisattas' birth, the bodhisattas' mothers pass away and reappear among the Contented group.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
At Savatthi.
There Ven.
Ananda addressed the monks, “Friend monks!
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded to him.
Ven.
Ananda said, “Friends, Ven.
Punna Mantaniputta was very helpful to us when we were newly ordained.
He exhorted us with this exhortation:
“'It's with possessiveness, friend Ananda, that there is “I am,” not without possessiveness.
And through possessiveness of what is there “I am,” not without possessiveness?
Through possessiveness of form there is “I am,” not without possessiveness.
Through possessiveness of feeling… perception… fabrications… Through possessiveness of consciousness there is “I am,” not without possessiveness.
“'Just as if a young woman — or a man — youthful, fond of adornment, contemplating the image of her face in a mirror, pure & bright, or in a bowl of clear water, would look with possessiveness, not without possessiveness.
In the same way, through possessiveness of form there is “I am,” not without possessiveness.
Through possessiveness of feeling… perception… fabrications… Through possessiveness of consciousness there is “I am,” not without possessiveness.
“'What do you think, friend Ananda — Is form constant or inconstant?'
“'Inconstant, friend.'
“'And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?'
“'Stressful, friend.'
“'And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: “This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am”?'
“'No, friend.'
“'… Is feeling constant or inconstant?'
“'Inconstant, friend.'…
“'… Is perception constant or inconstant?'
“'Inconstant, friend.'…
“'… Are fabrications constant or inconstant?'
“'Inconstant, friend.'…
“'What do you think, friend Ananda — Is consciousness constant or inconstant?'
“'Inconstant, friend.'
“'And is that which is inconstant easeful or stressful?'
“'Stressful, friend.'
“'And is it fitting to regard what is inconstant, stressful, subject to change as: “This is mine.
This is my self.
This is what I am”?'
“'No, friend.'
“'Thus, friend Ananda, any form whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: every form is to be seen as it actually is with right discernment as: “This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.
“'Any feeling whatsoever…
“'Any perception whatsoever…
“'Any fabrications whatsoever…
“'Any consciousness whatsoever that is past, future, or present; internal or external; blatant or subtle; common or sublime; far or near: every consciousness is to be seen as it actually is with right discernment as: “This is not mine.
This is not my self.
This is not what I am.
“'Seeing thus, the instructed disciple of the noble ones grows disenchanted with form, disenchanted with feeling, disenchanted with perception, disenchanted with fabrications, disenchanted with consciousness.
Through disenchantment, he becomes dispassionate.
Through dispassion, he is fully released.
With full release, there is the knowledge, “Fully released.” He discerns that “Birth is ended, the holy life fulfilled, the task done.
There is nothing further for this world.”'
“Friends, Ven.
Punna Mantaniputta was very helpful to us when we were newly ordained.
He exhorted us with this exhortation.
And when I had heard this Dhamma-explanation from Ven.
Punna Mantaniputta, I broke through to the Dhamma.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Sāvatthī at Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
And on that occasion Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana was living among the people of Avantī on Pavatta Mountain near the Osprey Habitat.
And at that time the lay follower Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa was Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana's supporter.
Then as Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa was alone in seclusion, this train of thought appeared to his awareness: “According to the Dhamma that Master Mahā Kaccāyana teaches, it's not easy living at home to practice the holy life totally perfect, totally pure, like a polished shell.
What if I were to shave off my hair & beard, put on the ochre robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness?
So he went to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana and on arrival, having bowed down to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, “Just now, venerable sir, as I was alone in seclusion, this train of thought appeared to my awareness: 'According to the Dhamma that Master Mahā Kaccāyana teaches, it's not easy living at home to practice the holy life totally perfect, totally pure, like a polished shell.
What if I were to shave off my hair & beard, put on the ochre robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness?' Give me the going-forth, Master Mahā Kaccāyana!
When this was said, Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana said to Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa, “It's hard, Soṇa, the life-long, one-meal-a-day, sleeping-alone holy life.
Please, right there as you are a householder, devote yourself to the message of the Awakened Ones and to the proper-time, one-meal-a-day, sleeping-alone holy life.” And so Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa's idea of going-forth subsided.
Then a second time as Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa was alone in seclusion, this train of thought appeared to his awareness: “According to the Dhamma that Master Mahā Kaccāyana teaches, it's not easy living at home to practice the holy life totally perfect, totally pure, like a polished shell.
What if I were to shave off my hair & beard, put on the ochre robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness?
So he went to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana and on arrival, having bowed down to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, “Just now, venerable sir, as I was alone in seclusion, this train of thought appeared to my awareness: 'According to the Dhamma that Master Mahā Kaccāyana teaches, it's not easy living at home to practice the holy life totally perfect, totally pure, like a polished shell.
What if I were to shave off my hair & beard, put on the ochre robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness?' Give me the going-forth, Master Mahā Kaccāyana!
When this was said, Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana said to Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa, “It's hard, Soṇa, the life-long, one-meal-a-day, sleeping-alone holy life.
Please, right there as you are a householder, devote yourself to the message of the Awakened Ones and to the proper-time, one-meal-a-day, sleeping-alone holy life.” And so Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa's idea of going-forth subsided a second time.
Then a third time as Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa was alone in seclusion, this train of thought appeared to his awareness: “According to the Dhamma that Master Mahā Kaccāyana teaches, it's not easy living at home to practice the holy life totally perfect, totally pure, like a polished shell.
What if I were to shave off my hair & beard, put on the ochre robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness?
So he went to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana and on arrival, having bowed down to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, “Just now, venerable sir, as I was alone in seclusion, this train of thought appeared to my awareness: 'According to the Dhamma that Master Mahā Kaccāyana teaches, it's not easy living at home to practice the holy life totally perfect, totally pure, like a polished shell.
What if I were to shave off my hair & beard, put on the ochre robes, and go forth from the household life into homelessness?' Give me the going-forth, Master Mahā Kaccāyana!
So Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana gave Soṇa Koṭikaṇṇa the going-forth.
Now at that time the southern country of Avantī was short of monks.
So only after three years — having gathered from here & there with hardship & difficulty a quorum-of-ten community of monks — did Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana give full admission to Ven.
Soṇa.
Then, after having completed the Rains retreat, as he was alone in seclusion, this train of thought appeared to Ven.
Soṇa's awareness: “I haven't seen the Blessed One face-to-face.
I've simply heard that he is like this and like this.
If my preceptor would give me permission, I would go to see the Blessed One, worthy & rightly self-awakened.
So, leaving seclusion in the late afternoon, he went to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, “Just now, venerable sir, as I was alone in seclusion, this train of thought appeared to my awareness: 'I haven't seen the Blessed One face-to-face.
I've simply heard that he is like this and like this.
If my preceptor would give me permission, I would go to see the Blessed One, worthy & rightly self-awakened.' “Good, Soṇa.
Very good.
Go, Soṇa, to see the Blessed One, worthy & rightly self-awakened.
You will see the Blessed One who is serene & inspires serene confidence, his senses at peace, his mind at peace, one who has attained the utmost tranquility & poise, tamed, guarded, his senses restrained, a Great One.
On seeing him, showing reverence with your head to his feet in my name, ask whether he is free from illness & affliction, is carefree, strong, & living in comfort, 
Saying, “As you say, venerable sir,” Ven.
Soṇa — delighting in & approving of Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana's words — got up from his seat, bowed down to Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, circled him to the right, set his lodging in order, and — taking his bowl & robes — set off wandering toward Sāvatthī.
Wandering by stages, he arrived at Sāvatthī, Jeta's Grove, Anāthapiṇḍika's monastery.
He went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there, he said to the Blessed One, “Lord, my preceptor, Ven.
Mahā Kaccāyana, shows reverence with his head to the Blessed One's feet and asks whether the Blessed One is free from illness & affliction, is carefree, strong, & living in comfort.
“Are you well, monk?
Are you in good health?
Have you come along the road with only a little fatigue?
And are you not tired of alms-food?
“I am well, Blessed One.
I am in good health, Blessed One.
I have come along the road, lord, with only a little fatigue and I am not tired of alms-food.
Then the Blessed One addressed Ven.
Ānanda, saying, “Ānanda, prepare bedding for this visiting monk.
Then the thought occurred to Ven.
Ānanda, “When the Blessed One orders me, 'Ānanda, prepare bedding for this visiting monk,' he wants to stay in the same dwelling with that monk.
The Blessed One wants to stay in the same dwelling with Ven.
Soṇa.” So he prepared bedding for Ven.
Soṇa in the dwelling in which the Blessed One was staying.
Then the Blessed One, having spent much of the night sitting in the open air, washed his feet and entered the dwelling.
Likewise, Ven.
Soṇa, having spent much of the night sitting in the open air, washed his feet and entered the dwelling.
Then, getting up toward the end of the night, the Blessed One invited Ven.
Mahā Soṇa, saying, “Monk, I would like you to recite the Dhamma.
Responding, “As you say, lord,” to the Blessed One, Ven.
Soṇa chanted all sixteen parts of the Aṭṭhaka Vagga.
The Blessed One, at the conclusion of Ven.
Soṇa's intonation, expressed high approval: “Good, monk.
Very good.
You have learned the Aṭṭhaka Vagga well, have considered them well, have borne them well in mind.
You have a fine delivery, clear & faultless, that makes the meaning intelligible.
How many Rains do you have?
“I have one Rains, Blessed One.
“But why did you take so long?
“For a long time, lord, I have seen the drawbacks in sensuality, but the household life is confining with many duties, many things to be done.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
At Savatthi.
There Ven.
Sariputta addressed the monks: “Friends!
“Yes, friend,” the monks responded.
Ven.
Sariputta said, “Friends, just now as I was withdrawn in seclusion, this train of thought arose to my awareness: 'Is there anything in the world with whose change or alteration there would arise within me sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair?' Then the thought occurred to me: 'There is nothing in the world with whose change or alteration there would arise within me sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, & despair.' When this was said, Ven.
Ananda said to Ven.
Sariputta, “Sariputta my friend, even if there were change & alteration in the Teacher would there arise within you no sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair?
“Even if there were change & alteration in the Teacher, my friend, there would arise within me no sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair.
Still, I would have this thought: 'What a great being, of great might, of great prowess, has disappeared!
For if the Blessed One were to remain for a long time, that would be for the benefit of many people, for the happiness of many people, out of sympathy for the world; for the welfare, benefit, & happiness of human & divine beings.' “Surely,” “it's because Ven.
Sariputta's I-making & mine-making and obsessions with conceit have long been well uprooted that even if there were change & alteration in the Teacher, there would arise within him no sorrow, lamentation, pain, distress, or despair.
See also: DN; SN..
Translator's note: This discourse is the source of many proverbs frequently quoted in Theravadin countries.
In, when Thailand was celebrating the th anniversary of the founding of the current dynasty, His Majesty the King structured his chief address to the Thai people around the four qualities mentioned in the Buddha's last verse.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Alavi in the haunt of the Alavaka yakkha.
Then the Alavaka yakkha went to the Blessed One and on arrival said to him: “Get out, contemplative!
“All right, my friend,” the Blessed One went out.
“Come in, contemplative!
“All right, my friend,” the Blessed One went in.
A second time… A third time, the Alavaka yakkha said to the Blessed One, “Get out, contemplative!
“All right, my friend,” the Blessed One went out.
“Come in, contemplative!
“All right, my friend,” the Blessed One went in.
Then a fourth time, the Alavaka yakkha said to the Blessed One, “Get out, contemplative!
“I won't go out, my friend.
Do what you have to do.
“I will ask you a question, contemplative.
If you can't answer me, I will possess your mind or rip open your heart or, grabbing you by the feet, hurl you across the Ganges.
“My friend, I see no one in the cosmos with its devas, Maras & Brahmas, its contemplatives & brahmans, its royalty & commonfolk, who could possess my mind or rip open my heart or, grabbing me by the feet, hurl me across the Ganges.
But nevertheless, ask me what you wish.
Translator's note: This discourse is the source of many proverbs frequently quoted in Theravadin countries.
In, when Thailand was celebrating the th anniversary of the founding of the current dynasty, His Majesty the King structured his chief address to the Thai people around the four qualities mentioned in the Buddha's last verse.
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Alavi in the haunt of the Alavaka yakkha.
Then the Alavaka yakkha went to the Blessed One and on arrival said to him: “Get out, contemplative!
“All right, my friend,” the Blessed One went out.
“Come in, contemplative!
“All right, my friend,” the Blessed One went in.
A second time… A third time, the Alavaka yakkha said to the Blessed One, “Get out, contemplative!
“All right, my friend,” the Blessed One went out.
“Come in, contemplative!
“All right, my friend,” the Blessed One went in.
Then a fourth time, the Alavaka yakkha said to the Blessed One, “Get out, contemplative!
“I won't go out, my friend.
Do what you have to do.
“I will ask you a question, contemplative.
If you can't answer me, I will possess your mind or rip open your heart or, grabbing you by the feet, hurl you across the Ganges.
“My friend, I see no one in the cosmos with its devas, Maras & Brahmas, its contemplatives & brahmans, its royalty & commonfolk, who could possess my mind or rip open my heart or, grabbing me by the feet, hurl me across the Ganges.
But nevertheless, ask me what you wish.
According to the Culaniddesa, the streams that “flow every which way” are the streams of craving, views, conceit, defilement, corruption, and ignorance that flow out the six sense media.
The first two lines in Ven.
Ajita's second set of questions is identical to the first half-line in Dhp..
For a more detailed answer to Ajita's last set of questions, see SN..
Staying at Savatthi.
Then King Ajatasattu of Magadha, the son of Queen Videha, raising a fourfold army, marched toward Kasi against King Pasenadi Kosala.
King Pasenadi heard, “King Ajatasattu of Magadha, the son of Queen Videha, they say, has raised a fourfold army and is marching toward Kasi against me.” So King Pasenadi, raising a fourfold army, launched a counter-attack toward Kasi against King Ajatasattu.
Then King Ajatasattu & King Pasenadi fought a battle, and in that battle King Pasenadi defeated King Ajatasattu and captured him alive.
The thought then occurred to King Pasenadi: “Even though King Ajatasattu has wronged me when I have done him no wrong, still he is my nephew.
What if I, having confiscated all his elephant troops, all his cavalry, all his chariots, & all his infantry, were to let him go with just his life?” So King Pasenadi — having confiscated all his elephant troops, cavalry, chariots, & infantry — let King Ajatasattu go with just his life.
Then in the early morning, a large number of monks, having put on their robes and carrying their bowls & outer robes, went into Savatthi for alms.
Having gone for alms in Savatthi, after the meal, returning from their alms round, they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they.
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion spoke these verses:
Staying at Savatthi.
Then King Ajatasattu of Magadha, the son of Queen Videha, raising a fourfold army, marched toward Kasi against King Pasenadi Kosala.
King Pasenadi heard, “King Ajatasattu of Magadha, the son of Queen Videha, they say, has raised a fourfold army and is marching toward Kasi against me.” So King Pasenadi, raising a fourfold army, launched a counter-attack toward Kasi against King Ajatasattu.
Then King Ajatasattu & King Pasenadi fought a battle, and in that battle King Ajatasattu defeated King Pasenadi.
King Pasenadi, defeated, marched back to his capital at Savatthi.
Then in the early morning, a large number of monks, having put on their robes and carrying their bowls & outer robes, went into Savatthi for alms.
Having gone for alms in Savatthi, after the meal, returning from their alms round, they went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As they were sitting there, they said to the Blessed One: “Just now, lord, King Ajatasattu of Magadha, the son of Queen Videha, raising a fourfold army, marched toward Kasi against King Pasenadi Kosala.
King Pasenadi heard, 'King Ajatasattu of Magadha, the son of Queen Videha, they say, has raised a fourfold army and is marching toward Kasi against me.' So King Pasenadi, raising a fourfold army, launched a counter-attack toward Kasi against King Ajatasattu.
Then King Ajatasattu & King Pasenadi fought a battle, and in that battle King Ajatasattu defeated King Pasenadi.
King Pasenadi, defeated, marched back to his capital at Savatthi.
“Monks, King Ajatasattu has evil friends, evil comrades, evil companions, whereas King Pasenadi has fine friends, fine comrades, fine companions.
Yet for now, King Pasenadi will lie down tonight in pain, defeated.
That is what the Blessed One said.
Having said that, the One Well-Gone, the Teacher, said further:
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Pāva at the Ajakalāpaka shrine, the dwelling of the Ajakalāpaka spirit.
And on that occasion, in the pitch-black darkness of the night, the Blessed One was sitting in the open air, and the rain was falling in scattered drops.
Then the Ajakalāpaka spirit — wanting to cause fear, terror, & horripilation in the Blessed One — went to him and, on arrival, not far from him, three times made a commotion & pandemonium: “Commotion & pandemonium!
Commotion & pandemonium!
Commotion & pandemonium!
— That's a goblin for you, contemplative!
Then, on realizing the significance of that, the Blessed One on that occasion exclaimed:
Thus have I heard:
On one occasion the Blessed One was living near Savatthi at Jetavana at Anathapindika's monastery.
Then he addressed the monks saying, “Monks.” — “Venerable Sir,” said the monks, by way of reply.
The Blessed One then spoke as follows:
“Monks, eleven advantages are to be expected from the release of heart by familiarizing oneself with thoughts of loving-kindness, by the cultivation of loving-kindness, by constantly increasing these thoughts, by regarding loving-kindness as a vehicle, and also as something to be treasured, by living in conformity with these thoughts, by putting these ideas into practice, and by establishing them.
What are the eleven?
“He sleeps in comfort..
He awakes in comfort..
He sees no evil dreams..
He is dear to human beings..
He is dear to non-human beings..
Devas protect him..
Fire, poison, and sword cannot touch him..
His mind can concentrate quickly..
His countenance is serene..
He dies without being confused in mind..
If he fails to attain arahantship here and now, he will be reborn in the brahma-world.
“These eleven advantages, monks, are to be expected from the release of heart by familiarizing oneself with thoughts of loving-kindness, by cultivation of loving-kindness, by constantly increasing these thoughts, by regarding loving-kindness as a vehicle, and also as something to be treasured, by living in conformity with these thoughts, by putting these ideas into practice and by establishing them.
So said the Blessed One.
Those monks rejoiced at the words of the Blessed One.
“Monks, for one whose awareness-release through good will is cultivated, developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken, eleven benefits can be expected.
Which eleven?
“One sleeps easily, wakes easily, dreams no evil dreams.
One is dear to human beings, dear to non-human beings.
The devas protect one.
Neither fire, poison, nor weapons can touch one.
One's mind gains concentration quickly.
One's complexion is bright.
One dies unconfused and — if penetrating no higher — is headed for the Brahma worlds.
“These are the eleven benefits that can be expected for one whose awareness-release through good will is cultivated, developed, pursued, handed the reins and taken as a basis, given a grounding, steadied, consolidated, and well-undertaken.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Park.
Now at that time Mahanama the Sakyan had recovered from being ill, was not long recovered from his illness.
And at that time many monks were at work making robes for the Blessed One,, “When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.” Mahanama the Sakyan heard that many monks were at work making robes for the Blessed One,, “When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.” So he approached the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “I have heard that many monks are at work making robes for the Blessed One,, 'When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.' For those of us living by means of various dwelling places, by means of which dwelling place should we live?
“Excellent, Mahanama, excellent!
It is fitting for clansmen like you to approach the Tathagata and ask, 'For those of us living by means of various dwelling places, by means of which dwelling place should we live?'
“One who is aroused to practice is one of conviction, not without conviction.
One aroused to practice is one with persistence aroused, not lazy.
One aroused to practice is one of established mindfulness, not muddled mindfulness.
One aroused to practice is centered in concentration, not uncentered.
One aroused to practice is discerning, not undiscerning.
“Established in these five qualities, you should further develop six qualities:
“There is the case where you recollect the Tathagata: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting the Tathagata, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on the Tathagata.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Mahanama, you should develop this recollection of the Buddha while you are walking, while you are standing, while you are sitting, while you are lying down, while you are busy at work, while you are resting in your home crowded with children.
“Furthermore, there is the case where you recollect the Dhamma: 'The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting the Dhamma, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on the Dhamma.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Mahanama, you should develop this recollection of the Dhamma while you are walking, while you are standing, while you are sitting, while you are lying down, while you are busy at work, while you are resting in your home crowded with children.
“Furthermore, there is the case where you recollect the Sangha: 'The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four types when taken as pairs, the eight when taken as individual types — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting the Sangha, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on the Sangha.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Mahanama, you should develop this recollection of the Sangha while you are walking, while you are standing, while you are sitting, while you are lying down, while you are busy at work, while you are resting in your home crowded with children.
“Furthermore, there is the case where you recollect your own virtues: ' untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, conducive to concentration.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting virtue, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on virtue.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Mahanama, you should develop this recollection of virtue while you are walking, while you are standing, while you are sitting, while you are lying down, while you are busy at work, while you are resting in your home crowded with children.
“Furthermore, there is the case where you recollect your own generosity: 'It is a gain, a great gain for me, that — among people overcome with the stain of possessiveness — I live at home, my awareness cleansed of the stain of possessiveness, freely generous, openhanded, delighting in being magnanimous, responsive to requests, delighting in the distribution of alms.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting generosity, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on generosity.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Mahanama, you should develop this recollection of generosity while you are walking, while you are standing, while you are sitting, while you are lying down, while you are busy at work, while you are resting in your home crowded with children.
“Furthermore, you should recollect the devas: 'There are the Devas of the Four Great Kings, the Devas of the Thirty-three, the Devas of the Hours, the Contented Devas, the devas who delight in creation, the devas who have power over the creations of others, the devas of Brahma's retinue, the devas beyond them.
Whatever conviction they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of conviction is present in me as well.
Whatever virtue they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of virtue is present in me as well.
Whatever learning they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of learning is present in me as well.
Whatever generosity they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of generosity is present in me as well.
Whatever discernment they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of discernment is present in me as well.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting the conviction, virtue, learning, generosity, and discernment found both in himself and the devas, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on the devas.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Mahanama, you should develop this recollection of the devas while you are walking, while you are standing, while you are sitting, while you are lying down, while you are busy at work, while you are resting in your home crowded with children.
See also: AN..
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying among the Sakyans at Kapilavatthu in the Banyan Park.
Now at that time many monks were at work making robes for the Blessed One,, “When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.” Mahanama the Sakyan heard that many monks were at work making robes for the Blessed One,, “When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.” So he approached the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “I have heard that many monks are at work making robes for the Blessed One,, 'When the robes are finished, at the end of the three months, the Blessed One will set out wandering.' For those of us living by means of various dwelling places, by means of which dwelling place should we live?
“Excellent, Mahanama, excellent!
It is fitting for clansmen like you to approach the Tathagata and ask, 'For those of us living by means of various dwelling places, by means of which dwelling place should we live?'
“One who is aroused to practice is one of conviction, not without conviction.
One aroused to practice is one with persistence aroused, not lazy.
One aroused to practice is one of established mindfulness, not muddled mindfulness.
One aroused to practice is centered in concentration, not uncentered.
One aroused to practice is discerning, not undiscerning.
“Established in these five qualities, you should further develop six qualities:
“There is the case where you recollect the Tathagata: 'Indeed, the Blessed One is worthy and rightly self-awakened, consummate in knowledge & conduct, well-gone, an expert with regard to the world, unexcelled as a trainer for those people fit to be tamed, the Teacher of divine & human beings, awakened, blessed.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting the Tathagata, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on the Tathagata.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Of one who does this, Mahanama, it is said: 'Among those who are out of tune, the disciple of the noble ones dwells in tune; among those who are malicious, he dwells without malice; having attained the stream of Dhamma, he develops the recollection of the Buddha.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where you recollect the Dhamma: 'The Dhamma is well-expounded by the Blessed One, to be seen here & now, timeless, inviting verification, pertinent, to be realized by the wise for themselves.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting the Dhamma, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on the Dhamma.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Of one who does this, Mahanama, it is said: 'Among those who are out of tune, the disciple of the noble ones dwells in tune; among those who are malicious, he dwells without malice; having attained the stream of Dhamma, he develops the recollection of the Dhamma.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where you recollect the Sangha: 'The Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples who have practiced well… who have practiced straight-forwardly… who have practiced methodically… who have practiced masterfully — in other words, the four types when taken as pairs, the eight when taken as individual types — they are the Sangha of the Blessed One's disciples: worthy of gifts, worthy of hospitality, worthy of offerings, worthy of respect, the incomparable field of merit for the world.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting the Sangha, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on the Sangha.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Of one who does this, Mahanama, it is said: 'Among those who are out of tune, the disciple of the noble ones dwells in tune; among those who are malicious, he dwells without malice; having attained the stream of Dhamma, he develops the recollection of the Sangha.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where you recollect your own virtues: ' untorn, unbroken, unspotted, unsplattered, liberating, praised by the wise, untarnished, conducive to concentration.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting virtue, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on virtue.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Of one who does this, Mahanama, it is said: 'Among those who are out of tune, the disciple of the noble ones dwells in tune; among those who are malicious, he dwells without malice; having attained the stream of Dhamma, he develops the recollection of virtue.'
“Furthermore, there is the case where you recollect your own generosity: 'It is a gain, a great gain for me, that — among people overcome with the stain of possessiveness — I live at home, my awareness cleansed of the stain of possessiveness, freely generous, openhanded, delighting in being magnanimous, responsive to requests, delighting in the distribution of alms.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting generosity, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on generosity.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Of one who does this, Mahanama, it is said: 'Among those who are out of tune, the disciple of the noble ones dwells in tune; among those who are malicious, he dwells without malice; having attained the stream of Dhamma, he develops the recollection of generosity.'
“Furthermore, you should recollect the devas: 'There are the devas of the Four Great Kings, the devas of the Thirty-three, the devas of the Hours, the Contented Devas, the devas who delight in creation, the devas who have power over the creations of others, the devas of Brahma's retinue, the devas beyond them.
Whatever conviction they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of conviction is present in me as well.
Whatever virtue they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of virtue is present in me as well.
Whatever learning they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of learning is present in me as well.
Whatever generosity they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of generosity is present in me as well.
Whatever discernment they were endowed with that — when falling away from this life — they re-arose there, the same sort of discernment is present in me as well.' At any time when a disciple of the noble ones is recollecting the conviction, virtue, learning, generosity, and discernment found both in himself and the devas, his mind is not overcome with passion, not overcome with aversion, not overcome with delusion.
His mind heads straight, based on the devas.
And when the mind is headed straight, the disciple of the noble ones gains a sense of the goal, gains a sense of the Dhamma, gains joy connected with the Dhamma.
In one who is joyful, rapture arises.
In one who is rapturous, the body grows calm.
One whose body is calmed experiences ease.
In one at ease, the mind becomes concentrated.
“Of one who does this, Mahanama, it is said: 'Among those who are out of tune, the disciple of the noble ones dwells in tune; among those who are malicious, he dwells without malice; having attained the stream of Dhamma, he develops the recollection of the devas.' See also: AN..
On one occasion the Blessed One was staying at Nadika in the Brick Hall.
Then Ven.
Sandha went to the Blessed One and, on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there the Blessed One said to him, “Sandha, practice the absorption of a thoroughbred horse, not the absorption of an unbroken colt.
And how is an unbroken colt absorbed?
“An unbroken colt, tied to the feeding trough, is absorbed with the thought, 'Barley grain!
Barley grain!' Why is that?
Because as he is tied to the feeding trough, the thought does not occur to him, 'I wonder what task the trainer will have me do today?
What should I do in response?' Tied to the feeding trough, he is simply absorbed with the thought, 'Barley grain!
Barley grain!'
“In the same way, there are cases where an unbroken colt of a man, having gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, dwells with his awareness overcome by sensual passion, obsessed with sensual passion.
He does not discern the escape, as it actually is present, from sensual passion once it has arisen.
Making that sensual passion the focal point, he absorbs himself with it, besorbs, resorbs, & supersorbs himself with it.
“He dwells with his awareness overcome by ill will… sloth & drowsiness… restlessness & anxiety… uncertainty, obsessed with uncertainty.
He does not discern the escape, as it actually is present, from uncertainty once it has arisen.
Making that uncertainty the focal point, he absorbs himself with it, besorbs, resorbs, & supersorbs himself with it.
“He is absorbed dependent on earth… liquid… fire… wind… the sphere of the infinitude of space… the sphere of the infinitude of consciousness… the sphere of nothingness… the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception… this world… the next world… whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, pondered by the intellect.
That is how an unbroken colt of a man is absorbed.
“And how is a thoroughbred absorbed?
An excellent thoroughbred horse tied to the feeding trough, is not absorbed with the thought, 'Barley grain!
Barley grain!' Why is that?
Because as he is tied to the feeding trough, the thought occurs to him, 'I wonder what task the trainer will have me do today?
What should I do in response?' Tied to the feeding trough, he is not absorbed with the thought, 'Barley grain!
Barley grain!' The excellent thoroughbred horse regards the feel of the spur as a debt, an imprisonment, a loss, a piece of bad luck.
“In the same way, an excellent thoroughbred of a man, having gone to the wilderness, to the foot of a tree, or to an empty dwelling, dwells with his awareness not overcome by sensual passion, not obsessed with sensual passion.
He discerns the escape, as it actually is present, from sensual passion once it has arisen.
“He dwells with his awareness not overcome by ill will… sloth & drowsiness… restlessness & anxiety… uncertainty, obsessed with uncertainty.
He discerns the escape, as it actually is present, from uncertainty once it has arisen.
“He is absorbed dependent neither on earth, liquid, fire, wind, the sphere of the infinitude of space, the sphere of the infinitude of consciousness, the sphere of nothingness, the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception, this world, the next world, nor on whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, or pondered by the intellect — and yet he is absorbed.
And to this excellent thoroughbred of a man, absorbed in this way, the gods, together with Indra, the Brahmas, & Pajapati, pay homage even from afar:
When this was said, Ven.
Sandha said to the Blessed One, “But in what way, lord, is the excellent thoroughbred of a man absorbed when he is absorbed dependent neither on earth, liquid, heat, wind, the sphere of the infinitude of space, the sphere of the infinitude of consciousness, the sphere of nothingness, the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception, this world, the next world, nor on whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, or pondered by the intellect — and yet he is absorbed, so that to this excellent thoroughbred of a man, absorbed in this way, the gods, together with Indra, the Brahmas, & Pajapati, pay homage even from afar:
“There is the case, Sandha, where for an excellent thoroughbred of a man the perception of earth with regard to earth has ceased to exist; the perception of liquid with regard to liquid… the perception of fire with regard to fire… the perception of wind with regard to wind… the perception of the sphere of the infinitude of space with regard to the sphere of the infinitude of space… the perception of the sphere of the infinitude of consciousness with regard to the sphere of the infinitude of consciousness… the perception of the sphere of nothingness with regard to the sphere of nothingness… the perception of the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception with regard to the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception… the perception of this world with regard to this world… the next world with regard to the next world… and whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, or pondered by the intellect: the perception of that has ceased to exist.
“Absorbed in this way, the excellent thoroughbred of a man is absorbed dependent neither on earth, liquid, fire, wind, the sphere of the infinitude of space, the sphere of the infinitude of consciousness, the sphere of nothingness, the sphere of neither perception nor non-perception, this world, the next world, nor on whatever is seen, heard, sensed, cognized, attained, sought after, or pondered by the intellect — and yet he is absorbed.
And to this excellent thoroughbred of a man, absorbed in this way, the gods, together with Indra, the Brahmas, & Pajapati, pay homage even from afar:
“For a person endowed with virtue, consummate in virtue, there is no need for an act of will, 'May freedom from remorse arise in me.' It is in the nature of things that freedom from remorse arises in a person endowed with virtue, consummate in virtue.
“For a person free from remorse, there is no need for an act of will, 'May joy arise in me.' It is in the nature of things that joy arises in a person free from remorse.
“For a joyful person, there is no need for an act of will, 'May rapture arise in me.' It is in the nature of things that rapture arises in a joyful person.
“For a rapturous person, there is no need for an act of will, 'May my body be serene.' It is in the nature of things that a rapturous person grows serene in body.
“For a person serene in body, there is no need for an act of will, 'May I experience pleasure.' It is in the nature of things that a person serene in body experiences pleasure.
“For a person experiencing pleasure, there is no need for an act of will, 'May my mind grow concentrated.' It is in the nature of things that the mind of a person experiencing pleasure grows concentrated.
“For a person whose mind is concentrated, there is no need for an act of will, 'May I know & see things as they actually are.' It is in the nature of things that a person whose mind is concentrated knows & sees things as they actually are.
“For a person who knows & sees things as they actually are, there is no need for an act of will, 'May I feel disenchantment.' It is in the nature of things that a person who knows & sees things as they actually are feels disenchantment.
“For a person who feels disenchantment, there is no need for an act of will, 'May I grow dispassionate.' It is in the nature of things that a person who feels disenchantment grows dispassionate.
“For a dispassionate person, there is no need for an act of will, 'May I realize the knowledge & vision of release.' It is in the nature of things that a dispassionate person realizes the knowledge & vision of release.
“In this way, dispassion has knowledge & vision of release as its purpose, knowledge & vision of release as its reward.
Disenchantment has dispassion as its purpose, dispassion as its reward.
Knowledge & vision of things as they actually are has disenchantment as its purpose, disenchantment as its reward.
Concentration has knowledge & vision of things as they actually are as its purpose, knowledge & vision of things as they actually are as its reward.
Pleasure has concentration as its purpose, concentration as its reward.
Serenity has pleasure as its purpose, pleasure as its reward.
Rapture has serenity as its purpose, serenity as its reward.
Joy has rapture as its purpose, rapture as its reward.
Freedom from remorse has joy as its purpose, joy as its reward.
Skillful virtues have freedom from remorse as their purpose, freedom from remorse as their reward.
“In this way, mental qualities lead on to mental qualities, mental qualities bring mental qualities to their consummation, for the sake of going from the near to the Further Shore.”
I have heard that on one occasion the Blessed One was staying near Savatthi in Jeta's Grove, Anathapindika's monastery.
Then Ven.
Ananda went to the Blessed One and on arrival, having bowed down to him, sat to one side.
As he was sitting there he said to the Blessed One: “What is the purpose of skillful virtues?
What is their reward?
“Skillful virtues have freedom from remorse as their purpose, Ananda, and freedom from remorse as their reward.
“And what is the purpose of freedom from remorse?
What is its reward?
“Freedom from remorse has joy as its purpose, joy as its reward.
“And what is the purpose of joy?
What is its reward?
“Joy has rapture as its purpose, rapture as its reward.
“And what is the purpose of rapture?
What is its reward?
“Rapture has serenity as its purpose, serenity as its reward.
“And what is the purpose of serenity?
What is its reward?
“Serenity has pleasure as its purpose, pleasure as its reward.
“And what is the purpose of pleasure?
What is its reward?
“Pleasure has concentration as its purpose, concentration as its reward.
“And what is the purpose of concentration?
What is its reward?
“Concentration has knowledge & vision of things as they actually are as its purpose, knowledge & vision of things as they actually are as its reward.
“And what is the purpose of knowledge & vision of things as they actually are?
What is its reward?
“Knowledge & vision of things as they actually are has disenchantment as its purpose, disenchantment as its reward.
“And what is the purpose of disenchantment?
